{"1544142600": [[{"Title": "Approval of Minutes for the Redevelopment Successor Agency, Housing Authority, Parking Authority and Public Financing Authority Meetings", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the minutes for the following meetings:1. Parking Authority \u2013 April 8, 2014, October 28, 2014, June 23, 2015 and June 14, 20162. Public Finance Authority \u2013 June 9, 20153. Redevelopment Successor Agency \u2013 January 12, January 26, February 23, May 24, and June 14, 20164. Housing Authority \u2013 January 26, April 12, May 24, and June 14, 2016"}], [{"Title": "Big Blue Bus (BBB) Custodial Services", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4254 to Coastal Building Services, Inc., a California company, for custodial services at BBBs' 1660 7th Street facilities; andAuthorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Coastal Building Services, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $180,000 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options subject to an increase based on the Living Wage Ordinance, for a total amount not to exceed $915,800 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends an agreement with Coastal Building Services, Inc., to provide custodial services for the Big Blue Bus (BBB) administration and maintenance facilities in an amount not to exceed $180,000 for one year with four additional one-year options, for a total amount not to exceed $915,800. The award would ensure that there is no interruption of custodial services, thereby, maintaining BBB buildings and facilities at a high level of hygienic and cleanliness conditions for the health, safety, and wellbeing of staff, in addition to maintaining them to the level of cleanliness befitting public assets.", "Background", "BBB is a 24/7 operation, and cleaning of the facilities is an ongoing task with multiple buildings, including the Maintenance facility, the Fuel and Wash Island, and the Administration building. In total, the square footage of the facilities is approximately 95,000 square feet. Within these buildings, custodial services are needed on a daily, weekly and monthly basis including basic daily cleaning in all offices, restrooms, breakrooms and general space areas. Because of the industrial nature of BBB and the volume of employees within the facilities, detailed cleaning of multiple areas is an on-going job on a weekly and monthly basis as well. Also included are several types of flooring that require consistent care and special equipment. Staff is recommending a new contractual services agreement with Coastal Building Services, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $180,000 for one year with four additional one-year renewal options for a total amount not to exceed $915,800 over a five-year period, with future years contingent on Council budget approval.", "Discussion", "On December 5, 2014, the City executed a Contractual Services Agreement (CSA) with Goodwill for an amount of $105,000 to provide custodial services for BBB facilities, with two one-year renewal options. Goodwill was unable to complete the work as bid. Therefore, after expending $42,000, a new CSA was awarded to the second best bidder, Able Building Maintenance, in the amount of $140,000 on August 13, 2015. The combined amount expended between the two CSAs was approaching the threshold of City Manager authority; therefore, BBB initiated a new bidding process for a five-year contract.", "Method of Service", "On August 26, 2014, staff was directed by Council to review contracted services throughout the City and identify situations where contracted services could be brought in-house. Per Attachment A of the January 13, 2015 Staff Report titled Contract and As-Needed Staff Review Report, custodial and building maintenance services were identified as meeting the criteria for contractual services under the categories of space required, equipment required, and workforce flexibility.", "Bid #4254 requires the vendor to provide all equipment needed to deliver the contracted services, saving the City costs associated with the purchase and storage of equipment. In addition to cost savings, the nature of custodial work needed requires a large employee pool that would work every evening, as well as requisite supervision during those evenings and work hours.", "The alternative to awarding bid #4254 is to perform all custodial services in-house. This would require four additional full-time employees as well as supervisory staff to oversee this function, training of the processes in place at BBB, and the purchase of additional custodial equipment. The total expenditure for comparable in-house services for the five-year term would be $1,471,274.", "Based on the expense associated with bringing this service in-house, staff recommends that Council award bid #4254 to Coastal Building Services, Inc., for custodial services at BBB\u2019s 1660 7th Street facilities. The total expenditure for the five-year term is $915,800.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On October 6, 2016, the City published a Notice of Inviting Bids to provide custodial services to BBB's 1660 7th Street facilities in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on Planet Bids, the City's online bidding site, and advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Forty-eight vendors downloaded the bid, and four bid responses were received and publicly opened on October 25th, 2016.", "Two of the bidders were non-responsive, failing to provide renewal options. Of the remaining two responsive bidders, Coastal Building Services, Inc. had the lowest annual cost based on BBB\u2019s projected service needs. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Coastal Building Services, Inc., meets these criteria evidenced through prior experience working for the City as well as high recommendations from other clients. Coastal Building Services, Inc., was a vendor for the City of Santa Monica from 2011-2014. They were selected as the vendor for custodial services for several city buildings, and come highly recommended by City staff in Public Works. They also have several very positive references, including from the City of Laguna Niguel, City of Dana Point and Cedars Sinai Hospital. Based on these criteria, Coastal Building Services, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Coastal Building Services, Inc., is for an amount not to exceed $915,800. Funds of $180,000 are available in the FY 2016-2017 budget in the BBB Transit Facilities Maintenance Division. The contract will be charged to account 416574.555015. Future year funding is contingent upon Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Change of Concept for 250 Santa Monica Pier", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease modification with Romana Pier LLC., to change the restaurant concept and trade name at 250 Santa Monica Pier.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Romana Pier LLC, a City tenant who currently operates an Italian restaurant named Ristorante Al Mare on the Santa Monica Pier, has proposed to change the restaurant\u2019s concept and name. Council approval is necessary because the 2010 lease specifies the food type and trade name, requiring City approval of substantive changes. Thetenant proposes to rebrand the restaurant as a fast-casual restaurant with counter and sit-down service, featuring American-inspired fare such as salads, sandwiches, and burgers. The proposed restaurant name is \u201cEarl\u2019s Seaside Tavern.\u201d Both the trade name and concept have been developed specifically for the Pier and the restaurant location, in order to further the vision for the Pier and remain consistent with the Pier\u2019s leasing guidelines.", "Background", "On January 6, 2010, the City as Landlord entered into a lease agreement with Romana Pier LLC (Tenant) for the operation of a full-service Italian restaurant with alcohol service and ancillary entertainment located at 250 Santa Monica Pier. The restaurant is situated within the Billiards Building on the landmarked Santa Monica Pier (Pier) and had previously been home to several nightclubs, including the Arcadia and theAshgrove. The existing space was entirely renovated. As part of the remodel, the Tenant created the Pier\u2019s first rooftop, outdoor dining patio, offering visitors outstanding vantage points from which to view the Pier, beach, and coastline. However, after six years of operating as an Italian restaurant, the Tenant believes a new concept and associated trade name for the restaurant is needed in order to better serve visitors to the Pier.", "On August 9, 2016, Council considered the Tenant\u2019s request for a change in restaurant concept and trade name (Attachment A). The proposed concept was a fast-casual, modern interpretation of Mexican fare with the name \u201cCantina Taqueria\u201d. Council asked a variety of questions and directed staff to return with additional information. However, rather than continue to pursue the Mexican concept further, the Tenant has instead proposed a new restaurant concept and trade name for Council\u2019s consideration.", "Discussion", "The Tenant has proposed a revised restaurant concept that incorporates counter service on the ground floor with a menu consisting predominately of sandwiches. The remainder of the restaurant would provide sit-down service with a larger menu (Attachment B) featuring American-inspired fare such as salads, sandwiches, and burgers, with the restaurant name of \u201cEarl\u2019s Seaside Tavern\u201d and associated building signage (Attachment C). Although the Tenant abandoned its proposal for a Mexican restaurant, staff has evaluated the revised proposal within the framework of the questions raised by Council. Council directed staff to return with additional information regarding the Pier Leasing Guideline\u2019s standards for the diversity of uses, the availability of vegetarian menu options on the proposed menu, the Pier Board\u2019s comments, and labor peace lease provisions for Pier tenants. The following summarizes the evaluation.", "Pier Leasing Guidelines and tenant diversity: The Pier Leasing Guidelines, approved by Council on April 8, 2014 (Attachment D), state that the City will seek out \u201cfood options and activities that are thematically compatible with the Pier yet not overly duplicative of the products and services already offered on the Pier\u201d. While the proposed menu includes some items served at other Pier restaurants, approximately two-thirds of the menu items are unique to the Pier.  Additionally, while the Leasing Guidelines do not specifically prohibit chain operations on the Pier, they do emphasize maintaining the Pier\u2019s own \u201cpersonality\u201d and unique character rather than offering a replication of things at other piers and places. The Tenant is co-owned by Planet Hollywood. Planet Hollywood owns the Buca di Beppo and Earl of Sandwich chains and has a new concept in Las Vegas called Tequila Taqueria. The Tenant initially explored pursuing the chain concepts for the Pier, but following their familiarization with the Pier Leasing Guidelines, instead chose to proceed with a name and concept tailored to the Santa Monica Pier. The Tenant understands the importance of individualizing their operations to the unique environment of the Santa Monica Pier and proposes the \u201cEarl\u2019s Seaside Tavern\u201d to be a one-of-a-kind establishment found only on the Santa Monica Pier.", "Vegetarian items: The proposed menu includes a variety of vegetarian items.", "Pier Board comments: While the Pier Leasing Guidelines do not give the Pier Board a defined role in evaluating prospective tenants or changes in tenancy, the board reviewed the proposed change of concept on November 21, 2016. The board was supportive of the proposed branding, trade name, and menu, noting that the changes would encourage family-friendly patronage consistent with the Pier overall. The board also supported the proposed colors and finishes and felt that the changes to the front area of the restaurant would enhance access and activation. The board encouraged the new management to work with the other Pier leaseholders for mutual benefit and follow the City\u2019s sustainability standards. Lastly, some board members expressed concerns about the use of \u201cTavern\u201d in the restaurant\u2019s name.", "Labor Peace: The labor peace provision in the Romana Pier LLC lease is consistent with the labor peace provisions required in the current Pier Leasing Guidelines. OnAugust 23, 2016, Council directed staff to update the Pier Leasing Guidelines with a revised labor peace provision, with consideration for whether certain micro-businesses should be exempt from the provisions. Staff plans to present the revised guidelines incorporating the new labor peace provision for Council\u2019s review in early 2017.", "Next Steps", "If the menu and trade name are approved, the Tenant intends to initiate a remodel of the interior space and exterior fa\u00e7ade which would be subject to regulatory approvals such as a Certificate of Appropriateness from the Landmarks Commission and a modification of a Conditional Use Permit by the Planning Commission.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Housing Authority Proposed Revision to 2016 Administrative Plan", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the proposed revisions to the 2016 Housing Authority Administrative Plan.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Housing Authority operates rental housing voucher programs funded by the federal government which are implemented based upon an Administrative Plan. The plan must be periodically updated to reflect changes mandated by federal regulations, as well as revisions in discretionary policies determined by a local housing authority. Key aspects of the proposed discretionary revisions to the current plan include separate waiting lists for the four voucher programs (which serve different populations), streamlining procedures for the waiting lists, expanded priorities for residents who are displaced or severely rent burdened, clarification regarding rent limits and annual rent increases, and enhanced protocols regarding tenant responsibilities. Changes to the existing plan require approval by the City Council.", "Background", "The U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) provides federal funds to the Santa Monica Housing Authority (HA) to administer rental assistance programs for approximately 1,400 very low-income households. Since approval of the 2016 Administrative Plan (Plan) earlier this year, HUD regulations governing the Section 8 Program have changed and trigger mandatory changes to the Plan. Further, HUD permits the local jurisdiction to make discretionary policies and procedures to administer the HA\u2019s rental subsidy programs, after a public comment period.", "The Administrative Plan is not a strategic or planning document, rather an operations manual of policies and procedures. Its purpose varies for each of our constituencies:", "\u00b7 It informs the Housing Commission and City Council regarding the policies of the HA on all aspects of program operations.", "\u00b7 It serves as a policy and procedures manual for staff to adhere to uniformly and consistently in their daily work.", "\u00b7 It provides the standard by which participants and the public can determine if applicants and participants are being treated equitably.", "\u00b7 It notifies HUD of the policies the HA has adopted in conformity with HUD Regulations.", "\u00b7 HUD expects the HA to develop policies and procedures that are consistent with mandatory regulations and to make clear the optional or discretionary policies the HA has adopted. HUD\u2019s direction under 24 CFR 982.54 requires the HA to make policy choices that provide guidance to staff, the public, and program applicants and participants. If local policies conflict with HUD regulations, HUD regulations take precedence.", "The context of the Plan begins with federal laws that govern the programs. HUD writes regulations and notices to interpret, clarify, and define the laws. The HA then develops policies and procedures consistent with the regulations and notices and compiles the policies in the Plan.", "Discussion", "The proposed revisions to the 2016 Plan reflect and comply with changes in HUD regulations and HA operations, in order to help ensure staff consistency in administration. Staff proposes revisions to the discretionary policies governing the administration of the wait lists, and rent limits for housing subject to affordability covenants. The proposed revisions to the discretionary policies in the Plan are detailed in Attachment B. Highlights of proposed discretionary revisions to the 2016 Plan include policies which:", "1. Adds language to distinguish vouchers funded by federal HOME grants from the Section 8 Housing Choice Voucher Program.", "2. Adds language to clarify that the revised Administrative Plan becomes effective upon approval by City Council, rather than HUD.", "3. Adds language that is consistent with HUD regulations for situations where two parents share joint custody of minor children, clarifying that only one parent is eligible for the HUD dependent deduction and only one parent is eligible to receive a voucher size appropriate to accommodate the minor children.", "4. Proposes changes to the administration of the wait list: (Staff anticipates opening the Housing Choice Voucher and inclusionary housing wait lists in early2017. The Continuum of Care and HOME wait lists are referral-only lists that are proposed to remain open. Anyone remaining on the existing wait lists with a continued interest would have an opportunity to apply for the new wait lists.)", "a. Requires applicants to utilize the online system \u201cAssistance Check\u201d to apply and report changes to their housing applications.", "b. Adds language to clarify that the Housing Choice Voucher (HCV) wait list may be closed upon receipt of an adequate number of applications.", "c. Adds a procedure to maintain a wait list of 500 total applications for Tenant-Based and Project-Based Voucher (PBV).", "d. Adds language permitting one wait list for HCV and PBV, and separate wait lists for Continuum of Care, inclusionary housing, and HOME programs. The separate wait lists for Continuum of Care and HOME programs are proposed to remain open while funding is available in order to address immediate needs. The inclusionary housing wait list is recommended to remain open at all times in order to ensure sufficient applicants.", "e. Adds clarifying instructions to applicants who request to add family members to their application while they are awaiting selection from a wait list.", "f. Adds clarifying language to allow applicants to remain on multiple wait lists after being selected to participate in one of the HA\u2019s programs.", "g. Adds language to further describe households eligible for special admission to the wait list (e.g., admission due to expiring affordability covenants on a HUD-financed senior project).", "h. Adds two new categories of displacement that are eligible for a Tier 1 priority:", "\u00b7 A family assisted through a federal housing program and displaced from that program for reasons beyond their control, or", "\u00b7 Victims of domestic violence/familial abuse, sexual assault or stalking.", "i. Adds a new priority for sorting applications within the Tiers by assigning additional points to households who are Severely Rent Burdened.", "5. Adds a document to the Briefing Packet, which is given to all new participants, reminding households to report any income changes to the HA within 10 business days.", "6. Adds a provision that requires a household to notify their landlord in writing when repairs are required in the apartment.", "7. Adds language regarding changes in household composition as it relates to changes in the bedroom size of the voucher.", "8. Adds language requiring that a household must be able to receive mail through the U.S. postal service and at the address funded by the HA.", "9. Adds language to clarify the rent-increase request process for landlords/owners:", "a. Adds language which specifies that requests for rent increases from owners must align with the annual recertification process.", "b. Adds language to deny the addition of surcharges or pass-through fees on Rent Controlled apartments above the contract rent amount determined by the HA.", "c. Adds language to approve annual rent increases associated with the General Adjustment approved by the Rent Control Board, if funding is available.", "10. Modifies parameters for completing quality control inspections requiring the use of an apartment sample completed in the previous month, as opposed to the previous three months.", "11. Adds additional language to deter failure to report income, including an ability to move to termination after two or more occurrences of failure to report income within 36 months.", "12. Adds clarifying language for procedures when a household owes debt to the HA that must be repaid within 30 days.", "13. Adds detailed policy regarding rent determinations for deed-restricted apartments (apartments with recorded affordability covenants).", "14. Adds the term \u201cProof of Effort\u201d to the glossary as it was not previously defined; Proof of Effort is a form which documents that an applicant is searching for an apartment.", "15. Adds language to update information regarding the demographics and population served under the Family-Self Sufficiency (FSS) program.", "16. Adds language to clarify administrative policies for the FSS program specifically related to the Program Coordinating Committee (PCC), outreach methods, participant selection, case management, and program requirements.", "The proposed revisions to the 2016 Administrative Plan are available on the SMHA\u2019s website. (Attachment B)", "The proposed revisions to the Administrative Plan have been presented to the Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles, Housing Commission, Commission for the Senior Community, Social Services Commission, and Disability Commission. The proposed Plan was available for public comment until November 7, 2016. All comments received are included in Attachment C, with responses to be included as an attachment in the final Plan.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Two-year Pilot Program Offering Reduced-Cost Big Blue Bus Passes for Youth and Students", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Transit Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council:1. Approve a two-year Youth Pass pilot program to provide a reduced fare for youth who ride Big Blue Bus (BBB); 2. Adopt a two-year reduced fare Youth Pass priced at $19 per month; and3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report. #0", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica continually strives to improve its service to its residents and its customers, by becoming a city of wellbeing that works for everyone, introducing initiatives that fulfill the City Council\u2019s prioritized set of strategic goals adopted at its special meeting on August 23, 2015.  Mobility and youth-focused initiatives speak to the Council\u2019s established priorities. Big Blue Bus has explored various strategies to increase mobility amongst youth riders, including reducing the cost of the monthly youth pass from $40 to $38 through a fare restructure proposal to City Council on October 27, 2015. At this meeting, Council voted unanimously to further reduce the cost of the 30-day Big Blue Bus Youth Passes from the proposed $38 to $28 and initiate a one-year pilot in January 2016.", "The $28 monthly youth pass was extremely popular during BBB\u2019s Buy One Get One (BOGO) program with sales of the youth pass out-performing sales for the same time period in years past. Based on the success of the reduced cost youth pass, BBB staff proposes that Council adopt further discounting the youth pass to $19 per month through the proposed two-year pilot Youth Pass Program. Staff recommends funding this new two-year pilot program with funds remaining from the BOGO program totaling $91,024. Staff would monitor sales of the youth pass during the first year of the pilot program and provide updates and final funding requests for Council adoption in the FY17-19 Biennial Budget in June of 2017.", "Background", "The Big Blue Bus Youth Pass is an unlimited ride 30-day pass available to all riders between five and eighteen years of age. As with all Big Blue Bus (BBB) fare media, this pass is available to any customer regardless of where they reside, as long they meet the particular eligibility criteria for each pass; eligibility age between five and eighteen being the criteria for the youth pass. At the October 27, 2015 Council meeting, BBB staff proposed a new fare structure that increased the base cash fare, but discounted other fare media, including the 30-day Youth Pass from $40 to $38 per month. Based upon public hearing feedback by members of the community and the PTA at SAMOHI and in an effort to increase ridership among young people, the Council directed staff to further discount the youth pass by $10 to $28 per month for a one-year period, and agreed to fund the difference.", "The discounted pass was extremely popular during BBB\u2019s Buy One Get One (BOGO) program, another Council funded initiative to incentivize youth ridership, with sales of the youth pass totaling 2,915 for a program subsidy of $29,150 through the end of September. Projecting that this trend continues through the end of the one-year pilot, the number of youth passes sold would be approximately 3,886, a 101% increase over sales for the same period in 2015 when BBB sold 1,925 youth passes.", "At its September 13, 2016 meeting, at the request of Councilmember McKeown, Council directed staff to explore and return with recommendations for a two-year pilot program offering extremely reduced-cost Big Blue Bus passes for SMMUSD students, as part of the City\u2019s ongoing GoSaMo program. Through this direction, Council highlighted that such a program would be in pursuit of one of the Council\u2019s adopted top-five priorities, mobility, with hopes of increasing safety and reducing individual private vehicular traffic near schools.", "Discussion", "The BBB Youth Pass became more popular in 2016 with staff marketing and outreach to SAMOHI, the discounting of the pass by Council, and the BOGO program. Pass sales achieved an all-time high with more than 2,915 passes sold through September in the calendar year. The youth pass allows youth between the ages of five and eighteen to ride any line, any time during a thirty-day consecutive period. Passes are sold and usable year round. Historically for the month of August, which is the most popular sales month for the pass, BBB sold 170 passes in 2013, 226 in 2014, and 278 in 2015. This year, 893 youth passes were sold in August (including the BOGO promotion), which can be credited to staff outreach, the popularity of BOGO, and Council\u2019s direction at the October 27, 2015 meeting to offer a program to incentivize the City\u2019s youth to ride transit.", "During the last year, staff has also made significant progress at other SMMUSD schools and LAUSD schools in the BBB service area to increase youth ridership, through a focused campaign called Blue to School. Direct outreach to Paul Revere Middle School at Allenford and Sunset Blvd has resulted in daily ridership of 61 students travelling to and from the school on BBB. Staff promoted the Buy One, Get One free (BOGO) and discounted youth 30-day youth pass with a bilingual flier distributed via email to 66 school and parent leaders at both primary and secondary schools within the BBB service area. Staff also developed a prospecting model to identify secondary schools with which to develop relationships to formally promote the use of Big Blue Bus to expand accessibility to their locations and to cut down vehicle trips. Nineteen prospective schools were identified using this model. Staff initiated relationships with each through sending information about BOGO by US mail, an extra effort to ensure awareness of BBB initiatives supporting youth ridership.", "Big Blue Bus also partners with SMMUSD and theSafe Routes to School programfor the bi-annualBike it! Walk it! Bus it! events. BBB provided an average of 278free rides to students duringeacheventweektoencouragestudents to tryan active mode oftransportationto get to class.Additionally,an in-busbilingualaudio ad promoting the 30-Dayyouth pass has been playingon allBBB buses every 45 minutes since June 2016.", "Staff proposes a two-year pilot Youth Pass Program reducing the monthly youth pass price to $19 providing a healthy incentive as BBB increases its Blue to School campaign in 2017 as a comprehensive outreach program. The benefits of the program align with the Council\u2019s goal of improving mobility access options in the City, is in line with the Climate Action Plan adopted by Council, and reduces overall congestion in the peak periods through the reduction of vehicle trips to schools now undertaken by parents who personally transport their children. Staff projects that the youth pass program would sell over 4,275 passes in 2017 based upon this historical data, planning for a 10% increase should the Council adopt further discounting the youth pass to $19 per month through the proposed two-year pilot Youth Pass Program. Staff recommends funding this new two-year pilot program with funds remaining from the BOGO program totaling $91,024. The projected subsidy for funding the Youth Pass Program would total $81,225 for the first year of the pilot program. The remaining $9,799 would be allocated for the administration of the program and educational and marketing materials for outreach.", "Staff will undertake a comprehensive outreach program to educate and market the youth pass program and BBB service to schools. In addition, the post-Evolution of Blue service analysis will provide staff data to help determine whether additional modifications to schedules and routing would benefit additional school ridership patterns.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Funding for Year 1 of the Youth Pass pilot program requires a budget transfer of $91,024 from account SO015103.589000 to account SO015103.589200. Staff will update Council during the study session on the FY17-19 Biennial Budget to recommend adoption of the final budget for the two-year program."]}, {"Title": "Annual Report on Low- and Moderate-Income Housing Asset Fund", "Department": "Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Receive the Annual Report on the Low- and Moderate-Income Housing Asset Fund for Fiscal Year 2015-16 and authorize staff to post the report on the City's website by December31,2016; and2. Direct staff to present the independent audit of the Low- and Moderate-Income Housing Asset Fund to the Council upon completion of the independent audit of the City\u2019s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR) and authorize staff to post the results of the audit on the City's website after presentation to City Council.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "State law requires the City to report annually on the low- and moderate-income housing asset fund (Fund) of the former Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency. For fiscal year 2015-16, the Fund included approximately $4.5 million to fund the preservation and -production of affordable housing within the next three years. In addition, the former Agency\u2019s inclusionary and replacement housing obligations have been satisfied. Thelaw also requires an independent audit of the Fund, which will be completed as part of the City\u2019s annual audit process.", "Background", "Santa Monica\u2019s former redevelopment agency pursued a robust program of supporting and financing the preservation and production of affordable housing, contributing far more than required by state law toward affordable housing. Since the dissolution of the redevelopment agency, the housing successor agency has taken responsibility for investing the former agency\u2019s housing assets. The housing assets primarily consist of repayment of affordable housing loans made by the former agency, interest earned on cash balances, and 20 percent of the repayment of loans between the City and the former agency. In Santa Monica\u2019s case, Council committed the remaining 80 percent of repayment of City/Agency loan repayments toward affordable housing. The former agency\u2019s assets may be used to create additional affordable housing opportunities in SantaMonica.", "Discussion", "Senate Bill 341 (SB 341), which is codified in Health and Safety Code Section 34176.1 and became effective on January 1, 2014, requires each housing successor that assumed the housing functions of a former redevelopment agency to post a report on its website that contains information regarding the low- and moderate-income housing asset fund (Fund) of the former redevelopment agency for the previous fiscal year. Inthis case, the City, as the housing successor (Housing Successor), is required to prepare and post the report (Attachment A.)", "In addition, the Housing Successor is required to conduct and provide to the Council an independent financial audit (Audit) of the Fund within six months of the end of the fiscal year. The Audit may be included as part of the City\u2019s independent financial audit.", "The City as Housing Successor assumed the housing functions of the former Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency (RDA) on January 10, 2012 (Attachment B). The transfer of the functions included the transfer of formerly designated RDA low- and moderate-income housing funds together with any funds generated by former RDA housing assets. Thefunds must be maintained by the City in the separate Fund and expended in accordance with Health and Safety Code section 34176.1 (\"Section 34176.1\"). Allowable expenditures include the development of affordable housing, monitoring and preservation of housing subject to affordability restrictions and covenants, and homeless prevention and rapid rehousing services for homeless individuals.", "To ensure that the monies in the Fund are expended in accordance with the law, Section 34176.1(f) requires an independent financial audit of the Fund within six months of the end of the fiscal year. The independent audit of the City\u2019s Fund will be included as part of the City\u2019s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR) prepared by Lance, Soll and Lunghard (LSL), the City\u2019s independent auditor. Staff is working to complete the CAFR during the required six\u2011month timeframe. Staff will post the results of the independent audit of the Fund on its website after the CAFR is presented to City Council.", "SB 341 also requires annual reporting and website posting of Housing Successor for fiscal year 2015-2016 related to the Fund. The Report includes the following information:", "\u00b7 The Fund\u2019s balance for the fiscal year ending June30,2016 is $4,492,240, with $1,964,877 of deposits from City-Agency loan repayments, interest income, and residual receipts, and zero expenditures during the period;", "\u00b7 the former RDA\u2019s replacement housing obligations are satisfied;", "\u00b7 the former RDA\u2019s inclusionary housing obligation is satisfied as of June 30, 2009;", "\u00b7 approximately 9.8 percent of the affordable housing assisted by the former RDA and the Housing Successor is restricted to seniors; and", "\u00b7 there is \u201cexcess surplus\u201d (the aggregate of unencumbered funds deposited into the Fund during the preceding four fiscal years) in the Fund, with a plan to encumber these funds for affordable housing production and preservation within the next three fiscal years.", "The Annual Report is attached as AttachmentA and is required to be posted on the City's website after Council's review and receipt.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Sixth Modification of Property Management Contract with Real Estate Consulting and Services, Inc.", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a sixth modification to Contract #9183 in the amount not to exceed $281,571, including a ten percent contingency, with Real Estate Consulting and Services, Inc., a California-based company, to provide property management services at City-owned Mountain View Mobile Home Park. The proposed amendment would result in an eighty-seven month amended contract with a new total contract amount not to exceed $3,694,887, and would extend the contract term for six months through June 2017.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Real Estate Consulting and Services, Inc. (RECS) provides property management services for Mountain View Mobile Home Park (MVMHP), a City-owned mobile home park community with 105 rental spaces for affordable housing. Staff recommends extending the contract for an additional six months through June 2017 resulting a an eighty-seven month total contract term to provide consistent property management until anticipated transfer of MVMHP to a new owner by June 2017. The increase in contract budget of $281,571 includes management fees, estimated operating expenses for a six-month period, and a standard ten percent contingency.", "Background", "A professional service agreement with RECS was first approved by Council on March 9, 2010 (Attachment A) to provide property management services for MVMHP. On September 13, 2011 (Attachment B), Council approved a second modification, consolidating property management services with RECS for four City-owned residential properties. RECS has performed well, demonstrating expertise in property management services, familiarity with City rental regulations, and professionalism in their communications with residents. Recognizing the benefits residents have from a provider with a local presence, Council approved the third modification on June 11, 2013 (Attachment C) extending contract services through June 2015, and a fourth modification on April 28, 2015 (Attachment D) extending contract services with RECS through December 2016. On March 1, 2016, Council approved the fifth modification (Attachment E) to increase the contract budget due to unanticipated capital repairs and additional property management services.", "On April 12, 2016, Council authorized the issuance of a Request for Proposal (RFP) to solicit proposals from affordable housing organizations to acquire and operate MVMHP as affordable housing. The RFP was issued on September 28, 2016, and transfer of the property is anticipated to occur by June 2017.", "Discussion", "The scope of property management duties that RECS currently performs covers all necessary routine functions, including: handling day-to-day operations; supervision and coordination of maintenance and repair contracts; payment of all operating expenses such as utilities, maintenance, repairs and fees; occupancy responsibilities, including leasing and rent collection. City\u2019s Housing staff provides direct oversight of RECS to ensure effective and efficient management of the City properties, including conferring with RECS weekly and reviewing monthly status reports.", "Mountain View Mobile Home Park is a unique property with a varied mix of homeowners and renters. To comprehensively understand the concerns and expectations of all residents and incorporate comments and feedback into the RFP, staff facilitated three open forums with MVMHP residents and presented the draft RFP at a Housing Commission meeting, over a five-month period. The review and comment period garnered valuable feedback for the RFP, but delayed issuance of the RFP, and correspondingly, the anticipated transfer of MVMHP. Therefore, staff recommends extending the existing property management contract with RECS for an additional six months through June 2017, which would allow for continuity of services through the anticipated transfer period. The current contract expires on December 31, 2016. The projected budget is a 21% increase over the previous period. Major contributors to the increase include modernization of pool plumbing and electrical systems, increase in utility costs, and repairs and maintenance due to vandalism to the irrigation and drainage systems along the frontage of the property.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to RECS is $281,571, for an amended contract total not to exceed $3,694,887. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Housing and Economic Development Department. The contract will be charged to account 01264.533220."]}, {"Title": "Medical Services for Arrestees", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a three-year professional services agreement with Vital Medical Services, LLC, a California-based company, for in-house medical service provisions for arrestees. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080(d) and is for a total amount not to exceed $500,000 (includes a 7.5% annual contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and 2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a three-year professional service agreement with UCLA Santa Monica Hospital and Palm Drive Medical Group, a California-based company, to provide emergency room medical services to arrestees.  This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080(d) and is for a total amount not to exceed $150,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) is required by state and federal law to provide medical services to arrestees known to have or declaring medical issues or injuries prior to booking and housing in the SMPD Jail. Currently, Vital Medical Services, LLC (Vital) provides on-site medical services for SMPD arrestees and inmates. For medical needs requiring emergency room treatment, SMPD utilizes UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica (UCLA SM).", "SMPD is seeking authorization to enter into a Professional Services Agreement with Vital which would enable Vital to continue to provide on-site medical services for Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) arrestees and inmates. The total cost of these services would not exceed $150,000 during the first year, and not exceed $500,000 over the term of the agreement", "Secondly, SMPD is seeking authorization to enter into a Professional Services Agreement with UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica (UCLA SM) and Palm Drive Emergency Physicians Medical Group (Palm Drive). The total cost of these services would not exceed $50,000 in the first year, and not exceed $150,000 over the term of the agreement.", "Background", "The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) ran a pilot program with Vital Medical in 2015. Based on the success of the pilot, SMPD contracted with Vital beginning in March 2016 for one year of service.", "Prior to the on-site services provided by Vital, arrestees requiring pre-booking medical clearance, medical care, or blood draws were transported by police officers to local hospitals. The cost of the emergency room visits, physician services and any ancillary tests or medical services were borne by the Police Department. Additionally, every medical clearance required one or two sworn police officers to transport the arrestee to the medical facility, wait for available medical personnel, standby during the necessary treatment and tests, and transport the arrestee back to the SMPD Jail Facility. Arrestees who required follow-up medical treatments for wound care or the dispersal of medicine required additional police transports. These activities place an additional burden on the Police Department's patrol personnel who then are unable to be in the field responding to the community's public safety needs, creating potential public safety risks, in addition to the risks posed by having arrestees waiting in the emergency room with the general public. The usage of Vital in the SMPD Jail throughout 2016 has provided a more secure environment to conduct medical exams and has significantly reduced the amount of time police officers are removed from patrol duties to obtain medical clearances.", "Prior to contracting with Vital in 2016, SMPD analyzed data from FY 2008 to FY 2014 to assess costs. The average number of patients requiring medical treatment was 287 per year, with the lowest year\u2019s treatment numbers being 199 arrestees and the highest being 437. Costs paid for those medical services averaged $71,643 per year, with the span of costs ranging from $38,000 to $110,000. These averages do not include the costs associated with the amount of time officer(s) spent in the emergency room and the cost impacts of the resulting patrol shortages.", "The Police Department and UCLA SM/Palm Drive have had an ongoing relationship for more than twenty years. The contract was renewed simultaneously to the contract with Vital in February 2016. The most recent Council action prior to 2016 dates back to a February 10, 1998 Council meeting regarding the use of UCLA-Santa Monica Hospital/Palm Drive (under their previous name \u201cJanzen, Johnston, and Rockwell\u201d) for Emergency Room Treatment of Prisoners.", "Discussion", "Vital Medical Services, LLC", "Currently, Vital provides pre-booking medical clearances to arrestees who exhibit or complain of non-emergent medical conditions that police personnel are unable or unqualified to administer treatment for, and blood draws taken from persons arrested for driving under the influence (DUI).", "The proposed three-year agreement with Vital would allow medical treatment for up to 600 arrestees annually (an average of 50 per month) on-site in the Jail Facility. The agreement would enable SMPD to exceed this annual estimation by 20% (for a total of 720 arrestees) at no additional charge. Vital would notify the Department when 75% of the agreed upon services have been delivered.", "Vital's personnel currently provide pre-booking medical clearance evaluations and select minor medical treatments to the Police Department's arrestees utilizing appropriately vetted and licensed PAs and/or NPs. Examples of medical services performed include minor wound care and treatment of nausea. Absent specific evidentiary kits required by County of Los Angeles crime laboratories, Vital provides the necessary equipment and supplies to perform the medical services in a private room located within the SMPD Jail Facility.  The medical exam room meets all medical, County Health Department and Board of State and Community Corrections requirements for these types of services. Providing such medical services in the Jail complies with current standards set forth in Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.", "The usage of Vital for medical treatment has significantly reduced the need for police officers to be removed from patrol duties to obtain medical clearances from local emergency rooms (ER). Not having arrestees in the ER limits the exposure of the general public to uncooperative, potentially combative arrestees and potentially thwarts a mechanism for escape. It also enhances officer safety by not having to transport an uncooperative or combative arrestee to and from the SMPD Jail Facility.", "The proposed agreement would commit Vital to provide 16 hours of on-site medical services per week, on predetermined dates, and provide medically certified personnel on an on-call basis 24-hours a day, 365 days per year. Currently, Jailers are responsible for identifying arrestees that require medical clearance, notifying Vital to respond to the jail, and escorting the arrestee to the secure medical exam room located in the confines of the Jail. The estimated time for jail staff to conduct a medical clearance averages 30 minutes in comparison to a police officer which averaged over two hours in an ER.", "Based on a recent 90-day analysis (March 7 \u2013 June 4, 2016), Vital provided 153 medical clearances and 21 DUI blood draws. This equates to an approximate savings of 276 hours that police officers would otherwise have been removed from patrol duties for arrestee medical clearances with an estimated salary savings of $25,000. Jail staff performed the medical clearances utilizing approximately 77 hours at a significantly lower pay rate. Vital has proven to be an effective and cost efficient means of providing medical treatment to arrestees.", "UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica Hospital and Palm Drive", "In the event an arrestee requires emergency room services, he/she would be transported to the UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica Emergency Room for treatment.", "The proposed three-year agreement with UCLA SM/Palm Drive, at a cost of $300 per visit, would meet the medical needs of those arrestees who require ongoing, emergent care and cannot be treated in the SMPD Jail Facility by Vital. In the event that an arrestee requires emergency room treatment, one or two sworn police officers (based on the nature of the arrest) will transport the arrestee to the UCLA SM Hospital Emergency Room, wait with the arrestee for available medical personnel, standby during the necessary treatment and tests, and then transport the arrestee back to the SMPD Jail Facility. Examples of situations requiring emergency room treatment include any injury needing an x-ray or an MRI since that equipment is not available to Vital Medical in the SMPD Jail Facility.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Vital Medical Services to furnish and provide on-site medical services in the SMPD Jail Facility as an exception to the competitive process basis. Competition does not exist, since Vital is currently the only service in existence delivering facility-based medical support to municipal law enforcement agencies. The alternatives to providing on-site medical services would require SMPD to hire medical staff as City employees at a significantly higher cost or to return to the previous practice of having police officers transport all arrestees requiring medical services to the hospital emergency room and wait with them for treatment.", "In terms of those arrestees who require immediate, emergency medical care, staff recommends UCLA SM/Palm Drive to provide emergency room services to the Police Department\u2019s arrestees. Staff has confirmed that there are no similar emergency room and billing services pairing provided at local hospitals.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Vital Medical Services, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $500,000. Funds of $150,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Police Department. The agreement will be charged to account 01306.555250. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "The agreement to be awarded to Palm Drive Emergency Physicians Medical Group is for an amount not to exceed $150,000. Funds of $50,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Police Department. The agreement would be charged to account 01306.555250. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 67524 for Five Residential Condominium Units at 1025 Euclid Street", "Department": "Development Review 1", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the Resolution approving Final Tract Map No. 67524 for a five-unit residential condominium at 1025 Euclid Street.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for a five-unit residential condominium project at 1025 Euclid Street. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on September 20, 2006. The series of State legislation passed in response to the economic recession (i.e. SB 1185, AB 333, AB 208, and AB 216) extended the Map\u2019s expiration date to October 1, 2015. A timely filing of the Final Map was made to the County prior to the Map\u2019s expiration date.", "PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER UNITS", "No. 67524 1025 Euclid Street. Granbell Euclid, LLC  5", "Discussion", "A Vesting Tentative Map application (06TM-020) was submitted to the City Planning Division on July 12, 2006, to create five residential condominium air parcels on one land lot as part of an attached two-story multi-family development at 1025 Euclid Street. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Vesting Tentative Map for the project on September 20, 2006. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. As a vesting tentative map application, its associated approval confers a vested right to proceed with development in substantial compliance with the ordinances, policies, and standards in effect at the time the vesting map is deemed complete by the City. In this case, the application was deemed complete in August, 2006, and therefore the development is subject to the development standards of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended) in effect at that time.", "The Planning Commission\u2019s September 20, 2006, approval of the Vesting Tentative Map was set to expire two years from the approval date; however, the series of State legislation passed in response to the economic recession (i.e. SB 1185, AB 333, AB 208, and AB 216) automatically extended the Map\u2019s expiration date to October 1, 2015. The purpose of the State legislation extending the expiry dates of eligible maps was to ensure that projects would not lose their vested rights as keeping projects in the pipeline was deemed critical to California\u2019s economic recovery. If applicants had to re-apply for entitlements, additional time and expense would be spent instead of allowing applicants the opportunity to construct a project when economic conditions improved and financing became available. A timely filing of the Final Map was made to the County, and was subsequently approved by the City Engineer in 2012 prior to the Map\u2019s expiration date. According to Section 66452.6(d) of the Subdivision Map Act, once a timely filing is made to the County or City, subsequent actions of the local agency, including, but not limited to, processing, approving, and recording of a map, may lawfully occur after the map\u2019s expiration date.", "A Design Compatibility Permit (DCP) was not required for the project because the site is located within the R-2 zoning district, and according to Section 9.04.20.15.020 of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended), a DCP shall not be required for condominiums in the R2, R3, and R4 districts. The Architectural Review Board approved the building\u2019s design, colors, and materials on January 30, 2008; however, this approval expired on January 30, 2009, and project review by the Architectural Review Board will need to occur anew prior to the issuance of any building permits for the development of the project.", "The existing residential structures on the site to be demolished were constructed in 1922 and 1949. The structures are not listed on the City\u2019s Historic Resource Inventory; however, because the existing structures are over 40 years old, a permit to demolish the existing improvements will not be issued until the Landmarks Commission reviews the demolition permit application and all requirements of SMMC Section 9.25.040 are satisfied. The City\u2019s Landmarks Commission retains jurisdiction to review the demolition permit application and to nominate the improvements as a City Landmark or Structure of Merit pursuant to the designation criteria and procedures contained in Chapter 9.56 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code. At the time this report was prepared, an application to demolish the existing structures had not been submitted to the City for review by the Landmarks Commission. Furthermore, there are four rent-controlled units on the property pending Ellis withdrawal and still under Rent Control law. No demolition of the structures or removal of the rent-controlled units shall occur until the Ellis withdrawal process is completed, in accordance with SMMC Article XVIII (Rent Control Law).", "The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map approved by the Planning Commission. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium facilities tax of $5,000 (i.e. $1,000 per unit) prior to issuance of building permit. Additionally, the developer has chosen to pay an in-lieu fee to satisfy the Affordable Housing Protection Plan (AHPP) requirements that were in place in 2006, which allows the payment of an in-lieu fee for condominium projects of more than three units. The AHPP fee is based on the rate in effect at the time of payment. The current AHPP rate for condominiums is of $36.51/sf for a total fee of approximately $312,671.64 for an 8,564 square foot project to be paid prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy, but after issuance of building permit.", "The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. No off-site improvements were assessed by the City Engineer related to the development of the project. The associated Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map shall be reviewed by the City Attorney's office prior to the issuance of building permits to determine compliance with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Adoption of Resolution Authorizing Application for Grant Funds from the California Office of Emergency Services", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the resolution authorizing the application for grant funds in the amount of $747,855 from the California Office of Emergency Services for Big Blue Bus\u2019 Transit Security Improvement Project; and2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for the grant, accept the grant, if awarded, and accept all grant renewals, if awarded.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Funds are available to Big Blue Bus (BBB) through the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006, also known as Proposition 1B bond funds. The grant funds may be used for a variety of safety and security capital enhancement projects. Adoption of the attached resolution is a requirement of the grant program for eligibility to receive Proposition 1B bond funds allocation for Fiscal Year (FY) 2014-15, 2015-16, and 2016-17.", "Background", "The Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality and Port Security Bond Act of 2006, approved by voters as Proposition 1B in 2006, authorizes grants for specified purposes including transit system safety, security and disaster response projects. Funds may be used for capital expenditures to increase protection against security and safety threats.", "The City of Santa Monica\u2019s Big Blue Bus is a designated recipient of the State Controller\u2019s Office Transit System Safety, Security and Disaster Response Account to receive funds in the amount of $267,091, $267,091, and $213,673 for FY 2014-15, FY 2015-16, and FY 2016-17, respectively. Proposition 1B funds are allocated to transit operators by the State on an annual basis through the California Transit Security Grant Program (CTSGP) for transit security purposes and managed by California Office of Emergency Services (Cal OES). These funds are available pending the sale of bonds by the State, in which funds may be released in different fiscal years. At this time, BBB is claiming all remaining allocated funds in the Proposition 1B program.", "Discussion", "Proposition 1B funds are allocated to transit operators by the State of California on an annual basis through CTSGP for transit security purposes and managed by Cal OES. Applications to secure funds for projects are submitted and approved annually; however, the availability of the funds is contingent upon the success of the State of California Prop 1B bond issuance. Funds are made available for disbursement to transit operators once the proceeds from the sale of the bonds are received by the State.", "A Threat and Vulnerability Assessment (TVA) was conducted by the Federal Transit Administration for the Big Blue Bus in 2011. A TVA is an analysis of safety hazards and security threats that can cause loss of life, personal injuries, property damage and disrupt operations. It provides an analytical process to rate and consider the probability and severity of these hazards and threats in order to determine the greatest risks to the agency. The TVA provides a baseline to create and implement a security plan with recommended actions aimed at reducing the risk of hazards or threats and mitigating any consequences.  As a result of the initial TVA, staff programmed and purchased additional security cameras, wireless onboard cameras, enhanced gating and fencing at the BBB yard, to provide greater protection against security and safety threats using Proposition 1B funds. In addition, staff recently met with Department of Homeland Security personnel to review progress to date and to update the 2011 TVA.", "The FY 2014-15, FY 2015-16, and FY 2016-17 funds would also", "be used to continue BBB\u2019s Transit Security Improvement Project, which includes procuring vehicle collision avoidance hardware and software to be piloted on 10 of the new buses being delivered to BBB in January of 2017. Funds from these Prop 1B program years will also be used to replace onboard security cameras that have exceeded their useful life and add wireless download capability to increase the efficient retrieval of digital recordings from buses.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of the Proposition 1B grants totaling $747,855 from the California Office of Emergency Services for the Big Blue Bus Transit Security Improvement Project has been included in the approved FY 2016-17 Big Blue Bus budget in account C410956.589000."]}, {"Title": "City Services Building Well Construction Contract Change Order", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Agreement #10336 (CCS) in the amount of $15,554 with BC2 Environmental, a California-based company, for additional construction services on the City Services Building exploratory boring and water supply drilling project. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $284,591.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 12, 2016 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City to enter into a construction contract with BC2 Environmental to drill a 650 foot deep exploratory well on the west side of City Hall to evaluate regional geology and to potentially install a groundwater supply well for the new City Services Building (CSB) in an amount not to exceed $269,037. Due to construction noise concerns expressed by the community, sound abatement panels were deployed. Further, additional pumping to obtain necessary water samples and disposal of sediment generated by testing activities was also required.  Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to execute a first modification to construction contract #10336 (CCS) for $15,554 with an amended new total amount not to exceed $284,591.", "Background", "Drilling for this project commenced on September 20, 2016.  A primary objective of this project was to drill and obtain hydrogeologic data from a deep exploratory boring which would be used to assess the quantity and quality of the City\u2019s groundwater resources in this portion of the Coastal sub basin.  A secondary objective of the project was to construct a shallow, small-diameter potable-supply water well to support the proposed City Services Building (CSB). Once tested and permitted, groundwater from the well would be treated and utilized as a supplemental onsite water source for the CSB.  The design of the potable well would be based on the hydrogeologic data obtained from the exploratory boring.", "The proposed deep exploratory boring was drilled using standard water well drilling methods to collect samples, evaluate the subsurface geology, and obtain geophysical logging data from the borehole.  A critical piece of data the City obtained was the confirmation of fresh groundwater in the subsurface at this location and the depth to the subsurface interface between fresh groundwater water and saline groundwater.  A direct benefit of this data is that it supports the City\u2019s strategic planning for long-term water self-sufficiency. The well was completed on October 20, 2016.", "Discussion", "This project was procured utilizing the City\u2019s competitive bid process. On April 14, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and provide drilling and well construction work in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City received five proposals. BC2 Environmental was selected based on, among other things, price and experience.", "Due to construction noise concerns expressed by the community, optional sound abatement panels were deployed at the project site during drilling. Additional pumping was also required to obtain necessary groundwater quality samples because of the high clay content in the subsurface at the drilling location.  In addition, the clay sediment needed to be vacuumed from the bottom of the onsite Baker storage tanks to provide storage space for development water from the well.  The unforeseen additional contractor time and high clay content at the drilling site resulted in change order costs exceeding the 10% contingency for this project. Two groundwater bearing zones were identified for potential use. The project is now complete.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to BC2 Environmental is $15,554, for an amended contract total not to exceed $284,591. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019045.589000."]}, {"Title": "Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District Annual Report Fiscal Year (FY) 2016-17", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District\u2019s Annual Report for FY 2016-17.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Since its inception in 2013, the assessment revenues from the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) have been invested in expanding international brand recognition and broadening target markets in order to enhance local benefits from tourism while reducing external impacts. The attached Annual Report summarizes the SMTMD\u2019s proposed programs and activities for calendar year 2017, including an approved budget, hotel report, and marketing plan. Staff recommends that Council approve the Annual Report, in compliance with state law governing tourism marketing districts.", "Background", "In California, Tourism Marketing Districts are formed pursuant to the Property and Business Improvement District Law of 1994. The law allows for the creation of special benefit assessment districts whereby businesses assess themselves in order to raise funds within a specific geographic area to achieve a variety of objectives including stabilizing funding for tourism promotion, increasing the City\u2019s transient occupancy tax revenues, and remaining competitive by growing market share of visitors.", "The Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) was adopted by Council in2012. The SMTMD was initiated by Santa Monica hotels and Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT), formerly known as the Santa Monica Convention and Visitors Bureau. The goals of the SMTMD are to develop Santa Monica as a brand, promote Santa Monica as a tourism destination, and increase lodging stays through marketing and promotional efforts. Key achievements that were a direct result of SMTMD assessment funding are detailed in the Annual Report. Most notably, the SMTMD funds were invested in enhancing business development programs to broaden international target markets of the United Kingdom, Australia, Brazil, France, and Germany, as well as markets in North America. The additional investment in public relations media expanded international recognition of Santa Monica as a destination. Visitor research has shown that international visitors are more likely to stay longer, spend more money locally, and use active forms of transportation once they arrive.", "Implementation of the SMTMD assessments commenced on January 1, 2013 and continues through December 31, 2017. Unlike other business assessment districts within Santa Monica, an annual report for the SMTMD is required to be approved byCouncil. The Annual Report for 2016-17 represents the final report for the initial five-year term of the SMTMD (Attachment A).  In November 2016, Council approved a renewal of the SMTMD through June 2027.", "Discussion", "Streets and Highways Code Section 36650 specifies that Annual Reports provide the following information:", "\u00b7 The improvements, maintenance, and activities to be provided for the coming year.", "\u00b7 An estimate of the cost of providing the improvements, maintenance, and activities for the year.", "\u00b7 The estimated amount of any surplus or deficit of revenues to be carried over from a previous year.", "\u00b7 The estimated amount of any contributions to be made from sources other than assessments levied pursuant to this part.", "\u00b7 The method and basis of levying the assessment in sufficient detail to allow each real property or business owner, as appropriate, to estimate the amount of the assessment to be levied against his or her property or business for the year.", "\u00b7 Any proposed changes to the boundaries of the tourism marketing district or to any benefit zones or classification within the district.", "The operating budget for the SMTMD fluctuates with market conditions and room night sales and is adjusted annually to reflect estimated revenues and expenditures. SMTMDassessments are based on estimates that take into account the previous year\u2019s assessment collections, hotel occupancy projections, and other factors in the hotelindustry. Specifically, SMTT uses the aggregate average annual available and occupied rooms, resulting occupancy levels, average daily room rate, and REVPAR (revenue per available room) to structure the estimated assessment revenues for each reporting year. The following summarizes the proposed annual budget:", "SMTMD Reporting Year", "FY 2016-17", "Revenues", "Estimated TMD Assessments", "4,432,320", "Programs", "Travel Industry Sales", "1,276,646", "Marketing", "1,323,000", "Visitor Services", "66,721", "Client Services/MICE", "316,123", "Total Cost of Programs", "2,982,490", "General and Administrative Services", "314,662", "Salaries and Benefits", "914,796", "Contingency Fund", "220,371", "Total Expenses", "4,432,320", "Estimated Carry-Over from Previous Fiscal Year", "362,891", "Estimated In-Kind Contributions", "145,000", "The FY 2016-17 Annual Report was presented and approved by the TMD Committee on November 8, 2016 and the Board of Santa Monica Travel and Tourism on November9, 2016, in accordance with the adopted SMTMD Management District Plan.", "As stipulated by State Law, the City Council may approve a report as filed by the SMTMD or may modify any particular section contained in an annual report and approve it as modified. However, Council may not approve a change in the basis and method of levying assessments that would impair an authorized or executed contract to be paid from the revenues derived from the levy of assessments. Since there were no proposed changes in the boundaries or assessment formulas in the FY 2016-17 reporting year, staff recommends approval as prepared by the SMTMD.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 68028 for an 8-Unit Condominium Project at 1444 11th Street", "Department": "Development Review 1", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the resolution approving Final Tract Map No. 68028.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for the following condominium project. The Tentative Tract Map was approved by the Planning Commission on January 16, 2008.", "TRACT MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER  UNITS", "68028 1444 11th Street 11th Street, LLC   8", "Discussion", "After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved a Tentative Tract Map for the above project on January 16, 2008. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The project was delayed, as many of the proposed condominium projects were of this time period, due to the national economic recession. The state legislature, in fact, passed multiple bills that extended the expiration dates of the tentative maps.", "The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $8,000 prior to issuance of the building permit. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer\u2019s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 73635 for a 3-Unit Condominium Project at 1927 18th Street", "Department": "Development Review 1", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the Resolution approving Final Parcel Map No. 73635.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Parcel Map for the following condominium project. The Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on October 21, 2015.", "TRACT MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER  UNITS", "73635   1927 18th Street TWD 18th Street, L.P.   3", "Discussion", "After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved a Tentative Parcel Map for the above project on October 21, 2015. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $3,000 prior to issuance of building permit. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer\u2019s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Time Setting of December 13, 2016 City Council Meeting", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council vote to change the start time of the December 13, 2016 City Council meeting from 5:30 p.m. to 6:00 p.m. due to a lack of agenda items and the administration of the Oath of Office to newly elected members. The time change would change the regular meeting to a special meeting."}, {"Title": "Pilot Program for Park Ambassadors", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": "Director Susan Cline, Director Karen Ginsberg", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Services Agreement with Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. to establish a pilot ambassador services program for Tongva and Palisades Parks for a one year with a one year option, starting on January 1, 2017.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The success of the Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) ambassadors, combined with increasing public activities in the two downtown-adjacent parks, has prompted staff to propose a one-year pilot program with a one-year option to provide ambassador services in Tongva and Palisades Parks with the goal of improving the parks\u2019 cleanliness and safety and the public\u2019s perception of the parks. Under the proposed program, ambassadors would help support a comfortable and active environment for all park visitors by offering hospitality services (directions, recommendations, escorts, etc.) and reporting maintenance or safety issues to responsible City departments.", "Background", "The May 2016 opening of the downtown station of Expo light rail phase 2, combined with the June 2016 opening of the Colorado Esplanade, created a significant gateway for the public to access Santa Monica\u2019s downtown, the Pier, and Santa Monica\u2019s adjacent parks. The initial ridership numbers have exceeded expectations and the amount of pedestrian activity throughout Santa Monica\u2019s downtown and oceanfront areas has been significant. Concurrently, as the regional issue of homelessness continues to be a challenge throughout the Los Angeles area, park users have noted a marked increase in the number of homeless people in the downtown-adjacent parks.", "Over the past two decades, stewards of public parks have focused on a variety of means to activate parks in order to help ensure that they are welcoming and comfortable for all users, including residents, visitors, employees of nearby businesses, and unhoused individuals who may have few other options. Key means for activating public parks have included diverse programming, such as cultural and musical events, fitness and mindfulness classes, games, and outdoor reading rooms. Park activation strategies have also focused on providing park ambassadors to greet park patrons, answer questions, and report maintenance problems to park maintenance staff and behavioral problems to local police.", "Since its opening, Tongva Park has included a series of cultural events that draw a diverse group of participants. Tongva Park\u2019s Discovery Hill (children\u2019s play, splash, and picnic area) is also heavily used. However, other parts of the park are used less frequently and the public has expressed concerns about feeling unwelcome in those areas of the park. Similarly, Palisades Park is heavily used by fitness enthusiasts engaged in walking, running, and training, as well as park patrons who enjoy the incredible views over the Pacific Ocean.", "DTSM launched its hospitality and maintenance ambassador program in 2009 following the establishment of the Downtown Santa Monica Property-Based Assessment District (PBAD) in which property owners voted to fund supplemental and enhanced services to benefit the downtown area through a special assessment. Ambassadors are uniformed sidewalk concierges trained to assist those seeking information about downtown, report maintenance or other public safety issues to the appropriate parties, and provide a welcoming presence for all visitors to the area.", "Ambassadors have received excellent reviews and ratings from visitors, residents, and businesses for their customer service, responsiveness, and knowledge of businesses, services, and amenities. DTSM has also effectively used ambassadors to monitor the public restrooms in parking structure 4, greet patrons, and provide information. DTSM plans to deploy ambassadors to parking structure 5 to monitor the public restrooms that will be built in coordination with the transit and parking customer service center project to be completed in late 2017.", "On July 14, 2015, Council approved the creation of the Lincoln Boulevard PBAD and Colorado Avenue PBAD Overlay Zone as well as authorized a modification to the Maintenance Services Agreement (Attachment A). The Maintenance Services Agreement was modified by the City to contract with DTSM for enhanced maintenance services in the amount of $25,000 annually for the City-owned, Big Blue Bus property located at 612 Colorado Avenue, which is just outside of the Colorado Avenue PBAD Overlay Zone. Tongva and Palisades Parks are not located within the DTSM PBAD and therefore do not benefit from the existing downtown ambassador service program.", "Discussion", "DTSM currently provides ambassador and maintenance services within the downtown area, paid for by assessed property owners. DTSM\u2019s ambassador program has been regarded as a key element of the public\u2019s improved perceptions of downtown Santa Monica as a cleaner and more attractive destination. Tongva Park, Palisades Park, and the adjacent rights of way have been impacted by increased pedestrian traffic following the arrival of the Expo line, regional increases in homelessness, greater use by street performers, and reported illegal activity and anti-social behavior. In response to the impacts, staff requested that DTSM propose an ambassador services pilot program for an initial one-year term with a one-year option in the two downtown-adjacent parks. A pilot program would provide the City and DTSM with an opportunity to assess and address the cleanliness and safety of the parks, as well as the public\u2019s experiences and perceptions. As part of the pilot program, staff would evaluate data collected over the first year of the program to assess the effectiveness of the use of ambassadors in the parks and whether additional or different activation strategies are required.", "DTSM\u2019s proposed ambassador pilot program (Attachment B) would provide hospitality services in Palisades Park from Santa Monica Pier to the California Incline (Attachment C) from 6:30 a.m. to 11 p.m. daily, as well as hospitality and restroom monitoring services in Tongva Park (Attachment D) from 6 a.m. to 11 p.m. daily. The staffing would include one hospitality ambassador roaming Palisades Park during the hours of public operation, one restroom ambassador monitoring Tongva Park during the hours of public operation, and one hospitality ambassador roaming Tongva Park during designated peak hours of operation for up to ten hours daily. Hospitality ambassadors help maintain a welcoming and safe environment by engaging visitors; offering directions, recommendations, escorts and other customer service assistance; providing visual and audio observation to public space management; monitoring and reporting anti-social behaviors; and providing minor maintenance assistance when needed. In addition, an ambassador would be stationed in close proximity to the public restrooms in Tongva Park to discourage anti-social behaviors, conduct intermittent restroom cleanings, and check stock of restroom supplies. DTSM would contract with Block by Block for operation of the ambassador program as an extension of the existing Downtown Ambassador program. DTSM ambassadors maintain a close working relationship with the Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD), receive regular training from SMPD, and communicate frequently with SMPD and parks personnel on the behaviors and conditions that they encounter and observe.", "DTSM\u2019s proposed program budget for the first full year of operation is $309,472 for Tongva Park and $190,444 for Palisades Park, with an annual program cost of $499,916. The estimated cost for the remaining six months of service in FY 16-17 would be approximately $250,000. DTSM would pay staff at or above the City\u2019s living wage standard, with annual escalation of up to three percent to cover increased operational costs such as changes to insurance or wages.", "Staff recommends a pilot program with an initial one-year term with a one-year option, with each party maintaining a six-month notice to terminate. DTSM would conduct a pre-deployment, baseline assessment of the conditions of the parks. During the pilot program, the ambassadors would collect data on handheld devices, recording observations, types of assistance provided, and interactions with the public. DTSM would produce both monthly and quarterly reports on the data collected, observations, trends, and on-going issues. Staff proposes to pilot the ambassador program with DTSM due to its demonstrated ability and expertise related to managing similar responsibilities, the synergies with DTSM\u2019s existing downtown ambassador program, and economies of scale resulting from managing the ambassador services collectively, as well as its ability to commence the Ambassador operation in the parks by January 1, 2017. A Services Agreement to contract ambassador services with DTSM would be required because the parks are located outside of DTSM\u2019s assessment district boundaries and the pilot program services would be paid for entirely by the City. At the end of the pilot program, staff would return to Council with an evaluation of the pilot program and recommendations regarding the effectiveness of the ambassador program and whether the program should continue, be modified, or expanded to additional public spaces, or if an alternative approach should be considered.", "Additionally, staff is evaluating how the public spaces along the Colorado Esplanade at the southeast corner of Ocean and Colorado Avenues, adjacent to the western entrance to Tongva Park, and the grassy triangle at Main Street, adjacent to the Sears building, could be activated to best serve the public and support the Colorado Esplanade and the adjacent parks. Following the evaluation, staff anticipates returning to Council with recommendations on activating the areas.", "Board Action", "DTSM Board reviewed and approved the submission of the proposal to provide Ambassador Services in Tongva and Palisades Parks at their October 27, 2016 Board meeting.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The Services Agreement with DTSM is for an amount not to exceed $1,015,000 for the proposed two-year term. Funds for the first six months of service in the amount of $250,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Works Department. The services agreement would be charged to the following accounts:", "014982.555010", "$125,000", "014522.555010", "$125,000", "Future-year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "Prepared By: Elana Buegoff, Senior Development Analyst", "Approved", "Forwarded to Council"]}], [{"Title": "Study Session on Proposed Mandatory Seismic Retrofit Program", "Department": "Building & Safety (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on proposed updates to the seismic retrofit program and direct staff to:1. Draft an ordinance to amend the seismic retrofit program and tenant protection provisions;2. Initiate a Request for Proposal (RFP) to identify a contractor to assist with reviewing structural assessment reports, plan checks, and monitor compliance; and3. Establish administrative procedures and fees to implement the retrofit program.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "There is no greater responsibly of government than public safety. With earthquakes a way of life in Santa Monica and the Los Angeles region, it\u2019s not a matter of if, but rather when we could experience a significant seismic event. Although Santa Monica adopted mandatory Seismic Retrofit standards in 1999, many buildings continue to be at risk and it is necessary to update these standards and establish a program to ensure compliance.", "Staff is completing the review of buildings in Santa Monica which will result in a final Seismic Evaluation Inventory list of buildings. These buildings meet specific characteristics related to age and construction type which could make them less resilient to earthquakes based on their known performance in earthquakes.", "Staff seeks direction and comment from Council on a proposed Mandatory Seismic Retrofit Program (\u201cRetrofit Program\u201d) to update technical retrofit standards and to establish more robust Retrofit Program implementation and compliance procedures. The proposals are based in large part on the work completed by the City of Los Angeles which adopted its program in November 2015 under the leadership of seismologist Dr. Lucy Jones.", "The goal of the mandatory Retrofit Program is to reduce structural deficiencies and improve the performance of vulnerable buildings during earthquakes. Without proper strengthening, these vulnerable buildings may be subjected to structural failure during and/or after an earthquake.", "Background", "Physical damage to vulnerable buildings, physical injury, and even death are the most apparent threats from earthquakes. Earthquakes can also cause significant economic damage in their aftermath. Earthquakes cause the greatest amount of fatalities in the world, with earthquake deaths resulting primarily from the failure of building construction.", "The Southern California region is dispersed with a network of geological seismic faults.  Figure 1 is a map created using fault data points from the California Geological Survey (CGS) of earthquake faults in the City of Santa Monica and neighboring cities.", "Figure 1: Regional Faults in the City of Santa Monica Area.", "Many of these seismic faults are active and have the very real potential to cause major catastrophic damage during earthquakes and aftershocks. The City of Santa Monica is not only within close proximity of major Southern California active faults but also has a fault running through the extent of the City.", "Mapping of the location and extent of the Santa Monica Fault is under the authority of the CGS. The current map of the Santa Monica Fault was mapped in 1996 and shows a fault line originating off the Pacific coast and from a west-east extent, proceeds to run through the City of Santa Monica in areas primarily north of the Santa Monica freeway.", "The 1995 Safety Element of the General Plan of the City of Santa Monica identifies the hazards of ground motions and fault rupture of the Santa Monica Fault. In 1996, the Santa Monica City Council adopted a resolution declaring the Santa Monica Fault as an active seismic fault. An active seismic fault is defined by the United States Geological Survey (USGS) as: \u201cA fault that is likely to have another earthquake sometime in the future. Faults are commonly considered to be active if they have moved one or more times in the last 10,000 years.\u201d A fault that is deemed active then requires proposed developments to evaluate site conditions prior to construction.", "The USGS is currently updating the map of the Santa Monica Fault it is anticipated that the results will be published in mid-2017. Specific areas within the City of Santa Monica are also prone to liquefaction. Liquefaction is presented by the USGS as: \u201cLoose sand and silt that is saturated with water can behave like a liquid when shaken by an earthquake.\u201d Liquefaction is likely to occur where the soil is saturated with granular soils with poor drainage and nonporous sediments. In Santa Monica these areas are found along our coastline and at the eastern parts of the City. The pink areas on the map in Figure 2 show the areas prone to liquefaction.", "Figure 2: City of Santa Monica Geologic Hazards Map, 2014", "In 1994 the Council adopted a series of emergency ordinances establishing procedures for the restoration or demolition of buildings damaged in the January 17, 1994 Northridge Earthquake, repair or reconstruction standards for unreinforced chimneys and retrofitting standards for public buildings, repair and retrofitting standards for critical facilities, and to evaluate, reconstruct and rehabilitate hazardous buildings including: unreinforced masonry buildings, concrete tilt-up buildings, soft story buildings, non-ductile concrete buildings, welded steel frame buildings.", "On June 8, 1999, the Council adopted by ordinance substantial updates to the 1994 Seismic Retrofit Ordinance (see Attachment A). That ordinance addressed the retrofit requirements of the same five vulnerable building types first established by the Council in the 1994. This 1999 ordinance remains in effect today. Even though this law required building owners to retrofit their buildings, without a formal enforcement effort, compliance was essentially voluntary. As a result, insufficient progress has been made toward compliance.", "The State of California does not have required seismic retrofit standards for buildings-at-risk. Although there are references in documents such as the California Building Code and the California Existing Building Code there are no codified requirements. This absence of a statewide requirement has led to many jurisdictions developing their own retrofit standards.", "On October 13, 2015, the City of Los Angeles City Council adopted a mandatory retrofit program for Wood-Frame Soft-Story and Non-Ductile Concrete buildings. The program became effective November 22, 2015. Los Angeles began to issue notices to property owners of Soft-Story buildings over a period of 18 months beginning in May 2016. Staff has leveraged the work completed in Los Angeles in establishing the administrative proposals outlined in this report. The technical standards that are proposed are also consistent with those adopted by Los Angeles. More information regarding the Los Angeles program is provided later in this report and a summary of the Los Angeles program, as well as the recently adopted San Francisco program is included as Attachment C.", "Discussion", "Buildings of a certain age and construction type are known to be seismically vulnerable due to structural elements of the building. These buildings exhibit characteristics that make them less resilient to earthquakes.", "Vulnerable buildings include the following construction types and age:", "\u00b7 Unreinforced Masonry Buildings (\u201cURM\u201d) built before January 1, 1975", "\u00b7 Concrete or Reinforced Masonry Buildings with Flexible Diaphragms (\u201cConcrete Tilt-Ups\u201d) built before January 1, 1994", "\u00b7 Soft, Weak, Open Front Wall Buildings (\u201cSoft Story\u201d) Where the building was built under building code standards enacted before January 1, 1978, and where the ground floor portion of the structure contains parking or other similar open floor space and there exists more than one story", "\u00b7 Non-Ductile Concrete Buildings (\u201cNon-Ductile Concrete\u201d) where the building was built under building code standards enacted before January 13, 1977", "\u00b7 Welded Steel Moment Frame Buildings (\u201cSteel Moment Frame\u201d) where the building was built under building code standards enacted before December 1995", "Without proper strengthening, these vulnerable buildings may be subjected to structural failure during and/or after an earthquake. The technical standards recommendations are for minimum life-safety requirements to reduce the occurrences of building damage, occupant injury and occupant death, meaning that the standards are intended to protect life by reducing the chance of buildings collapse. Buildings which meet the proposed standards may still be found to be uninhabitable following a seismic event. Certain critical buildings, such as those used by emergency personnel, or buildings designated as emergency shelters are designed and built, or retrofitted, for \u201cimmediate occupancy\u201d and \u201cimmediate operation\u201d to ensure the continuity of these critical operations. A recent report entitled \u201cSafer Cities Survey\u201d (see Attachment B) issued by The Dr. Lucy Jones Center for Science for the Society for the Structural Engineers Association of Southern California provides information on the risks of seismic events in Southern California, an overview of steps taken by jurisdictions in the Los Angeles region, and a description of vulnerable building types.", "On October 13, 2015 the City of Los Angeles established its first mandatory seismic retrofit program under the leadership of seismologist Dr. Lucy Jones. The program includes only two types of vulnerable buildings, Soft Story and Non-Ductile Concrete Buildings. On April 18, 2013 San Francisco established a mandatory seismic retrofit program only for Soft Story buildings. Attachment C provides a brief summary of those programs.", "Seismic Evaluation Inventory List", "As a first step in updating the City\u2019s mandatory Seismic Retrofit Program, staff from the Building and Safety Division initiated a project to develop the Seismic Evaluation Inventory List (\u201cThe List\u201d) of buildings that are considered seismically vulnerable and that require a structural evaluation. Owners of any building on the list would be required to complete a structural evaluation. If the evaluation concludes that a building is indeed seismically vulnerable, the building must be seismically retrofitted within an established time frame. The process to identify vulnerable buildings included a review of building permit records and on-site external visual evaluations.", "Building and Safety\u2019s engineering and inspection staff performed the assessment for the following three buildings types since these buildings are easily identifiable and could be completed most efficiently with in-house staff, including:", "\u00b7 Unreinforced Masonry Buildings", "\u00b7 Concrete Tilt-Up Buildings", "\u00b7 Soft Story Multi-Family Dwelling Buildings", "Staff issued a Request for Proposals and contracted with Degenkolb Engineers to complete the assessment of the more complex building types, including:", "\u00b7 Non-Ductile Concrete Buildings", "\u00b7 Steel Moment Frame Buildings", "In addition to the age and construction type of the building staff carefully considered a building owner\u2019s previous efforts to retrofit. With the two exceptions outlined below, buildings that otherwise meet the definition of a seismically vulnerable building as outlined above are not included in the Seismic Evaluation Inventory List, if staff was able to verify that the building has been retrofitted with an approved building permit in compliance with the standards adopted by the Council on June 2, 1999.", "The two exceptions include:", "\u00b7 Unreinforced Masonry Buildings: Single-Story with tall unreinforced walls[1]", "\u00b7 Soft Story Buildings: Any three story or higher Soft Story with building irregularities[2]", "Even if these two building types have been previously retrofitted, they would still require further analysis for possible additional improved strengthening elements to the building.", "The following chart provides the preliminary number of buildings that have been placed on the draft Seismic Evaluation Inventory List by vulnerable building type. Although it was staff\u2019s intent to provide a final version of the list with this report, however, due to issues identified with the current draft, additional review of the list is necessary before it can be finalized and released. Staff anticipates releasing the list by January 2017. It is important to note that when a building is placed on the list it does not mean that the building presents an immediate hazard, but rather it meets specific criteria based on age and construction type which potentially makes the building vulnerable, and that without further analysis and proper strengthening, if required, it would be vulnerable to structural failure during and/or after an earthquake.", "Vulnerable Building Type", "Preliminary", "Number of Buildings Placed on", "Seismic Evaluation Inventory List", "Unreinforced Masonry Buildings", "209", "Concrete Tilt-Up Buildings", "34", "Soft-Story Buildings", "1573", "Non-Ductile Concrete Buildings", "66", "Steel Moment Frame Buildings", "80", "Overall Total Number", "1,962", "Attachment D provides a detailed criteria for each building type that would qualify the building to be placed on the Seismic Evaluation Inventory List. Although the list is being compiled with the best information available, should a building that meets the requirements for inclusion on the list be identified at a later date, the building will be added to the list and the building owner would be subject to all the same requirements as if the building had always been included.", "Proposed Updates", "The goal of the mandatory Retrofit Program is to reduce structural deficiencies and improve the performance of vulnerable buildings during earthquakes to protect life. Staff\u2019s recommendations take into account standards that would provide an improved measure of safety while allowing seismic retrofit to be an achievable task. Staff utilized the Structural Engineers Association of Southern California (SEAOSC)[3] to ensure that the review met the highest level of technical expertise in conducting its review of the standards. Also taken into consideration were the benefits of a regional approach to ensure consistency which would be of benefit to building owners.", "Staff recommends applying the existing standards to the various vulnerable building types:", "Potentially Seismically Vulnerable Buildings Type", "Technical", "Standard", "Mandatory / Voluntary", "Unreinforced Masonry Buildings", "CA Existing Bldg Code", "Appendix Chp A1", "Mandatory", "Concrete Tilt-Up Buildings", "Int\u2019l Existing Bldg Code", "Appendix Chp A2", "Mandatory", "Soft-Story Buildings", "City of Los Angeles", "ASCE 7", "Mandatory", "Non-Ductile Concrete Buildings", "City of Los Angeles", "ASCE 41", "Mandatory", "Steel Moment Frame Buildings", "City of West Hollywood", "ASCE 41", "Mandatory", "Single-Family Brace and Bolts", "CA Existing Bldg Code", "Appendix Chp A3", "Voluntary", "Buildings that were previously retrofitted under a valid building permit are considered to have met City requirements at the time that the building retrofit was completed. Except in specific cases, these retrofitted buildings will not be affected by the passage of a proposed retrofit ordinance. Generally, building codes are not retroactive unless a specific requirement is written into building standards due to discovered hazards of certain construction. In the specific cases involving Soft Story buildings and Unreinforced Masonry buildings, these buildings exhibit potential weaknesses whether the building was previously retrofitted or not. Staff recommends that these buildings be analyzed to current building standards to determine the seismic safety of these buildings even if they underwent a recent retrofit. Under existing local law seismic retrofits are required to meet modern building code requirements. Staff is proposing meeting 75% of modern building code requirements to meet life safety standards because both experience and State Law guidance (e.g. California Existing Building Code) provides that 75% is sufficient to meet life safety standards in a seismic retrofit.", "A public hearing of the Building and Fire Life-Safety Commission was held on November 3, 2016. The Building Officer and his staff presented the Commission with the technical proposals for retrofit standards. The Commission unanimously recommended that the Council adopt staff\u2019s proposed technical standards.", "Compliance Time Frames and Noticing", "Staff is proposing that all buildings that have met the criteria to be placed on the list would be issued a notice to comply (\u201cNotice\u201d) with all compliance time frames beginning from the time that Notice is sent to the owner from the Building Officer. The following chart provides the recommended time limits for each type of building:", "Potentially Seismically Vulnerable Buildings Type", "Structural Evaluation Report Due", "Buildings Permits Must be Obtained Within", "Retrofit[4] Must be Completed Within", "Unreinforced Masonry Buildings", "3 Months", "12 Months", "24 Months", "Concrete Tilt-Up Buildings", "4 Months", "18 Months", "36 Months", "Soft-Story Buildings", "24 Months", "42 Months", "72 Months", "Non-Ductile Concrete Buildings", "36 Months", "78 Months", "120 Months", "Steel Moment Frame Buildings", "36 Months", "180 Months", "240 Months", "Staff proposes that the compliance time frames begin at the time the Notice is deposited with the U.S. Postal Service by U.S. certified mail. To manage work load more effectively, staff would issue the Notices phased over time by building hazard priority as follows:", "1. Unreinforced Masonry Buildings and Concrete Tilt-Up Buildings", "2. Soft-Story Buildings (3 or more stories)", "3. Soft-Story Buildings (16 units or more)", "4. Non-Ductile Concrete, and Steel Moment Frame", "5. Soft-Story Buildings (2 stories, 7 to 15 units)", "6. Soft-Story Buildings (2 stories, 6 or less units)", "For each building that is found to not meet the established retrofit standards, a Notice will be mailed to the owner and a copy of the Notice will be filed with the County of Los Angeles Department of Registrar/Recorder requesting recordation of the notice on property title. This recorded notice will stay on the title until a complete retrofit has been achieved in accordance with all requirements. Following notice to the owners that an owner is required to retrofit its building to current standards, the owner will be required to then notify all tenants residing in the building of the finding and order by the Building Officer that the building requires structural strengthening. An estimated schedule for the roll out of the notices is provided as Attachment F.", "Appeals", "Based on existing law, the owner of any building subject to seismic retrofitting requirements will have multiple opportunities to seek review of the Building Officer\u2019s decisions during the retrofitting process. First, anyone who receives a notice from the Building Officer, indicating that the Building Officer has determined that their building is potentially seismically vulnerable and requiring the submission of a Structural Evaluation Report, may appeal this determination to the Building and Fire-Life Safety Commission. Additionally, once a Structural Evaluation Report has been reviewed by Building and Safety, and staff determines that, based on the Report, a building is sufficiently vulnerable to warrant seismic retrofitting, that determination may also be appeal to the Commission.", "Time Frame Extensions", "While, as indicated above, staff proposes to set forth concrete timeframes for retrofitting, many unforeseeable or unusual circumstances could make strict compliance with such time frames impossible. For instances, owners may not be able to timely secure assistance from licensed engineers as there are a limited number of structural engineering firms available in the Los Angeles area, and the City of Los Angeles is also undergoing this same type of seismic retrofitting program. Additionally, unexpected personal developments, such serious illnesses, could also hinder compliance. Any person experiencing any such unforeseen or unusual circumstances would be able to seek a time extension from the Planning Director (or his or her designee), whose decision would be appealable to a City Hearing Officer.", "Enforcement Action", "The Program will have enforcement mechanisms for noncompliance of each time limit milestone. Code Enforcement staff will coordinate closely with staff in Building and Safety when enforcement is necessary. In egregious cases of noncompliance, staff will refer such cases to the City Attorney\u2019s Office.", "Tenants", "Owners of vulnerable buildings that require retrofitting would be required to comply with existing tenant protection provisions of the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) including Chapter 8.100 Tenant Protection During Construction and Chapter 4.36 Tenant Relocation Assistance. This would include any future amendments to those codes.", "In response to recent experiences related to air quality concerns during construction and the health and safety of tenants, staff is also proposing to include with amendments to the retrofit program minor modifications to Chapters 8.100 and 4.36 of the SMMC to strengthen the City\u2019s response when there is an identified risk to tenants. Staff is also modifying its current protocols when air quality issues arise which are currently under the jurisdiction of the South Coast Air Quality Management Division (AQMD). Although AQMD would continue to maintain jurisdiction over air quality, including asbestos testing and abatement permitting, staff proposes to establish greater tenant protection protocols, coupled with contracting with a licensed environmental consulting firm to initiate testing in such cases where there is a reasonable suspicion of a potential hazard. Staff proposes to amend the SMMC to hold the building owner responsible for costs associated with testing when such testing is required due to the actions of the owner. This change is not intended to supersede AQMD\u2019s authority but rather to keep staff focused on the City\u2019s goal to first protect the health and safety of tenants. This would allow staff to initiate a relocation order more expeditiously instead of waiting for AQMD or the Los Angeles County Department of Health to respond to an immediate need. If necessary staff will submit as part of the FY2017/18 biennial budget a request for funding for environmental testing. Any needs that arise during the remainder of FY2016/17 will be paid for with existing budget.", "Land Use and Other Regulations", "Staff does not propose any major changes to zoning, permitting or review requirements that may result from work needed to complete a retrofit, except in the case of parking requirements. For example, any retrofit project that would trigger review by the Architectural Review Board (ARB) or the Landmarks Commission must obtain such review and approval before a building permit could be issued authorizing commencement of the project.", "However, there are a couple of notable exceptions proposed.", "1. Consistent with Los Angeles, staff does propose that if a retrofit should cause a need to reduce the number of parking spaces that staff (instead of the Planning Commission) be authorized to approve such reductions if the applicant can show that there is no practicable method to complete the retrofit without reducing parking.", "2. Staff proposes allowing permit extensions up to the time frame established for completion, including any extensions granted.", "3. If the cost of the retrofit requires that reconfiguration of trash areas, staff proposes that the Public Works Director (or designee) should be able to waive the requirement if impracticable.", "Demolition", "Staff does not propose any changes in established requirements for demolition of buildings. Owners will not be provided with the option to demolish a building in lieu of completing a retrofit. An owner who wishes to demolish a building would be required to meet all requirements of Chapter 9.25 of the SMMC. As is the case today, only in such cases where the Building Officer determines that a building is so unsafe that it is an imminent threat to public safety could the building be demolished without first meeting the requirements of Chapter 9.25.", "Staffing and Fees", "Staff anticipates that the resources needed to mail the initial notices to building owners who are on the Seismic Evaluation Inventory List, informing them of their need to obtain a structural evaluation report will be absorbed by existing clerical staff and budget. If necessary staff proposes to contract with short term temporary staff assistance to complete minor clerical tasks in completing the mailing.", "Staff proposes to upgrade the currently vacant but budgeted position of Building & Safety Supervisor to Building & Safety Administrator as part of the FY2017/19 biennial budget process. The upgrade would allow for the hiring of an employee with the experience and level skill set appropriate to serve as program manager/ombudsman for Permit Center operations. This change will also provide necessary programmatic and process skills within the unit to oversee and improve the Construction Permitting process. This position would continue to supervise the permit center employees, but would also work towards continual process improvements to address systemic permit processing issues. Staff will seek to use savings from other staffing adjustments in Planning and Community Development to offset the cost. Routine administrative duties to support the program would be managed by this position with support from existing permit center staff. The newly created Neighborhood Preservation Coordinator would assist with monitoring projects in residential buildings with tenant occupants.", "Staff also proposes to issue a Request for Proposal to contract with an engineering firm to assist with reviewing the structural engineering reports and plan checks. Utilizing a consulting firm to assist with this work will allow for flexibility in resources as work increases and decreases due to the rolling deadlines. Inspections would be conducted with existing staff. If necessary staff would bring forward a budgetary request in the future for additional staffing resources.", "Existing Plan Check and Building Permit fees would apply for seismic retrofit work to be completed, including a Seismic Retrofit Engineering Report Review Fee. However, as part of the FY 2017/19 biennial budget process, staff will include any necessary fees related to the mandatory retrofit program that may be identified.", "Economic Cost of Seismic Retrofit Work", "The current estimated cost of a non-complex, two-story Soft Story building ranges from $5,000 to $10,000 per unit. This would make the cost of an average six-unit Soft Story retrofit range between $30,000 to $60,000. Both the Los Angeles and the San Francisco have estimated typical Soft Story retrofit costs at $60,000 to $130,000 per building. The cost estimates by Los Angeles and San Francisco are consistent with what owners can expect in Santa Monica based on the current inventory of Soft Story buildings.", "For commercial buildings, there are not established standards of retrofit costs as the methods of retrofit solutions vary widely.", "Rent Controlled Units and Building Owner \u201cPass-Through Costs\u201d", "Following the 1994 Northridge Earthquake, Council passed an ordinance requiring the repair, and strengthening of Soft Story multi-family buildings. This effort provided some measures of additional safety by allowing a form of strengthening of Soft Story and Weak Front buildings. Following Council\u2019s action in 1994 for Soft Story strengthening, the Rent Control Board adopted Regulation 4113 which allowed building owners to pass-through 100% of earthquake related repairs and retrofitting costs to tenants. Effective February 16, 1994, the regulation allowed 100% of the reasonable costs plus financing to be passed-through as permanent rent increases provided the work was completed by June 30, 1996.", "As of August 1, 1995, Rent Control Regulation 4113B allowed owners to pass-through 50% of the costs associated with retrofitting required by City Council Ordinances 1748 and 1771. Currently, if an owner undertakes and completes retrofit work, a \u201cnet operating income petition\u201d can be filed with the Rent Control Board. This petition would compare current net operating income versus net operating income in 1978 prior to the passage of the rent control law. If the petition finds that the owner is not making a fair return, relative to the 1978 reference, then improvement costs can be passed-through as permanent rent increases.", "While many petitions were filed under Regulation 4113, only one petition was filed under Regulation 4113B and no rent increases based upon seismic retrofit costs have been requested through the net operating income process. This may be attributable in large part to the passage of the Costa-Hawkins Rental Housing Act by the State legislature in 1995. With the ability to reset rents to market rate for all new tenancies that started since January 1999, owners may take all existing and anticipated operating costs into consideration when establishing a new rent. For this reason, and because a mandatory retrofit program is not yet in place, owners have not pursued permanent rent increases in recent years for retrofitting costs.", "The City of Los Angeles will allow a fifty-percent pass-through cost to tenants, if approved by the Los Angeles Housing Community Investment Department. The maximum rent increase is $38 per month for 10 years. The recovery period may be extended until the full approved amount is collected. Seismic retrofit costs are divided among all the units. Applications for the increase by the owner must be submitted within 12 months of completing the retrofit work. City staff will work with the Rent Control Board staff to provide recommendations on the issue of pass-through to the Rent Control Board, following Council\u2019s passage of the Seismic Retrofit Ordinances.", "Financing for Seismic Retrofit Work", "There are also options for property owners to receive property assessed clean energy (PACE) program financing. The City, by joining a number of joint powers authorities(JPAs) has authorized seven separate PACE programs to operate within the City\u2019s boundaries (Attachment G). Currently, four of the seven PACE programs provide seismic retrofit financing to Santa Monica property owners, with the potential that the other three PACE programs operating in the City may also add seismic retrofitting as an eligible activity in the future. PACE financing allows participating property owners repay the cost of the seismic retrofit improvements through an assessment levied against their properties, which is payable in semi-annual installments on property tax bills. A lien is filed against the property as security until the assessment is re-paid. The assessment remains with the property should the owner transfer or sell the property before the loan is re-paid. As a participant in a JPA, the City is not obligated to repay the bonds issued by the authority, or collect or pay the assessments levied on the participating properties.", "Program Implementation Elements", "If directed to do so, staff will prepare an ordinance to amend the SMMC and develop the administrative procedures for the program, issue a Request for Proposal for an engineering firm, train staff, and begin issuing notices to building owners.", "Following direction, staff will send a letter to all property owners on the list to provide them with information regarding the proposed program, their responsibilities, and the anticipated roll out schedule for the notices in advance of bringing an ordinance to Council. Staff anticipates bringing an ordinance for Council consideration to its February 14, 2017 meeting. Budgetary items would be included with the FY2017/18 Biennial budget.", "Staff proposes to launch a custom Seismic Retrofit Program webpage to allow visitors the option to search by property address or Assessor\u2019s Parcel Number (APN) to determine if a building is on the Seismic Evaluation Inventory List. The web site will also contain information for both building owners and residential tenants.", "Staff has begun public outreach, including Rent Control staff, the Santa Monica Chamber Commerce, Downtown Santa Monica, Inc., Building Owners and Management Association (BOMA), ACTION Apartments Association, Inc. in preparation for the study session with Council. Staff will continue and expand outreach following direction from Council on the program, including offering educational programs and materials on the administrative and technical aspects of the program, such as a Seismic Retrofit Fair and/or seminars. Materials and meetings geared towards tenants will be developed to ensure that tenants are also well informed of the program. Staff will also work closely with Rent Control staff in developing outreach and educational programs.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions."]}], [{"Title": "Introduction for First Reading of Ordinances Modifying the Taxicab Franchises of Bell Cab, Independent Taxicab Owners Association, Metro Cab, Taxi! Taxi!, and Yellow Cab to Reduce the Number of Vehicles Allocated", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinances modifying the taxicab franchises of Bell Cab, Independent Taxicab Owners Association, Metro Cab, Taxi! Taxi!, and Yellow Cab to reduce the number of authorized vehicles.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica has received requests from all five taxicab franchisees in accordance with Section 5 (f) of the franchise agreement to reduce the number of vehicles due to the market no longer requiring the franchisee to furnish taxicab services with the number of vehicles authorized under the Franchise. Due to the continued reduction in trips being served by taxicab companies, staff is recommending that Council approve the reduction in vehicles from 300 vehicles to the 199 total vehicles requested by the taxicab companies. Staff recommends granting the taxicab companies\u2019 request to reduce their vehicle allocations as this is consistent with the decrease in demand for taxicab services.", "Background", "Existing State law requires every city or county to protect the public health, safety, and welfare by adopting an ordinance or resolution in regard to taxicab transportation services operated within the jurisdiction for vehicles designed to not carry more than eight people, excluding the driver. This must include a policy for licensing the taxicab businesses, rates, and a mandatory controlled substance and alcohol testing program. On July 28, 2009 the Council established a taxicab franchise program, and on October 12, 2010, granted franchises to five taxicab companies by ordinance to Bell Cab Company, Inc. (Bell Cab); Independent Taxi Owners\u2019 Association (ITOA); Metro Cab Company, LLC (Metro Cab); TMAT Corp., dba Taxi! Taxi! (Taxi! Taxi!); and L.A. Taxi Cooperative, Inc., dba Yellow Cab Company (Yellow Cab).", "At its November 24, 2015 meeting, Council modified and extended the franchise agreements for two years to December 31, 2017 by ordinance for all five companies (see Attachment A). At this meeting, Council approved maintaining the level of 300 authorized taxicabs to operate in the City and approved other changes to the taxicab franchise program that were requested by the taxicab companies.", "One of the key changes approved by Council was to grant taxicab companies the ability to \u201cpark\u201d a taxicab, which would allow the taxicab company to remove the vehicle from its insurance plan, saving the company money during slower periods. To \u201cpark\u201d a vehicle is simply to not operate the vehicle. This provided companies with a means by which to manage their fleets based on demand. However, taxicab companies are still required to pay the $1,100 Vehicle Franchise Fee and $250 Business License Tax for each authorized vehicle.", "Section 5 (f) of the taxicab franchise agreements allows a franchisee to request a reduction in the size of their fleet if the \u201cpublic convenience and necessity no longer requires Grantee to furnish taxicab services with the number of vehicles authorized under this franchise.\u201d On October 10, 2016, Taxi! Taxi! notified staff of its request to reduce the number of vehicles authorized to operate. On October 17, 2016 staff informed the other four taxicab franchisees of Taxi! Taxi!\u2019s request so they could also request a reduction to their authorized vehicles if desired. On October 31, 2016 all four remaining companies, Bell Cab, ITOA, Metro Cab, and Yellow Cab (i.e. the \u201cTaxicab Coalition\u201d), notified staff of their requests to reduce their number of vehicles.", "Subsequently, in accordance with the requirement set forth in the franchise agreement, the franchisees submitted a written application to the City Clerk requesting a reduction in the size of their taxicab fleets. Taxicab companies were informed by staff of the requirement in the franchise agreement to also post notice for at least 15 days prior to the Council meeting of their request to reduce their fleets.", "If Council approves the request to reduce the number of authorized vehicles from 300 to 199 the vehicle franchise fees due for the 2017 franchise year will decrease accordingly.", "Discussion", "In November 2015 Council extended the taxicab franchises for all five taxicab companies as well as various other changes to the program rules and regulations. One of the changes allowed taxicab companies to \u201cpark\u201d vehicles by removing them from service. The companies were required to notify the City when they \u201cparked\u201d a vehicle. Since the beginning of the 2016 franchise year, taxicab companies have parked a total of 57 vehicles reducing the number of vehicles in service to 243 from 300. It is important to note that the $1,100 Vehicle Franchise Fee and Business License Tax is still due for each vehicle that are authorized by Council even when the vehicle is \u201cparked\u201d. The following chart shows the breakdown by taxicab company, of the total number of \u201cparked\u201d vehicles:", "Company", "Current Authorized Vehicles", "\u201cParked\u201d", "Operating", "Percent Change in Total Vehicles", "Bell Cab", "58", "8", "50", "-14%", "ITOA", "58", "13", "45", "-22%", "Metro Cab", "63", "17", "46", "-27%", "Taxi! Taxi!", "63", "17", "46", "-27%", "Yellow Cab", "58", "2", "56", "-3%", "Totals", "300", "57", "243", "-19%", "All five taxicab companies have requested a formal reduction in the number of authorized vehicles due to the systemic decrease in demand. Included as attachment B is a copy of the requests. As noted in the 2015 report, although it is not possible to know specifically the cause of the decline, it clearly coincides with the arrival of and ensuing surge in popularity and consumer demand for Transportation Network Companies (TNC); Uber officially launched in Los Angeles on March 8, 2012. Reducing the number of vehicles would not likely reduce service levels since demand is also down. The year over year the number of calls for service responded to within 15 minutes for each taxicab company has not changed significantly even with the number of vehicles that the companies have removed from service on their own by \u201cparking\u201d them. Companies with licenses in other jurisdictions (Bell, ITOA, and Yellow) continue to have lower response times than Taxi! Taxi! and Metro Cab, with Yellow cab historically having the lowest at 80% of requests for service being responded to within 15 minutes (compared to 83% in 2015). The following chart provides a comparison between 2015 and 2016 year to date through September.", "Average Percent of Calls Responded to within 15 Minutes", "Jan-September 2015 and 2016", "Company", "2015", "2016", "Bell", "89%", "87%", "ITOA", "90%", "87%", "Metro", "94%", "91%", "Taxi Taxi", "93%", "94%", "Yellow", "83%", "80%", "News reports have consistently reported on the disruptive nature of TNCs and its impact on the taxicab industry. In a recent suit filed by Flywheel Taxi of San Francisco, the company has sued Uber in U.S. District Court claiming that Uber has used its significant venture capital funding to undercut competitors with predatory pricing, losing money on rides in San Francisco \u201cwith the expectations of reaping extraordinary future returns\u201d. It is the continued competitive pressure on the taxicab industry and the shift in consumer demand from taxicabs to TNCs which appears to have led to the reduction in taxicab trips and ultimately the need for fewer taxicabs. If Council approves a reduction in vehicles, it is also unlikely that there would be a material impact on circulation or parking, as the demand for vehicles for hire have not decreased, only the type of service being used. The total number of taxicab vehicles operating in Santa Monica may be decreasing, but the number of Uber and Lyft vehicles has increased considerably over the same time period. However, there would be a lower demand for taxicab stands.", "If Council approves the request the number of authorized taxicabs would decrease from 300 to 199. Following is a breakdown by taxicab company:", "Company", "Current Authorized Vehicles", "Vehicle Reduction Requested", "Remaining Authorized Vehicles", "Percent Change in Total Vehicles", "Bell Cab", "58", "-15", "43", "-22%", "ITOA", "58", "-28", "30", "-48%", "Metro Cab", "63", "-20", "43", "-29%", "Taxi! Taxi!", "63", "-23", "40", "-37%", "Yellow Cab", "58", "-15", "43", "-22%", "Totals", "300", "-101", "199", "-32%", "If Council were to approve the reduction of 101 vehicles the companies would no longer be required to pay a franchise fee, vehicle renewal fee, or business license tax for these vehicles. The combined reduction of 101 vehicles would result in a total reduction in revenue to the City of $142,111 broken down as follows:", "Fee", "Fee Amount", "Total Reduction", "Per Vehicle Franchise Fee", "$1,100.00", "-$111,100.00", "Per Vehicle Renewal Fee", "$57.04", "-$5761.04", "Per Vehicle Business License Tax", "$250.00", "-$25,250.00", "Staff recommends granting the taxicab companies\u2019 request to reduce their vehicle allocations as this is consistent with the staff recommendation in 2015 which was based on the significant decrease in demand for taxicab services. Following reflects the number and percentage change in trips serviced between 2013 and 2015:", "Company", "2013 Trips", "2015 Trips", "Percent Change", "2013 to 2015", "Bell Cab", "69,806", "26,913", "-61%", "ITOA", "156,279", "73,145", "-53%", "Metro Cab", "179,289", "83,088", "-54%", "Taxi! Taxi!", "277,293", "120,860", "-56%", "Yellow Cab", "93,196", "68,786", "-26%", "Totals", "775,863", "372,792", "-52%", "There was also a 44% drop in trips from 2015 (Jan-Sept) to 2016 (Jan-Sept). This puts 2016 on target to see a total drop in trips from 372,792 in 2015 to 220,056 in 2016, or 41%, and a 72% drop since 2013.", "The draft ordinance modifying the franchise agreements are attached as follows:", "\u00b7 Bell Cab Company, Inc. - Attachment C", "\u00b7 Independent Taxi Owners\u2019 Association - Attachment D", "\u00b7 All Yellow Taxi (dba Metro Cab) - Attachment E", "\u00b7 TMAT Corp., (dba Taxi! Taxi!) - Attachment F", "\u00b7 L.A. Taxi Cooperative, Inc (dba Yellow Cab) - Attachment G", "Other Requests from the Taxicab Coalition", "The Taxicab Coalition has also requested that the franchise fees for the companies be reduced by 50% and that the Business License Tax be eliminated. If Council approved both the request to reduce vehicles to 199 and the reduction in fees and taxes, the additional reduction in revenues to the City would be $62,250 broken down as follows:", "Fee", "Fee Amount", "New Fee with 50% Reduction", "Total Revenue Reduction", "Company Franchise Fee", "(5 Companies)", "$5,000", "$2,500", "-$12,500", "Per Vehicle Business License Tax", "(199 Vehicles)", "$250", "$0.00", "-$49,750", "Currently the City does not collect business license taxes from drivers even when they are independent contractors. The companies did not request any reduction in fees for vehicle franchise fees, driver permits, or vehicle permits. The current fee structure is provided as attachment H.", "If both requests are approved, the total reduction in revenue would be $204,362 ($142,111 for the reduction in vehicles to 199 and $62,250 for the elimination of the Business License fees and reduction of Company Franchise fees by 50%).  This would be a 46% reduction in revenue when compared with FY2015/16 revenue of $443,451.", "Staff does not recommend that Council adopt the requested changes in fees and taxes and instead wait until staff returns with any additional changes to the program prior to the expiration of the existing agreements on December 31, 2017. Repealing the business license requirement would require a change to the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC); and then, reinstating the business license tax on taxicab companies would require approval by the voters.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Staff anticipates revenues to decrease by approximately $111,100 in Vehicle Franchise Fees, $5,761 in Vehicle Renewal Fees, and $25,250 in Business License Fees due to the reduction of 101 vehicles, leaving the remaining authorized vehicles at 199. Staff will monitor revenues and any changes will be reflected in the FY 2016-17 mid-year budget."]}], [{"Title": "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center Development Agreement Amendment Float-Up Discussion", "Department": "Design & Preservation (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "It is recommended that the Council:1. Discuss the Applicant\u2019s proposed Development Agreement Amendment request to allow Planning Commission, or City Council on appeal, to exercise its discretion, pursuant to SMMC Section 9.37.090, to provide extended expiration dates for one or more of the eight originally-proposed Development Review Permits for Phase Two buildings. The proposed expiration date for each building would range between 21 and 233 months based on the five phases of development proposed for the Phase Two project.2. Discuss whether the Applicant\u2019s vested rights should be extended, and if so, to what extent.3. Discuss the staff-proposed procedural amendment to the Development Agreement to establish an alternate framework for Phase Two vested rights and a phasing plan.4. Discuss whether to consider project alternatives through project negotiations and/or environmental review. This could include potential changes to the total overall floor area for Phase Two, the allocation of floor area between approved uses, the size/scale of one or more buildings, the circulation/access plan, and trip reduction measures required with the project. 5. Identify what, if any, additional objectives, including desired community benefits, the City should include in its negotiations with the Applicant.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Applicant, Providence Health & Services (\u201cProvidence\u201d), proposes a second amendment to its previously-approved Development Agreement with the City of Santa Monica for Phase Two Development at the Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center campus (\u201cPSJHC\u201d or \u201cHealth Center\u201d) located at 2121 Santa Monica Boulevard. The original Development Agreement was executed in July 1998 with a 55-year term to guide phased reconstruction and future development of Saint John\u2019s Health Center after the 1940s-built hospital sustained substantial damage from the 1994 Northridge earthquake. The Development Agreement authorized vested rights for two phases of development on Saint John\u2019s-owned property.", "Phase One development consisted primarily of rebuilding core hospital facilities and creating a new plaza on Santa Monica Boulevard and was substantively completed in 2013. The Development Agreement established the parameters for Phase One rebuilding and required an annual community benefit plan for the 55-year term of the Agreement. A first amendment to the Development Agreement was approved by the City Council in 2011 principally to address how Phase One parking would be provided by the Health Center.", "Providence has proposed Phase Two development in accordance with the vested rights for up to 799,000 SF of floor area and permitted uses authorized by the Development Agreement. The Phase Two project is located on Applicant-owned parcels on both sides of Santa Monica Boulevard and proposes a health care campus to expand the services currently provided by the hospital\u2019s diagnostic and treatment center, in-patient suites, an emergency department, and a medical research facility (John Wayne Cancer Institute and Research Center). North Campus development would occur on three sites: two building sites are located on the east and west sides of the existing Entry Plaza, and one building site is located mid-block along 20th Street between Santa Monica Boulevard and Arizona Avenue. South Campus development would occur on five sites where the current John Wayne Cancer Institute and two surface parking lots are located south of Santa Monica Boulevard.", "Consistent with the procedural requirements for Phase Two development set forth in the Development Agreement, a proposed Master Plan to guide the development of the Health Center\u2019s South Campus was submitted by Providence in February 2015. Development Review Permit applications for the eight originally-proposed Phase Two buildings located on both the North and South Campuses were filed in March 2015. All of these required applications (\u201cPhase Two Project\u201d or \u201cPhase Two\u201d) were submitted and deemed complete prior to the July 9, 2015 Phase Two Vesting Deadline established by the Development Agreement. Phase Two applications were submitted following completion of Phase One reconstruction of the diagnostic and treatment center and in-patient suites, and construction of the new Entry Plaza on Santa Monica Boulevard.", "Providence is proposing an amendment to the Development Agreement that would allow the Planning Commission, or City Council on appeal, to exercise its discretion, pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 9.37.090, to extend the expiration dates for each of the eight Development Review Permits in five phases, over a twenty year period. As discussed more fully in this report, the Applicant has made this request because it is unable to construct the entire Phase Two Project within the timeframes currently provided by the Development Agreement. Providence has also stated that this amendment is necessary because it must maintain current Health Center operations and provide required parking through the duration of Phase Two construction, and it would allow Providence to focus on priority elements of the Phase Two Project in the near-term, while having assurance that longer-term future development at the Health Center can occur in response to changing community health care needs.", "While the Applicant has requested a narrow amendment allowing the extension of the vesting schedule under the Development Agreement, the City Attorney's office has advised that the Planning Commission and City Council may retain full discretion over an amended vesting schedule and may seek additional community benefits in consideration for any amendment to the Development Agreement, given that if no amendment were authorized, the Applicant's existing vested rights would terminate if not exercised in accordance with the existing schedules in the Development Agreement.", "The heart of the issue before the Council is whether to move forward with a time extension for Phase Two and, if so, what, if any, other elements of the existing Development Agreement should be renegotiated. Both the Planning Commission and City staff offer recommendations to the Council, as discussed below.", "Council, of course, understands the balance of interests involved. On the one hand, long-term planning for providing health care in today\u2019s changing landscape requires a level of predictability and flexibility for an institution like Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center to survive in a competitive marketplace and continue its legacy of service to the community. Of equal importance are the interests of affected residents and businesses in the area impacted by the growth and daily operations of a major institution like the Health Center. In contrast to UCLA Medical Center, which as a state agency is essentially exempt from local land use regulation, Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center must navigate the challenges of serving its core mission, being a good neighbor, and collaborating with the City on orderly long-range planning.", "The Applicant\u2019s Development Agreement amendment proposal was presented to the Planning Commission on April 27, 2016. After an extensive discussion, the Planning Commission supported staff\u2019s recommended procedures as a substitute for the Applicant\u2019s proposal and provided feedback on a host of project components including site planning and design, circulation, mix of uses, parking, and the requested extension of time to build out Phase Two project over an extended period.", "Accordingly, this report recommends Council authorize staff to initiate negotiations with the Applicant in conjunction with the request for an extension of time to complete the Phase Two Project, subject to the Development Agreement amendments described herein to establish the following:", "\u00b7 Phase Two Project Master Plan \u2013 Currently, the Development Agreement specifies that the Planning Commission takes action on a South Campus Master Plan \u2013 for South Campus development sites only \u2013 with Council review only on an appeal of the Commission\u2019s action. Staff believes that it would be prudent for the Council to consider a procedural amendment that would establish Council\u2019s authority to review and take action on a comprehensive Phase Two Project Master Plan not only because of the large scope of development contemplated, but also because of the traffic circulation changes and integration of the North and South Campuses contemplated by the Phase Two Project as a whole. This change would comport with the quasi-legislative character of the a master plan and would require that all Phase Two development, on both the north and south campuses, be consistent with the Phase Two Project Master Plan.", "\u00b7 Comprehensive Phasing Plan \u2013 As part of the Master Plan, staff recommends establishment of a Phase Two Project Phasing Plan to provide a framework for comprehensive and integrated review of the Phase Two Project, and orderly build-out of the project beyond the timeframes currently authorized by the Development Agreement. This approach would provide a timeline and framework for phased review for each of the Phase Two buildings and a schedule of performance for associated infrastructure, community benefits, and site features over an approximately 20 year period. With this recommended approach, the Applicant would not be required to obtain Development Review Permit approval of all of its proposed development within the timeframe currently necessitated by the existing vesting deadlines in the Development Agreement.", "In light of the Planning Commission\u2019s recent feedback and staff\u2019s recommendations, the project description provided in this report reflects several modifications to the order in which certain improvements would be constructed, revisions to the parking structure proposed on the north campus, and the addition of two small caf\u00e9 buildings on the north and south campus plazas.", "The greater level of detail and background discussion provided in this report regarding the Development Agreement and the Applicant\u2019s Phase Two proposal has been provided to help inform Council\u2019s evaluation of the potential benefits, challenges, and trade-offs associated with the Applicant\u2019s request for an extension of time to build out the Phase Two Project. More specifically, this report provides the following information:", "1. Summary of Phase One Project pursuant to 1998 Development Agreement", "2. Phase Two Project Description for Applicant\u2019s South Campus Master Plan & North Campus sites", "3. Applicant-proposed phasing plan and amendment request (Attachment \u201cC\u201d)", "4. Proposed procedural amendment to establish Council review of a Phase Two Master Plan", "5. Conceptual discussion of an amendment to establish a framework for Phase Two vested rights and a comprehensive Phase Two Project Phasing Plan", "6. Summary of the April 27, 2016 Planning Commission discussion", "7. Potential community benefits, in addition to current requirements", "8. Next steps", "Additionally, summary description of current Phase Two procedural requirements established by the 1998 Development Agreement is included as background information in Attachment \u201cA\u201d to this staff report.", "Staff recommends that the Council focus on several key issue areas during its preliminary discussion of the Applicant\u2019s request for an extension of time to build out the Phase Two Project:", "1. Discuss the Applicant\u2019s proposed Development Agreement Amendment request to allow Planning Commission, or City Council on appeal, to exercise its discretion, pursuant to SMMC Section 9.37.090, to provide extended expiration dates for one or more of the eight originally-proposed Development Review Permits for Phase Two buildings. The proposed expiration date for each building would range between 21 and 233 months based on the five phases of development proposed for the Phase Two project.", "2. Discuss whether the Applicant\u2019s vested rights should be extended, and if so, to what extent.", "3. Discuss the staff-proposed procedural amendment to the Development Agreement to establish an alternate framework for Phase Two vested rights and a phasing plan.", "4. Discuss whether to consider project alternatives through project negotiations and/or environmental review. This could include potential changes to the total overall floor area for Phase Two, the allocation of floor area between approved uses, the size/scale of one or more buildings, the circulation/access plan, and trip reduction measures required with the project.", "5. Identify what, if any, additional objectives, including desired community benefits, the City should include in its negotiations with the Applicant.", "Project / Site Information", "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center is located along Santa Monica Boulevard between 20th Street and 23rd Street. The facility\u2019s North Campus is located between Santa Monica Boulevard and Arizona Avenue with the main hospital on Santa Monica Boulevard and the emergency department entrance on Arizona Avenue. The South Campus is located between Santa Monica Boulevard and Broadway and includes the John Wayne Cancer Institute, and the Health Center\u2019s MRI building and surface parking lots. Site information and photos are provided on the following pages.", "Zoning District:", "HMU (Healthcare Mixed-Use District)", "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center", "North and South Campuses", "LUCE:", "Healthcare District", "Existing", "On-Site Improvements:", "(A) Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center & Entry Plaza \u2013", "2121 Santa Monica Blvd", "(1942 / 2013)", "~475,000 SF", "(B) Providence Saint John\u2019s Child & Family Development Center \u2013 1339 20th Street (1961)", "~34,670 SF", "(C) Commercial building (vacant) \u2013", "2221 Santa Monica Blvd (1970) ~10,551 SF", "(D) John Wayne Cancer Institute and Research Center \u2013", "2200 Santa Monica Blvd (1951) ~55,055 SF", "(E) 10-unit apartment building (vacant) \u2013 1417 21st Street (1948)", "(F) MRI Building", "(G) Surface parking lots", "Rent Control:", "Ten rent-controlled units (vacant)", "Adjacent Zoning", "Districts and Land Uses:", "R2, R4, MUB, HMU, MUBL, GC: Medical office & services, single- & multi-family residential, assisted living, commercial, institutional, creative office & studios", "Background", "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center is a non -profit hospital and health care facility that was originally built in 1942 on Santa Monica Boulevard between 20th and 23rd Streets in the Mid-City neighborhood. After sustaining significant damage in the 1994 Northridge Earthquake, a plan for phased reconstruction and expansion of the hospital\u2019s North and South Campuses was authorized in July 1998 with approval of a Development Agreement between the City and the Sisters of Charity of Leavenworth on behalf of Saint John\u2019s Health Center.", "The 55-year term of the Development Agreement ends on July 9, 2053. The First Amendment to the Development Agreement was authorized by Council in 2011, in large part, to modify the way the Health Center would be required to provide parking for the Phase One project.", "Phase One Development", "The Development Agreement granted approval for construction of new hospital facilities in two phases. The Phase One Project consisted of vested rights, subject to extension, for the construction of a new 475,000 SF hospital consisting of the following components:", "\u00b7 Below-grade central plant", "\u00b7 Inpatient Center (205,000 SF and a maximum height of 75 feet)", "\u00b7 Outpatient and Diagnostic & Treatment Center (265,000 SF and a maximum height of 58 feet) with an emergency department and North Lawn", "\u00b7 Main Entry Plaza on Santa Monica Boulevard", "Phase One Community Benefit Summary", "As part of the original Development Agreement approved in July 1998, and the first amendment to the Development Agreement approved in June 2011, a number of substantial community benefits were negotiated for inclusion in the project; these include the following one-time and ongoing programs, contributions, and facilities:", "One-time:", "\u00b7 North Lawn: 41,000 SF outdoor area with landscaping and walkways.", "\u00b7 Off-site Traffic Mitigation Improvements: one-time payment of a minimum of $332,000 in fees to the City to construct improvements.", "\u00b7 Off-Site Public Works Improvements: one-time payment of $641,000 in fees to the City to construct sidewalks, curbs, streetlights, and street paving in the project area.", "\u00b7 Off-Site Transit Improvements: $100,000 contribution for Memorial Park light rail station upgrades (required by First Amendment).", "Ongoing:", "\u00b7 Child Care Program: provide a minimum of 49 full-day child care for employees and the community. 21 of these spaces must be for infant/toddler care.", "\u00b7 Transportation Demand Management Program: employee trip reduction program enhancements (required by First Amendment).", "\u00b7 Light Rail Shuttle: 15-month requirement to operate shuttle to/from Memorial Park light rail station starting within six months of the Expo light rail opening unless duplicative public transit service is provided by the City (required by First Amendment).", "Beginning in Spring 2016, PSJHC started funding a Big Blue Bus Transit Pass Program for all Health Center employees and its contract employees. The program provides them with unlimited Big Blue Bus use. This Service Agreement funds a service enhancement along Big Blue Bus routes 41 and 42 by establishing a 15-minute frequency during peak hours along the route that includes service to the Health Center.", "\u00b7 Neighborhood protection measures: eleven requirements including establishing a community Ombudsperson, providing a reduced valet rate for parking 90 minutes or less, one-time payment of $30,000 for installation of a crosswalk at 21st Street/Arizona Avenue, and one-time payment of $15,000 for a pedestrian safety study (required by First Amendment).", "\u00b7 Annual Community Benefit Program: CA State required plan for non-profit hospitals to support the health and well-being of Santa Monica residents and the community and also required by the 1998 Development Agreement for the full 55-year term of the Agreement. The City established the annual Community Benefit Program as a requirement of the original Development Agreement to ensure that if the Health Center is sold to a for-profit entity during the 55-year term of the Agreement, the new owner would be required to provide the community benefit program on an annual basis for the full 55-year term.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Community Access Plan: The Santa Monica Community Access Plan is a required component of the annual Community Benefit Program, per the Development Agreement. It identifies local recipient agencies, dollar value, and level of service provided to non-profits and the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District. The plan also documents the charitable medical and mental health services, free health education, and preventive health services provided to the local community.", "Minimum $732,000 dollar value subject to 1.5% compounded annual adjustment. During calendar year 2014, health services valued at $5,876,605 were provided where a total of $928,897 was required.", "Phase One Construction Milestones", "Significant construction milestones for Phase One included completion of the in-patient suites in 2005, completion of the diagnostic and treatment center in 2009, and demolition of the south and east wings of the original hospital building in 2010. Today\u2019s North Campus, comprised primarily of the in-patient suites, diagnostic and treatment center, and emergency department is smaller in size and number of licensed beds in comparison to the pre-1994 hospital facility:", "\u00b7 1994 hospital pre-earthquake: 662,000 SF and 501 licensed hospital beds", "\u00b7 2013 hospital redeveloped: 475,000 SF and 265 licensed hospital beds", "As noted above, the City Council approved a first amendment to the Development Agreement in July 2011 primarily to modify the Health Center\u2019s Phase One parking obligations. In lieu of constructing the originally-approved North Campus subterranean parking garage, the amendment requires the Health Center to provide at all times on- and off-site parking to meet the peak parking demand of its various user groups (visitors, patients, physicians, scientists, and staff).", "The amendment also requires the Health Center to provide at all times parking that is functionally equivalent to the previously-approved 443-space garage (i.e., owned spaces or spaces subject to specific lease terms). The amendment further requires implementation of an annual parking management plan and authorized changes to the design of the Entry Plaza that is accessed from Santa Monica Boulevard.", "Following approval of the First Amendment to the Development Agreement, the new Entry Plaza on Santa Monica Boulevard was constructed and it opened for use as the primary entrance to the Health Center in October 2013. The opening of this feature marked the substantive completion of the Phase One Project authorized by the Development Agreement.", "Providence Health and Services assumed full sponsorship of Saint John\u2019s Health Center from the Sisters of Charity of Leavenworth in January 2014. The transfer of sponsorship was completed as Phase One construction was nearing completion. Providence is now the sole sponsor of Saint John\u2019s Health Center, the John Wayne Cancer Institute, and all clinics and centers associated with the Health Center that has a total of approximately 1,700 employees. City staff worked with Providence during its due diligence review and sponsorship transition to clarify the requirements of the Development Agreement and provide a detailed overview of the key issues and community concerns that were associated with Phase One development and the First Amendment.", "Phase Two Development Process", "Development Agreement Section 3.8 specifies that there is a 17-year vested rights term for Phase Two (i.e., until July 2015), subject to extension and requirements for timely submittal of certain applications to maintain these vested rights beyond the July 2015 vesting deadline. The purpose of Phase Two is to implement a second development plan with sufficient floor area for health care-related uses, open space, and parking as outlined in the Agreement.", "The Development Agreement includes maximum floor area (i.e., square footage) and permitted uses that Providence has a vested right to develop on each of the three North Campus Designated Areas slated for Phase Two development. Maximum allowable building heights ranging from 70-95 feet and required building setbacks are also identified for these three North Campus sites. For the South Campus, the Development Agreement provides a vested right to develop a maximum total floor area and a vested right to develop permitted uses, subject to City approval of a Master Plan for the South Campus.", "In addition to the Master Plan requirement for the South Campus, all Phase Two buildings require City review and approval of Development Review Permit applications. Further, the Agreement specifies that South Campus buildings cannot be approved unless the Master Plan for the South Campus has also been approved.", "North Campus development is currently not a required component of the Master Plan and approval of North Campus Development Review Permits does not currently require prior or concurrent Master Plan approval.", "Consistent with Development Agreement requirements, applications for a South Campus Master Plan and eight Development Review Permits for all Phase Two buildings were timely submitted prior to the Phase Two vesting deadline in July 2015. These applications were submitted February 5, 2015 and March 31, 2015, respectively. The Development Agreement Amendment application was also submitted to the City on March 31, 2015. All applications submitted in conjunction with Phase Two development were reviewed by City staff and deemed complete on June 5, 2015.", "Attachment \u201cA\u201d to this report provides a summary chart of Development Agreement Milestones from 1998 to 2015.", "Environmental review pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) is required for all Phase Two development. Environmental documentation will be prepared and then reviewed during future public hearings when the Master Plan, Development Review Permits, and Development Agreement Amendment are formally considered by Planning Commission and City Council.", "Discussion", "Project Description and Phase Two Vested Rights", "The parameters of the Phase Two project were developed following a needs assessment process conducted by Providence after assuming sponsorship of the Health Center in 2014 and have been revised based on outreach with community members, early review with City staff, and following Planning Commission\u2019s April 27th preliminary discussion of the proposed amendments and project concept. The Applicant has stated that the Phase Two Project incorporates the research, recommendations and priorities gathered from Providence\u2019s executive team, physicians, clinicians, staff, administrators, and community health care service providers \u2013 and focuses on developing a state-of-the-art medical care and research center in the community building that features a new medical research facility for the John Wayne Cancer Institute, expanding ambulatory and acute care services, and supporting health and wellness education in the community.", "The project also includes a new and expanded Child and Family Development Center and new visitor housing. Finally, the Development Agreement requires replacement of the existing ten units of multi-family housing existing on the site. The Applicant proposes that two of the ten units would be deed-restricted affordable. The vacant apartment building to be removed is located behind the John Wayne Cancer Institute with frontage along 21st Street.", "With respect to Phase Two Project community benefits, the 1998 Development Agreement requires continuation of all Phase One community benefits, along with the following:", "\u00b7 An amended Community Access Plan to ensure that a reasonable number of Santa Monica residents who are unable to afford fees and memberships will have access to Phase Two\u2019s community-oriented facilities.", "\u00b7 Minimum 35% open space on the South Campus.", "\u00b7 An expanded Phase One child care program to address the child care needs generated by the Phase Two development.", "While the 1998 Development Agreement does not require Phase Two North Campus buildings to be incorporated in the Master Plan for the South Campus, and approval of the Master Plan is also not a prerequisite for review or approval of North Campus buildings, the Applicant has studied both campuses and proposed a Master Plan that functionally integrates the Phase Two building sites on the North and South Campuses as shown in Figure 1.", "More specifically, Phase Two integrates health care-related uses, buildings, open space, parking resources, circulation, and consistent architectural design across the North and South Campuses. Along with an overview of the Proposed Phase Two Project, the following section provides a summary of the vested uses and floor area authorized by the Development Agreement for Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center.", "The Development Agreement authorizes a total Vested Floor Area for Phase Two development equal to 744,000 SF above-grade and an additional 55,000 SF below grade. This floor area is divided between the North and South Campuses. Figure 1 identifies all of the proposed Phase Two sites on the North and South Campuses with the aggregate vested floor area authorized by the Development Agreement as well as the maximum building heights/stories identified in the Agreement as development standards for the North Campus.", "North Campus Buildings", "The Development Agreement identifies three specific development sites on the North Campus and maximum building heights and stories for each, in addition to maximum allowable floor area. This is in contrast to the South Campus where specific development sites and building heights/stories were not specified in the Development Agreement.", "The total Vested Floor Area for North Campus Phase Two development is 347,000 SF of above-grade floor area and 55,000 SF of below-grade floor area (402,500 SF total). The Applicant is currently proposing three main North Campus buildings, plus the caf\u00e9, with up to a total of 343,500 SF of above-grade floor area and approximately 26,000 SF of below-grade floor area:", "\u00b7 North Campus Building 2I \u2013 North Campus Parking Structure", "\u00b7 North Campus Building 2C \u2013 West Ambulatory & Acute Care Building", "\u00b7 North Campus Building 2D/2E \u2013 East Ambulatory & Acute Care Building", "\u00b7 North Campus Building at Entry Plaza \u2013 Caf\u00e9 Kiosk", "In response to City staff\u2019s comments provided to the Applicant regarding necessary intersection and circulation improvements along Santa Monica Boulevard, the Applicant has further studied the 2C and 2D/E development sites since Planning Commission\u2019s review in April and revised the proposal. North Campus sites 2C and 2D/2E are identified in the third and fifth phases of development and are now proposed with less floor area than permitted and with building heights consistent the Development Agreement.", "The Applicant has also included in the current submittal a 1,500 SF caf\u00e9 that would be located at the existing Mullin Plaza in order to in order to create a pedestrian-oriented amenity in the open plaza area. As more study and refinement of north campus circulation improvements is conducted, further evaluation of programmatic needs and north campus building floor plates will be completed by the Applicant during the review process.", "South Campus Buildings", "The Phase Two South Campus Master Plan Area has a total land area of 225,550 SF (approximately 5.17 acres). Land area includes Providence-owned sites on both sides of 21st Street between Santa Monica Boulevard to the north and Broadway to the south. The Master Plan incorporates proposed five buildings on the South Campus. The Development Agreement authorize 396,500 SF of Vested Floor Area plus 10 units of replacement multi-family housing. There is a minimum 35% open space requirement for the South Campus. The Master Plan includes 396,500 SF of floor area and provides the 10 replacement units and the 35% open space required. Since the Planning Commission\u2019s discussion in April, the Applicant has incorporated a small, 900 SF caf\u00e9 that would be located in the open space area/plaza on the South Campus:", "\u00b7 South Campus Building S2 \u2013 Multi-Family Replacement Housing", "\u00b7 South Campus Building S3 \u2013 West Ambulatory Care & Research Building", "\u00b7 South Campus Building S1 \u2013 Child & Family Development Center", "\u00b7 South Campus Building S4 \u2013 East Ambulatory Care & Research Building / Education / Conference Center", "\u00b7 South Campus Building S5 \u2013 Visitor Housing", "\u00b7 South Campus Building S6 \u2013 Caf\u00e9 at South Campus Plaza", "Attachment \u201cB\u201d to this report provides more specific information about each of the Phase Two buildings on the North and South Campuses, including proposed floor area, building height, and uses.", "The two following tables provide a summary of proposed Phase Two floor area compared to the vested floor area authorized by the Development Agreement and, for reference, to the floor area permitted by the current Zoning Ordinance for a Tier 2 project in the Healthcare Mixed-Use District (SMMC Section 9.13.030). Note that the Development Agreement allows North Campus floor area to be reallocated between the three North Campus sites, subject to approval of Development Review Permits for each building.", "Table 1:  Providence SJHC", "Vested Floor Area vs.", "Proposed Phase Two Project", "Phasing Plan Stage", "Development Agreement", "Vested Floor Area", "Phase Two Project", "Proposed Floor Area", "2I North Campus Parking Structure", "2C West Ambulatory Care & Research Building", "2D/E East Ambulatory Care & Acute Care Building", "(** includes 157,000 SF of above-grade parking instead of other permitted, medical-related uses)", "North Campus Total", "Stage B", "Stage C", "Stage E", "137,500 SF above-grade", "120,000 SF above-grade", "30,000 SF below-grade", "90,000 SF above-grade", "25,000 SF below-grade", "347,500 SF above-grade", "55,000 SF below-grade", "402,500 SF Total", "160,000 SF** above-grade", "112,000 SF above-grade", "6,000 SF below-grade", "70,000 SF above-grade 20,000 SF below-grade", "343,500 SF above-grade**", "26,000 SF below-grade", "369,500 SF Total", "S3 West Ambulatory Care & Research Building", "S2 Multi-Family Housing", "S1 Child & Family Development Center", "S4 Ambulatory Care & Research Building / Education / Conf. Center", "S5 Visitor Housing", "S6 Plaza Caf\u00e9", "South Campus Total", "Stage A", "Stage A", "Stage A", "Stage D", "Stage D", "Stage D", "10 units", "up to 100 units", "396,500 SF", "123,000 SF", "10 units / 17,000 SF", "34,500 SF", "199,300 SF", "30 units / 38,000 SF", "900 SF", "396,500 SF", "Phase Two", "Project Total", "744,000 SF above-grade", "55,000 SF below-grade", "799,000 SF Total", "740,000 SF above-grade", "26,000 SF below-grade", "766,000 SF Total**", "- 96,525 SF", "(demo existing buildings)", "669,475 SF Total (net new)", "Table 2: Providence SJHC", "Comparison of", "Above-Grade Floor Area", "2015 Zoning Ordinance", "Healthcare", "Mixed-Use District", "Tier 2 (2.5 FAR)", "Maximum", "Above-Grade", "Floor Area", "1998 Development Agreement", "Vested", "Above-Grade Floor Area", "Proposed", "Phase Two Project", "Proposed", "Above-Grade Floor Area", "South Campus", "(225,500 SF parcel area)", "563,750 SF", "396,500 SF", "396,500 SF", "North Campus", "2I (45,000 SF parcel area)", "2C (37,000 SF parcel area)", "2D/2E (39,000 SF parcel area)", "112,500 SF", "92,500 SF", "97,500 SF", "137,500 SF 120,000 SF", "90,000 SF", "160,000 SF", "112,000 SF", "70,000 SF", "Phase Two", "Above-Grade Floor Area", "866,250 SF", "(2.5 FAR @ Tier 2)", "744,000 SF", "(2.15 FAR)", "741,687 SF", "(2.14 FAR)", "Phase Two Circulation and Access", "Providence has proposed a Master Plan and Phase Two project that introduces substantive changes to the street network in and around the Health Center. The plan includes three new streets; partial closure and modifications to 21st Street (existing); a new walk-street adjacent to the proposed Saint John\u2019s Square; and modifications to the existing North Campus Entry Plaza that provides access to the main hospital.", "North Campus Entry Plaza Modifications", "In response to comments from City staff and Planning Commission, Providence is proposing to modify the existing ingress and egress driveways from the Entry Plaza on the North Campus along Santa Monica Boulevard to align with the proposed, new 20th Place and 22nd Street on the South Campus. The original Master Plan submittal maintained the existing North Campus Entry Plaza in its current configuration.", "With two new streets proposed on the South Campus, the original design included a series of five T-intersections on Santa Monica Boulevard between 20th and 23rd Streets. This design resulted in three of these five intersections having un-signalized turn pockets. Accordingly, staff recommended that the Applicant re-study the Santa Monica Boulevard corridor to resolve these circulation conflict points.", "The Applicant\u2019s revised circulation plan proposes to widen the footprint of the existing Entry Plaza on the North Campus so its existing signalized ingress and egress driveways on Santa Monica Boulevard would align with the new 20th Place to the west to the new 22nd Street to the east. This revised design is superior as it creates only two four-way intersections between 20th and 23rd Streets and allows vehicles and pedestrians to cross more safely at two consolidated and signalized intersections on Santa Monica Boulevard. This revised Entry Plaza design would require an Amendment to the Development Agreement to memorialize the change to the Entry Plaza site plan that was previously approved in 2011.", "The Master Plan proposes an enclosed pedestrian bridge across Santa Monica Boulevard at the third floor of the proposed West Ambulatory Care Building and Research Center (S3) to the North Campus building on the west side of the Entry Plaza (2C). The Applicant has proposed this primarily for patients needing transportation between the treatment areas on the North and South Campuses. City staff has expressed concern about the pedestrian bridge across Santa Monica Boulevard from an urban design standpoint as it increases the perceived scale of the project and may draw pedestrians away from the street level.", "Two tunnels underneath Santa Monica Boulevard are also proposed as part of the last phase of development to connect the North and South Campus subterranean garages. Project components that involve vacating a street, tunneling beneath public streets, potential relocation of existing public utilities, and use of air space over public property and/or subterranean easements under public property will also need separate Council action which has its own procedural requirements and timelines.", "Phase Two Parking", "In conjunction with its Master Plan and Phase Two Project, Providence has proposed a phased parking plan designed to meet the peak parking demand for the entire Health Center at each stage of Phase Two development and at the completion of the project. This approach has also been proposed in an effort to provide a long-term, on-site solution to the Health Center\u2019s Phase One parking demand that is currently accommodated on surface parking lots at the North Campus Entry Plaza and on two South Campus development sites, and by leasing spaces from private parties at nearby parking facilities.", "Based on a parking demand analysis prepared by Walker Parking Consultants and submitted with the Master Plan and Phase Two Development Review Permit applications, and in response to City staff an Planning Commission comments, Providence SJHC is currently proposing approximately 2,750 parking spaces at completion of Phase Two buildout. This total parking supply would include the requirements for Phase One and Phase Two development at the completion of the project:", "\u00b7 Approximately 1,550 spaces located in two South Campus subterranean garages.", "\u00b7 Approximately 400 spaces split between North Campus sites 2C and 2D/2E.", "\u00b7 Approximately 774 spaces in the North Campus Parking Structure on 20th Street", "\u00b7 Approximately 30 existing Phase One parking spaces will remain on the North Campus, including at the Emergency Department on Arizona Avenue.", "The North Campus Parking Structure is proposed to be constructed as the second phase of development in order to provide a critical and early supply of spaces to meet the Health Center\u2019s Phase One parking obligation as South Campus surface parking lots are removed during phased construction.", "There are several factors that support the location of a parking garage on site 2I. The location of the proposed garage mid-block on 20th Street preserves the efficiency of Santa Monica Boulevard between the North and South Campuses. There is also direct freeway access from eastbound I-10 and to westbound I-10. However, there are several constraints associated with the garage\u2019s mid-block 20th Street location that could affect its functionality.", "The new structure is currently planned for up to 774 spaces in a five-story above-grade structure with four levels of subterranean parking. This structure is proposed for Health Center employee parking only. The proposed parking supply in this garage represents a reduction in one level/story of above-grade (the original proposal included up to 893 spaces). Staff will continue to discuss the parking plan with the Applicant to determine if this is an appropriate location for required Phase Two parking or whether the applicant\u2019s supply reduction is sufficient to address concerns about the functionality of the garage, while still providing sufficient parking to meet project demand.", "Applicant\u2019s Request for Extension of Time", "The following section provides a discussion of Providence\u2019s request for an extended phasing period to build out the Phase Two Project. Development Agreement Section 3.8.2 states that vested rights for a proposed building that includes floor area for which Saint John\u2019s has a vested right shall continue to apply beyond the July 9, 2015 Phase Two Vesting Deadline in the event that 1) a Development Review Permit Application for the proposed building has been filed and deemed complete by the City prior to the Phase Two Vesting Deadline and Saint John\u2019s diligently pursues process of the application, or 2) a Development Review Permit for the proposed building has been approved prior to the Phase Two Vesting Deadline.", "Development Agreement Section 3.8.3 establishes limits on the Providence\u2019s vested rights for buildings beyond the Phase Two Vesting Deadline pursuant to Section 3.8.2. In summary, Providence has eighteen (18) months following issuance of the Development Review Permit for a Phase Two building to obtain all required building approvals from the State of California (OSHPD) for a hospital building \u2013 or obtain a building permit from the City for a non-hospital building.", "The Development Agreement also establishes the timeframe to exercise rights and complete construction of a Phase Two building before the building permit expires. This is set forth in Exhibit \u201cF\u201d to the Development Agreement and pursuant to SMMC Section 8.04.0202.030 (code in effect at the time of Development Agreement approval). This timeline to exercise rights and complete construction before the building permit expires would be approximately five years.", "Providence has requested a Development Agreement Amendment to allow additional time to build out Phase Two development in five sequential phases over an approximately twenty-three-year period. The Applicant\u2019s originally-proposed amendment to the Development Agreement (Attachment \u201cC\u201d) would authorize Planning Commission, or Council on appeal, to exercise its discretion to provide expiration dates that vary between 21 and 233 months following final City approval of Development Review Permits for each of the eight Phase Two buildings.", "The Applicant has stated that allowing phased construction of the Phase Two Project over an extended period is critical for several reasons. Specifically, an extended phasing period would allow Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center to:", "\u00b7 Implement a state-of-the-art medical care and research center in the community;", "\u00b7 Remain fully operational during construction (main hospital);", "\u00b7 Maintain sufficient parking for all Health Center uses during and after construction;", "\u00b7 Minimize construction impacts on neighboring residents and businesses;", "\u00b7 Maintain certainty regarding vested rights and procedural requirements for Phase Two in order to provide sufficient time to fundraise and finance construction; and", "\u00b7 Provide flexibility to reevaluate priorities in the future based on its assessment of community needs and the changing demands of health care and medical research.", "Moreover, the Applicant has stated that it is unable to meet the schedules currently required in the Development Agreement for the entire Phase Two Project. In its submittals for the Master Plan and Development Agreement Amendment applications, Providence has emphasized the three most important programmatic items proposed in early stages of Phase Two: on-site parking, replacement of the John Wayne Cancer Institute, and a new home for the expanded day care facility.", "Development of additional on-site parking early in Phase Two is important because the Applicant must provide adequate parking to meet all Phase One parking obligations at all times. Most of the South Campus sites are currently developed with surface parking that is required for Phase One and will be removed in order to accommodate the new Phase Two construction. The only Phase Two site not currently developed with required parking for Phase One is site 2I, where the existing Child and Family Development Center is located.", "Providence has underscored the importance of timely replacement of the John Wayne Cancer Institute because the existing facilities are out-of-date and cannot efficiently accommodate the newest technologies for cancer research. Providence views the John Wayne Cancer Institute as a critical component of its vision for the Phase Two Project and Master Plan.", "Figure 6 provides a graphic representation of Phase Two and the development sites for each of the five proposed phases (Stages A-E).", "Amendments for Extension of Time & Phased Construction", "As part of the City\u2019s preliminary review of the Applicant\u2019s Development Agreement amendment to allow for an extended period to complete phased construction of Phase Two, several key issues are identified for further discussion and direction from Council. Specifically, staff recommends two Development Agreement amendments. This framework was discussed at the Planning Commission on April 27, 2016 and recommended by the Commission as the preferred mechanism for structuring review of all north and south campus improvements:", "\u00b7 A procedural amendment to provide Council approval authority over a Phase Two Project Master Plan and require that all Phase Two development be in accordance with the Master Plan; and", "\u00b7 An amendment to establish a comprehensive Phasing Plan that provides structured and substantive review of individual buildings at specified milestones \u2013 instead of reviewing the currently-pending Development Review Permits for buildings nearly 20 years in advance of construction, as currently proposed by the Applicant\u2019s amendment.", "Procedural Amendment \u2013 Council Review of a Phase Two Project Master Plan", "Currently, the Development Agreement specifies that Planning Commission takes action on the South Campus Master Plan application and that action is subject to Council appeal. Staff recommends initiation of a procedural amendment to the Development Agreement to authorize Council review and approval of a comprehensive Phase Two Project Master Plan after receiving a formal recommendation from the Planning Commission. This amendment would structure review so both the Planning Commission and Council serve in their traditional quasi-legislative role when reviewing land use plans to establish rules for development of parcels within a specific geographic area (i.e., community and neighborhood plans, specific plans). The amendment would also require that all Phase Two development be in accordance with the approved Master Plan. This procedural amendment would need to occur before the formal approval of the Phase Two Project Master Plan.", "In order to effectuate this procedural amendment, staff proposes to amend the Development Agreement to state that the Master Plan requirement shall apply to all vested Phase Two uses and floor area on the north and south campuses \u2013 and to all other associated project improvements \u2013 instead of requiring the Master Plan for only south campus development as currently required. There would be a number of text revisions associated with this procedural amendment to ensure internal consistency. However, in concept, the amendment would address several key provisions in order to secure the associated physical infrastructure, community and project benefits, and urban design improvements that would be required as part of a master plan process of this magnitude.", "More specifically, the procedural amendment would establish the basic parameters guiding the development of the north and south campus Phase Two building sites, including, without limitation to: (a) building placement, (b) building height for all buildings, (c) setbacks for all buildings, (d) stepbacks for all buildings, (e) parking (both subterranean and above-grade), (f) location of uses, (g) vehicular and pedestrian circulation, (h) open space and landscape elements, and (i) phasing and timing of all improvements associated with Phase Two development (collectively, the \u201cPhase Two Master Plan Elements\u201d).", "This procedural amendment would also establish that prior to City Council\u2019s review and action on the Phase Two Project Master Plan, a public hearing will be held so the Planning Commission can make its formal recommendations to City Council. Consistent with current language in Section 3.6.6 of Development Agreement, the procedural amendment would continue to affirm that the City Council shall have full discretion to approve, conditionally approve, or deny the proposed Phase Two Master Plan and the Phase Two Master Plan Elements. In exercising its discretion over the proposed Phase Two Master Plan, the Council should consider whether to reaffirm the Phase Two Vested Uses and Vested Floor Area as set forth in Section 3.7 of the original Development Agreement or whether to reevaluate the Phase Two Vested Uses and Vested Floor Area through this amendment process.", "Framework for a Comprehensive Phase Two Project Master Plan and Phasing Plan", "The following is a conceptual discussion of the recommended amendments to provide Providence with the additional time needed for Phase Two build-out while protecting the community and City\u2019s interest in promoting comprehensive and orderly development of the Phase Two Project. More specifically, the recommended amendments would be drafted to establish a comprehensive Master Plan and Phasing Plan with consideration given to the following:", "1. Evaluate whether a reduction or modification of the Vested floor Area or Vested Uses currently provided by the original Development Agreement is warranted, in particular for building(s) identified by the Applicant as being a lesser priority and/or designated to later phases of development.", "2. Establish a Phasing Plan for orderly build-out of the Phase Two Project over an extended period, beyond the timeframes currently authorized by the Development Agreement.", "3. Provide for comprehensive and integrated review of all Phase Two building sites in the Master Plan.", "4. Ensure that physical improvements, operational requirements, and community & project benefit obligations are incorporated in the Phase Two Project Phasing Plan and performance of such measures is linked to project milestones in the Master Plan and, as appropriate, in the conditions of approval for the associated Development Review Permits for individual buildings.", "5. Ensure that vested rights for the Applicant\u2019s first-level priorities for Phase Two are addressed clearly in the Phasing Plan. Examples of first-level priorities include rebuilding the John Wayne Cancer Research Institute and the Child & Family Development Center, and accommodating new parking spaces early in Phase Two in a manner that facilitates orderly development of the Health Center in subsequent stages of development.", "6. Establish a schedule for formal review of the ten Development Review Permits (including the two caf\u00e9s) following approval of the Phase Two Project Master Plan. For example, it may make sense to authorize review of the first four Development Review Permits concurrently with final review of the Phase Two Master Plan. Three additional project milestones could be formulated based on construction of the four remaining Phase Two buildings associated with Stages C, D, and E.", "7. Establish a schedule of performance in the Phase Two Project Master Plan to authorize future review of Development Review Permits for buildings in the latter phases of development. Development Review Permit submittal or building permit issuance deadlines could also be established for these subsequent buildings and their associated development phase. For example, the Applicant schedule states that construction would begin for the West Ambulatory Care Building (2C) on the North Campus approximately 9.5 years after initial approval of the Master Plan.", "The Phase Two Project Phasing Plan could require the Applicant to submit, and have deemed complete, the Development Review Permit application for Building 2C as a 10-year milestone from approval of the Master Plan. This would allow building mass, design, programmatic needs, and other requirements of the permit to be reviewed in the future \u2013 and with the benefit of an assessment of health care and community priorities at a period in time closer to implementation.", "8. Prioritize the infrastructure, circulation, and open space improvements and link them clearly to a schedule of performance in the final Phase Two Project Phasing Plan to ensure the Health Center will function optimally, in the event that certain phases of development are not pursued in the future.", "9. Require preparation of new empirical parking demand analyses at specified stages of the Phase Two build-out after new buildings, uses, and parking resources have been constructed. This would allow for a reassessment of parking requirements for the next stage(s) of construction and determine how user group (patient/visitor and employee) travel behavior has changed over time due to increased access to public transit in the area, increased reliance on alternate modes of transportation, and continued implementation of Transportation Demand Management Programs at the Health Center and Citywide.", "If direction is provided to staff to pursue this alternative review framework for the Phase Two Project, Council would need to first approve the procedural amendment authorizing its own action on the Phase Two Master Plan in a separate public hearing. The substantive amendment would be reviewed concurrently during future public hearings for the proposed Phase Two Master Plan.", "With consideration of the points outlined above, a Phase Two Project Phasing Plan could be developed and authorized with Council approval in conjunction with comprehensive Master Plan. This approach would allow Providence to build out the project over an extended time-period and allow the City to structure a review process with a schedule of performance for important plan components such as infrastructure, circulation improvements, and community and project benefits over the course of the phasing plan.", "Moreover, the proposed amendment would structure the review of the Phase Two Project Master Plan and the associated Development Review Permits so that important regulatory review decisions are made timely and with the expectation that more context-responsive buildings and improvements will be implemented over the proposed 20-year life of the Phase Two Project.", "The following is an preliminary conceptual framework for this approach. Note that the timeframes and stages are provided for illustrative purposes only, to show one example of a review process that is based on a 20-year build out as currently contemplated by the Applicant.", "\u00b7 April \u2013 December 2016", "o PSJHC Phase Two Development Agreement Amendment float-up discussions at Planning Commission and City Council", "\u00b7 Winter-Spring 2017", "o Planning Commission recommendation on procedural amendment authorizing Council review of Phase Two Project Master Plan", "o Council action on procedural amendment authorizing Council review of Phase Two Project Master Plan", "o Begin environmental analysis for Phase Two Project Master Plan", "o Architectural Review Board float-up", "\u00b7 Spring-Summer 2018", "o Planning Commission recommendation on Phase Two Project Master Plan, Phasing Plan, and associated Development Agreement Amendments [phase one north campus site plan/circulation revisions, etc.]", "o EIR recommendation", "\u00b7 Fall 2018 \u2013 Winter 2019", "o Council action on Phase Two Project Master Plan, Phasing Plan, and associated Development Agreement Amendments [phase one north campus revisions, etc.]", "o EIR review and certification", "o Planning Commission review and approval of Development Review Permits for Stage A and Stage B buildings (multi-family housing, child & family development center, John Wayne Cancer Institute, North Campus Parking Structure)", "\u00b7 Summer 2019", "o Architectural Review Board for Stage A and Stage B buildings", "o Plan check", "Figure 7 shown below outlines the steps that would follow Council action on the Phase Two Project Master Plan and associated Phasing Plan:", "Public Objectives/Proposed Community Benefits", "The Development Agreement for Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center includes a requirement for Phase One and Phase Two community benefit programs. As presented earlier in this report, Phase One community benefits are provided through implementation of an annual Community Benefit Program and Community Access Plan that requires provision of in-kind and cash support to organizations, and direct medical services to support community health in Santa Monica and beyond in the Health Center\u2019s broader service area. Providence is obligated to implement these requirements for the life of the 55-year term of the Agreement that ends in 2053.", "The Development Agreement specifies several community benefit requirements associated with Phase Two development that build on the programs established through the Phase One Program:", "\u00b7 An amended Community Access Plan to ensure that a reasonable number of Santa Monica residents who are unable to afford fees and memberships will have access to Phase Two\u2019s community-oriented facilities.", "\u00b7 Minimum 35% open space on the South Campus.", "\u00b7 An expanded child care program provided as part of Phase One to address child care needs generated by the Phase Two development.", "Staff is seeking feedback and direction from Council the community and project benefits that should be considered during negotiations with the Applicant. Feedback and potential community benefit recommendations will also be sought from the City\u2019s Social Services Commission and Child Care Task Force later in the review process. In the meantime, staff suggests community benefit negotiations with the Applicant include, at a minimum, discussions on the following:", "Child and Family Services", "Identify ways to increase support for child and family services in the community and at the Health Center campus. This is an area where Providence and Saint John\u2019s Health Center has expertise, a track record for providing child and mental health services and supporting local non-profit providers in the community.", "In conjunction with the proposed Development Agreement Amendment, staff will look for ways to Providence can increase support for area service providers/partners and potentially provide an increase in the capacity of and services provide by the new Child & Family Development Center that will replace the existing center located on 20th Street. This could include reviewing the physical size/floor area of the Child & Family Development Center building and by evaluating programs providing services and support for:", "\u00b7 Therapeutic care/services/preschool", "\u00b7 Family support programs", "\u00b7 Mental health services", "\u00b7 Home visits for families with infants", "\u00b7 Support for health care in schools", "Child Care Center (a component of the Child & Family Development Center)", "Review the physical size of the Child Care Center, amount of floor area, and amount of open space dedicated to child care in conjunction with the existing community benefit requirement to reassess its Childcare Program to meet the child needs generated from the Phase Two Project. This parallel effort to assess the child care demands associated with the proposed Phase Two Project is underway; the Applicant team selected a City-approved child care consultant who is preparing a child care needs assessment study for the Phase Two Project. The results of this study will be provided during formal review of the Master Plan.", "Exceptional Architecture, Sustainability and Environmental Design", "Provide a high level of architectural design throughout the Phase Two Project; provide certification under one or more of the following LEED ratings systems categories:", "\u00b7 LEED Healthcare", "\u00b7 LEED for Neighborhood Development", "\u00b7 LEED for New Construction", "\u00b7 LEED for New Homes", "Consideration should be given for superior energy and water conservation elements to be integrated into the design for the Phase Two buildings that may be unrelated to a rating system. The Applicant has developed a series of sustainability goals and objectives as part of the proposed Master Plan for the South Campus and for the North Campus sites. Greater achievement on sustainability and environmental design goals, including LEED certification, will be negotiated as part of the Phase Two Project with consideration given to the specific physical and programmatic needs of medical care and research buildings. Staff will also evaluate where greater achievement can be obtained in other portions of the Health Center campus and/or other building types (i.e., child care, residential buildings).", "Monetary Contributions", "Finally, staff would recommend that a monetary contribution be negotiated as part of the Development Agreement Amendment to support transportation and circulation enhancements:", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus Contribution to support improvements in and around the Healthcare District.", "\u00b7 Transportation Management Organization (TMO) Contribution to support continued outreach and development of the Citywide TMO and its work focused on the Healthcare District.", "\u00b7 Monetary contribution to support expanded transportation-related improvements and/or transportation-related improvements that are funded and implemented by Providence.", "Planning Commission Discussion", "The Planning Commission held a preliminary float-up discussion on April 27, 2016 to review and provide feedback on the Applicant\u2019s proposed Development Agreement amendments and staff\u2019s recommendation for structuring the review of the Phase Two Project. The Commission provided recommendations on the Applicant\u2019s proposed amendments and expressed support for staff\u2019s substitute amendments presented in this report. More specifically, staff\u2019s proposal was preferred because it provides the City with the ability to evaluate, plan, and regulate the north and south campuses comprehensively through Council approval of a Phase Two Master Plan. The Commission also supported staff\u2019s proposed review framework because it could provide for staggered review and assessment of parking needs, programmatic priorities, and other site design and infrastructure elements at future stages of development \u2013 instead of reviewing and approving all eight main buildings in the beginning of the phased build out.", "As detailed more fully in Attachment \u201cD\u201d, Planning Commissioners and members of the community who spoke at the Planning Commission meeting also provided a range of comments on site planning, preferred uses, urban design, the construction period, and potential community benefits for consideration during the City review process. After staff receives Council direction on how to proceed with the Applicant\u2019s request for an extension of time to build out the Phase Two Project, these comments will be reviewed carefully once staff begins internal review of the project and negotiations with the Applicant.", "Community Meeting", "The Applicant conducted a community meeting on July 30, 2015 to provide an overview of the Phase Two Project, Master Plan for the South Campus, and proposed Development Agreement Amendment, and to gather early feedback on the proposal. The Applicant has also conducted smaller outreach meetings with various stakeholders and groups, including residents and the Board of Directors from the Geneva Plaza, residents from a neighboring condominium building on the east side of the South Campus, and with Santa Monica Mid-City Neighbors on several occasions and most recently on November 15, 2016.", "The list of comments and questions raised at the July 30, 2015 community meeting is provided as Attachment \u201cE\u201d to this staff report and is expanded on in the Planning Commission and Community Members\u2019 comments from the April 27, 2016 meeting (Attachment \u201cD\u201d). In general, community members have been gathering information on the scope of the project and seeking clarification on particular aspects of the project and the time extension requested to build the project in phases. Some of the common issues raised include the following and are also detailed more fully as part of Attachment \u201cD\u201d:", "Parking and Access", "\u00b7 Will there be enough parking spaces provided with the new project?", "\u00b7 How much will it cost to park at the project site and will drivers with disabled placards be allowed to park at a reduced price or for free in the new garages?", "\u00b7 How will impacts to street parking be addressed with the new parking garages?", "\u00b7 Will there be changes made to parking meter restrictions on Broadway and Santa Monica Boulevard?", "\u00b7 Request was made for a dedicated passenger loading zone and ten metered spaces converted to permit-only parking along 21st Street to serve Geneva Plaza residents, visitors, and caregivers.", "\u00b7 Concerns were expressed that the proposed 2,880 parking spaces would be either too few or too many parking spaces for the site.", "\u00b7 Residents who live closest to the South Campus have reviewed and asked questions about the new street plan; residents want to make sure safe and convenient access is provided to Broadway.", "\u00b7 Concern has been expressed about traffic impacts on Broadway.", "\u00b7 Support was provided for the idea of opening up the block and creating access between Broadway and Santa Monica Boulevard.", "Building Design, Site Plan, Construction, and General Comments", "\u00b7 Several questions have been raised about various building heights and number of stories, the height of the pedestrian bridge over Santa Monica Boulevard, and the use/access plan for open spaces areas.", "\u00b7 Request the Health Center be respectful of neighbors during the construction period and not block driveway and please observe construction hours.", "\u00b7 Questions were raised about the length of time for constructing the first phase of development and clarification on the overall timeline for build-out.", "\u00b7 Compliment provided on the architectural design and open space plan.", "\u00b7 Question raised about the potential for new jobs associated with the Phase Two project.", "\u00b7 Community benefits should be reevaluated carefully and consider the immediate neighborhood, build on the Health Center\u2019s existing programs, and strengthen existing and create new partnerships with other non-profit community service providers.", "Next Steps", "Council will need to provide direction on whether to pursue the procedural amendment authorizing Council action on a Phase Two Project Master Plan and whether there is interest in the amendment addressing an extended timeframe to complete Phase Two development through establishment of a comprehensive Phase Two Project Phasing Plan. The information gathered through this preliminary discussion will also help inform the scope of the project that will be studied as part of the project\u2019s environmental review pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), and establish whether an amendment may be necessary to the Hospital Area Specific Plan (last revised in 1998).", "If direction is provided to pursue both amendments, then public hearings would be scheduled for the procedural amendment by the second quarter of 2017. The substantive amendment addressing an extended timeframe for the Phase Two Project build-out would be reviewed concurrently with future public hearings for the proposed Phase Two Master Plan and Phasing Plan for South Campus and North Campus development sites.", "Fiscal Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Adoption of Reimbursement Resolution and Pledged Revenue and Fund(s) Resolution for the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the Reimbursement Resolution and Pledged Revenue and Fund(s) Resolution for the City of Santa Monica\u2019s proposed Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On January 26, 2016, the City Council adopted a resolution (Attachment A) authorizing City staff to file applications with the California State Water Resources Control Board (State Water Board) requesting funding from a combination of various State programs including Proposition 1 grant programs and the Clean Water State Revolving Fund (CWSRF), and to negotiate funding for the proposed SWIP with the State Water Board. The State Water Board is currently reviewing the financial section of the City\u2019s CWSRF application for low interest financing. Before the State Water Board provides a funding proposal for review, City Council adoption of the attached Reimbursement Resolution (Attachment B) and Pledged Revenue and Fund(s) Resolution (Attachment C) is required. The preliminary estimated cost of the project is approximately $57,050,000. Staff has determined that the Wastewater Fund has the financial capacity to pledge future revenues towards payment of any and all CWSRF financing for the SWIP, thereby completing an important step in the funding application process for the SWIP. Adoption of the subject resolutions has no fiscal impact. Staff will return to City Council for review and approval for any project funding agreement.", "Background", "The State Water Board is committed to assisting its stakeholders build resiliency to drought and climate change. Similarly, the City has established among its sustainability goals the objective of reaching water self-sufficiency by the year 2020, concurrent with addressing the water conservation requirements made necessary by the on-going drought. The City\u2019s proposed SWIP would align with these objectives, while simultaneously helping to improve drought resiliency, increase water supply for reuse, and enhance flexibility in the management of the City\u2019s water resources, by allowing for the treatment and reuse of brackish/saline groundwater, municipal wastewater, and stormwater. City Council previously approved staff applying for State Water Board grant and low interest financing on January 26, 2016. City Council adopted the SWIP environmental documents on September 27, 2016.", "Currently, the City\u2019s water supply is a combination of imported water and local groundwater. Long term, the City seeks to become sustainably independent from imported water through continued conservation and increasing reliance on its groundwater resources. The SWIP takes a forward thinking approach to help secure the City\u2019s water future by leveraging use of existing City infrastructure and by linking together three distributed water reuse elements into a single cohesive and comprehensive project to harvest, treat, and reuse non-conventional water resources. Advanced treated water produced from the SWIP would be used to meet existing permitted non-potable reuse demands. When properly permitted, a significant portion of the advanced treated water would be utilized for indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge. Combined, these three elements would produce approximately 1,680 acre-feet per year (AFY) of new water.", "The SWIP has three basic elements (Attachment D) all designed to function as a cohesive and integrated system for the harvesting, treatment and conjunctive reuse of all nonconventional water resources that are available to the City (i.e. stormwater, brackish/saline impaired groundwater, and municipal wastewater).", "\u00b7 SWIP Element 1, a shallow brackish/saline impaired groundwater supply well, would be installed to replenish a City stormwater harvest tank near the Santa Monica Pier during dry weather. The City recently received a $3.7M Clean Beaches Initiative (CBI) grant to construct this 1.6 million gallon tank. Runoff and impaired groundwater from the CBI tank would be piped to the City\u2019s existing Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF). As part of Element 1, the SMURRF would also be upgraded with the installation of a containerized reverse osmosis (RO) unit capable of treating both captured stormwater and brackish/saline impaired groundwater for permitted non-potable distribution and future permitted indirect reuse (aquifer recharge).", "\u00b7 SWIP Element 2 would provide a source of recycled water for permitted conjunctive reuse via the construction of a new below ground Advanced Water Treatment Facility (AWTF) to treat up to 1 million gallons per day (MGD) of municipal wastewater. Treatment would include, among other things, membrane bioreactors, membrane filtration, reverse osmosis, and advanced oxidation.", "\u00b7 SWIP Element 3 would include added infrastructure to further improve stormwater harvesting and reuse. Two below-grade runoff harvest tanks totaling 4.5 million gallons would reduce ocean discharges and divert the harvested runoff to the new AWTF. One tank would be constructed upgradient beneath Memorial Park and the other below ground at a location on the Civic Center Parking Lot. The subject tanks also provide for compliance with new State Enhanced Watershed Management Plan (EWMP) for Jurisdictional Group 2 and 3 and Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System (MS4) permit requirements for nonpoint source pollution control, and would help improve beach water quality.", "Discussion", "The preliminary estimated cost of the project is approximately $57,050,000. The City is pursuing a combination of grants and low interest financing from the State Water Board to fund the proposed SWIP. In addition to applying for Proposition 1 grant funding, City staff submitted an application seeking CWSRF low interest financing. The current CWSRF interest rate is approximately 1.7% per annum. If the entire project were funded via the CWSRF, debt service costs to the Wastewater Fund may be as much as $2.5 million per year. Grant funding or principal forgiveness by the State would lower repayment costs. Staff has determined that the Wastewater Fund has the financial capacity to pledge future revenues toward payment of any and all CWSRF financing for the SWIP and still maintain adequate reserves. This new debt service cost would be almost entirely offset after one year, when the existing Wastewater Revenue Bonds reach maturity and no longer require debt payments.", "The CWSRF application consists of four packages: General, Environmental, Financial, and Technical. The State Water Board has completed the review of the General and Environmental Packages for the SWIP and is currently completing its review of the Technical and Financial Packages. In order to complete the Financial Package review and provide a funding proposal, City Council adoption of the Reimbursement Resolution and Pledged Revenue and Fund(s) Resolution is required.#0", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to City Council for review and approval for any", "project funding agreement."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to three annual vacancies on the Clean Beaches & Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee for terms ending on December 31, 2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmembers McKeown and Davis that Council direct staff to explore the procedural steps necessary to establish voter approval requirements for development exceeding the general plan, the adopted zoning code, or some other specified threshold, and/or require a super-majority Council vote on projects exceeding specified parameters, and return to Council and the community with information for possible future actions, including policy changes, resolutions, ordinances, and Council-initiated ballot measures.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmembers McKeown and Himmelrich that Council, in light of recent news coverage and Superior Court action, direct staff to review all existing and pending agreements with Neil Shekhter, NMS, and associated entities, verifying information provided as part of such agreements, and attempting to ensure that the municipal corporation, residents/taxpayers, and occupants of NMS buildings are fully protected from possible misstatements and their consequences.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember Himmelrich that the City Council support a Los Angeles County sales tax measure to raise money to fund health, mental health, care centers, and other supportive services for homeless individuals.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown, Mayor Pro Tem Winterer, and Mayor Vazquez that the Council allocate from Council contingency funds $10,000 as a one-time matching incentive for fundraising to retain Bergamot Station\u2019s City Garage, a facility considered crucial to our community\u2019s long-term plans for a cultural campus at Bergamot, where City Garage has received a 50% rent increase from the private entity holding the master lease until December of 2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1542936600": [[{"Title": "Proposed Rent Subsidy Pilot Program: Preserving Our Diversity", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the proposed Preserving Our Diversity pilot program (POD Program) Guidelines, as outlined in Attachment A to the report, to provide rental assistance to extremely low-income residents experiencing severe rent burden.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Data from several hundred Santa Monica low-income households that participated in a recent written survey indicates many residents are paying a disproportionate amount of rent for their housing. At the lowest income levels, households paying unaffordable rents are left with approximately $200 a month for household necessities, which can result in long-term residents having to leave Santa Monica. To further one of the City Council\u2019s Strategic Goals of maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, Council approved funding for a pilot program to provide rental assistance to a limited number of existing residents. Implementing the proposed Preserving Our Diversity (POD) Pilot Program provides an opportunity to gauge the efficacy of preserving housing affordability through a locally designed and funded rental-assistance program. Theprimary goal of the proposed Program is to help extremely low-income residents stay in their homes and mitigate economic displacement by reducing household rent burden and achieving a feasible level of affordability. Staff recommends implementing the pilot POD Program prioritizing extremely low-income and severely rent-burdened households.", "Background", "In December 2015, the Housing Commission presented a report to Council recommending affordable housing strategies that could help preserve Santa Monica\u2019s economic diversity and bolster housing security for residents (see Attachment B). Oneof the strategies discussed in the Commission\u2019s report aims to \u201cassist lower-income Santa Monicans to remain in their rent-controlled homes.\u201d The report discusses federal data indicating that 6,325 Santa Monica households with very low incomes are spending more than half of their incomes on rent. A key rationale of the rental assistance strategy is stemming the ongoing loss of affordable, rent-controlled apartments, which occurs when long-term residents vacate their homes and rents become decontrolled. Lower-income households are more likely than higher-income households to be economically displaced due to unaffordable rent. In such cases, existing affordability of rent-controlled residences is lost as rents for new tenants are set at market rates.", "Responsibility for aiding economically strained households has traditionally fallen on Federal, State, and County governments. Santa Monica, however, has for more than three decades been a leader in local government policy initiatives to support affordability, particularly in regard to housing. The City was one of a handful of cities statewide with a program of rent control for apartments, which made a huge impact not only on the ability of thousands of residents to continue to live here during times of rapidly increasing rents, but also to ensure a far more economically diverse community make-up. The City was also a pioneer in leveraging affordable housing funding, particularly from redevelopment, and has aggressively pursued \u201cinclusionary zoning\u201d policies. Yet with changes in State law affecting local rent control protections and the demise of redevelopment, market forces are continuing to place local residents in a tight squeeze to afford rent and hang on to their homes. While there is risk in stepping into that gap, the downside risks of not exploring new solutions leaves many Santa Monica households vulnerable.", "On May 10, 2016 (see Attachment B), Council directed staff to explore creating a local rent-subsidy program to assist low-income Santa Monica residents who currently live in rent-controlled apartments and are severely rent burdened. Additionally, as part of the FY2016-17 budget approved on June 14, 2016, Council allocated $300,000 for a pilot program providing rental assistance to rent-burdened households living in rent-controlled apartments, for the purpose of preserving housing affordability (see Attachment C.) \u2018Rent-burdened\u2019 is a national affordable housing metric and describes a household paying more than 30 percent of income for rent. \u2018Severely rent-burdened\u2019 designates a household paying more than 50 percent of income for rent.", "Renter Needs Survey", "To assess the magnitude of rent burden among residents in rent-controlled residences, staff conducted a Renter Needs Survey (Survey) from June 24, 2016 to July 18, 2016. The Survey also functioned as a pre-application for the POD rental-assistance pilotprogram. Potential participants were informed of the Survey/pre-application by a flyer included in the annual June 2016 Rent Control Board mailing to approximately 27,500 rent-controlled tenants, as well as postings on City websites, advertisement in local papers, and outreach to businesses, churches, libraries, supermarkets, and social service agencies. The Survey asked ten questions about each household, including size, income, rent, tenure in Santa Monica, and demographics (See Attachment D.)", "As of July 18, 2016, 814 surveys were received by mail or online via Survey Monkey. Analysis of the surveys was narrowed to the 678 containing complete information, and further narrowed to the 433 households living in rent-controlled residences not already subsidized by the City, County, or federal government, or subject to affordability covenants. The survey data is self-reported and would be verified during the eligibility verification process.", "Key Findings", "The key findings of the Renter Needs Survey include:", "\u00b7 76% of the 433 (330) households are rent-burdened", "\u00b7 36% of the 433 (155) households are severely rent-burdened", "o 79 of 155 households are extremely low-income", "\u00a7 74 of 79 households have been residents for more than 10 years", "\u00a7 Of the 74 households, the average:", "\u00a7 age = 69", "\u00a7 household size = 1.2", "\u00a7 monthly rent = $925", "\u00a7 income = $1,137 (monthly); $13,644 (annual)", "\u00a7 rent-to-income ratio is 81%", "\u2018Extremely low-income\u2019 describes households with incomes less than 30 percent of the median income (e.g., annual income of less than $18,250 for a 1-person household). Additionally, affordable rent is defined as 30 percent of gross income. To relieve the rent burden of the average household mentioned above, the household needs $584 per month in rental assistance, or $7,008 annually. The table below demonstrates the rental subsidy calculation for the average household:", "Rent Subsidy Calculation", "Monthly Rent", "$925", "Tenant\u2019s Portion", "(30% of monthly income of $1,137)", "($341)", "Rent Assistance Needed", "$584", "Annual Rent Assistance", "$7,008", "Relieving rent burden for all 74 extremely low-income households who are severely rent-burdened would cost $518,983 annually (excluding program administration costs).", "See Attachment E for charts illustrating detailed demographic characteristics of the 433 Survey-respondent households living in rent-controlled residences, including information about household size, tenure in Santa Monica, senior status, rent, and income.", "Discussion", "Survey data from the 433 households experiencing rent burden indicates the scope of need far exceeds the capacity of the proposed pilot POD Program, which has a $300,000 budget ($200,000 for direct rental assistance and $100,000 for program administration.) Completely relieving rent burden for the 74 households mentioned above would require annual subsidies more than double ($518,983) the direct rental assistance budget. Incrafting the proposed POD Program, staff considered three main factors for prioritizing assistance: 1) income level; 2) rent-burden level; and 3) length of residency.", "Extremely low-income households are economically vulnerable given minimal monthly income available after paying rent. Survey responses indicate there are 84 extremely low-income households who are rent-burdened (not just severely rent-burdened), with $216 per month available on average. Similarly, this population is experiencing the greatest rent burden, with 94 percent of the extremely low-income households also classified as severely rent-burdened (i.e., 79 of the 84) and are likely at the greatest risk of being displaced and possibly becoming homeless. Therefore, prioritizing extremely low-income households would have a similar result to targeting severely rent-burdened households, given the significant overlap between the two groups.  Targeting long-term residents within this cohort, defined as living in Santa Monica for more than 10 years, would narrow the focus to 74 households.", "With respect to rent-burden level, the proposed POD Program could seek to eliminate rent burden by providing assistance to reduce household rent payments to 30 percent of income. Analyzing the same 74 households mentioned previously (i.e., extremely low-income, severely rent-burdened, and residents for more than 10 years), assisting the most burdened households, and based upon the $200,000 rental assistance budget, 18 households could be served. Alternatively, the Program\u2019s goal could be to reduce, rather than eliminate, rent burden. For example, reducing rent burden to 40 percent of household income would enable the Program to serve more households because the rental assistance per household would be lower. Under the 40 percent scenario, 21 households could be served. Taking the approach one step further, reducing rent burden to 50 percent of income level would allow the Program to serve 27 households. Three options for the pilot POD Program are summarized below:", "Option 1: Eliminate rent burden by reducing rent to 30 percent of household income", "o projected number of households served: 18", "Option 2: Reduce rent burden to 40 percent of household income", "o projected number of households served: 21", "Option 3: Reduce rent burden to 50 percent of household income", "o projected number of households served: 27", "A fourth option (Option 4) could be to provide a set amount of monthly rental assistance, depending on qualifying income category. For example, a monthly subsidy based upon the following income categories:", "o extremely low income: $500", "o very low income: $400", "o low income: $300", "The fixed-amount method differs from the other three options because it would serve households in all low-income categories rather than just those at the lowest income level (i.e., extremely low-income). The number of households that could be assisted would depend on the monthly subsidy allocated to each income group. Using the example provided above ($500 to $300), approximately 13 households in each of the income categories could be assisted, for a total of 39 households. Using a lower standard subsidy \u2013 for example, $400, $300, $200 - would increase the number of households that could be assisted to approximately 18 in each income category, or 54 total households. Using a higher standard subsidy amount than presented in the example would have the opposite effect.", "Staff recommends implementing the pilot POD Program using Option 2, and prioritizing households that are extremely low-income and severely rent-burdened, and have been Santa Monica residents for more than 10 years. Option 2 balances a significant reduction in rent burden with assisting more households than Option 1. Additionally, the Survey data indicates that the households experiencing the most substantial economic challenges are both extremely low-income and severely rent-burdened.", "Threshold Eligibility Criteria", "Staff recommends the following threshold household eligibility criteria for the proposed POD Program (household must meet all criteria below):", "o Submitted a complete Renter Needs Survey by July 18, 2016 at 5 p.m. PST", "o Living in a Santa Monica rent-control apartment for at least 10 years;", "\u00d8 Excludes households living in deed-restricted affordable housing, and properties purchased, rehabilitated, or constructed with financial assistance from the City, Los Angeles County, or the federal government, as well as inclusionary affordable apartments subject to the Affordable Housing Production Program;", "o Not currently participating in, or previously terminated from, any Santa Monica Housing Authority rental subsidy programs;", "o No household members convicted of violent crime which occurred within the last 5 years, or are registered sex offenders.", "Priority Criteria", "o Extremely low income (less than 30 percent of median income; see Attachment F);", "o Severely rent-burdened (rent exceeds 50 percent of gross household income)", "\u00d8 Prioritization among the households would be implemented by serving households in order of highest rent burden to lower rent burden. For example, a household with a rent burden of 80 percent would have priority over a household with a 75 percent rent burden.", "Program Implementation", "Staff has envisioned the proposed POD program whereby a portion of each participant\u2019s rent would be paid directly to the participant\u2019s property owner. The approach is customary for rental subsidy programs to ensure the funding assistance is used for the purpose it is being provided \u2013 a payment for rent. One concern with the customary approach is that some property owners might refuse to accept the City\u2019s payments, in spite of local laws which prohibit housing discrimination on the basis of income. An alternative approach would be to make payments directly to participating residents. Payments directly to residents presents several challenges, including that the program assistance: 1) might not be used to pay rent; 2) could be considered additional income when determining participant eligibility for other public support programs and services; and 3) may be treated as taxable income (which reduces the net value of the assistance received). As a result, staff recommends initially implementing the proposed pilot POD program as a direct payment to property owners on behalf of tenants.", "The proposed POD program does not provide a long-term solution to Santa Monica\u2019s diversity challenges because existing residents will eventually have to give up their existing housing for variety of reasons. Further, a pilot program runs the risk of raising unrealistic expectations about the City\u2019s ability to fill the widening gap between housing costs and the income of lower-income residents. It will be important to stress that the program is a genuine pilot, not an assurance of ongoing funding for the recipient households, nor a guarantee of the continuation of local rental subsidies. Rather, it is an opportunity to assess the effectiveness of a new approach to maintaining housing security. Combined with the case management approach recommended by the Social Service Commission, the pilot may assist in shaping local housing policies and potentially offer a model for regional, State, or Federal policies and programs.", "In the short term, the recommended pilot is a relatively cost-effective test of new ways to deal with a severe challenge for local residents. For example, if the program were to reduce rent burden to 40 percent of income for the average pilot household, the total cost of the subsidy (excluding program administration costs) over 55 years for the household would be $310,860 ($471 monthly subsidy x 12 months x 55 years), which is comparable to the City\u2019s cost to produce one affordable residence that would be deed-restricted for a minimum of 55 years. On the other hand, rental assistance programs are staff intensive and tend to be more expensive to administer than loan subsidy programs because of the income qualification process that is required annually for each participant.", "Commission Input", "As mentioned earlier in this report, the Housing Commission\u2019s December 2015 report to the City Council regarding affordable housing strategies recommended implementing a local rent subsidy program. Draft guidelines for the proposed POD Program were reviewed and discussed by the Housing Commission at its June 16, 2016 meeting (see Attachment G). Commissioners had a wide-ranging discussion and provided feedback regarding various methods for prioritizing program participants and utilizing the available funding. One approach discussed is to use the limited funds to reduce rent burden to a level below 50 percent of income \u2013 such as 40 percent of income - rather than all the way down to 30 percent of income, thereby allowing the program to assist more households. Another approach discussed was targeting low-income households rather than extremely low-income households, also with the intent of assisting more households (and based upon an assumption that reducing rent burden would require less assistance for low-income households versus extremely low-income households).", "Revised draft guidelines were presented to the Housing Commission at its October20,2016 meeting, reflecting input received from the June meeting. TheHousing Commission voted 5-2 to approve the revised draft guidelines for the proposed POD Program, which are identical to the proposed guidelines attached to this staff report (except a minor language change regarding required income verification documentation). The Commissioners who did not vote to support the proposed guidelines expressed concern that prioritizing the most severely rent-burdened households would diminish the Program\u2019s financial capacity to assist the greatest number of households. Additionally, the Social Services Commission at its October24,2016 voted to support the proposed POD Program and suggested the Program should assist participant households with accessing federal, state, county, and local benefit programs and services for which they are eligible. The proposed Guidelines have incorporated the Social Services Commission input.", "Next Steps", "With Council approval, staff would implement the Program and provide a subsequent report to Council, including the total number of households assisted and an evaluation of the Program\u2019s impact on housing retention. The pilot program is expected to help inform considerations of a permanent rent-assistance program.", "Once guidelines are approved, staff would provide written materials to Program participants at the outset to make clear the temporary (pilot) nature of the Program, including the stipulation that rental assistance funding is authorized for only twelve months. However, the Council and community should be aware that discontinuing rental assistance to initial participants of the POD Program could be disruptive to those households.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The Preserving Our Diversity Pilot Program will cost $300,000 with $200,000 allocated to subsidies and $100,000 allocated to administration. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Housing and Economic Development Department. Program expenditures would be charged to account 04264.577290. Future-year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Acceptance of 2015 State Homeland Security Grant Program (SHSGP) Grant Funds", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $200,000 from the 2015 State Homeland Security Grant Program (SHSGP) and execute the subrecipient agreement and related documents to purchase equipment that supports regional homeland security goals; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impact and Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In 2015, $200,000 was awarded to the City of Santa Monica Fire Department as a part of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s State Homeland Security Grant Program (SHSGP) grant. Funds were requested to purchase equipment that supports regional homeland security goals. Specifically the Fire Department requested funding in the amount of $200,000 to fund interoperability radio components and two heart monitor defibrillators.", "Background", "The SHSGP program provides no-match grant funding for costs associated with updating and implementing the State's Homeland Security Strategy, and enhancing the capability of local agencies to prevent and respond to threats and/or incidents of terrorism. In 2015, $200,000 was awarded to the City of Santa Monica Fire Department as a part of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s SHSGP grant. Funds were requested and granted to purchase equipment that supports regional homeland security goals; specifically, interoperability equipment to strengthen communication capabilities and the purchase of two heart monitor defibrillators to be utilized in support of surge capacity during response to emergency incidents.", "As a result of the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, through the Office for Domestic Preparedness, has provided financial assistance to state and local governments through no-match grant programs. The SHSGP program focuses on enhancing regional preparedness in major metropolitan areas. The SHSGP program directly supports the national priority of expanding regional collaboration within the national preparedness guidelines and is intended to assist participating jurisdictions in developing integrated regional systems for prevention, protection, response, and recovery from natural or man-made disasters. The grants are 100% federally funded from the Department of Homeland Security to the State of California. The County of Los Angeles administers the SHSGP grant program.", "Discussion", "The City of Santa Monica has directly received over $4.0 million of Department of Homeland Security no-match grant funds since 2001. These funds have purchased equipment, supplies, and training in direct support of overall regional goals to promote effective information gathering, sharing, and response to threats and/or acts of terrorism.", "The Fire Department would use the $200,000 of the SHSGP 2015 grant to purchase two heart monitor defibrillators to be utilized in support of surge capacity for response to large-scale emergency incidents or planned events when additional equipment is required and the purchase of various interoperability equipment, including six first responder portable radios, radio remote microphones, radio batteries, and radio battery chargers. This equipment improves the Fire Department\u2019s emergency medical response equipment cache and communications reliability. This equipment purchase also would strengthen response and communication capabilities throughout the region.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $200,000 grant from the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency requires the following FY 2016-17 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20312.406808 in the amount of $200,000", "2. Appropriate the following expenditures to reflect receipt of the 2015 SHSGP grant: $200,000 at account 20312.555366."]}, {"Title": "Approval of Third Modification to Agreement with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC. for Santa Monica Airport Management", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to Professional Services Agreement No. 10262 (CCS) in the amount of $223,025 with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC (\u201cAeroplex\u201d), a California-based corporation, to provide additional property management and consulting services for the Santa Monica Airport. This will result in a two-year amended agreement expiring on June 30, 2017, in the amount of $844,115, including a 10% contingency with a one-year option to renew in the amount of $433,900, including a 10% contingency in FY 2017-18, at the sole discretion of the City for a total contractual amount not to exceed $1,278,015, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City currently contracts with Aeroplex to provide assistance to City staff with commercial real estate leasing, property management and consulting services for aviation properties at Santa Monica Airport as well as City owned properties at 3100 Donald Douglas Loop North. Staff recommends that Council approve a third modification in the amount of $223,025 to increase the amended agreement expiring on June 30, 2017 to $844,115 with a one-year option to renew in the amount of $433,900 in FY 2017-18 at the sole discretion of the City for a total not to exceed amount of $1,278,015 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. The modification is requested for Aeroplex to also assume responsibility for minor repairs and maintenance of the City owned properties, using its own employee and contracted resources; and to assist the City in developing a business plan for a City owned and operated Fixed Based Operation (FBO) at Santa Monica Airport (SMO).", "Background", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A), Council directed staff to contract for real estate brokerage services and property management firms to assist City staff with commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned properties at the Santa Monica Airport. On July 13, 2015, the City entered into Professional Services Agreement No. 3022 (CCS) with Aeroplex for an amount not to exceed $79,990 to provide assistance to City staff in negotiating leases for City-owned properties located at Santa Monica Airport, including brokerage services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period, and to provide property management and consulting services for those properties.", "Due to the acquisition of additional properties that required property management services, on March 1, 2016, (Attachment B) Council approved a first modification to the Agreement increasing the amount to $404,990 for year one with two one-year options to renew in the amount of $325,000 in FY 2016-17 and $325,000 in FY 2017-18 at the sole discretion of the City for a total amount not to exceed $1,054,990 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "On Sept 26, 2016, under his authority, the City Manager approved a second modification to Agreement No. 10262 (CCS), increasing the minimum monthly property management fee paid to Aeroplex from $4,000 to $15,000. The modification did not require additional funds, and had no budgetary impact.", "On August 23, 2016 (Attachment C), Council adopted a policy for establishing exclusive public proprietary Fixed Based Operation (FBO) services with City proprietor services and directed the City Manager to implement all steps necessary or advisable to implement that policy. Aeroplex\u2019s professional expertise would expedite the process of establishing the City\u2019s FBO.", "Discussion", "Although City Council voted to close the Santa Monica Airport by June 2018 or as soon as legally feasible, the City will continue to operate its City owned assets until that time or the time it closes. Staff anticipates that the need for additional commercial property management and consulting services for City-owned real estate assets in the current and future fiscal years will exceed the current agreement amount of $1,054,990.", "Maintenance", "On April 1, 2016, Aeroplex assumed property management responsibilities for the facility located at 3100 Donald Douglas Loop North. The property consists of 18,941 square feet of office space, 145,560 square feet of hangars, and 306,000 square feet of land area used for parking and aircraft ramp area. Since that time, maintenance and repair needs have been addressed on a case-by-case basis using City resources at the request of Aeroplex property management staff.", "This is a newly acquired facility. The City\u2019s Facilities Management Division does not have the necessary resources to respond to the needs of the tenants in an expeditious manner. Staff recommends contracting  with Aeroplex for the minor maintenance needs for this facility which would include, but are not limited to minor roof repairs, flooring, painting, addressing mold issues, fire extinguisher annual maintenance, hangar door repairs, pest control, minor plumbing repairs, and minor electrical services. In order to provide more efficient service to tenants, Aeroplex would assume responsibility for these minor repairs and maintenance needs using their own employees and/or contracted resources, consistent with City procurement policy and procedures. The City would continue to provide for regularly scheduled maintenance services, such as HVAC system upkeep, and janitorial and landscape services, including capital expenditures, using funds already authorized in the FY2016-17 Operating Budget. The additional cost of using Aeroplex services for this scope of work is estimated at $81,675 including a 10% contingency for FY 2016-17 (prorated for nine months of service), and $108,900 including a 10% contingency for FY 2017-18. The proposed costs are similar to the City\u2019s costs if the services were to be performed by City staff.", "FBO Business Plan", "Staff requested that Aeroplex provide consulting services to assist staff to prepare a business plan for a City operated Fixed Based Operation (FBO) at Santa Monica Airport (SMO). This business plan at a minimum would include training manuals for employees, equipment and fleet mix, all regulatory requirements and processes, and a cost analysis for the FBO.", "These additional consulting services would add $32,450 including a 10% contingency to the current agreement in FY 2016-17.", "Consultant Selection", "On April 1, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing and property management agent. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. One hundred and thirty four (134) vendors were notified, and 21 vendors downloaded the RFP. Five firms (Aeroplex Group Partners, CBRE Group Inc., Corporate Realty Group, PAR Commercial Brokerage, and Property Management Associates) responded. Responses to the RFP were received and publicly opened on May 11, 2015.", "The Airport Division of the Public Works Department and Housing and Economic Development staff evaluated proposals based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 and listed in the RFP. Based on these criteria, staff recommended Aeroplex as the best qualified firm to assist City staff in negotiating Airport leases at the Santa Monica Airport, including broker and property management services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Aeroplex is $223,025 for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,278,015.", "Award of the agreement modification requires the following FY2016-17 appropriations:", "33431.555060", "$32,450", "33457.533260", "$65,340", "33457.533280", "$16,335", "Total", "$114,125", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Beach Improvement Group (B.I.G.) Restrooms 16 and 17 Repair", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2401 to Concept Consultant, Inc., a California-based company, for the construction of the Beach Improvement Group (BIG) Beach Restrooms 16 and 17 Repair project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Concept Consultant, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $327,230 (includes a 10% contingency);3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report; and4. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Beach Improvement Group (BIG) project, located along Ocean Front Walk between Bay Street on the south and the Santa Monica Pier on the north, was built in 2000. The construction of beach restrooms 16 and 17 was part of the BIG project. The restrooms are in fair to poor condition due to the environmental exposure resulting from proximity to the ocean and because of high-volume use by locals and tourists. Staff recommends City Council award a construction contract to Concept Consultant, Inc. in a not to exceed amount of $327,230 for the BIG Beach Restrooms 16 and 17 Repair project which would repair the damage on the concrete masonry walls and steel tube roof frames, replace the broken concrete sinks, wood doors and plumbing and remove the vertical offsets on the sidewalks.", "Background", "Beach restrooms 16 and 17 were constructed as part of the Beach Improvement Group (BIG) project in 2000. Restroom 16 consists of a single structure which houses both the men\u2019s and women\u2019s toilets, and includes twelve regular and two ADA-accessible toilet cubicles and four pre-cast concrete sinks. Restroom 17 consists of two structures; the north structure houses the men\u2019s toilets and the south structure houses the women\u2019s toilets. Each structure includes six regular and one ADA-accessible toilet cubicles and two concrete sinks.", "In early 2014, staff began an assessment of existing conditions for beach restrooms 16 and 17. At the time, IDS Group, Inc., who was selected based on a Request for Bid (RFB) posted on the City\u2019s online vendor portal PlanetBids on January 6, 2014, worked under a blanket agreement for the City for structural engineering services. On April 23, 2014, staff executed professional services agreement #2841 with IDS Group, Inc. in the amount of $18,000, below Council threshold, for inspection services, structural engineering and drafting design services and an evaluation report. The report documented the extent of damages and made recommendations for the repair work. Based on the recommendations in that report, a set of engineering plans were produced and plans for the repair work have been approved.", "Discussion", "Beach restrooms 16 and 17 were constructed out of cement masonry blocks with steel structural tubes to support the fiber plastic roof. IDS Group reported that over the years the masonry blocks have spalled, exposing rebars to ocean air, and moisture has caused corrosion. The steel structural tubes supporting the roof are also corroded and should be corrected as part of the repair for structural integrity. The Beach Restrooms 16 and 17 repair project would also replace concrete sinks, restroom doors, and remove the vertical offsets on sidewalks. In order to maintain service to the public, one restroom would remain open while the other restroom is closed for construction. To complete all necessary repairs and to open the restrooms in time for the summer season, the project was approved in the Capital Improvement Program FY2016-18 Biennial Budget.", "Contractor Selection", "On August 23, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide construction services for the BIG Beach Restrooms 16 and 17 repair project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 40 vendors were notified and 11 attended the non-mandatory job walk. Two bids were received and publicly opened on September 28, 2016.", "Bidder", "Amount", "Concept Consultant, Inc.", "$297,482.03", "Custom Design Construction", "$353,375.00", "Bids were evaluated based on work requirements specified in the Request for Bids (RFB) and the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff conducted phone and in-person reference checks and were satisfied with the quality and history of work submitted by Concept Consultant, Inc. Based on these criteria, Concept Consultant, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Concept Consultant, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $327,230 (includes a 10% contingency). Additionally, direct owner costs for permit fees, inspection fees and material testing are estimated at $75,000. Funds of $329,416 are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account M119071.589000. Award of the contract and direct owner costs require an appropriation of $72,814 to account M119071.589000. The contract and direct owner costs will be charged to account M119071.589000."]}, {"Title": "First Modification to the Agreement with Systems Source, Inc. for Citywide Knoll Furniture Procurement", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to purchase agreement #4231 in the amount of $1,107,000 with Systems Source, Inc., a California-based company, to provide Knoll systems furniture procurement, installation and consulting services on an as-needed basis for City staff offices. This will result in a five year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,282,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In July 2016, staff executed a customized purchase agreement in the amount of $175,000 with Systems Source, Inc. in order to complete pending office space furniture projects.  This modification requests Council\u2019s approval to increase the not-to-exceed amount to accurately reflect the City\u2019s annual average spent to procure Knoll furniture for future office projects over a multiple year period in an efficient and cost-effective manner. The majority of installed modular furniture systems at the City are from the furniture line Knoll Morrison. Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to amend the agreement with Systems Source, Inc. to increase the amount by $1,107,000 for a new total amount not to exceed $1,282,000 over a five-year period.", "Background", "The City maintains approximately 170,000 square feet of leased and City-owned municipal office space dispersed in one primary (City Hall) and multiple satellite office buildings. There are approximately 1,800 full time and 500 temporary City employees. The City completes between 50-80 Knoll office space projects per year ranging from single furniture purchases to complex and full interior workspace modifications. Knoll became the City\u2019s standard modular system in order to re-use existing modular product as staff reorganized and moved. Over the past three years, the City has spent approximately $769,100 on Knoll office furniture, bid competitively, on an as-needed basis. Therefore, the City\u2019s annual average for office space purchasing is $256,400; or approximately $1,282,000 over a five-year period.", "Office modernizations, moves, staffing changes, reorganizations, ergonomic and workplace accommodation needs, and normal wear-and-tear drive the need for furniture procurement. Modular furniture allows flexibility to provide various workspace scenarios and an ability to readapt the same furniture later because of its long useable lifespan. Knoll\u2019s components are easily refurbished for a second life and the Morrison product line is lifetime guaranteed, which is why the Knoll line populates a majority of the City\u2019s workspaces.", "In 2013, the Architecture Services Division in the Public Works Department formalized its responsibility to consistently manage all staff office space projects, and implemented space planning and office design standards for the City to guide ongoing development of occupied office space. The historical practice was for City Departments and Divisions to purchase various furniture pieces on their own, which created waste and could not meet evolving staff needs. To unify workspaces and to be cost effective, the Architecture Services Division specifies two furniture lines specializing in modular furniture: Knoll and Haworth. A facility\u2019s existing furniture typically determines which furniture line is procured. Surplus furniture parts and pieces are utilized before the procurement of new furniture is authorized. All furniture left over after a remodel is inventoried and stored in the City\u2019s warehouse for future City use in order to increase sustainability and cost effectiveness.", "Knoll and Haworth only sell product through authorized dealers in order to preserve warranty protections and to ensure the product meets City specifications. There are three Knoll authorized dealers in the Greater Los Angeles region, two in Los Angeles County, and one in Orange County.", "Typical furniture procurement and consulting services most often fall into the following categories:", "\u00b7 Workstation reconfigurations with existing furniture", "\u00b7 Workstation reconfigurations with a blend of existing and new furniture", "\u00b7 New workstations in existing office plans", "\u00b7 Comprehensive office remodel with newly procured furniture utilizing minimal existing inventory", "\u00b7 Complete office remodels with newly procured furniture only", "Office space projects vary in scope and size from two to eight work stations and vendors are typically contracted to build, refurbish, and move furniture for modifications to the interior space of a building and office space. Recent and pending furniture requests include new furniture and office pieces like lateral files, overhead cabinets and desk reconfigurations for citywide locations like the Swim Center Offices, Memorial Park, Airport Administrative Building, Fire Department Conference Room, Community & Cultural Services Administrative Office, and new chairs for Public Landscape. All projects are planned pending funding availability by the requesting City Department and/or Division, and overall procurement varies based on City staff needs and organizational staffing changes.", "Discussion", "The City completes between 50-80 Knoll office space projects per year. Furniture orders require long lead times due to customized manufacturing practices and comprehensive design services (necessary to measure, design and specify products and quantities).", "Prior to 2014, each office project was bid out independently. This process contributed to significant delays due to the time required to obtain competitive quotes from each of the three authorized Knoll dealers in the Southern California market; the time required to establish a purchase order with the selected vendor; and the time required for the vendor to initiate the order with their manufacturer. In order to reduce delays and streamline this process, Architecture Services staff worked with Finance to revise the process and establish a customized purchase agreement that could apply to multiple office projects. A customized purchase agreement eliminates vendor fatigue, reduces staff time and costs for managing small office project work, and allows for smoother transitions as City staffing needs evolve.", "On February 11, 2014 (Attachment A), Council authorized professional services agreement #9873 (CCS) with Western Office Interiors, a California-based company, to provide Knoll furniture and consulting services for three years in an amount not to exceed $620,000. As of December 2015, Western Office Interiors became non-responsive and the decision was made by City staff to terminate the contract.", "For half of calendar year 2016, Knoll furniture procurement was managed by staff per the competitive bidding/purchase order process. In June 2016, staff issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) with the intention to secure two authorized Knoll furniture vendors under contract to share total work load related to the management of new Knoll furniture procurement and consulting services. Staff solicited competitive proposals on the City\u2019s online bidding portal PlanetBids, and staff invited the three authorized Knoll dealers in the area to participate. In July 2016, the City entered into a five-year purchase agreement with Systems Source, Inc. in the amount of $175,000, below Council threshold, in order to accommodate current projects under time restraints.", "Analysis of Knoll furniture procurement over the past three fiscal years shows that the City purchased approximately $769,100 in office furniture with an approximate annual average of $256,400 from authorized Knoll dealers. Staff recommends that Council approve a first modification to purchase agreement #4231 in the amount of $1,107,000 with Systems Source, Inc. to provide Knoll furniture procurement and consulting services for a total amount not to exceed $1,282,000 over five years. The modification amount is based on average annual spending by Departments and Divisions for City staff office space projects between FY 2013-14 through FY 2015-16. Purchases will be made over the contract term on an as-needed basis.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On June 16, 2016, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP) to contract over a five-year term at least two authorized Knoll dealers to provide Knoll furniture procurement and consulting services for staff offices in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line vendor portal website, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and SMMC 2.24.100(a). 260 vendors were notified, 17 vendors downloaded the proposal. Staff additionally reached out to notify each of the three (3) authorized Knoll dealers in the Southern California market and encouraged them to participate in the RFP. One (1) proposal was received on July 6, 2016. The proposal was evaluated based on the criteria listed in the RFP, including price, satisfactory work performance in California on similar work required within the past five years, references, requirement to be an authorized Knoll dealer, and ability to take measurements for proposal development and for final installation. Staff conducted additional outreach to the other two authorized Knoll dealers in the Southern California market. One vendor was non-responsive and did not reply to staff\u2019s request for information, and the second vendor was not interested to contract with the City based upon their history of smaller projects that require extensive oversight and detail. Based on the RFP criteria and in accordance with SMMC 2.24.072, Systems Source, Inc. is recommended as the best qualified firm.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Systems Source, Inc. is $1,107,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,282,000. Furniture procurement, installation and consulting services are funded from budgets in various departments and will only be purchased if funds are available in the appropriate account. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Authorizing the City Manager to Execute a Cooperative Agreement with the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) for the Olympic Crossover Project and 4th Street Area Access Improvements", "Department": "Mobility (PCD)", "Sponsors": "Director Susan Cline", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the resolution authorizing the City Manager to execute a cooperative agreement with the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) for Caltrans\u2019 required review and approval of a Project Study Report-Project Development Support Project Initiation Document (PSR-PDS PID) for the Olympic Crossover project and 4th Street area access improvements. #0", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Long-standing access and circulation issues were created with the construction of the I-10 freeway, including the physical separation of the Downtown and Civic Center, which compromised access to these destinations. The success of the Downtown and Civic Center relies on the strength and connectivity of pedestrian, bicycle, transit, and vehicle networks. The Draft Downtown Community Plan (DCP), building on the 2010 Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) vision for reconnecting the Downtown and Civic Center, identifies specific strategies for expanding the street and sidewalk networks. Council prioritized key infrastructure that could improve mobility and access, including a flyover structure over the I-10 freeway to relocate the 4th Street westbound off-ramp to align with Olympic Drive (termed the \u201cOlympic Crossover\u201d) and access changes to the 4th Street area that affect the bridge and on- and off-ramps.", "Since the Olympic Crossover and 4th Street area access changes fall within Caltrans right-of-way, Caltrans involvement and approvals are required at every phase of the project. As a first step in the technical study of these network improvements, Caltrans has required a Project Study Report\u2013Project Development Support Project Initiation Document (PSR-PDS PID) process. A cooperative agreement between the City and Caltrans stating the rights, duties, decisions, and commitments made between partners for preparing, reviewing, and approving a PSR-PDS PID is required. This report recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution (Attachment A) authorizing the City Manager to execute a cooperative agreement (Attachment B) with Caltrans for required review and approval of a PSR-PDS PID for the Olympic Crossover project and 4th Street area access improvements.", "Background", "Council discussions surrounding network improvements between the Downtown and Civic Center have been long-standing. On April 14, 2009 (Attachment C), Council allocated a portion of redevelopment funds to study options for integrating the Downtown Expo Terminus Station, Civic Center, and Downtown areas. On January 19, 2010 (Attachment D), Council directed staff to explore refining the Civic Center and Downtown circulation network as described in the then draft 2010 Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE). On April 12, 2011 (Attachment E), Council prioritized short- and long-term projects related to the Civic Center and Downtown circulation network. On January 24, 2012 (Attachment F), Council approved planning analysis, including further exploration of freeway off-ramp relocation and bridging concepts, to improve first/last mile access to the Downtown Expo Terminus Station. On October 27, 2015 (Attachment G), Council was informed that City staff and Caltrans were discussing the appropriate process for evaluating the technical requirements of a flyover structure over the I-10 freeway to relocate the 4th Street westbound off-ramp to align with Olympic Drive (termed the \"Olympic Crossover\") and 4th Street area access improvements, and that City staff would be requesting to initiate the analysis and documentation required by Caltrans for completing a Project Study Report\u2013Project Development Support Project Initiation Document (PSR-PDS PID). Council directed staff to prioritize the Olympic Crossover, study traffic flows both in and out of the Downtown Expo Terminus Station site, and examine opportunities for better access in the area of the I-10 freeway.", "Discussion", "For those potential freeway ramping, bridging, and capping network improvements on the State Highway System that fall within the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) right-of-way, Caltrans involvement and multiple Caltrans approvals are required at every phase of the project. As a first step in the technical study of the Olympic Crossover and 4th Street access changes, Caltrans has required the preparation of a PSR-PDS PID. Completing a PSR-PDS PID provides a key opportunity for the City and Caltrans to develop alternatives and reach consensus on project purpose and need, scope, rough order of magnitude cost estimates, and schedule. Caltrans approval of a PSR-PDS PID allows the project to proceed to the next phase of a Project Approval and Environmental Document (PA&ED). Caltrans is requesting a cooperative agreement for the initial study of the Olympic Crossover and 4th Street access changes. A cooperative agreement states the rights, duties, decisions, and commitments made between partners. Cooperative agreements ensure that partners complete all of their obligations according to Caltrans\u2019 policies and procedures, applicable Federal Highway Administration policies and procedures, and State and federal laws. By entering into the cooperative agreement, the City agrees to prepare the technical document and manage the analysis and review processes required by Caltrans to complete a PSR-PDS PID. Once the document is approved, the City can consider whether to proceed on to the next phase of PA&ED.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The cooperative agreement with the California Department of Transportation is for an amount not to exceed $120,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The agreement will be charged to account 01267.555060."]}, {"Title": "Amendment to Professional Services Agreement with Alta Planning and Design for Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Professional Services Agreement No. 10282 in the amount of $20,000 with Alta Planning and Design, a professional consulting company based in California, to provide additional design consulting services for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School project. This will result in an amended Professional Services Agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $122,914 (including a 6.1 % contingency); andAuthorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project is one of the phases of the overall Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) Final Concept Plan adopted by City Council in February 2014. On April 12, 2016, the City Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with Alta Planning and Design to provide engineering design services to design and construct curb extensions, a median refuge island, way finding signage and pavement markings in the vicinity of Edison Language Academy in an amount not to exceed $102,914. Staff is requesting a first modification in the amount of $20,000 to the existing Professional Services Agreement 10282 (CCS), for a total not to exceed amount of $122,914, with Alta Planning and Design, which would provide $12,500 for final design of a traffic circle at the intersection of 22nd Street and Delaware Avenue, and a $7,500 contract contingency. Neither a traffic circle at this location, nor a contract contingency were included in the initial professional services agreement.", "Background", "The Edison Safe Routes to School Project is funded by a State Safe Routes to School grant through the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) that was awarded in June 2012. The City received notice to proceed from Caltrans in August 2013, which allowed the City to begin advertising and selection for design services.", "On April 12, 2016, Council authorized a professional services agreement with Alta Planning and Design to provide engineering design services for the Edison Language Academy State Safe Routes to School (SR2S) Project in an amount not to exceed $102,914, per Attachment A.", "Discussion", "Preparation of the project concept design drawings is underway. The additional scope of work includes the final design of a traffic circle at 22nd Street and Delaware Avenue, which was not originally anticipated in the initial scope of work. During the current conceptual design phase of the project, staff requested inclusion of the design feature after additional assessment of site conditions revealed sufficient right-of-way to consider the addition of the traffic circle. A traffic circle would provide a visual cue to motorists that they are travelling on neighborhood streets, aid in calming vehicle traffic where volumes are greater than 2,000 ADT (average daily traffic) and speeds are greater than 20 MPH, and allow space for landscaping to enhance the identity of the corridor. A traffic circle at this location is consistent with the Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway Plan recommended objective to connect the Pico Neighborhood to local destinations like the Edison Language Academy, located on Virginia Avenue, by creating an environment that supports active transportation.  An initial concept for the traffic circle at 22nd Street and Delaware Avenue was created as part of the initial design and is shown below.", "Consultant Selection", "On July 1, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to obtain design engineering services for the Edison Language Academy SR2S Project. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,025 vendors were notified, and 50 vendors downloaded the RFP. Two proposals from Alta Planning and Design and from Engineering Resources of Southern California, Inc. were received. Staff conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; two \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms were received from Nishikia Chamberlain, Inc. and Transpo Group.", "A selection committee consisting of staff from the Civil Engineering Division and the Strategic and Transportation Planning Division reviewed the proposals. Proposals were evaluated based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, as well as selection criteria following Caltrans Local Assistance Procedures Manual (LAPM) guidelines, which includes understanding of the project\u2019s scope, direct experience on similar projects, qualifications of the proposed staff, capability of developing innovative or advanced techniques, familiarity with state and federal procedures, financial responsibility, and demonstrated technical ability. The selection panel unanimously recommended Alta Planning and Design for the project.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Alta Planning and Design is $20,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $122,914. Award of the agreement requires the following FY 2016-17 budget changes:", "Release of fund balance from reserve account 4.370332 of $20,000; and", "Appropriation of $20,000 to account C049102.589000.", "The agreement modification will be charged to account C049102.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Agreement with Esri for GIS Software License Renewal", "Department": "Information Services Department, Web Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Environmental Systems Research Institute, Inc. (Esri), a California-based company, for software licensing related to the City\u2019s enterprise Geographic Information System (GIS). This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 (d), as competition does not exist because only Esri possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder, and is for a total amount not to exceed $170,500 (including 10% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica is heavily reliant on the availability of data to inform decision making, manage day-to-day operations, optimize service delivery, and improve citizen engagement. Many data repositories exist in the City. The enterprise Geographic Information System (GIS) is one of the largest and most impactful data sources utilized by City staff, residents and businesses. GIS data is used by staff to manage geographical data (geospatial data); generate maps to conduct analysis and create public notifications related to City projects; and, provide geospatial functionality for numerous software applications. GIS data is also used to create daily maps to identify traffic patterns and manage critical underground infrastructure and City assets. Businesses utilize the data and features provided by the enterprise GIS to inform their business decisions. In particular, numerous businesses working on behalf of the City require access to the City\u2019s GIS to complete their work. The elements stored in the City\u2019s GIS that are not deemed private and confidential are made available to the public as part of the City\u2019s commitment to further transparency and civic engagement. The City\u2019s GIS program relies solely on Esri software. Esri is the only software provider that meets the requirements of enterprise scalability and enables compatibility with similar systems in neighboring jurisdictions, thereby enabling data sharing. The Esri system licenses will soon expire. Staff recommends entering into a new license agreement with Esri for a three-year term, including product support and training at a cost not exceed $155,000. Staff also recommends approving a 10% contingency in the amount of $15,500, which would enable the City to purchase any Esri add-on products, not included in the enterprise agreement, as needed. The total cost including contingency would not exceed $170,500 during this three-year term.", "Background", "The City has been using Esri software since 1993 to develop and manage its Geographic Information System (GIS). A GIS is a system designed to capture, store, manipulate, analyze, manage, and present all types of geographical data. Merging cartography, statistical analysis, and computer science technologies, the City uses its GIS to project data onto maps in support of a broad spectrum of projects and operations in every department. Some these maps are interactive and made available for public consumption via the City\u2019s website.", "On June 25, 2013 (Attachment A), Council authorized a three-year agreement with Esri in the amount of $167,535 for system licensing, including product support and training. The agreement will soon expire; therefore, staff recommends entering into a new three-year enterprise agreement with Esri to ensure business continuity.", "Discussion", "City departments use GIS to support critical operations, such as development of public notifications for City projects; dispatch of public safety resources; management of hazardous material storage; management of infrastructure and assets, including wastewater, storm drain, water systems, fiber optics, and utilities; management of traffic control systems; facilitation of street sweeping and refuse collection operations; updates and studies for land use, redevelopment, zoning and general plan activities; and, property ownership tracking.", "In addition to the explicit functionality provided by the Esri system, GIS integrations are becoming more integral to software systems. Systems such as permitting and project tracking systems, those used for fire and police analysis, as well as asset management systems within public works are reliant on the Esri enterprise GIS. In addition to the benefits provided to City operations and to staff, the enterprise GIS benefits local businesses and the public, as it is the source of several data streams currently available for public consumption via the City\u2019s open data portal.", "At this time, staff recommends entering into a new enterprise license agreement with Esri for a three-year term at a total cost not to exceed $155,000, including product support, training, as well 10% contingency, for a total not to exceed amount of $170,500. Should the City elect to not extend its enterprise level agreement with Esri, the following alternatives may be considered:", "Alternatives", "\u00b7 Lower agreement level to a client-based model as opposed to an enterprise level. This option would retain Esri as a provider, but would change the licensing agreement to be based on client licenses, as opposed to providing all City staff full access to GIS tools. One potential benefit to this option would be reduced costs as result of a decrease in the total number of workstations with access to GIS. Drawbacks would include loss of access to GIS data and tools by the organization as a whole and lack of enterprise level technical support (i.e. the City would receive lower-tier support than it is accustomed to).", "\u00b7 Move away from the Esri product-line entirely and switch to another software vendor. Esri is the largest provider of GIS services to both public and private sectors, however, other providers are in the marketplace. Both traditional and open-source software alternatives may be considered. Benefits could include savings in licensing costs, particularly if an open-source model is considered. However, any such savings would be lost and the City would incur additional costs when factoring in for data migration, recreating software applications to work with a new enterprise GIS, and training the entire workforce on the new system.", "The two alternatives mentioned above could be considered; however, the City would not benefit from changing its GIS licensing model or from moving away from the enterprise license level offered by Esri. As the City increases its use of data to inform decisions and as new technologies and platforms emerge, the City will be required to maintain the enterprise GIS in a manner that is nimble and interoperable, allowing the City to \u201cplug in\u201d new systems to the enterprise GIS as needed. By entering into a new enterprise license agreement with Esri, the City will continue to maintain its ability to proliferate GIS services to other systems and applications. Moreover, Esri is the dominant provider of GIS software, particularly for public sector agencies, resource sharing amongst jurisdictions straightforward. Given the City\u2019s widespread use of Esri, the annual enterprise license agreement is a cost-saving option designed for cities like Santa Monica. The enterprise license agreement allows the City to deploy unlimited number of core Esri products, such as software for staff desktop computers and City enterprise servers.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends entering into a new enterprise license agreement, including product support and training, with Esri for a three-year term, as an exception to the competitive process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d), as competition does not exist because only Esri possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder. The compatibility of this service is also of paramount consideration. Esri is the dominant provider of GIS software; is the only provider of enterprise GIS software; and, is used by most jurisdictions in the region, including Los Angeles County, City of Los Angeles, and Culver City. Esri is also used by other government agencies, with which the City integrates GIS data for regional public safety and planning initiatives. The need to operate the GIS in an enterprise environment and to share data with neighboring jurisdictions, such as Los Angeles County, make Esri the only viable provider of GIS software. A 2015 survey conducted by ARC Advisory Group found that Esri software accounts for a 43% share of the GIS market. In comparison, the second-largest provider accounts for an 11% market share. Moreover, the ARC Advisory Group report indicated that Esri products are used in over two-thirds of Fortune 500 companies.", "Given the City\u2019s widespread use of Esri, the annual enterprise license agreement is a cost-saving option designed for cities like Santa Monica. The enterprise license agreement allows the City to deploy unlimited number of core Esri products, such as software for staff desktop computers and City enterprise servers. Software maintenance is included for the term and offers technical support for named callers, new software releases, upgrades, updates, and internet-based training.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Esri is for an amount not to exceed $170,500, including contingency. Funds of $56,833 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in various departments. Future funding is contingent upon Council approval and budget adoption."]}, {"Title": "Modify Purchase Order for Personal Protective Equipment", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Increase the award of Bid #4215, awarded to Municipal Emergency Services Inc., a Connecticut-based company, for the purchase of firefighting personal protective equipment, from $165,000 to $450,000; and2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Municipal Emergency Services Inc. for firefighting personal protective equipment in the amount not to exceed $450,000 over the three year agreement and on the same terms and conditions with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Fire Department personnel are equipped with two sets of personal protective equipment (PPE). Following a formal bid process in FY2015-16, Municipal Emergency Services Inc. was recommended as the best bidder to provide and deliver firefighting personal protective equipment. The current purchase order with MES is not to exceed $165,000. However, after auditing the current inventory, and accounting for the new recruit academy of 17 firefighters who all require a new set and access to a reserve set, the current purchase order requires modification. Staff recommends an increase to the current purchase order authority for the three year term to a total not to exceed $450,000.", "Background", "The National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) sets the standard governing the requirements for structural firefighting protective clothing and for proximity firefighting protective clothing. NFPA 1971 protects firefighting personnel by establishing minimum levels of protection from thermal, physical, environmental, and blood-borne pathogen hazards encountered during structural and proximity firefighting operations. PPE typically has a useful life of ten years and must be replaced prior to the end of its useful life or replaced sooner if damaged beyond repair. In addition, NFPA standards recommend that each firefighter be equipped with two sets of turnouts to avoid contamination after a fire or other hazardous response which require decontamination of worn garments prior to be being placed back into service. The Department provides this equipment for each firefighter.", "On October 27, 2015 (Attachment A), Council awarded Bid #4215 to Municipal Emergency Services Inc., a Connecticut-based company, for the purchase of firefighting personal protective equipment and authorized the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Municipal Emergency Services Inc. for firefighting personal protective equipment for a total not to exceed $165,000.", "Structural firefighting turn out gear has not been funded out of an expenditure line item for the fire department. This has resulted in the purchasing and subsequent inventory being somewhat inconsistent. After a thorough audit and taking into account 17 new firefighters coming on at one time, the department requires a significant expenditure in this area to meet the needs of our personnel.", "Discussion", "In 2016, the Fire Department responded to over fifteen thousand calls for service.  Officers must don personal protective equipment to protect the firefighter\u2019s body from injury when responding to emergency incidents. Personal protective equipment is worn to protect the firefighter from harmful environmental conditions and physical injury during fire and rescue incidents. The hazards addressed by protective equipment include physical, electrical, heat, chemicals, biohazards, and airborne particulate matter. The maximum lifespan of a set of turnouts is 10 years, but some may not last that long due to damage or severe wear.", "A recent comprehensive analysis of Fire Department PPE revealed significant deficiencies in the replacement of aged and worn PPE. The Fire Department expects to purchase 25-30 sets of PPE in an annual cycle that allows for future budget planning and is consistent with national best practices. In addition to replacing suits for existing personnel, the Department recently hired seventeen firefighter recruits and must purchase equipment for these new officers. Currently, these recruits use rented equipment from 911 Safety Equipment, LLC, a New York-based company.", "Staff recommends a modification to an existing purchase order for personal protective equipment (PPE). Each Firefighter requires a primary set of turnouts, and a reserve set that can be used when the frontline set becomes contaminated following a fire or other significant exposure and requires cleaning.", "Vendor Selection", "In August 2015, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to deliver firefighting personal protective equipment as required by the Fire Department in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 460 vendors were notified, of which 35 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on September 11, 2015 per Attachment A. In addition to price, bids were evaluated based on ability to deliver and compliance with bid specifications. Bid specifications adhere to regional specifications as developed by the Los Angeles Region Fire Agencies with some slight variation. Additionally, Municipal Emergency Services Inc. is recommended as the best and lowest bidder to provide personal protective equipment in accordance with the City specifications. MES is a regional provider of firefighting equipment and is well positioned to deliver PPE within the specifications outlined in the bid.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The purchase order modification to be awarded to Municipal Emergency Services Inc. is $285,000, for an amended purchase order total not to exceed $450,000. Funds are available in the FY2016-17 budget in the Fire Department. The purchase order will be charged to account 01313.533010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}], [{"Title": "Local Coastal Program Update Study Session: Overview of the Community Outreach Process and Proposed Policy Direction for the Land Use Plan", "Department": "Design & Preservation (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on the proposed policy direction for the City\u2019s Local Coastal Program Land Use Plan update and direct staff to proceed with developing a draft LCP Land Use Plan for public release.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report discusses the proposed policy approach to updating the City\u2019s 1992 Local Coastal Program (LCP) Land Use Plan (LUP). The update project began in September 2015 and has proceeded with a community outreach process, and research and analysis of coastal policy issues relevant to the seven policy areas required by the Coastal Act:", "1. Access;", "2. Recreation and Visitor-Serving Facilities;", "3. Environmental Quality;", "4. Scenic and Visual Resources;", "5. Sea Level Rise and Coastal Hazards (new section based on recent Coastal Commission direction);", "6. Cultural Resources and Historic Preservation; and", "7. New Development (includes policies for specific LUP subareas).", "The report summarizes the public outreach process that staff has undertaken in order to educate and learn from the community about coastal issues such as Sea Level Rise, protection of endangered species, and encouraging multi-modal access to the beach area to ensure that Santa Monica\u2019s popular beach and Pier are maintained for and protected from their extensive visitor use. The Planning Commission\u2019s comments from their October 5, 2016 study session are also summarized.", "Following this Council study session, staff will prepare a draft Land Use Plan for public release early next year. A recommendation from the Planning Commission will be required prior to Council adoption. The LUP will then be submitted to the California Coastal Commission for certification. It is intended for this process to follow Council\u2019s decision on the Downtown Community Plan in order to incorporate DCP policies for the portion west of 4th Street that is within the City\u2019s Coastal Zone.", "Key Questions", "Council should review, comment and provide direction on staff\u2019s approach, which has been informed by Planning Commission direction, on key policy issues raised by the LUP Update, including:", "1. Coastal Access:", "a. The multi-modal approach to coastal access that focuses on providing automobile, transit and active transportation options to help people visit the coast using the supply of parking facilities located throughout the Coastal Zone, including beach lots, Downtown, the Civic Center, and public parking around Main Street, with improved wayfinding both physical and electronic.", "b. The approach to future planning to enhance the seaside recreational environment of the Santa Monica Pier with new activity supported by multi-modal access, some reduction of the Pier parking area and TDM programs in place of requiring additional Pier activities to provide parking.", "2. Recreation and Visitor-Serving Facilities: The reformulation of the low-cost visitor accommodation replacement fee;", "3. Scenic and Visual Resources:", "a. The removal of two listed \u201cscenic view corridors\u201d designated in the current LUP that do not appear to offer significant coastal viewsheds (the Santa Monica Freeway and the Third Street Promenade).", "b. Exploration of other scenic viewpoints as suggested by the Planning Commission and more specific identification of the public view corridors to be protected.", "4. Sea Level Rise and Coastal Hazards: A phased approach to adaptation strategies and development restrictions based on measurement and documentation of actual sea level rise and the anticipated life span of proposed projects. This phased approach would create thresholds and \u201ctrigger\u201d points at which the City would need to adopt more definitive standards, requirements and adaptation programs applicable to affected coastal areas with favor for lower-impact deterrents such as dunes rather than sea walls;", "5. New Development: The approach to adjusting LUP maximum allowable development parameters (i.e. height and density) to be consistent with the LUCE.", "The map below of the City of Santa Monica\u2019s Coastal Zone is provided for reference.", "Background", "The Local Coastal Program and the City of Santa Monica", "A Local Coastal Program (LCP) as required by the California Coastal Act is comprised of two components: the Land Use Plan (LUP) and the Implementation Plan (IP). The LUP describes the planning area\u2019s land use and environmental conditions, identifies issues, and contains land use policies and maps that complement adopted City policy and satisfy the intent of the State Coastal Act. The LUP must comply with the Coastal Act and maintain consistency with the General Plan. LUP policies take precedence within the Coastal Zone.", "The IP, also sometimes referred to as a Coastal Zoning Ordinance, is a zoning document that contains the standards with which development in the coastal zone must comply. Once approved and certified by the Coastal Commission, most of the authority to issue coastal permits for new development would be transferred to the City of Santa Monica. The Coastal Commission would retain permanent coastal permit jurisdiction over development proposed on tidelands, submerged lands, and public trust lands, and would also act on appeals of local government coastal development permit decisions within a certain area inward from the coastline. The Coastal Commission also reviews and approves any amendments to previously certified Local Coastal Programs.", "The City adopted its current LCP/LUP in 1992, but has never adopted an Implementation Plan, with the result that currently all required Coastal Development Permits must be issued by the Coastal Commission after City entitlements are approved. Since 1992, some substantial changes have occurred in regard to conditions in the Coastal Zone, including the arrival of the Expo Light Rail Line, substantial implementation of the Civic Center Specific Plan, revival of the Santa Monica Pier and construction of the Annenberg Community Beach House, as well as other public and private development. Also, the City has amended its General Plan through the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), Historic Preservation Element, Open Space Element and Housing Element. In this LCP update, the Coastal Commission is also particularly interested in ensuring that its new programs and policies are incorporated, especially those related to climate change and sea-level rise.", "Project Grant Funding", "The City has received two grants from the Coastal Commission to update the LCP Land Use Plan and develop an Implementation Plan. The first grant, for $225,000 was authorized by Council on June 24, 2014, and awarded by the Coastal Commission in September 2014. The project got underway in September 2015 with the hiring of a grant-funded Assistant Planner, followed shortly thereafter by Council approval for a contract with Dudek, Inc., to provide consulting services on October 27, 2015. Although initially the project scope aimed to complete both LCP components, the scope was revised to complete and submit the LUP for certification before undertaking the IP process.", "On May 10, 2016, Council approved an application for a second Coastal Commission grant. In July 2016, the Coastal Commission awarded $100,000 to develop the Implementation Plan following LUP adoption and certification.", "Planning Commission Comments", "On October 5, 2016, the Planning Commission held a study session and was generally supportive of the staff-recommended approach to the LUP update including ensuring consistency between the LUP and adopted policy documents. The Commission also shared comments about some specific issues including:", "\u00b7 Scenic View Corridors: Commissioners asked for clarification as to how scenic corridors are defined and asked staff to review additional potential vantage points and view corridors, including the Main Street Bridge, Tongva Park viewpoints, Ocean Park Blvd./4th Street Bridge and the Colorado Esplanade for potential inclusion in the LCP.", "\u00b7 Access and Mobility: Commissioners stated agreement with policies that focus on a multi-modal approach and encouraging shared use of parking. In particular, there was interest in maximizing public use on weekends of available private parking facilities that are in easy walking distance from the beach.", "\u00b7 Sea Level Rise Adaptation: Commissioners stated their concern about how LCP policies would deal with projections of a changing coastline and impacts from coastal storms. The Commission was generally favorable toward the phased approach in which policies are triggered based on the proposed project\u2019s expected life span and as actual rise in mean high tide line occurs. The Commission emphasized interest in ensuring that any parameters for new development anticipate adaptations for sea level rise.", "\u00b7 Low Cost Visitor Accommodation: Commissioners discussed the fee imposed by the Coastal Commission for removal of low-cost visitor accommodations and agreed that it should be reviewed and updated.", "\u00b7 Mello Act: The Commission requested clarification regarding replacement housing provisions applicable to the Coastal Zone and whether incorporating the requirements of the Mello Act into the LUP would be appropriate.", "Discussion", "Project Outreach", "Between January and July 2016, the LCP planning team undertook an outreach strategy that was designed to inform the public about coastal issues and the LCP\u2019s role in planning to manage sea level rise impacts. Two workshops were held:", "\u00b7 Santa Monica's Coastal Area in the 21st Century (2/29/16): Introduced the purpose and timeline of the Update within the context of the history of Santa Monica\u2019s coastal uses and planning efforts.", "\u00b7 Adapting to a Changing Coastline (4/13/16): Experts explained how climate change is already leading to rising sea levels and the outlook for Santa Monica, with some discussion of adaptation options. This workshop was recorded by CityTV and a link to the video is available on the LCP project webpage: http://www.smgov.net/Departments/PCD/Plans/Local-Coastal-Plan-Update/.", "Between January and May 2016, staff presented an introduction to the LCP planning process to the following neighborhood, business and civic organizations:", "\u00b7 Planning Commission", "\u00b7 Pier Corporation Board", "\u00b7 Task Force on the Environment", "\u00b7 Disabilities Commission", "\u00b7 Landmarks Commission", "\u00b7 Commission for the Senior Community", "\u00b7 DTSM, Inc.", "\u00b7 Neighborhood groups in conjunction with presentations on the Downtown Community Plan: North of Montana Neighborhood Association and Ocean Park Association", "\u00b7 Recreation & Parks Commission", "\u00b7 Kiwanis", "In addition to this outreach to stakeholders and community members who participate in the civic process, it was felt that the issues of the LCP and the opportunity to educate the public about the environment and a more sustainable approach to beach area planning and access are so compelling that other creative outreach tools are needed. In response, staff developed three additional opportunities to reach people where they are and engage them on the issues of sea level rise, multi-modal access and the environmental sensitivity of Santa Monica\u2019s beaches:", "\u00b7 Pier Visitor Survey: Intercept survey of 632 people on the Pier during 4 weekdays in July focusing on travel patterns, parking locations used and other coastal points of interest visited (See Attachment A). Survey results support a multi-modal planning approach to providing public access and services in the coastal area that is already shifting the emphasis from automobiles and beach parking to support for other modes. Contrasts between the responses from local, frequent visitors, compared with out-of-town and first time visitors, point to the need for wayfinding signage and on-line tools to help people gain an understanding of the proximity of the Pier to downtown, the Civic Center, Main Street and Venice to help them find their way to and around the coastal area.", "\u00b7 Owlized on the Pier: On October 27th 2016, two augmented virtual reality viewfinders (one ADA accessible) presenting scenarios that visualize the scientific findings of the Coastal Storm Modeling System (CoSMoS) study were installed on the Santa Monica Pier. The interactive tool, called \u201cThe Owl\u201d begins with a present day scene looking north of the Pier, followed by the same scene showing the coastline with two meters of sea level rise. Scenarios of major (100-year) storms are then projected on the evolving coastlines.", "The Owl conducts a survey that gauges users\u2019 level of awareness and concern about sea level rise and educates about possible adaptation measures to deal with coastal storm surges that are inspired by natural defenses like sand dunes. The Owl will remain on the Pier for two months and is also available through a phone app. Staff is working with educators and USC Sea Grant to incorporate the Owl as an educational tool in school programs related to climate change. This project has been a joint effort with the City\u2019s Office of Sustainability and the Environment\u2019s Climate Action and Adaptation Plan outreach program.", "\u00b7 Beach Nature Walk to the Snowy Plover protected area: Staff participated in an August 2016 visit, co-sponsored by the Audubon Society and the SM Library on the Beach program, to observe the Western Snowy Plovers, who are currently roosting on the Santa Monica sand in the north beach area, including a fenced-off \u201cexclosure\u201d that has been provided by the City to attempt to keep out disturbances. The Western Snowy Plovers require sensitivity and protection from City maintenance staff and beach users alike while they spend the season at Santa Monica Beach. Staff then organized a second visit with the Audubon Society, bringing 20 community members to the beach on Sunday morning, October 16th to observe this threatened bird species\u2019 enjoyment of their Santa Monica wintering home and learn about the City\u2019s plans to strengthen their protection through the LCP.", "The Draft LUP will reflect comments and suggestions received from the community through the outreach program, and input from researchers and Coastal Commission staff in regard to policies that address future shore erosion and coastal storm forecasts.", "The Big Policy Picture", "The State Coastal Act\u2019s key objective is to preserve and maintain the coastline to protect its natural beauty and ecosystems and to ensure public access to the beach for recreational purposes. The Act recognizes that public access may appropriately be limited in situations in which there are conflicts between fragile ecosystems and public access. It also provides that \u201cpublic access policies of this article be carried out in a reasonable manner that considers the equities and that balances the rights of the individual property owner with the public's constitutional right of access.\u201d With an emphasis on maintaining coastal recreation that is accessible to everyone, the Act seeks to protect lower cost visitor and recreational services, including, to the extent feasible, lower cost accommodations.", "As a State statute, the Coastal Act takes precedence over policies that may be established by a local jurisdiction. Policies established in the LUP are reviewed and require certification by the Coastal Commission. These policies then become the basis for the IP, which will be prepared following the Council\u2019s adoption of the LUP. The LUP, therefore, has the very important function of reconciling State and local policies in a manner that complies with the Coastal Act and achieves the City\u2019s policy objectives established in the LUCE.", "Santa Monica\u2019s land use and circulation policies are grounded in principles of long-term sustainability, both through the form and types of allowable development and through connecting land uses with transportation options to reduce dependence on automobiles. The Sustainable City Plan, LUCE and all mobility and specific plan efforts applicable to the Coastal Zone have aimed to promote more sustainable practices and reduce the City\u2019s carbon footprint. Zoning regulations and landscape & irrigation requirements have implemented these policies through development standards that apply to a variety of residential and commercial projects.", "The LUP builds on these policies with regard to Coastal Zone-specific matters that are not already covered by existing City policies. The LUP divides the Coastal Zone into eight subareas, some of which are further divided into sections. Coastal Zone subareas facilitate the establishment of appropriate policies based in particular on the subarea\u2019s proximity to the more sensitive beach and beach-adjacent assets.", "The LCP planning team is coordinating with the work of the Downtown Community Plan (DCP) for compatible policy direction, as the central portion of Downtown (with 4th Street as the eastern boundary) is located within the Coastal Zone. Since Downtown Santa Monica is located above the bluffs and out of sensitive habitat areas, it is not anticipated that special environmental policies to be developed for the LCP will apply to Downtown. However, issues related to visitor services and access, including provision of bike and pedestrian pathways and parking to meet the needs of those visiting the coast and arriving by car, do overlap with plans for managing development in Downtown. Likewise, Civic Center planning and proposed projects, particularly those affecting the Civic Center parcels that make up the large surface parking area between Pico Boulevard and Civic Center Drive, are within the Coastal Zone and LCP policies related to access are also being coordinated with the projects being proposed and considered in the Civic Center.", "LUP Policy Approach", "The policy approaches discussed in this staff report will eventually be incorporated into the LUP policies in Chapter 4, which will become the basis for future coastal development permit (CDP) decisions.", "In the early preparation phase of the LUP Update, staff and the project consultants (Dudek) closely reviewed the City\u2019s 1992 LUP, City policy documents and State Coastal Commission policies to identify the key issues for the 2016 update. The review resulted in a framework that builds on the current LUP structure, includes guiding policy language from the Coastal Act (a standard in recently certified LUPs) and adds policies to reflect circumstances that have changed over time in the coastal area.", "Chapter 4 will be organized to address the seven policy categories of the Coastal Commission\u2019s jurisdiction under the State Coastal Act:", "1. Access;", "2. Recreation and Visitor-Serving Facilities;", "3. Environmental Quality;", "4. Scenic and Visual Resources;", "5. Sea Level Rise and Coastal Hazards;", "6. Cultural Resources and Historic Preservation;", "7. New Development.", "The following discussion summarizes guidance established in the Coastal Act for policies, changes that have occurred since the existing LUP was adopted in 1992, and the proposed approach in the LUP Update.", "Access", "Coastal Act Guidance", "Access policies in the LCP implement the Coastal Act\u2019s mandate to ensure that development does not interfere with the public\u2019s right to access the sandy and rocky coastlines along the State shoreline. To the extent that the public relies on being able to reach the shore from inland points of departure, the Commission has generally associated this mandate with jurisdiction over transportation, such as provision of roads and parking. The Coastal Commission has traditionally looked carefully at any activity that might cut off a route to the beach or affect parking supplies on which visitors depend in order to access the beach. Conditions often include maintaining open pathways through a development and provision of parking that meets the needs of customers and employees of new development proposals.", "Changes since Existing LUP was Adopted", "Santa Monica\u2019s roads and pathways to the beach area have been greatly enhanced since the 1992 LCP was certified. Improvements to coastal roads and pedestrian connections from Downtown and the Civic Center include the extension of Olympic Drive, the pathway between the end of Pico Boulevard and the beach pedestrian path, the Colorado Esplanade, pedestrian bridge upgrades from Palisades Park, and the California Incline upgrade. All beach locations in Santa Monica comply with the Coastal Act\u2019s mandate to make the beaches and ocean available and accessible for the public\u2019s use and enjoyment, as evidenced by the 17 million annual visitors who use all points along the City\u2019s beaches.", "Last May, the Expo Line opened, bringing a significant new option for accessing Santa Monica\u2019s coastal area. The Colorado Esplanade was completed at the same time, enhancing the arrival experience from the station to the Pier and beach. The completion of the project, and the City\u2019s local street and sidewalk improvements and provision of Breeze Bikeshare represent a major step forward in the City\u2019s goals to create a more sustainable coastal area through a multi-modal approach that provides visitor access while addressing traffic congestion and ensuring availability of parking.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "LUP policies will ensure continued access, particularly in the north beach area where private residences and clubs are located on the west side of PCH, punctuated by public parking lots that form visual and physical connections to the beach and ocean. In order to get a picture of how visitors access the coast, staff conducted an intercept survey on the Pier in July, about two months after Expo opened. People were asked how they arrived to the Pier, where else they were visiting and how they were travelling between destinations in the surrounding area and to other points along the coast. Information about where people came from and how often they visited the Pier, size of the group they were with and where they parked if they drove was also collected. Attachment A contains staff\u2019s analysis of the results, as well as the survey team\u2019s anecdotal observations and insights gleaned from conversations with survey participants. Some of the findings of interest included the following:", "\u00b7 Visitors are arriving by a variety of modes, most commonly car, Expo Line, bus, and walking, confirming the City\u2019s planning approach to coastal area visitor access;", "\u00b7 Fewer than 1/3 of total survey participants parked at the beach/Pier lots;", "\u00b7 Visitors were more likely to drive and park at the lots closest to the Pier; more returning visitors parked at the Civic Center lots and on the streets than infrequent visitors; improved signage and wayfinding, as well as educational outreach, could help redirect visitors to less used options;", "\u00b7 Approximately 25% of survey participants only visited the Pier;", "\u00b7 Most of those surveyed who were visiting more than one coastal destination within Santa Monica walked between them; many first time visitors were unaware of nearby points of interest, such as the Third Street Promenade, within walking distance;", "\u00b7 The majority of those surveyed found it easy to access the Pier. Those that drove to the Pier reported experiencing access barriers at a rate of more than four times that of transit riders. The biggest barrier for drivers was heavy traffic coming into Santa Monica. A small number of drivers reported parking barriers;", "\u00b7 The survey picked up significant interest in using transit, particularly the Expo Line.", "The information from the survey is encouraging in that it seems to imply that policies that facilitate transit use and active transportation have positive impacts on travel behaviors and can be effective in reducing vehicle traffic to the coast. As the City contemplates anticipated changes to the shoreline due to sea level rise (discussed more fully below), flexible policies in regard to provision of beach-adjacent parking will become important in balancing land use demands between vehicle parking and recreational use of the beach.", "Access for All", "The LUP will include policies that address special needs for access by the elderly, disabled persons, visitors with small children and/or large, heavy equipment being brought to the beach. Through efforts of the City staff, supported by the Disabilities, Recreation and Parks, and Seniors Commissions, improved beach access has been provided to support people with mobility disabilities in several locations, through provision of walkways that extend to the sand, availability of beach wheelchairs, and continued provision of dedicated ADA-compliant parking spaces.", "Multi-modal focus", "The LUP access policies will approach all modes of transportation with consideration for the City\u2019s clean air and congestion management goals, as well as a recognition that the coastal area is not served by adequate public transportation to serve the needs of all regional visitors.", "\u00b7 Automobile Access", "Policies will carry forward from the current LUP to ensure vehicular access and parking opportunities in compliance with the coastal act to allow visitors to drive to Santa Monica and visit the beach. Along with this, the LUP will be consistent with City policies that seek to balance automobile usage with other travel modes. In terms of policies, this will be expressed with a more nuanced definition of \u201cbeach parking\u201d that includes parking opportunities within a \u00bc mile radius of the beach. There are thousands of public parking spaces in the Downtown area, Civic Center and Neilson Way public parking lots that serve more than one destination, as evidenced by the number of people documented visiting the Pier along with other places. The City regularly monitors the availability of these parking resources and has data that shows that, with few exceptions, parking is available most of the time in these lots.", "Along with ongoing efforts to provide a reasonable level of visitor parking, the City also plans to continue efforts to ensure that residents living in Ocean Park and other parts of the Coastal Zone as needed, are able to access convenient parking to meet their needs through the preferential parking program. Staff is working with CCC staff to propose a policy that shares the public streets with beach-goers during daytime hours while recognizing that the historic charm of the Ocean Park neighborhood, and the character of the Coastal Zone residential neighborhood north of Wilshire Boulevard, often comes with a lack of on-site parking, making the adjacent street parking in some cases the only parking alternative that residents have. The LUP will include a map documenting existing preferential parking districts and propose parameters for the CCC to approve to guide requests for additional parking protections.", "Based on input received in the outreach process that indicates that first-time visitors need more help to gain orientation to the beach and its proximity to Downtown and Main Street, LUP policies will emphasize wayfinding and real-time information to connect visitors with active transportation information and directions to parking resources. The City will also continue its parking management strategy using pricing to encourage distribution of use, ensuring at all times that provisions are made for those requiring special accessibility.", "Parking will be required for new development, consistent with policies in all parts of the City. The policies proposed in the LUP will be geared toward consistency with the LUCE and DCP. Currently, City parking requirements and those imposed by the Coastal Commission start from very different assumptions and use different measurements and terms, leading to many situations in which City-approved projects are later held to a different parking standard during the CDP review process. This issue was addressed in the July 2015 zoning ordinance updates and will need to be resolved when the LCP IP is prepared.", "The Access policies will also address the unique parking situation of the Santa Monica Pier. The Santa Monica Pier Corporation Board is anticipating scheduling a presentation of its Pier Access and Use Study, prepared by ROMA Design Group, to the Council for direction in guiding future activity on the Pier. In the coming years, the City may consider options that add more visitor-serving activities on the deck area now used for parking (and summer events), which may reduce the capacity of the Pier deck parking lot. In addition, several existing businesses are in the process of expanding or considering expansion to serve the growing number of year-round Pier visitors. The proposed parking policy for the Pier will seek to allow flexibility for new activities on the Pier based on an approach recognizing that most Pier visitors do not park on the Pier and beach lots, arriving by train, bus, bike or walking from parking locations in the Downtown and Civic Center. The City is asking the CCC to look at observed access patterns, consider the modal split and the supply of public parking that already supports thousands of visitors to the Pier and require applicants for new and expanded businesses on the Pier to comply with Transportation Demand Management (TDM) measures to encourage other modes of travel for employees and customers rather than requiring additional parking, which cannot be provided on the Pier. This type of policy could obviate the need to seek parking variances for all projects proposed on the Pier.", "\u00b7 Transit Access", "An important element of the City\u2019s strategy to reduce congestion and GHG emissions is to encourage transit use through integrated land use-transportation planning, Big Blue Bus-Metro coordination, and initiating incentive programs. The Expo Light Rail line has been in operation for only a few months, but its impact on travel is already being felt in the coastal area. In conjunction with Expo, the Big Blue Bus has rerouted and adjusted its lines and schedules and aligned its TAP card technology, continuing to focus not only on Santa Monica residents but on the larger Westside population wishing to travel to Santa Monica\u2019s coast. LUP policies, consistent with current City policy, reinforce support for the Big Blue Bus and Metro Bus and rail transportation through requirements for developers of properties by bus stops to incorporate facilities for bus patrons, development of connections between bus and rail, and first mile-last mile solutions that promote the feasibility of using public transportation.", "\u00b7 Bicycle Access", "The Coastal area is a popular cycling destination. Policies for bicycle access to serve visitors to the coastal area are generally proposed to be consistent with the 2010 Bike Action Plan. The Bike Action Plan and Zoning Ordinance contain policies and requirements for developers to provide facilities that support employees and customers making a choice to ride a bicycle as their means of transportation. LUP policies will also support the City\u2019s provision of bike facilities and amenities, such as improved paths, lanes and bike racks, as well as the Breeze Bike Share program, and encourage opportunities for bicycle rental.", "\u00b7 Pedestrian Access", "Earlier this year, the Council adopted the Pedestrian Action Plan (PAP), recognizing that one of Santa Monica\u2019s greatest assets is its walkability and also acknowledging that facilities still can be improved to meet the community\u2019s expectations for safety and comfort as they walk through City streets. An example of one of the PAP\u2019s near-term projects that has already been implemented are the pedestrian scrambles in the Coastal Zone portion of Downtown, which provide separated signal cycles for pedestrians to cross in any direction. With implementation of the scrambles and the Colorado Esplanade, pedestrian access to the Pier and Palisades Park has been improved tremendously, and the LUP\u2019s policies encourage development of similar pedestrian facilities in the Coastal Zone.", "The Pedestrian Access policies will also include language that the Coastal Commission generally requires in regard to maintaining and improving the California Coastal Trail (CCT). The CCT is a network of public trails for walkers, bikers, equestrians, wheelchair riders and others along the 1200-mile California coastline. It is currently more than half complete. In Los Angeles County, the CCT includes the Marvin Braude Bike Trail (commonly referred to as the beach bike path). After many years of planning, the City has recently begun a project to upgrade the trail, which is scheduled to begin with a public planning process in the next couple of months. Components include the following:", "\u00b7 Renovation of Ocean Front Walk from the Pier to Arizona Ave", "\u00b7 Addition of a pedestrian path for Arizona Ave to northern City limits", "\u00b7 Addition of a pedestrian path around the 1550 lot and under the Pier", "\u00b7 Widening the bike path between Pier and Bay St to accommodate pedestrians", "With $8.2 million dollars allocated in the City\u2019s Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget, construction of the improvements is anticipated to get underway in 2018-19. The CCC will require a policy to provide continuous pedestrian access around the perimeter of the Santa Monica Pier, including during special events to ensure that the public is not deprived of access by private functions.", "Recreation and Visitor-Serving Facilities", "Coastal Act Guidance", "The Coastal Commission has a mandate to ensure that the public can enjoy the coast through recreational opportunities that are widely accessible both physically and financially. Specific guidance is provided in Section 30213 of the Coastal Act, which states that lower cost visitor-serving facilities, which include lower-cost overnight accommodations, shall be protected, encouraged, and where feasible, provided. An in-lieu fee may be required in order to mitigate for the loss of lower cost rooms.", "Also in this policy section, land uses and activities that serve visitors are prioritized in the coast-adjacent subareas and other parts of the Coastal Zone that have traditionally provided recreation and visitor services. Privatization of the beach area is to be avoided and the Coastal Act protects those areas currently open and free to the public from being privatized and commercialized. Although areas may be used for temporary events, these, too, are to be carefully reviewed to minimize the impacts on the public\u2019s ability to visit the coast. The beach and Pier are the key assets for the City of Santa Monica to protect, but other public spaces in the Coastal Zone, such as parks and the Third Street Promenade, are also important visitor-serving assets for consideration.", "Changes since Existing LUP was Adopted", "Over the last quarter century, the most significant changes to recreation and visitors services have been the development of the Civic Center and Tongva Park in particular, the addition and upgrade of several hotels, and improvements in visitor amenities, such as the expansion of beach-adjacent parks, new playgrounds, restroom facilities, exercise equipment, accessible pathways to the shoreline and improvements along the Marvin Braude Bike Trail. The number of visitors has increased to upwards of 17 million annually, with little change to the beach parking facilities. The Pier has been restored as an amusement center, with Pacific Park, new restaurants and an invigorated program of free public events, including the Twilight Concert series and fall movie nights, as well as regular street performers. The Pier \u201cseason\u201d has stretched beyond the summer and has more regular foot traffic throughout the year on weekdays as well as weekends. The City has developed regulations for use of the beach lots for temporary events, such as Cirque de Soleil, during non-peak seasons and has enjoyed success at its bi-annual late-night \u201cGlow\u201d art event.", "In addition, the City Attorney\u2019s Office has addressed issues of beach encroachment by some residents and beach clubs in the north beach area. This has involved examination of agreements with adjacent property owners to find a fair resolution to situations that have developed over many years.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "The policy concepts would encourage the retention and addition of visitor-serving activities in the beach area, with design features that support public access to the shoreline, including accommodations for those with disabilities. Temporary activities that close the beach or Pier are proposed to be minimized, but public events and festivals on the Pier, such as the summer concert and movie series, which are provided at no cost to the public, are allowed. Currently, the LUP prohibits the use of the beach and beach parking lot for special events in the summer months, allowing them during off-peak seasons, for example Cirque du Soleil. This policy would be continued. However, staff is aware that Santa Monica beach is being considered as a possible venue for beach volleyball should the City of Los Angeles be successful in its bid to host the 2024 Summer Olympics. The LUP will propose an exception to the summertime event prohibition for the Olympics, requiring post-event removal of any structures built.", "\u00b7 Proposition S", "Proposed LUP policies will be consistent with Proposition S, approved by City voters in 1990, which places limits on the provision of hotels, motels and larger-size restaurants in the Coastal Zone by prohibiting them in the Beach Overlay District. The City currently provides many dining and hotel options throughout the Coastal Zone at all price points. Although Prop S closes off some opportunities along the coast, zoning in the Coastal Zone and existing uses enable a sufficient supply of visitor-serving businesses in compliance with the Coastal Act. Prop S exempts the Pier deck and 140,000 square feet of new development on the Pier, where the underlying zoning permits restaurants (but not motels and hotels). Smaller restaurants (under 2,000 square feet) are not prohibited by Proposition S and may be developed within the Beach Overlay District if permitted by the underlying zoning.", "\u00b7 Mitigating Loss of Low Cost Visitor Accommodation", "The Coastal Zone includes a variety of lower cost accommodations that range from mid-level to luxury. Other lower cost accommodations are available both in the Coastal Zone (the Downtown IYH hostel and Lincoln Boulevard motels) and in other parts of Santa Monica east of the Coastal Zone. Although there may be more relatively affordable lodging in areas outside of the Coastal Zone, these are not taken into consideration for the purposes of the LUP Update policies because the Coastal Commission\u2019s jurisdiction is only the Coastal Zone.", "In order to determine an appropriate threshold by which mitigation fees may be required, staff is researching with Coastal Commission staff a reasonable definition of low-cost and moderately-priced visitor accommodation. The Coastal Commission has typically used a formula that compares the average daily rate of lower cost hotels in a specific coastal zone area with the average daily rates of hotels and motels across the entire State of California. Under this formula, lower cost is defined as rooms with rates that are at least 25% lower than the statewide average room rate. Higher cost is defined as 25% more than the statewide average room rate. Moderately-priced visitor accommodations fall in between the low-cost and high-cost range. As of March 2015, the statewide average daily room rate was determined to be approximately $145/night. According to the California Coastal Commission February 2016 staff report prepared for the Shore Hotel, based on a survey of 18 hotels and motels in the Santa Monica beach area, the average daily room rate is $333/night.", "Using the Statewide average daily room rate as a basis for establishing a threshold for mitigation could result in a rate that is significantly lower than typical hotel prices in the Coastal Zone. Localized studies of average daily room rates in the particular area in which a project is being proposed might result in more appropriate thresholds. If low cost visitor accommodation is defined at a level that is much lower than typical average daily room rates in Santa Monica, the consequence may that lost accommodations may never trigger requirements to pay a mitigation fee to replace low cost accommodations.", "Ordinance 1516, adopted on February 20, 1990, established mitigation fees for the removal of low cost lodging in the Coastal Zone. Staff proposes to update the low cost visitor accommodation fee, which is intended to mitigate the loss of low cost accommodations. Updating the in-lieu fee will include review of the construction costs and land costs associated with replacing the loss of each low cost hotel room.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Pier", "Santa Monica\u2019s most internationally recognized recreational facility, other than the beach itself, is the Pier, as discussed above and under New Development, below. The Pier is highly valued by the community and its protection and maintenance have long been a priority, even sparking a 1970\u2019s political upheaval and ballot measure (\u201cSave our Pier Forever\u201d) to prohibit its demolition, which had been ordered by the Council. It is a Landmark, with separate designation for two key features (the Looff Hippodrome and Yacht Harbor sign) and has a Council-appointed agency (Pier Corporation) to steward its activities. The Pier is a separate subarea (Subarea 2) in the LUP, and policies pertaining to the Pier may be contained in multiple LUP policy sections.", "Environmental Quality", "Coastal Act Guidance", "LCP environmental quality policies are concerned with fulfilling the Coastal Act\u2019s mandate to protect the coastal and marine environment from human activity that can contaminate or destroy coastal ecosystems and to restore natural conditions where it is possible to do so. Policies related to endangered species habitat protection and activities that can affect water quality, including management of stormwater that empties out into the ocean are the primary concerns for this section. The section will include policies for marine habitat protection, which will be considered guidelines for the Coastal Commission, which in all cases reserves Coastal Act authority over activities west of the mean high tide line (defined as the Commission\u2019s area of \u201coriginal jurisdiction\u201d).", "In addition to protection of endangered species, the second major policy subject in this section is water quality, an issue that is affected by regional forces and only partly within the City\u2019s sphere of influence. From its earliest development, the Los Angeles region was affected by flooding and drainage issues. In the previous century, cities including Los Angeles and Santa Monica resolved these problems by creating a system in which stormwater was collected from city streets and channeled into the Pacific Ocean. While this system has proven successful for controlling urban flooding, it has had a major side effect of directing polluted water into the ocean, as along with the collected rainwater, the storm drains picked up leaves and other plant materials, a variety of chemicals, biological matter and litter that is thrown onto streets and sidewalks. To exacerbate the problem, stormwater activity is not limited to the rainy season. During dry weather, the system carries less volume, but the region\u2019s storm drains catch water from irrigation and other activities that also brings pollutants toward Santa Monica Bay.", "Changes since the Existing LUP was Adopted", "Since the LUP was certified, the City has made great strides in its ocean and beach-cleaning efforts including:", "\u00b7 Construction of stormwater treatment facilities with regional partners, including the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMMURF), which can treat up to 500,000 gallons per day of dry weather run-off and the recent completion of the Penmar retention facility in Venice, which contains large underground tanks to collect and treat stormwater;", "\u00b7 Pilot projects to capture rainwater, such as the Bicknell Green Street and features on Ocean Park Boulevard west of Lincoln Boulevard, both within the Coastal Zone;", "\u00b7 Education and incentives to residents and businesses to change their practices to keep matter out of the storm drains;", "\u00b7 Developing ordinances and enforcement mechanisms that Council has enacted to curb irrigation overspray and prohibit release of pollutants into the storm drains, including automobile oil and waste products with harmful chemicals; and", "\u00b7 Developing additional projects that are intended to protect the marine environment year-round by increasing the capacity to capture and clean wet weather runoff. The most significant project currently in development is the Sustainable Wastewater Infrastructure Project (SWIP), which includes components in two LCP subareas (the beach area and Civic Center), and will require CCC approval of a Coastal Development Permit.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "The policy approach will maintain and update existing LUP policies related to protecting threatened and endangered species, maintaining the improvements to water quality including regulating new development to ensure that it does not result in adverse impacts on the coastal environment, and requiring best management practices (BMPs) to achieve coastal sustainability objectives.", "\u00b7 Stormwater Management", "The LUP\u2019s approach to stormwater management will be consistent with the City\u2019s current policies and practices. Although the toxic mix collected from the streets is channeled toward one of Santa Monica\u2019s three storm drains at the coastline, its origins are both within and outside of the city, and mostly outside of the Coastal Act\u2019s jurisdiction. Nevertheless, there is a strong mandate to address this environmental nuisance in the LCP. LUP policies will support and strengthen the aggressive approach the City takes to this problem, working with other regional partners to reduce the amount of water that reaches the beachfront storm drains and to intervene to clean it before it is released into Santa Monica Bay.", "The LUP narrative will also describe how the City has developed and continually enforces zoning and building code requirements for new residential and commercial development or additions to existing development through design or installation of features that avoid runoff from the property such as rainwater harvesting or on-site percolation into the aquifer.", "\u00b7 Endangered Species Habitat Areas", "The LCP is required to identify Endangered Species Habitat Areas, or ESHA, within its Coastal Zone and to outline the ways in which the identified endangered species will be protected and accommodated. Currently, only one endangered species has been identified as utilizing Santa Monica\u2019s beach as part of its life cycle habitat: the Western Snowy Plover, a small migrating flock of birds that nests in the beaches near Santa Barbara and \u201cwinters\u201d in the northern Santa Monica beach area. Working with the Audubon Society, the City has already taken steps to protect the plovers\u2019 wintering area, erecting a three-sided fence area around the specific beach territory that they occupy to keep out people, pets, vehicles and beach cleaning equipment that may harm them. In addition, educational tours have taken place over the years to increase awareness of this habitat. The LUP will include specific measures that aim to ensure that these birds are not disturbed during times that they are present on the city\u2019s beach.", "Two other endangered species were identified in the 1990s as requiring protection, the Brown Pelican and the Least Tern. However, since then, the Brown Pelican has been removed from the endangered species list and there have been no Least Tern pairs establishing breeding grounds for more than a decade. The LUP will include a policy requiring protection of all endangered species that are identified as becoming established along Santa Monica\u2019s beaches, although the new ESHA map will not include any specific land area associated with them at this time.", "Scenic and Visual Resources", "Coastal Act Guidance", "This LUP policy section relates to preservation of the visual quality of the coastal environment, which the Coastal Act requires to be \u201cconsidered and protected as a resource of public importance.\u201d Generally speaking, this requires maintaining a higher level of aesthetic quality for new development, including landscaping, parking lot landscaping, signage, lighting adjacent to the ocean and beaches or other scenic areas, bluff top setbacks and limitations on fencing and sea walls. This policy section identifies scenic corridors within the city, along which new development is required to maintain public ocean views from the public right of way. Importantly, the Coastal Act does not protect private views or mandate preservation of a view from one private development that might impact the development potential of another property.", "Changes Since the Existing LUP was Adopted", "The General Plan Conservation Element includes the following seven designated scenic corridors within the Coastal Zone:", "1. Santa Monica Freeway from the Coastal Zone boundary to Ocean Avenue;", "2. Ocean Avenue from the north city boundary to Barnard Way;", "3. Pacific Coast Highway (Route 1) within the City limits;", "4. Barnard Way from Ocean Avenue to the south city boundary;", "5. Wilshire Boulevard from 4th Street to Ocean Avenue;", "6. Third Street Promenade; and", "7. The Santa Monica Pier.", "During the past quarter century, the City has undertaken public projects that have enhanced the identified scenic corridors. The best examples are the beach greening and streetscape projects that have been implemented on and around Barnard Way and the coastal development requirements that have ensured that new development along Palisades Beach Road and on the Pier consider the view of both the project itself and of the beach and ocean beyond from Palisades Park. The Draft DCP includes improvements to the pedestrian environment along the Wilshire Boulevard corridor that would be consistent with the LCP\u2019s objectives to protect scenic corridors in the Coastal Zone.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "Map #13 in the current LUP includes scenic corridors and a public viewing area at Santa Monica Place. Staff is considering proposing the removal of two of the scenic view corridors: #1 (Santa Monica Freeway) and # 6 (Third Street Promenade). Neither of these corridors provides public views to or from the beach or bluffs. In 2004, when the building at the northwest corner of Colorado Avenue and 2nd Street was approved, the Coastal Commission determined that the public viewing area at Santa Monica Place was no longer significant and suggested that the City amend the LUP Map #13 to remove the decks as public viewing decks. Since then, the Coastal Commission approved the Shore Hotel, allowing its construction to a height of 45 feet, and finding no impacts on public views. Staff proposes to remove the public viewing area from Map #13 as part of the update.", "As part of their October 5, 2016 study session, the Planning Commission requested that additional scenic viewpoints be studied in addition to some acknowledgement of the I-10 Freeway as a historical natural and visual resource. Staff will be exploring additional scenic vantage points and proposes an approach that seeks to more specifically identify the scenic elements that are important to protect from each vantage point so that the scenic corridor is more clearly defined.", "Sea Level Rise and Coastal Hazards", "Coastal Act Guidance", "The connection between climate change (global warming), sea level rise and coastline shift are now well-established, and impacts are already clear in some sections of California\u2019s coastline. This issue has been integrated into the Coastal Act\u2019s mandate to protect and plan for the future of the California coastline. New scientific research has yielded more comprehensive and accurate data that can be used to anticipate and plan for coastline changes and cliff erosion. In response, on August 12, 2015, the CCC adopted a document outlining the expectations for this policy section entitled: California Coastal Commission Sea Level Rise Policy Guidance: Interpretive Guidelines for Addressing Sea Level Rise in Local Coastal Programs and Coastal Development Permits.", "Changes since Existing LUP was Adopted", "Issues related to climate change impacts and sea level rise were not well-understood in 1992 and were not considered in the development of the last LCP.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "The newest policy section being introduced through the LCP Update will define the City\u2019s approach to adapting to sea level rise (SLR) in combination with coastal storms that have become more frequent in recent years. Policies for this section are being developed in tandem with a regional analysis (the Coastal Storm Modeling System, or CoSMoS) that is concurrently being prepared by USC Sea Grant through a grant managed by the City\u2019s Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE). CoSMoS considers the combined impact of coastal hazards and when complete will map these hazards together, acknowledging that the separate processes cannot be considered in isolation from each other. A separate but similar effort commissioned by USGS (the ESA study) is approaching the topic from a slightly different angle, and the City will be able to gain more perspective on the forecast through a comparison of the two models\u2019 results.", "The preliminary CoSMoS study results indicate that, in the near term, Santa Monica\u2019s beaches will not be as heavily impacted as other parts of the coast, some of which are already losing shorelines and experiencing bluff erosion that impacts homes and businesses. In these places where shoreline loss or bluff erosion is already occurring, policies of managed retreat and adaptations involving the removal of structures or limitations on building new structures may have more immediate relevance.", "\u00b7 Coastal Erosion and Sea Level Rise", "Santa Monica\u2019s wide, sandy beaches are, nevertheless, forecast to narrow in the next 20 years and there is definitely expectation of some \u201ccoastal erosion\u201d or a higher shoreline. With two meters of SLR, a scenario that may be seen by 2050, the mean high tide line will move landward beyond the current life guard station locations. Such a retreat will eventually bring the beach closer to the historic line that existed in the City\u2019s early years before sand was added and wave action was altered by structures like the breakwater that created the yacht harbor and the Pier. The timeline for coastal erosion depends on global processes, including the melting of the polar ice cap and other influences on oceanic ecology. The height of the Pier places the deck and its activities above the level of sea level rise, according to the preliminary results of both models.", "A higher shoreline would imply that major winter storms, which have been gaining globally in number and intensity in recent years, would impact Santa Monica\u2019s beaches differently than in the past. The combined impact of sea level rise and intense storms may see water reaching higher points, impacting beach infrastructure, such as recreation facilities for beachgoers, the bike trail and the surface parking lots.", "\u00b7 Options for Adaptation", "The City will have to decide on policies to guide its steps when these predicted changes actually begin to occur. While beach nourishment, in which sand is imported to maintain the shoreline, may be possible, an ongoing beach nurturing program may be too expensive or have unintended consequences and ultimately is not widely believed to be a sustainable option in the long-term. The Coastal Commission has discouraged and recently rejected applications for the construction of sea walls, which tend to actually speed up coastal erosion on the seaward side of the wall, while protecting inland structures. Protective sea walls tend to favor the investment of the private property owner over the public\u2019s right to enjoy the beach.", "Adaptation measures under consideration include nurturing dunes that may slow down or hold back waves. Council recently approved a pilot project that The Bay Foundation plans to implement in the coming year to restore a portion of the beach near the northern city boundary line with a dune landscape. The project will utilize existing sediments to passively restore and transform approximately 3 acres of the current beach into a sustainable coastal strand and dune habitat complex which would support resilience to sea level rise. The project is expected to have benefits for wildlife that thrive in the dune environment.", "\u00b7 Phased Approach to Development Restrictions", "In the much longer term, some combination of adaptation measures and strategic managed retreat may be necessary. While privately-owned beach-adjacent properties in Santa Monica are not immediately vulnerable to sea level rise impacts, the need to restrict some forms of development will likely become necessary when triggered by the advent of a significant increase in sea level rise. The LUP will take a phased policy approach to sea level rise impacts, with development restrictions becoming effective based on the progression of sea level rise and the proposed project\u2019s expected life span. A project that represents an investment with a shorter life span, such as a playground or other beach amenity, would, for instance, be reviewed differently from a new home or addition and in both cases, the coastline\u2019s movement at the time of application would determine applicable requirements and development thresholds.", "As an example of the phased approach, policies requiring disclosure of sea level risk in connection with property sales, and risk acknowledgement in connection with permit approvals might go into immediate effect, and sea walls may already be prohibited by the Coastal Commission. Other policies, such as \u201crolling easements\u201d that limit the use of property and policies potentially prohibit rebuilding of lost assets, may be included in the LUP, but would only become effective when triggered by measured landward movement of the mean high tide line. The phased approach is intended to allow the City to take steps to reduce risk without unnecessarily restricting activity that does not yet pose a risk.", "Cultural Resources and Historic Preservation", "Coastal Act Guidance", "The Coastal Act\u2019s primary interest in terms of historic resources is protection of archeological remains, particularly those associated with native tribes that lived in specific coastal areas during earlier times. LCP policies will require special protection of these resources and identification and caution to be taken in the event that projects are undertaken in areas that potentially may contain cultural artifacts.", "In Santa Monica, the discovery of archeological resources is quite rare, but preservation of more modern historic resources is highly valued. The Coastal Act includes a statute that requires new development to: \u201cwhere appropriate, protect special communities and neighborhoods that, because of their unique characteristics, are popular visitor destination points for recreational uses.\u201d", "Changes Since the Existing LUP was Adopted", "Since the 1992 LUP was adopted, the City took an important step forward to protect its historic resources primarily through adoption of the General Plan Historic Preservation Element (HPE) in 2002. HPE policies have strengthened the Landmarks Ordinance (Chapter 9.56 Of the Municipal Code), which was first codified in 1975 and updated since. These policies and regulations have become the basis for a robust and active preservation program that is integrated into the planning process.", "The City has also maintained a Historic Resources Inventory (HRI) since the mid-1980s. The HRI has been updated for specific areas or for the entire city on several occasions and is in the process of another comprehensive update to be completed by May 2017. The City\u2019s Historic Resources Inventory (HRI) and list of designated landmarks and historic districts comprise a fairly comprehensive list of Santa Monica\u2019s unique historic resources, but in general these are not neighborhoods that in and of themselves constitute popular visitor recreational destinations. The Pier, although not a neighborhood, is a historic resource and popular visitor destination and it is already protected as a landmark, with separate designations protecting the Looff Hippodrome (carousel building) and the Pier Yacht Harbor sign. Main Street is also a visitor destination and many of its most distinct buildings are either designated as landmarks or listed on the HRI.", "Specific Plans that the City has adopted have given consideration to protecting and incorporating the historic resources within their plan areas to define character and provide guidance for future development. The policies of the LCP will not attempt to replace the HPE or Landmarks Ordinance, or to affect the policies of the DCP and Civic Center Specific Plan (CCSP), but will support HPE policies such as encouraging adaptive reuse and consulting the HRI as an integral activity in the planning review and plan check processes to ensure that full consideration is given to the proper treatment of historic resources.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "Due to strong protections and incentives already in place in the Zoning Ordinance and Landmarks Ordinance in addition to policies in the Historic Preservation Element, LUCE, and applicable Specific Plans, it is not necessary to include additional protections for historic resources in the LUP.", "One exception is to resolve a conflict between two State mandates with regards to City-designated cultural landscapes. The Coastal Commission has determined that plants classified as invasive may not be planted in the Coastal Zone including two iconic species of palm trees. At the same time, the City uses as a standard of review the US Secretary of Interior Standards for the Treatment of Historic Places, which defines the proper treatment for historic resources, including cultural landscapes. The best examples of where these regulations conflict is in Palisades Park, where the Landmark designation lists the iconic Mexican Fan Palms and Canary Island date palms as contributing features to a historic landscape, and City Hall, which includes Canary Island date palms in its landscape setting. As elements of designated historic resources, these palm trees should be preserved to the extent possible and the City would like to have the option to replace them in-kind if it becomes necessary to remove them. The Cultural Resource and Historic Preservation section will include a policy that recognizes designated cultural landscapes and allows replacement of trees that are called out as character-defining in a Landmark designation with the same species even if listed as an invasive species.", "New Development", "Coastal Act Guidance", "The policy categories are generally applicable to all areas of the Coastal Zone. However, New Development will include subarea-specific policies to appropriately guide development consistent with each subarea\u2019s unique character and circumstances. LUP policies will reflect the Coastal Act\u2019s prioritization of coastal-adjacent areas for the public enjoyment, although the Coastal Zone goes as far east as 4th Street north of Pico Boulevard and Lincoln Boulevard in Ocean Park. Policies will reflect the relative importance of Subareas 1, 2, and 3 (the beach, Pier and bluffs) for coastal access and recreation, and the unique circumstances of Downtown, the Civic Center, Main Street and the residential neighborhoods.", "Changes Since the Existing LUP was Adopted", "There have been many changes to the Coastal Area in the last quarter century, but few amendments to the LUP. The CCC removed certain subareas from the policy section of the current LUP, excluding them from their 1992 certification because of pending issues and policy concerns at that time. These areas included the Civic Center, which was then in the midst of planning the first Civic Center Specific Plan (CCSP), and the whole of Subarea 1 and parts of Subarea 3, which are beach areas within the Proposition S Beach Overlay District. At the time, the CCC expressed concern about the City\u2019s compliance with the Coastal Act\u2019s intent to provide visitor-serving uses at the beach based on restrictions of Proposition S. With time and the City\u2019s success in providing beach amenities, including the Annenberg Community Beach House, concerns that Proposition S would negatively affect beach access and visitor services have been largely alleviated. In the LUP Update, area-specific policies will be established for all subareas.", "In addition to the Civic Center, Downtown is also currently in the midst of a specific planning process through the Downtown Community Plan (DCP). The LUP Update provides an opportunity to ensure consistency with these plans. Since the LUP and DCP projects are being developed and considered concurrently, the timing for presentation of a Final Draft LUP is affected. The final draft of the LUP will be brought forward for adoption hearings after the DCP process has been completed, incorporating policies that ensure consistency between the two documents.", "Proposed LUP Update Approach", "Relevant documents were reviewed in the first phase of the LUP project, with the goal of identifying and resolving potential conflicts with the LUP. These included the 2010 LUCE, CCSP and draft DCP. The LUCE is built on a unique Tier structure that regulates projects to allow height and density maximums that depend on the provision of certain amenities or preferred uses, such as affordable housing, cultural amenities and open space. Specific standards and requirements for the Coastal Zone will be determined in the Implementation Plan (Coastal Zoning Ordinance), which will be developed through a separate public process following LUP certification. Until a Coastal Zoning Ordinance is adopted and certified by the CCC, the current Zoning Ordinance will continue to apply to the Coastal Zone and the Coastal Development Permit process will continue to be implemented by the CCC based on the updated LUP. The IP project has an anticipated timeline of two to three years.", "Attachment B shows a comparison of height limits in the LUP and LUCE. While the City evaluates applications based on the LUCE and Zoning Ordinance, CDP decisions are guided by the LUP. When the City has a certified LCP that includes both the LUP and IP, City staff will review projects in the Coastal Zone based on the LCP. Council should provide input on the parameters for height, including whether to adjust the maximum heights to be consistent with the LUCE.", "Next Steps", "Following the Council\u2019s direction on LCP policy development, staff will prepare a draft LCP Land Use Plan for public release in early 2017. The Draft LUP may contain a placeholder for Downtown subarea policies, which would be finalized to reflect the Downtown Community Plan (DCP) when the Final Draft LUP is released. In order to present a complete LUP for certification, including policies for all subareas, the public hearing schedule to consider the LUP Final Draft must come after the DCP adoption process. Currently, staff is working toward adoption hearings in Spring/Summer 2017, after the anticipated adoption of the DCP, to be followed by submittal to the Coastal Commission for certification.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended policy action."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Amending Article VIII of the Santa Monica Municipal Code by Adopting the California Building Standards Code and the Santa Monica Local Amendments to the California Building Standards Code", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on October 25, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Article VIII of the Santa Monica Municipal Code by adopting the California Building Standards Code and the Santa Monica local amendments to the California Building Standards Code.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}], [{"Title": "State of the Water Fund Report and 2017 Water Rate Adjustment", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Suspend the 9% water rate increase authorized by Council to go into effect on January 1, 2017 and authorize a 5% increase to be in effect until December 31, 2017; and2. Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report recommends the City Council adopt a 5% water rate increase for 2017 instead of the previously approved 9% increase. This recommendation is based on a proposed rightsizing of the Water Fund\u2019s capital program which provides for a better than expected five-year Water Fund balance projection and also an increased investment in the City\u2019s water main replacement capital program to provide a 100-year replacement schedule ($4M per year) as recommended in the 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan, instead of a 200-year replacement schedule ($2M per year) as currently budgeted.", "On February 24, 2015 (Attachment A), Council approved a series of five annual 9% water rate increases for the period of March 1, 2015 through December 31, 2019 to go into effect automatically unless suspended by Council for all or part of each increase. The first 9% increase went into effect on March 1, 2015. On February 23, 2016 (Attachment B), due to better than expected financial results in Fiscal Year 2014-15, Council approved a 5% increase for calendar year 2016, partially suspending the scheduled 9% increase. Based upon review of Water Fund performance for Fiscal Year 2015-16, revenues were $2.2M greater than anticipated; and expenditures were $16.8M less than anticipated, leaving the Water Fund with a $41.3M fund balance.", "The recommended rate adjustment would be sufficient to allow the City to fund necessary operating and capital programs; to deliver potable water to Santa Monica customers reliably, safely and sustainably in compliance with federal and state regulations; and stay on track to achieve water self-sufficiency as planned by 2020. The recommended 5% water rate increase for 2017 instead of the previously approved 9% increase would be effective for calendar year 2017 on bills issued on or about March 1, 2017 to February 28, 2018, with up to 9% increases authorized for 2018 and 2019 pending annual evaluation by Council and staff. Proposed and current water and fire line service rates are listed in Attachment C. Council may take action to adjust future rates at the next annual review.", "Background", "On February 24, 2015, Council approved the following schedule of water rate increases via resolution subject to an annual State of the Water Fund review analyzing fiscal performance and projected fund balances over a five-year period:", "Calendar Year", "2015, effective March 1, 2015", "2016, effective January 1, 2016", "2017 effective January 1, 2017", "2018 effective January 1, 2018", "2019 effective January 1, 2019", "Maximum Authorized Increase", "9%", "9%", "9%", "9%", "9%", "Actual Increase Adopted by Council based upon review of Water Fund performance", "9%", "5%", "Rate increases go into effect automatically on an annual basis unless suspended all or in part by Council. On February 23, 2016, based on an improved financial outlook, Council partially suspended the full 9% increase and approved a 5% increase.", "For financial stability, the Water Fund strives to maintain a $7 million minimum reserve balance with revenues sufficient to cover all operating and capital expenditures while meeting various water-related requirements and goals including:", "\u00b7 20% reduction in water use versus 2013 levels mandated by the State from May 5, 2015 through May 2016 and Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage conditions adopted by Council on August 12, 2014 in accordance with the City\u2019s Water Shortage Response Plan (Attachment D);", "\u00b7 Meeting a State-required 123 gallon per capita per day usage standard per the Water Conservation Act of 2009 also known as SBx7-7;", "\u00b7 Federal & State water quality and treatment requirements;", "\u00b7 Achieving Santa Monica's goal of 100% water self-sufficiency by 2020;", "\u00b7 Managing Santa Monica basin groundwater contamination and utilizing groundwater resources in a sustainable manner; and", "\u00b7 Maintenance and construction of water treatment and distribution systems including facilities, meters, pipelines, pump stations, reservoirs and well fields for reliable and efficient delivery of potable water for customer use.", "Rate increases may be deferred or lowered should revenues be greater than anticipated or expenditures be less than expected, while maintaining a $7 million minimum reserve Water Fund balance.", "Any 2017 rate increase would go into effect for water consumption beginning on January 1, 2017, effective on water bills prepared on or after March 1, 2017 as water meters are read approximately every two months (e.g. a bill issued for a meter read on March 1, 2017 would reflect water usage from January 1 to February 28, 2017).", "Discussion", "Fiscal Year 2015-16 Financial Performance", "In considering whether to suspend all or part of the scheduled 9% rate adjustment for calendar year 2017, staff analyzed the FY 2015-16 actual performance of the Water Fund. As indicated in the Five-Year Water Fund Balance Projection tables (Attachment E), the Water Fund ended Fiscal Year 2015-16 with a fund balance of $41,350,436.", "The Water Fund ended the year $19M better than expected due to modestly higher than expected revenues and significantly lower than expected capital and operating expenditures.", "\u00b7 Revenues - Usage reductions for Fiscal Year 2015-16 were exhibited by all customer classes compared to the prior fiscal year, including Commercial (-6%), Multi-Family Residential (-7%), Institutional including City accounts (-13%) and Single Family Residential (-14%). Although usage was down compared to the prior year, actual usage exceeded projected usage, resulting in actual revenues exceeding budgeted revenues by $2.2 million due to higher than expected water sales and meter/service line installs.", "\u00b7 Expenditures - a higher than normal expenditure budget was planned for FY 2015-16 to make investments in an ambitious $13.4M capital project schedule and implementing an accelerated $5M conservation program as prescribed in the City's 2015 Water Shortage Response Plan to meet mandated water use reductions. Due to lower than expected actual expenditures, a $16.8M surplus was realized as follows:", "o Capital Expenditures - $9.8M surplus - several project budgets were deferred or continued to FY 2016-17 pending bids or completion of design work.", "o Water Conservation Rebate and Plumbing Fixture Direct Install Programs - $3.7M surplus - a plumbing fixture replacement contract for low income housing was deferred due to permitting issues and $3M in rebate funding and other water conservation measures will be continued into FY 2016-17 to encourage further efficiencies in residential and commercial landscape and plumbing fixture water usage.", "o Charnock Well Field Operations (11375 Westminster Avenue) - $1M surplus - progress made in groundwater pollution plume clean-up of MTBE and other volatile organic compounds has reduced the need for granular activated carbon filter media change outs to a bi-weekly frequency, resulting in $859K in savings. Lower than expected contractor and operating supplies costs offset higher than expected energy costs accounting for the remainder of the savings.", "o Arcadia Water Treatment Plant Operations (1228 S. Bundy Drive) - $913K surplus - lower than expected costs were observed for electricity and water treatment chemicals along with deferral of membrane, cartridge filter and filter media change outs. Reverse osmosis membranes, which are used as part of the City\u2019s water filtration process, require replacement every 5 to 6 years and are scheduled to begin in spring 2017 at an estimated cost of $1.2M.", "o Metropolitan Water District (MWD) imported water purchases - $688K surplus - the City purchased 2,809 acre-feet of MWD water in FY 2015-16--the lowest amount in 20+ years. Two Charnock wells were shut down for repairs at various periods from April to June 2016 requiring the purchase of an additional 430 acre-feet of MWD water to replace lost local production; otherwise this surplus would have been higher.", "Water Self-Sufficiency by 2020", "Original Conditions", "The Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP) (Attachment F) was developed by staff in response to City Council direction in March 2011 to become water self-sufficient by 2020. After various study sessions, Council approved the SWMP on October 28, 2014. Water supply and demand conditions at the time (Fiscal Year 2012-13 data formed the basis for the analysis) led to the development of the following chart as included in the SWMP:", "In 2013, water demand in Santa Monica was 14,078 Acre-Feet (AF). Projections for future demand included an analysis of water demand in improved economic conditions. Applying regression analysis techniques and population growth estimates looking forward, demand was projected to increase to 15,490 AF by the year 2020. Given the groundwater production capability at the time of 9,000 AF, the \u201cgap\u201d between local production and total demand was calculated as the difference of 6,490 AF (stated as 6,500 AF). With an aggressive conservation program reducing demand by approximately 1,440 AF and the potential development of approximately 5,000 AF of new local groundwater, the 6,500 AF gap could be addressed.", "Current Conditions / Updated Gap Projection", "During Fiscal Year 2015-16, with California mired in a prolonged drought, the State Water Board enacted mandatory conservation measures requiring all water agencies in the State to reduce water levels by 20%. Preceding this action by the State, Santa Monica enacted Stage 2 of its own Water Shortage Response Plan, which already had required a 20% reduction in use.", "As a result, and following aggressive investment in conservation programs and enforcement, total water deliveries dropped to 11,348 acre-feet in Fiscal Year 2015-16. Of this amount, 2,809 acre-feet (25% of water sales) of imported water was purchased from Metropolitan Water District, with the remainder sourced locally from Santa Monica Basin groundwater. Although the State has backed off from its 20% mandatory reductions and in its place has requested water agencies to \u201cself-certify\u201d water supplies through the year 2019, Santa Monica remains in Stage 2 of its Water Shortage Response Plan, which sets a 20 percent conservation mandate. Santa Monica has certified that sufficient water exists to meet demands through 2019, principally because the Metropolitan Water District certified adequate supplies to meet the demands of its member agencies. Accounting for the drop in water demand due to successful conservation efforts, and assuming a slight (2%) increase in demand this year and holding through 2020, the future year forecast of water supply and demand conditions is displayed below. With the drop in demand projecting to 11,575 AF at the year 2020, and given the existing local groundwater production of 9,000 AF, the gap can be restated now as 2,575 AF to be achieved by 2020.", "Actions to Date", "Groundwater treatment capacity at the Arcadia Treatment Plant meets the pumping capacities of existing wells, with limited spare capacity. As initially calculated to meet water self-sufficiency, an additional 5,000 AF of local groundwater supply was required. Accordingly, additional well production would require additional treatment capacity; in initially seeking to develop an additional 5,000 AF per year as envisioned in the original plan, it was necessary to investigate the feasibility of additional treatment capacity. Toward this end, a pilot study for a proposed new treatment facility in the Olympic sub-basin has recently been concluded. The pilot study addressed the removal of contaminants specific to the Olympic sub-basin (Tetrachloroethylene (PCE), Trichloroethene (TCE), and 1,4-Dioxane), identified an appropriate treatment train for the constituents of concern (greensand filtration, reverse osmosis and advanced oxidation), and developed a preliminary cost estimate for the project (approximately $70M, not including direct owners costs). The Olympic Treatment Plant (OTP) would be located at the City Yards to take advantage of existing City-owned land and to remain in close proximity to existing Olympic sub-basin wells. The creation of additional treatment capacity separate and apart from the Arcadia facility would also create redundancy and independence in the event of an interruption in service at Arcadia. Furthermore, site planning and initial layout considerations have been made in close coordination with the ongoing City Yards master planning efforts.", "The final recommendation of constructing the OTP has not been made. While the pilot testing process was necessary in order to fully inform the final design of the OTP, additional analyses are underway, which will serve to best inform the threshold decision of whether to proceed with construction of the full-scale OTP. Presently, a sustainable yield analysis of the entire Santa Monica groundwater basin is underway. The results of the study, to be completed in spring 2017, will identify the sustainable yield of the basin. As defined in California\u2019s Sustainable Groundwater Management Act of 2014, sustainable yield means the maximum quantity of water \u2013 calculated over a base period representative of long term conditions in the basin and including any temporary surplus \u2013 that can be withdrawn annually from a groundwater supply without causing an undesirable result.", "The findings of the study, specifically the yield available from the Olympic subbasin, and the adjacent Coastal subbasin, will be considered in making the final recommendation. Furthermore, pending the findings of the sustainable yield analysis, exploratory wells will better define the quality characteristics of the water available to the OTP and refine the final design criteria and cost estimates. Additionally, in order to ensure the best use of available funding, the feasibility of expanding and/or enhancing the existing Arcadia Water Treatment facility will be addressed as an alternative to construction of a new plant at the City Yards. This analysis of the alternative siting of the OTP will also be completed in spring 2017.", "Also completed over the last year was the drilling of an exploratory bore hole immediately north of City Hall. The drilling operation met multiple objectives. It was an opportunity to explore and characterize the subsurface conditions in a part of the City where no wells currently exist and in doing so further supported basin-wide sustainability efforts, and it also served to provide an assessment of the potential for a water supply well to serve the proposed City Services Building.", "Closing the Gap", "Resiliency and adaptability in light of changing conditions applies to the approach towards self-sufficiency. Since the development of the original plan to achieve self-sufficiency and closing a 6,500 AF gap in supplies, an extensive, prolonged drought has materially changed the community\u2019s water demands. Recognizing that conservation has already been incorporated into the water supply portfolio resulting in significant savings, achieving self-sufficiency by 2020 now means identifying 2,575 AF of additional supply. While no new wells have been constructed as yet pending the results of the sustainable yield analysis, additional supply may be realized through the development of projects not previously envisioned nor included in the original supply projections.", "In the continuing search for alternate water sources to meet self-sufficiency goals, staff has developed the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP), for which Council approved the environmental documentation on September 27, 2016 (Attachment G).", "Briefly, the SWIP leverages the use of existing City infrastructure by linking together three distributed water reuse elements into a single cohesive and comprehensive project. Advanced treated water (runoff, brackish impaired groundwater, and municipal wastewater) produced from the SWIP would be used to meet existing permitted non-potable reuse demands such as landscape irrigation. When properly permitted, a significant portion of the advanced treated water would be utilized for future indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge. Combined, the three SWIP elements would produce approximately 1,680 acre-feet per year (AFY) of new water.", "Existing wells, which are presently not used or under-utilized, present an opportunity to increase supply in a more cost efficient and expedient manner than the process involved in creating and permitting new wells. In the Olympic sub-basin, well SM7 was drilled and completed in 1985. It was never placed in service as a production well however, due to high levels of volatile organic compounds (VOCs) detected in the well during development. These contaminants are the same as those being treated in water sourced from nearby wells SM3 and SM4, for which funds are being received by the City from Gillette and Boeing. Staff is currently reviewing the rehabilitation options for SM7. Limited pumping data for this well indicates it may be possible to recover up to 300 gallons per minute, which equates to 480 AF per year.", "Pending the results of the sustainable yield study, the priority for siting and constructing a new well would be in the Olympic or Coastal sub-basins. At least one additional well, with a production capacity of 500 gallons per minute at a minimum, would provide 800 AF. A proposed timeline for the projects is presented below.", "Cumulatively, these projects would provide 2,960 AF of new production, which is just over the revised anticipated gap of 2,575 AF. If these production estimates are met and conservation persists, the City is set to meet self-sufficiency by 2020 without the OTP by very narrow margins. Additional studies and analysis will explore more economical and incremental approaches to cover fluctuating water demands with and without the OTP.", "Other issues relative to self-sufficiency", "Santa Monica is actively moving toward closing the remaining gap to attain water self-sufficiency by 2020. In support of this effort, various programs and policies are in place or may soon become effective, pending Council approval, which aim to address demand and/or increase supplies. The development of additional water treatment capacity, the Sustainable Yield Study, and the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project have been addressed previously in this staff report. Further discussed herein are conservation programs, development of a Water Neutrality Ordinance, and sustainable management of groundwater resources.", "Conservation Programs", "The SWMP included the expansion of water conservation programs and rebates in addition to the installation of additional groundwater wells, and greywater and rainwater harvesting systems to increase local water supplies.", "Faced with the threat of continued drought, uncertain local and imported water supplies and increasing resident and day-time populations, City Council declared a Stage 2 Water Shortage on August 12, 2014, requiring mandatory water allocations and a 20% reduction in water use from 2013 usage.", "The City\u2019s drought response policies and programs build upon the programs and projects outlined in the SWMP. These coordinated efforts are achieving water use reductions while creating a sustainable water portfolio. Since June 2015, citywide water use has been reduced 19.7% compared to 2013 water usage. In FY 2015-16, 75% of Santa Monica\u2019s potable water was sourced from local groundwater with more than 64 days where no imported water was purchased from Metropolitan Water District. Santa Monica also exceeded the State SBx7-7 requirement to reduce water use to 123 gallon per capita per day (gpcd) as noted in the City's 2015 Urban Water Management Plan (Attachment H), using 113 gpcd in calendar year 2015. FY 2015-16 water sales of 11,348 acre-feet represents an even more impressive 21.5% savings versus the 20-year annual rolling average usage of 14,460 acre-feet from 1996 to 2015 despite increased population and building density.", "Drought Response: Water Use Reduction for FY2015-16", "The City\u2019s groundwater is recharged by rain. Only five inches of rain fell in the Santa Monica area during the 2015-2016 rainy season, which was significantly below the 14 inch average for the region and the 30 inches of rain that was anticipated due to El Ni\u00f1o conditions. Even though the state lessened its drought response requirements, Santa Monica continues to take a long-range water management approach to ensure a resilient and healthy water supply portfolio amid the uncertainty of climate change, watersupply availability, and waterdemands.", "As part of the Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage, water use allowances and penalties have been implemented in addition to expanded landscape rebates, turn-key toilet installations, home and business water consultations, and a comprehensive outreach and marketing plan. To date, 75% of all water customers are within their water use allowance and are consistently near or at the number each month. The City\u2019s public landscape and facilities operations have cut water use by 23%. Penalties focused on high water users and have been effective at encouraging these customers to reduce their water use. By the end of September 2016, staff issued 629 penalties to the highest water wasters and water usage among that group has been reduced by 8% as a result.", "The City\u2019s significant investments in water conservation have helped to achieve this reduction, but it is uncertain how much of this is due to behavioral changes versus permanent water-efficiency measures. Although significant reductions in water use among all customer sectors have been made, water demand has increased in Santa Monica by 6% in Q1 of FY 2016-17 compared to Q1 of FY 2015-16. With the lifting of the statewide mandatory targets in May 2016 it is anticipated that this trend may continue. Therefore, staff is redoubling efforts to promote the need for continued conservation. A new marketing campaign started in early July 2016 including social media, bus ads, street banners, banners at parks, targeted outreach to high-water use customers, landscape workshops for professionals, participation in the EPA\u2019s Sprinkler Spruce Up summer marketing campaign, outreach to City employees, and outreach through Santa Monica Tourism and Travel, the Chamber of Commerce and the business districts.", "In FY 2015-16, more than 400 landscape rebates were issued whereby 596,065 square feet of lawn were removed, and 10,000 water-saving products and plumbing fixture rebates were provided to residents and businesses. There are over 280 properties enrolled in the landscape rebate program this fiscal year that are projected to remove more than 200,000 square feet of lawn.", "Water Conservation Programs", "Drought Response Programs", "Total", "2014-2016", "Giveaways: showerheads, aerators, etc.", "2,501", "Landscape Consultations", "494", "Water Use Consultations", "272", "Water Use Allowance Citations", "629", "Water School", "156", "Water Waste Complaints", "889", "Water Waste Warning Letters", "786", "Water Waste Citations", "14", "SWMP - Water Conservation Programs", "Actuals2014 to 2016", "Target Amount by 2020", "Percent Complete", "Toilet Rebates Single Family", "391", "3,568", "11%", "Toilet Rebates Multi Family", "1,666", "4,000", "42%", "Toilet Rebates Commercial", "437", "200", "219%", "Toilet Direct Install", "1,340", "5,496", "24%", "Clothes Washer Rebates Residential", "242", "1,424", "17%", "Controllers Single Family", "80", "1,920", "4%", "Urinals Commercial", "18", "548", "3%", "Laminar Flow Devices Commercial", "125", "664", "19%", "Dry Pump Rebates Commercial \u2013 no customers have applied for this rebate.", "0", "40", "0%", "Connectionless Food Steamer Commercial \u2013 no customers have applied for this rebate.", "0", "2", "0%", "Conductivity Controller Commercial \u2013 no customers have applied for this rebate.", "0", "2", "0%", "Faucet Aerators Commercial \u2013 no customers have applied for this rebate.", "0", "158", "0%", "Coin-op Washers Rebates \u2013 this program is launching in 2017.", "0", "45", "0%", "St John's Medical Facility \u2013 this program has been declined by client and is no longer available.", "0", "N/A", "0%", "SMMUSD Audits/Retrofits", "7", "16", "44%", "WaterSmart Software Participants", "5,924", "6,000", "99%", "Lawn Removed (square feet)", "596,065", "1,100,000", "54%", "To assist Santa Monica in achieving additional water savings, the City is planning to invest $3M in FY 2016-17 in a robust suite of residential, commercial and institutional water conservation programs including landscape, turf removal, appliance and plumbing fixture rebates, water consultations and plumbing fixture direct installs and giveaways pending budget approval. Program details may be found online at: smgov.net/water.", "Water Neutrality Ordinance", "To address future water demand from development, staff is developing a Water Neutrality ordinance which would require new development projects to implement or fund water savings offsets to mitigate any additional projected water usage related to the new development. The Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE) and a stakeholder committee are studying various program, financial and legal issues. Staff anticipates returning to Council with a proposed ordinance in February 2017.", "Groundwater Management.", "Prudent management of the local groundwater resources is critically important in addressing Santa Monica\u2019s drive towards water independence. Local groundwater has been part of the City\u2019s water supply for nearly 100 years and sensible stewardship and oversight have allowed the City to withstand recurring droughts and contamination events in recent years. Challenges faced include increased urbanization and industrial land use changes, with the potential of these changes to result in groundwater degradation as seen over the last twenty years, as well as climate change challenges affecting groundwater recharge, sea level rise, and rising temperatures which have typically been coupled with a rise in water demand. The City is presently addressing groundwater management issues on two fronts: evaluation of alternatives to impose a temporary moratorium on the drilling of private wells until the results of the Sustainable Yield Analysis are completed, and the development of a basin-wide, multi-jurisdictional approach to basin management in compliance with the 2014 Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (SGMA).", "Regulation of Private Wells", "The City\u2019s groundwater sources must be protected against overdraft and contamination so that the City may continue to provide the necessary volume of potable water to its citizens within the health and welfare guidelines promulgated by the various State and federal regulatory agencies. Neither State law nor current City ordinances prohibit an individual property owner from constructing a private well for irrigation purposes on their property. Only a drilling permit from the Los Angeles County Health Department is required to construct a well. No City ordinance currently exists which requires any person or land owner wanting to construct a private well within the City to notify the City, or provide and information about that well and groundwater withdrawal from the well to the City.", "On January 24, 2012, Santa Monica adopted a resolution declaring its recognition for the fundamental rights of natural communities and ecosystems toexist,thrive and evolve. The Sustainable Bill of Rights (SBoR) was prepared as a Resolution that supports sustainable rights and commits to further exploration of how best to protect these rights and achieve community sustainability goals. On April 9, 2013 Council adopted a Sustainability Rights Ordinance that codified the rights outlined in the SBoR into the City\u2019s municipal code. These rights include:", "\u00b7 Recognizing the right of the people of Santa Monica to clean, affordable, and accessible water from sustainable sources for human consumption, cooking, and sanitary purposes;", "\u00b7 Recognizing the fundamental rights of natural communities and ecosystems to exist, thrive, and evolve; and", "\u00b7 Effectuating these rights by modifying local law and policy as needed to better protect and sustain, for future and current generations, the natural environment upon which we all depend.", "The City\u2019s established goal of water self-sufficiency by 2020 is bolstered by the SBoR, which emphasizes the City\u2019s responsibility to ensure its groundwater resources remain at heathy levels and continue to thrive, and furthermore defines the community\u2019s right to water from sustainable sources.", "Given the City\u2019s experience with past contamination events, current drought conditions, and required compliance with newly enacted state groundwater management law, staff is evaluating alternatives to impose a temporary moratorium on the drilling of private wells until the results of the Sustainable Yield Analysis are completed. Specifically, City staff are working with Los Angeles County staff to temporarily suspend the County issuance of well permits to property owners in Santa Monica. Following completion of the Sustainable Yield Analysis and additional assessment of local groundwater resources, staff will report back to Council in November 2017 as part of the State of the Water Fund report with a more substantive discussion of future regulatory actions which may be considered by the City relative to the continued regulation of private wells.", "Sustainable Groundwater Management Act", "The 2014 Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (SGMA) gives local agencies the authority to manage groundwater in a sustainable manner and allows for limited state intervention when necessary to protect groundwater resources. The SGMA requires the creation of Groundwater Sustainability Agencies (GSAs) to develop and implement local plans allowing 20 years to achieve sustainability. The SGMA provides a state framework to regulate groundwater for the first time in California history. Specifically, the SGMA:", "\u00b7 Establishes a definition of sustainable groundwater management;", "\u00b7 Establishes a framework for local agencies to develop plans and implement strategies to sustainably manage groundwater resources;", "\u00b7 Prioritizes basins with the greatest problems (ranked as high- and medium-priority); and", "\u00b7 Sets a 20-year timeline for implementation.", "The SGMA includes provisions to promote engagement by interested parties in the formation of a GSA and development and implementation of a Groundwater Sustainability Plan. GSAs must identify key parties and maintain records that spell out plans on how to include their interests in GSA operations and Groundwater Sustainability Plan development. The Act requires the GSA to provide this information to the California Department of Water Resources. The GSA is the primary agency responsible for achieving sustainability within the timeframe.", "Groundwater Sustainability Plans must include a physical description of the basin, including groundwater levels, groundwater quality, subsidence, information on groundwater-surface water interaction, data on historical and projected water demands and supplies, monitoring and management provisions, and a description of how the plan will affect other plans, including city and county general plans.", "The 50-square mile Santa Monica Basin is currently non-adjudicated and underlies Santa Monica and portions of Los Angeles. The City is in discussions with neighboring agencies including the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power and the City of Beverly Hills, to establish cooperative agreements relative to the creation of a Groundwater Sustainability Agency to manage demand and ensure water is utilized in a sustainable manner throughout the basin. In accordance with SGMA requirements, formation of a GSA for the Santa Monica Basin is required by June 2017 and adoption of a Groundwater Sustainability Plan by is required by 2022.", "Recommendation", "Due to an improved financial outlook, staff recommends Council partially suspend part of the 9% water rate increase authorized by Council and authorize a 5% increase. Comparing rates with nine other Southern California providers (Attachment I), Santa Monica's tiered rate structure currently offers close to the lowest, if not the lowest, rates in the region for the average user. For a single family residence using the City average of 24 HCF (17,952 gallons) over a two-month period, a 5% increase would raise a bi-monthly water bill by $4.06 from $83.08 to $87.14, which works out to less than a half-cent ($0.00485) per gallon. Burbank offers the next-best pricing at $95.", "Water Main Replacement Program and Capital Expenditures \u2013 due to staffing limitations, the City has expended only an average of $2M on water main replacements over the past 15 years. Currently, water main replacement is budgeted in FY 2016-17 at $4.4M, while FY 2017-18 to FY 2019-20 are budgeted at $2M per year. $2M provides for replacement of approximately one mile per year. As the City\u2019s water main system consists of 205 miles of pipeline, the current budget provides for a 205-year replacement schedule, approximately double the 100-year replacement schedule recommended in the City of Santa Monica\u2019s 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan. Deferral of water main replacements may lead to breakages due to corrosion and other causes resulting in property damage and water loss similar to those recently experienced at UCLA and other locations throughout Southern California.", "The 5% increase would fund an additional $2M per year for water main replacements and one new FTE Civil Engineer ($180K per year) required to address the increased workload associated with the enhanced main replacement program. This would increase the total water main replacement budget to $4M per year, which would fund two miles annually to achieve a 100-year replacement schedule. As indicated in Figure 1 below, 4% of the City\u2019s water main system (8 miles) is at or over 100 years old.", "Figure 1 - Age Distribution of Water System Pipelines", "To partially offset the increased water main replacement costs, staff have identified $3.4M in FY 2016-17 capital projects which may be reduced, eliminated or deferred, including:", "\u00b7 Water Resources facility improvement projects related to the City Yards Master Plan (deferred until onset of construction) - $1.5M", "\u00b7 Water main and valve replacement projects that cannot be completed in FY 2016-17 at current staff levels - $1M", "\u00b7 Construction projects where funding is no longer required (California Incline, Expo and Charnock Well Field booster pumps) - $470K", "\u00b7 Technology projects to be deferred or with budget savings that may be returned to the Water Fund (advanced metering infrastructure, software systems database reporting, water systems control hardware/software) - $330K", "\u00b7 Sustainability projects including groundwater management interagency memorandum of understanding development (work now to be completed by City staff) and Urban Water Management Plan closeout (plan accepted by the State) - $155K.", "A 5% rate increase would provide sufficient funding to maintain safe and reliable water deliveries for Santa Monica customers at a reasonable cost and continue investments in infrastructure and progress towards water self-sufficiency by 2020 while meeting Federal and State regulations and Council-mandated water usage restrictions. This adjustment would also provide the Water Fund the financial stability to allow for fluctuations in water usage, take action to combat elongated drought conditions, address unforeseen operating and capital requirements, meet or exceed bonding capital requirements at the end of the five-year rate analysis period and, ideally, avoid future rate shocks in the subsequent five-year rate period (FY 2019-20 to FY 2024-25). Despite having a larger than normal $41.3M Water Fund balance primarily due to the one-time infusion of $33.4M in Charnock Well Field MTBE settlement funds at the end of FY 2012-13, it is anticipated that significant investments in capital ($31M) and conservation ($18M) programs will cause expenses to outpace revenues in each of the next few years. As indicated in Attachment E, with a 5% rate increase for 2017, the Water Fund is projected to drop to a minimum fund balance of $7.6M in FY 2019-20, just above the required $7M reserve level.", "It is important to note that fluctuating conditions in water usage, customer behavior, policies & regulations, weather patterns, unforeseen repair costs, groundwater supplies & pollution content and other considerations make Water Fund financial predictions somewhat of a challenge. A modest 5% swing in water usage could lead to a +/- $5M change to the Water Fund balance over five years. Just two years ago, based on available data, Santa Monica had a 2014 usage level of 13,987 acre-feet with a twenty-year previous average of 14,460 acre-feet. With the implementation of a mandatory 20% reduction in water usage versus 2013 levels and the corresponding anticipated loss of revenue, financial projections had the Water Fund dropping to lower than $1M despite a $33.4M infusion of MTBE settlement funds, 5 years of planned 9% rate increases and a planned, but no longer needed $10M bond issue in 2018. With revised revenue estimates, a leaner capital program and lower than expected operating costs, the Water Fund's financial outlook has improved enough to justify a lower rate increase while meeting all water-related requirements and goals.", "Alternatives", "0% Increase (full suspension of 9% rate increase)", "A 0% increase for 2017, with the existing $2M annual water main replacement capital budget unchanged and no additional staffing, would cause the Water Fund to drop to an estimated $6.9M in FY 2019-20, slightly below the $7M minimum recommended reserve level. Also, as this would keep the City on a 205-year replacement schedule instead of the recommended 100-year schedule, this option is not recommended due to the risk of increased frequency of water line breakages.", "3% Increase (partial suspension of 9% rate increase) with Partial Water Main Capital Program and Staffing Enhancements", "With a 3% increase in 2017, the Water Fund could fund a new Civil Engineer FTE and increase the water main replacement capital budget by $1.2M per year to $3.2M annually beginning in FY 2017-18, enough to fund 1.5 miles of water main per year (136-year replacement schedule) with a projected fund balance of $7.4M at the end of FY 2019-20. The average single family residential water bill (24 HCF) would increase from $83.08 to $85.64 per bi-monthly billing period, a $2.56 increase. This increase would be sufficient to fund planned operations, but is not preferable because it would not meet the 100-year recommended water main replacement schedule.", "Task Force on the Environment and Water Advisory Committee Actions", "The State of the Water Fund update was presented to the Task Force on the Environment on October 24, 2016. Although no formal position was taken by the Task Force, significant discussion focused on strong support for a rate adjustment which would support full funding for infrastructure maintenance at a level which would return the water main replacement cycle to a 100-year period. Similarly, the same support was received upon presenting the State of the Water Fund update to the Water Advisory Committee on November 1, 2016. Both groups voiced support for the 5% recommendation.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "FY 2015/16 water sales ended the year approximately $1.6 million greater than budget. As noted earlier, although usage was down compared to the prior year, actual usage exceeded projected usage, resulting in actual revenues exceeding budgeted revenues by $2.2 million. Based on this and that the State has eased mandatory statewide conservation guidelines and the City remains at Stage 2 of its Water Shortage Response Plan, staff now projects an additional 2% increase in water sales for FY 2016/17. The increased revenues generated by this increased water usage will be partially offset by the reduction of the rate increase from 9% to 5% resulting in a net revenue increase for the year of approximately $1,130,000. Staff will monitor revenues and any changes will be reflected in the FY 2016/17 Midyear Report.", "The following Water Fund FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program account budgets will be reduced by the following amounts:", "Account Number Reduction", "C250136.589000 \u2013 Water Main Replacement   ($805,841)", "C250162.589000 \u2013 Water Resources Tenant Improve  ($1,500,000)", "C250388.589000 \u2013 Auto Meter Reading Pilot Prog  ($58,335)", "C257064.589000 \u2013 Expo Water Betterments   ($200,000)", "C258020.589000 \u2013 Water Systems Data Integration  ($132,000)", "C259015.589000 \u2013 SCADA Systems Upgrade    ($122,294)", "C259035.589000 \u2013 Booster Pump Charnock   ($19,292)", "C259040.589000 \u2013 Valve Study/Replacement   ($186,238)", "C259077.589000 \u2013 Sustainable Urban Water Master  ($5,000)", "C259078.589000 \u2013 Groundwater Management Plan  ($150,000)", "C259096.589000 \u2013 Calif Incline Construction   ($250,000)", "Total         ($3,429,000)"]}]], "1541118600": [[{"Title": "Addressing Hunger and Homelessness This Season", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Airport Administrative Building Green Roof Construction Contract", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #2385 to Terra Form Inc., a California-based company, for the installation of new landscape, hardscape and site furniture on the City-leased observation deck area rooftop of the Airport Administrative Building;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Terra Form Inc., in an amount not to exceed $215,600 (including a 10% contingency); and3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Airport Division seeks to install new landscape, hardscape and site furniture on the first floor rooftop of the Airport Administration building, located at 3223 Donald Douglas Loop South. The sod roof installed in the 1980s was removed in 2012 after a waterproofing repair project was performed to resolve water intrusion issues. The new Airport Administrative Building Green Rooftop project seeks to renovate the first floor rooftop area by upgrading hardscape and landscaping. Staff recommends Terra Form Inc. as the best and lowest bidder for construction services for the Airport Administrative Building Green Rooftop project in an amount not to exceed $215,600.", "Background", "In the 1980s, the City-owned first floor rooftop deck area featured a constructed sod rooftop at the south east end of the Airport Administrative Building, located at 3223 Donald Douglas Loop South. In 2012, the sod was removed to install a new waterproofing membrane in order to resolve ongoing water intrusion issues. After the installation of the membrane, the soil was backfilled and covered with mulch to prevent soil erosion and weed growth. The rooftop deck is accessible to the public and adjacent to the Airport observation deck. This recreational space is frequented by visitors and tenants.", "Discussion", "The City seeks to update the first floor deck area of the Airport Administrative Building with new landscape and hardscape. This green rooftop project would renovate the existing pedestrian walk way. Hardscape and drought tolerant landscape would be installed in the planter areas over the recently installed water proofing membrane. Renovations would improve the overall experience for visitors by enhancing the seating amenities and by making the area compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA). The Airport Administrative Building Green Roof project supports the City\u2019s sustainability goals and is in alignment with City Council\u2019s direction to enhance the airport\u2019s connection to the community.", "Contractor Selection", "In July 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to renovate the landscape and hardscape on the existing rooftop of the City-owned area at the Airport Administrative Building in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Thirty-four vendors downloaded the bid and three prospective bidders attended a pre-bid job walk. Two bids were received and publicly opened on August 17, 2016. The bid results are as follows:", "Bidder       Total Bid Amount", "Terra Form Inc.     $196,000", "Custom Design Construction   $218,000", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, Terra Form Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder. Staff contacted references provided by Terra Form Inc. for prior project experience on the Hollydale Regional Park in the City of South Gate and for the City of Santa Monica Airport Demonstration Gardens which were installed in 2011. All respondents reported work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that Terra Form Inc. has a license that is current, active, and in good standing and verified the firm is registered with the California Department of Industrial Relations (DIR).", "Schedule", "Construction work is tentatively scheduled to begin in December 2016 and is anticipated to be completed in spring 2017.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Terra Form Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $215,600 (includes a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C339085.589000.", "#1"]}, {"Title": "Memorandum of Understanding with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority for Operation and Maintenance of a Light Rail Transit System within the City of Santa Monica", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (Metro) regarding operation and maintenance of the light rail system within City boundaries.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On May 20, 2016, Metro opened its Expo line for passenger service, connecting Downtown Los Angeles to Downtown Santa Monica. Staff is seeking Council authorization to enter into a Memorandum of Understanding with Metro regarding operation and maintenance of the light rail system within City boundaries.", "New improvements, related to rail service, have been constructed for both City and Metro uses. Such infrastructure will be maintained by either the City or Metro. Therefore, staff recommends a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) and all other appropriate agreements with Metro to distinguish and identify the responsibility for maintenance and operations of exclusive infrastructure within City boundaries. The MOU would ensure that the City can continue its daily activities adjacent to the new rail line and that the future train operations and maintenance meet the needs of both the City of Santa Monica and Metro infrastructure.", "Background", "The Expo Line connects Downtown Los Angeles to Downtown Santa Monica.The three stops in Santa Monica are at the 26thStreet/Bergamot Station, Colorado/17thStreet/SMC Station, and the Downtown Santa Monica Station.The Construction Authority has completed construction of Expo Line and turned it over to Metro for operation.Metro opened the line for passenger service on May 20, 2016.", "OnSeptember 13, 2011, Council approved an ordinance that authorized a Master Cooperative Agreement (Cooperative Agreement) with the Exposition Metro Line Construction Authority (Construction Authority), per Attachment A.The Cooperative Agreement sets the respective duties of each party and also establishes the parameters on how each of the parties will interact in the construction of Phase 2.To date, the Cooperative Agreement has proven to be effective in facilitating completion of construction within the City.", "On May 27, 2014 (Attachment B), Council approved a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (Metro) and the Exposition Metro Line Construction Authority (Construction Authority) regarding train operation on City streets.", "On June 11, 2013 (Attachment C), Council approved a Bikeway License Agreement with Metro. The bikeway is located within the Metro-owned Exposition right-of-way adjacent to the Exposition Phase 2 Light Rail and includes 1.3 miles within the City of Santa Monica. The agreement allowed Metro to grant the City a non-exclusive license for the use, operation, alteration, maintenance, security, reconstruction and/or removal of the Bikeway. The City is to perform annual maintenance of the bikepath which includes landscape, sweeping, hardscape repairs, electricity costs, paving, signage, and striping maintenance. The bikeway is constructed within the City and was opened on May 20, 2016.", "Discussion", "City staff has been working with the Construction Authority, the Design Builder and Metro over the past six years to complete the light rail design and construction within the City boundaries. City staff have reviewed and approved numerous design packages for City infrastructure adjacent to the light rail. In addition, City staff participated in reviews of newly constructed Metro facilities within the City.", "There are new and existing maintenance responsibilities due to the light rail construction for both Metro and the City. The proposed MOU sets forth in detail each party\u2019s understanding of the mutual maintenance and repair responsibilities that impact, or may be impacted by operation of the rail lines within the City.", "Metro Maintenance Responsibilities", "Metro would be responsible for maintenance, repair, and reconstruction of its rail facilities, including tracks, rail stations, tactile warning strips, vehicular and pedestrian gates (both arm and swing), regulatory and operational signs within Metro right-of-way, train detector loops and conduits, low voltage communications between train loops and City\u2019s traffic signal controller cabinet, fencing and landscaping along the Metro right-of-way.", "City Maintenance Responsibilities", "In accordance with applicable law and City policy and practice, the City would be responsible for maintenance, repair and reconstruction of City facilities, including curbs, gutters and sidewalks, streets, and of City-controlled sidewalk areas adjacent to the light rail (excluding any Metro Structure as well as pavement or other types of walking or rail crossing driving surfaces between tracks), City streetlights, related circuits, and other equipment within the City right-of-way and adjacent to the light rail.", "Metro Track Allocation", "The City would be responsible for obtaining Track Allocation permits from Metro prior to performing any non-routine maintenance or repair work that may intrude into Metro tracks as required in the MOU. The City would not be required to obtain a Track Allocation permit for the routine operations of the City, including its normal and customary operations and maintenance upon the public right of way or other City owned or controlled property, as well as trash pickup, street and sidewalk maintenance. Emergency work would also be excluded from the Track Allocation permit process. If emergency maintenance or repair work is required, the City would notify Metro as soon as possible with as much notice as is reasonably practical under the circumstances.", "Training", "Metro would provide training and instruction to key City personnel and contractors, as appropriate, for safety related purposes.", "Permits", "The City would advise third parties that perform work within or adjacent to Metro\u2019s rail line that the work may require Metro to give its written permission as to time, place, and manner of such work, and may be subject to Metro\u2019s Track Allocation permit process.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Costs associated with City Maintenance Responsibilities are included in the FY 2016-17 Adopted Budget. Budget authority for subsequent years will be requested in each budget cycle for Council approval. Costs associated with Metro Maintenance Responsibilities will be paid by Metro."]}, {"Title": "City Services Building Program Change", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Agreement #10051 (CCS), in the amount not to exceed $1,692,480 (including 10% contingency), with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company, a California-based company, for design services associated with program changes and additional services required for the project. This will result in an amended Guaranteed Maximum Price agreement for design with a new total amount not to exceed $8,756,981. Staff will return to Council with a Guaranteed Maximum Price amendment for construction. 2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "City staff has identified the need to expand the design services to include adjustments to the City Services Building program, provide technical design services to move the City\u2019s Traffic Management Center to the building, modify the courtyard circulation, design additional environmental systems for the pasteurization of waste materials produced in the building and to provide an additional CEQA historic resources technical report for the project. Additionally, staff has identified the need to increase the scope of work for the design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company to include design-build services for tenant improvements in the south wing of City Hall necessitated by the City Services Building construction and for the design of essential fire and life safety alterations to the City Hall as required by code officials. A new roof and HVAC systems for the south wing of the building are also required for pursuit of a sufficient solar array and suitable water collection for the City Services Building, and need to be added to this scope of work. This is for a first modification to an existing design-build contract to provide additional professional design services for the City Services Building project. The project construction cost of $74,566,130 provided to Council on May 24, 2016 for the remaining work is increased by $238,599 (including a 10% contingency) for the programmatic scope changes, making the new total $74,804,729. The remainder of the design costs outlined in this report were anticipated to be expended at the time of bond issuance, but must be done sooner to keep the project timeline on track.", "Background", "On March 27, 2012 (Attachment A), Council authorized staff to select a design consultant to provide initial design feasibility analysis and cost estimation services for the City Services Building. A City Services Building was part of the Civic Center Specific Plan and has long been needed in order to eliminate expensive offsite leased space and coalesce city services in one location.", "On April 8, 2014 (Attachment B), Council authorized staff to execute an agreement with design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (including design firm Frederick Fisher and Partners Architects), for initial design, cost estimation services, and feasibility analysis for the City Services Building in an amount not to exceed $258,500.", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment C), Council reviewed and provided comments on the feasibility analysis, concept design and financial options for the City Services Building and authorized the design services phase for an approximately 50,000 square foot building, with three stories above grade and a basement level. Additionally, Council directed the project team to pursue the Living Building Challenge, internationally the most rigorous and ambitious environmental performance standard for buildings (more information can be found at <http://living-future.org>).", "On April 28, 2015 (Attachment D), Council authorized the City Manager to execute a design-build contract with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for a Guaranteed Maximum Price for design services for the City Services Building of $7,064,501 and to authorize direct owners costs associated with the design phase in the amount of $540,000. Because this is a design-build project, more technical consultants participate in the design phase resulting in an integrated design and cost savings in the construction phase.", "May 24, 2016 (Attachment E), Council reviewed and commented on the schematic design and cost estimates for the City Services Building, and directed staff to proceed with design development that endeavors to achieve Living Building Challenge certification for a project cost of $74,566,130 for the remaining work.", "Discussion", "Staff recommends that the current agreement #10051 with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for design-build services for the City Services Building be amended to include the proposed program changes for the City Services Building, to provide technical design services for the relocation of the Traffic Management Center and to provide design services of an environmental system that will pasteurize compost waste material in the City Services Building, and that the design-build team provide a required historic resources technical report as a CEQA support document for the project. Additionally, staff recommends that the design-build services for City Hall south wing tenant improvements, which are necessitated as a result of the City Services Building construction, along with HVAC systems and roof adaptations to provide essential fire and life safety alterations to the City Hall be added to the project scope. The degree to which City Hall was going to be affected by the City Services Building was unknown until the parameters and requirements were developed.", "City Services Building Design", "Design services for the City Services Building include program change, traffic management center relocation, environmental systems, courtyard design changes and CEQA requirements.", "City Services Building Program Change: Technology has reshaped the way work is done and the new building will reflect the potential for more efficient and collaborative workspace. We are committed to accelerate the digital transformation for City staff operations. The original contracted building program requirements for the City Services Building are recommended to be adjusted to convert private offices for division managers and department heads to shared workspaces available for use by all staff. This will create options for more formal and informal collaborative conference spaces and office spaces for focused work and meetings. This also creates more flexible work space better accommodating staff fluctuations. By providing more open spaces through the elimination of dedicated offices and providing natural light and air available to all workspaces, these program changes further contribute to the project by satisfying the requirements of the International Living Future Institute\u2019s Living Building Challenge certification.", "The proposed open working environment represents a change in working culture at the City and is in keeping with a trend of Workplace Transformation in offices across the country. The City is planning a change management effort and a digital transformation process to begin soon in order to shift more towards the use of mobile technology with a focus on collaboration and teamwork. A variety of workspaces have been planned within the City Services Building to accommodate different working styles including open flexible workspaces, break rooms and break out areas and a collection of small, medium and large spaces that can be utilized for quiet work or meetings. As staff becomes more mobile using laptops and tablets, the ability to work not only at an assigned workstation but throughout the building in one of more than 30 other locations will become the norm.", "Representatives from each staff division, called Liaisons, have been identified to collect and disseminate information regarding the project. A series of meetings have been, and will continue to be, held to review the project throughout the project development.", "Approximately 58% of the original building design is affected mid-project in the Design Development phase by this program change which results in an increase in design services fees of $238,599 (including a 10% contingency). Refer to Exhibit 1 for additional details. This is the sole design cost being proposed that is additional to the original scope of work brought to Council on May 24, 2016.The remainder of the design costs outlined in this report were anticipated to be expended at the time of bond issuance, but must be done sooner to keep the project timeline on track.", "Traffic Management Center: The existing Traffic Management Center located in the City Hall will be relocated to the City Services Building. The Owner\u2019s Project Requirements (OPR) did not identify this element in the original contracted program. City staff recommends that the design-build team provide technical design services to identify the existing equipment and provide design for the relocation of this important project element. The cost of this design work is $8,084 (including a 10% contingency).", "Environmental Systems for pasteurization of waste material in the City Services Building: Staff recommends that the design-build team provide design services for systems to pasteurize the compost that will be a by-product of the foam-flushing/composting toilets that are an integral component of the proposed methodology to achieve net-zero water in the building. The Bullitt Center in Seattle, which is an LBC certified building, transports their compost to a remote facility to complete the pasteurization process. City staff recommends that the design-build team provide design solutions to pasteurize the compost on site, in the basement, resulting in a greener solution. The design for these systems will determine whether this waste material may be sanitized and turned into a tested compost by-product that may be utilized in the landscape on site. The cost of this design work is $41,705 (including a 10% contingency.)", "Design change for courtyard ISD door (to room 105) to be replaced by a historic replica window: Due to the placement of the City Services Building, loading access to the Information Systems Department would require adjustment. In the future, ISD materials would be able to be delivered through the City Hall north loading area and into room 105. The ISD division would be accessed from within City Hall, which would be a more secure condition. The courtyard circulation and design has shown that the ISD door should be restored to a window per the historic fa\u00e7ade. The cost for this design work is $18,041 (including a 10% contingency.)", "CEQA Historic Resources Technical Report: As part of the regulatory process, the design-build team\u2019s historic preservation consultant was asked to prepare a formal analysis of the proposed project to identify potential impacts according to CEQA requirements. The cost of this report is $17,545 (including a 10% contingency.)", "City Hall Improvements", "As a general rule, competitive bidding for public entities is a mandatory requirement as provided by statute, charter or ordinance. However, there are certain well recognized exceptions to said rule. One exception is where the nature of the subject of the contract is such that competitive proposals would be unavailing or would not produce an advantage, and the advertisement for competitive bid would thus be undesirable, impractical, or impossible. The City Services Building design contract was let after a competitive RFP process. The construction of the City Services Building necessitates work in the existing City Hall building to which it adjoins. Exiting requirements, fire and life safety requirements and staff relocation requirements result in work that also must be perfectly coordinated with the City Services building. This work in City Hall is so intertwined with the City Services Building, for instance the exiting requirements that involve both buildings as one entity and fire protection requirements that involve the interface construction between the old and the new, that bringing in another design-build team to handle the work in City Hall would add time and cost to the project. A separate team would have a steep learning curve, and the coordination of the two scopes of work would be difficult, creating significant cost, time delay, and potential design liability issues to the extent that professional accountability may be difficult to allocate with two designers involved instead of one. The time required for competitive bidding would also likely jeopardize the financing schedule to issue bonds for this project. It was therefore determined that the City Hall scope should be added to the City Services Building scope, modifying the contract of the existing design-build team. It is anticipated that this added scope is less than ten percent of the overall cost of the project and will ultimately produce the best advantage for the City.", "City Hall South Wing Tenant Improvements: City staff recommends parity of the design and construction details for the City Services Building for the design for the tenant improvements for the south wing of City Hall. The impetus for this request is because both the design concept and the scope of construction services for this multi-faceted project is highly integrated with the construction of the City Services Building. The timing of this work is critical to make way for the construction of the City Services Building and to ensure that staff relocations are coordinated. Note that the first phase of the City Services Building construction project includes the design and construction of a new main fire sprinkler water service to provide water for sprinkler systems for the entire City Hall. This sprinkler system will be continued in the design and construction of new sprinklers located throughout this south wing tenant improvements project resulting in the need for the two projects to be well integrated. Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company estimates $951,273 (including a 10% contingency) to provide design services for the approximately 14,200 SF project as detailed in Exhibit 2.", "Fire and life safety City Hall adjustments: The Fire Chief and the Building Officer for the City of Santa Monica have reviewed the project and have determined that a new fire sprinkler connection must be installed in order to begin the long term process of installing sprinklers in City Hall. As a part of this project, fire hose connections will be installed in the City Hall lobby on each floor to assist fire fighters in the event of fire. Sprinklers will be installed in future tenant improvements as they become funded. The exiting study for the City Hall complex (consisting of the City Services Building and The City Hall combined) indicate that an added exit from the courtyard will be required. The City Hall\u2019s first floor north exit corridor will require modifications to create a fire passageway. The cost is $57,756 (including a 10% contingency) to provide design services for these City Hall adjustments.", "Facilities Funded Added Maintenance Scope: Because of the City Services Building\u2019s pursuit of Net Zero Energy, there is an enormous requirement of photovoltaic panels. In order to prepare for this, City Hall\u2019s existing antiquated HVAC units need to be removed and replaced by more efficient units. The roofing material needs to be replaced with material appropriate for water re-use. The HVAC systems on the south wing had been previously identified for replacement and include systems for the City Hall Chambers and room 214 Planning Administration. The design for this work is intertwined with the design and construction of the south wing tenant improvements. These would be funded through the Facilities Maintenance budget. The cost is $359,477 (including a 10% contingency) to provide design services.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for additional professional and design services is for an amount not to exceed $1,692,480 (including a 10% contingency), for an amended agreement total not to exceed $8,756,981. Funds in the amount of $359,477 are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. Award of the agreement modification requires the following budget actions:", "1) Appropriate $1,333,003 to account C014083.589000 (City Services Building); and", "2) Release of fund balance from reserve account 1.380246 (Capital Improvement Program savings) of $1,333,003.", "The agreement modification will be charged to the following accounts:", "M010085.589000  $359,477", "C014083.589000  $1,333,003", "Total  $1,692,480", "Construction of the City Services Building and associated tenant improvements to the existing City Hall building are proposed to be financed with a lease revenue bond for approximately $75 million. The debt service payments would be partially covered from what the City would have otherwise paid in rent at other facilities, and the difference would be diverted from the General Fund CIP allocation annually (currently estimated to reduce available CIP funding by approximately $3.4 million initially and decreasing thereafter). The CIP budget allocation will impact future biennial CIP budget cycles. Over time, the building would generate lease savings that, along with utility savings, would eventually exceed the cost of annual debt service and provide long-term savings to the City. The building debt would be retired in 30 years while the building is designed with a useful life of 150 years.  Staff will return to Council to seek approval of bond", "issuance and authorization for a guaranteed maximum price for construction."]}, {"Title": "Safe Routes to School Program Encouragement & Education Contract Award", "Department": "Strategic & Transportation Planning (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #88 to Alta Planning + Design, Inc., a Los Angeles based company for grant-funded Safe Routes to School Program Encouragement and Education; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Alta Planning + Design, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $450,000 over a 2-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica aims to expand the reach of the Safe Routes to School (SRTS) program by providing a series of encouragement and education activities to five elementary schools: John Muir Elementary School, Santa Monica Alternative Schoolhouse (SMASH), Franklin Elementary School, McKinley Elementary School, and Edison Language Academy. These schools were not included in the City\u2019s initial 2012-2013 SRTS Pilot program. Encouragement and Education programs catalyze desired outcomes around walking and biking behavior, and complement physical changes in the public right-of-way.", "This project is designed to provide \u201cshelf ready\u201d products and tools that can be easily used to educate students and inform parents about walking and biking to school. It will continue successful encouragement programs like Kidical Mass and Bike It! Walk It!, and complete walking and biking assessments at each school campus. Efforts include strengthening the relationship with student families to help ensure program sustainability. This project is funded by the State of California Active Transportation Program (ATP) and would take place over the course of the 2016-17 and 2017-18 school years. Grant funds in the amount of $450,000 will pay for consultant services and select incentives, and project management will be provided by City staff. The recommended team of Alta Planning + Design, Inc. will be required to meet the grant requirements and provide minimum services consistent with the ATP funding agreement with Caltrans.", "Background", "In July 2005, Congress passed federal legislation that established a National Safe Routes to School (SRTS) Program to address the lack of walking and biking to school. At its core, the SRTS Program empowers communities to make walking and bicycling to school a safe and routine activity. Safe Routes to School includes a wide variety of programs and projects, from building safer street crossings to establishing programs that encourage children and their parents to walk and bicycle safely to school.", "Locally, students, parents and school administrators have expressed support for increased bicycling and walking to Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (District) schools. The Santa Monica High School Solar Alliance first initiated Bike It! Walk It! Day in 2007.", "The City has received over $2.1 million in Safe Routes to School (SRTS) grants. The majority of the grant funds ($1.3 million) pay for infrastructure. In addition to grant funds, the City has appropriated approximately $140,000 in General Funds to support the SRTS program.", "In July 2012 (Attachment A), the City successfully obtained two operating grants totaling $328,000 to fund a comprehensive Safe Routes to School (SRTS) Phase I Pilot program. With the support of the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD), the grant-funded Phase I pilot program focused on two elementary schools (Will Rogers Learning Community and Roosevelt Elementary School) and two middle schools (John Adams Middle School and Lincoln Middle School). The program concluded in September 2013.", "On July 28, 2015 (Attachment B), the City accepted a grant awarded in the amount of $450,000 to build upon the growth and success of the SRTS program by creating tools that can be easily used by future stakeholders, as well as provide a series of education and encouragement activities at five elementary schools which were not included in the City\u2019s initial Pilot program.", "Discussion", "Over the course of expanding and refining the Safe Routes to School program, the City has developed a network of partners among the District, schools and Parent-Teacher Association that help to facilitate the implementation of SRTS. Events like Bike It! Walk It!, Kidical Mass, bike skills and safety trainings, and the Family Bike Hub have become core parts of the annual offerings after having been tested and found to be highly successful. Many of these elements were tested during the 2012-13 SRTS Pilot Program. This project will build on the success and lessons learned throughout the program and move the Safe Routes to School program towards an even greater level of sustainability.  Another major component will be conducting targeting education activities at those Elementary schools not included in Phase I (aka the Pilot) which are; McKinley, Grant, Muir, S.M.A.S.H., and Franklin. Walk audits will also be completed at each of these schools to ensure all school sites in SMMUSD have a plan to improve conditions for children who walk, bike, skate, to school.", "This project seeks to further facilitate change in behavior among school children and their parents to increase walking and biking to school, an objective of the City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), Bike Action Plan (BAP), and Pedestrian Action Plan. While momentum of the program has sustained over the years, additional resources are needed to focus on the schools not included in the pilot, have evaluation data for 100% of SMMUSD schools, and to establish institutional responsibilities. This will further raise awareness of the benefits of active transportation to school and continue building support to solidify SRTS stakeholder partnerships.", "The Project is intended to enhance safety through education, training and encouragement and does not involve the construction of infrastructure improvements. Bicycle and street safety training will be provided to schoolchildren, at the previously mentioned five targeted schools and other community events. All planned activities coincide with the parameters of Caltrans\u2019 Active Transportation Program funding.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On September 19, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Safe Routes to School Program Encouragement and Education. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 308 vendors were notified, 20 vendors downloaded the RFP.  3 firms responded. (Alta Planning + Design, Nelson Nygaard, and Walk \u2018N Rollers). Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Mobility and Community Cultural Affairs. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, stakeholder engagement/outreach strategy, ability to meet work plan/timelines, quality control, cost of services/cost control, references, and creativity/flexibility. Based on the criteria, Alta Planning + Design, Inc. is the best qualified firm.", "Alta Planning + Design offers over 20 years of experience as a firm leading Safe Routes to School Projects. They were the lead consultant for Southern California based Safe Routes to School projects such as: Los Angeles, Pasadena, Pico Rivera, Santa Clarita and dozens of other educational and encouragement program efforts targeted at elementary school students. Particularly this firm\u2019s familiarity with Santa Monica, experience of a consolidated project team, and thorough/ refined nature of proposal makes Alta the apparent choice.", "Next Steps", "Following execution of the agreement with Alta Planning + Design, Inc. the consultant will prepare a plan of action and schedule for implementing educational and encouragement activities for the 2016-17 and 2017-18 school years.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Alta Planning + Design, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $450,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The contract will be charged to account 20267.570410. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Airport Lease Approval with TaskUs, LLC", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Council 1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Lease with TaskUs, LLC, a California Limited Liability Corporation, (TaskUs) for office spaces located at 3221 and 3233 Donald Douglas Loop South, reflecting the general terms and conditions in the staff report; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with the recently adopted Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Leasing Policy (Attachment A), the City is moving forward with leasing city-owned properties. The City owns the building at 3233 Donald Douglas Loop South and 3221 Donald Douglas Loop South, which currently houses Typhoon Restaurant, Inc. (Typhoon) which will vacate the property on December 31, 2016. The proposed lease with TaskUs is for general office use including a total of 6,193 rentable square feet of space located at 3221 Donald Douglas Loop South and 3233 Donald Douglas Loop South, Suite C. Additionally, approximately 1,570 square feet of shared space would be permitted to be used by the tenant on a non-exclusive basis (Sky Deck).", "The proposed lease agreement with TaskUs is for a period of five years, with an option for an additional five year period. The base rent at full occupancy is at fair market value and begins at $19,050.75 per month. The lease includes an annual escalator of 3%.", "Background", "Typhoon has been located at 3221 Donald Douglas Loop South since 1990. On June 30, 2015, all Airport leases expired, including the lease for Typhoon. Since then Typhoon has been operating under a holdover agreement.", "On July 14, 2015 (Attachment B), the City Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Typhoon for a term not to exceed June 30, 2018. Negotiations were unsuccessful due to the short lease term, which was deemed unfeasible by Typhoon.", "On April 26, 2016, staff presented to the City Council the outline of a potential lease agreement with Typhoon during Closed Session. On May 11, 2016, Commercial Realty Group (the City\u2019s broker for Airport property) notified staff that it had an offer from Typhoon to lease the subject property on terms and conditions that were consistent with the information provided to City Council during the April 26 Closed Session.", "The proposed lease with Typhoon was for a full service restaurant with live entertainment. Negotiations continued with Typhoon from May until August. The outline of the agreement was as follows: a lease term of five years with an option to renew for an additional five years after the initial term expired. The rent rate, based on square footage, was determined using fair market value. The City also provided a reasonable tenant improvement package in order to encourage Typhoon to revitalize and modernize the restaurant space. Negotiations were successful and in early August 2016 both sides reached a verbal agreement. However, shortly thereafter, Typhoon management had an apparent change of mind and decided not to sign the Letter of Intent. Staff also discovered at that time that Typhoon was attempting to sell its business to another restaurant. On September 2, 2016, Typhoon withdrew from further negotiations and its offer to lease the premises and served notice to vacate the property by December 31, 2016. The City accepted the notice.", "TaskUs has been a tenant at the Santa Monica Airport since January 1, 2011 in various locations, and most recently as a tenant at 3233 Donald Douglas Loop South, units C and D. TaskUs provides cloud-based digital customer services. TaskUs is currently poised to expand its services and staff, and seeks additional office space. TaskUs made an offer to the City to occupy the premises previously leased by Typhoon.", "Discussion", "On September 15, 2016, Commercial Realty Group (CRG) notified staff that it had an offer from TaskUs to lease the subject property which includes the entire space occupied by Typhoon as well as one of the office suites currently occupied by TaskUs. The proposed lease with TaskUs is for 6,193 total square feet for general office use. The proposed lease would be for a term not to exceed five years with a monthly rental rate of $19,050.75 per month to be adjusted annually by 3%. This proposal includes an option to renew for an additional five years at fair market value for similar quality space in the Santa Monica commercial office market.", "Additionally, the City would authorize a tenant improvement credit in the amount of up to six months rent for the entire leasehold and an additional two months rent for the 3221 Donald Douglas Loop South premises for a total rent credit of $140,564.50 following the tenant\u2019s completion of tenant improvements within the premises. Tenant must complete the tenant improvements within the first 12 months of the lease in order to receive the tenant improvement credit.", "It should be noted that the subject building space at 3221 Donald Douglas Loop South is currently operated as Typhoon restaurant. The change in use requires extensive tenant improvements to the interior space. There is also a need to conduct tenant improvements to the 3233 Donald Douglas Loop South Suite C space that TaskUs currently occupies. Although TaskUs would modify the building with interior tenant improvements, TaskUs does not propose to expand the building. TaskUs would employ approximately 50 workers on site. Therefore, it should be noted that TaskUs would be subject to the transportation demand management (TDM) requirements of the City. TaskUs would be required to comply with all city building code regulations, planning standards, and any applicable FAA regulations, as a condition of the lease. The lease is consistent with the terms of the voter-approved Measure LC passed in 2014 and it conforms to the City\u2019s Airport leasing policy approved by Council during their March 22, 2016 meeting to regulate future use of SMO property.  Additionally, TaskUs is subject to all terms and conditions required by the standard lease agreement including labor peace provisions.", "Annual rent paid by TaskUs to the City would be between $228,609 for year one and $257,301 for year five, before tenant improvement credits. The proposed rent reflects market price. Securing this tenant helps ensure the Airport Fund\u2019s financial self-sufficiency and allows it to repay its debt obligation to the City.", "Commencement Date: Upon execution of lease document or January 1, 2017, whichever comes later.", "Term Ends: 60 months from the date of lease execution, slated for Dec 31, 2021.", "Options:  Option to renew for an additional five years at fair market value for similar quality space in the Santa Monica commercial office market.", "Base Rental Rate:  $19,050.75/Month/ Modified Gross ($3.08 PSF) Year One", "As broken down below:  3233 Donald Douglas Loop South Unit C: 2,153 Square Feet @ $5,920.75/ Month ($2.75 PSF) Modified Gross", "3221 Donald Douglas Loop South 4,040 Square Feet @ $13,130/Month ($3.25 PSF) Modified Gross", "Escalations: 3% per year starting at the anniversary of the execution date of the lease.", "Tenant Improvement", "Allowance:  Tenant improvement credit in the amount of up to six months\u2019 rent for the entire leasehold and additional two months for 3221 Donald Douglas Loop South premises for a total rent credit of $140,564.50 following the tenant\u2019s completion of tenant improvements within the premises. Tenant must complete the tenant improvements within the first 12 months of the lease in order to receive the tenant improvement credit.", "Parking: Tenant shall be able to utilize parking on an un-reserved basis at the building at a parking ratio of 2 spaces for every 1,000 square feet occupied by Tenant (approx. 16 spaces). Initially, Landlord shall not charge for parking, however Landlord shall have the ability to charge $150 per space per month for any parked cars above and beyond the ratio referenced above.", "Real Estate Commission", "A real estate commission fee of $21,463 based on 2% of the value of the total five-year lease term, would be due to Corporate Realty Group (CRG) upon execution of the proposed lease agreement.", "It should be noted that if TaskUs exercises its option to renew for an additional five-year lease at fair market value, the City would have a future commission obligation to CRG. This obligation would be based on 1.5% of the value of the total lease term for year six through year ten.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The recommended lease with TaskUs, LLC would generate an estimated $114,305  (base monthly rent x 6 months) in Airport revenues for FY2016-17 at account 33431.402120, if the lease is executed on January 1, 2017. FY 2016-17 revenue budget assumed a lower lease amount from the property due to the month to month Hold Over lease, the new lease is estimated to increase revenue by $45,398. Revenue account 33431.402120 should be increased by $45,398 for FY 2016-17 budget."]}, {"Title": "Redevelopment Successor Agency Last and Final Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency adopt the resolution approving the Agency\u2019s Last and Final Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule (ROPS) and administrative budgets for July 1, 2017 through December 31, 2042.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Preparation of a Last and Final Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule (ROPS) likely represents the final chapter in the process of dissolving Santa Monica's former redevelopment agency. Pursuant to state laws that dissolved all local redevelopment agencies in 2012, the City has completed a series of steps over the past five years that have resulted in the City's eligibility for a final ROPS. The steps include successfully completing several public improvements and affordable housing loans funded by the former agency, achieving state approval of semi-annual and annual ROPS, negotiating with the state regarding available balances in the former agency's housing and non-housing funds, and completing a state audit of transfers between the former agency and City. In the past year, pursuant to changes in state law that were diligently negotiated by Assembly member Bloom on the City's behalf, several loans from the City to the former agency were approved by the state for repayment, resulting in the expected return of an estimated $72 million to the City over the next seven or eight years. Council elected to use the loan repayment funds to support affordable housing needs in Santa Monica. If the Last and Final ROPS is approved by the local oversight board and the state, it would provide a long-term guarantee that all former agency obligations would be paid through 2042.", "Background", "As a result of AB 26, the City\u2019s Redevelopment Agency dissolved on February1,2012 and the City became the entity designated to implement the dissolution and management of the former Redevelopment Agency\u2019s assets and housing functions. Since then, the Redevelopment Successor Agency (Agency) has worked with the California Department of Finance (DOF) and taken steps towards repayment of all outstanding Agency indebtedness and winding-down of the Agency\u2019s activities.", "Under SB 107, the Agency may prepare a last and final recognized obligation payment schedule (Last and Final ROPS) once the Agency has received a \u201cFinding of Completion\u201d from the DOF and has met other Health and Safety Code criteria. AFinding of Completion is a formal determination made by the DOF that the Agency has satisfied its financial obligations under State law as specified in Health and Safety Code section 34179.7 and is one of the steps required to submit a Last and Final ROPS. The Last and Final ROPS lists all annual payments for remaining enforceable obligations.  Beginning on January1, 2016, qualifying agencies meeting requirements of Health and Safety Code section 34191.6 (a) were eligible to submit an Oversight Board-approved Last and Final ROPS, which identifies all of the former Redevelopment Agency\u2019s remaining enforceable obligations and sources of payment for those obligations. Once approved by the Oversight Board, the Agency must submit the approved Last and Final ROPS to the DOF and Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller for all enforceable obligation payments through the period ending December 31, 2042, which is when the last scheduled payment is expected to occur.", "Discussion", "Staff has prepared the Last and Final ROPS and corresponding administrative budgets for the period covering July 1, 2017 to December 31, 2042, including legally binding and enforceable obligations in the following categories:", "1) Bond payments,", "2) Indebtedness obligations (including loans),", "3) Contracts necessary for continued administration or operation of Agency, and", "4) Agency administrative cost allowance.", "To qualify to submit a Last and Final ROPS, the Agency must meet certain conditions, including receipt of a Finding of Completion, as well as listing of all enforceable obligations on a previous ROPS with approval by the DOF. The DOF has issued a Finding of Completion to the Agency and has previously approved all obligations listed on the draft Last and Final ROPS.", "A primary advantage of securing an approved Last and Final ROPS is no further requirement to prepare an annual ROPS to be reviewed and approved by the Oversight Board and DOF, as all enforceable obligations and sources of payment are detailed in the Last and Final ROPS (see Attachment A). The City also would benefit from a higher interest rate of four percent (versus three percent currently earned) on City-Agency loan balances payable to theCity. Once approved, the Agency may submit no more than two requests to the DOF to amend the Last and Final ROPS and the amendments must be reviewed and approved by the Oversight Board prior to submittal to the DOF.", "In March 2011, the Redevelopment Agency entered into a credit agreement with Wells Fargo Bank and borrowed $60 million to be used for the purpose of aiding in the construction of parks and public facilities within or of benefit to the project areas. Theproposed ROPS seeks prepayment of the loan during the first period (July 2017 through December 2017) of the Last and Final ROPS. At that time, approximately $12.8 million of the Wells Fargo loan principal will be outstanding.The loan can be prepaid at any time without penalty. The prepayment of the loan would result in estimated savings of approximately $192,000 in future interest costs.Per State law, the savings would be apportioned between the various taxing entities within the project area, including theCity.", "Under AB 26 and SB 107, the Agency may receive an administrative cost allowance of up to three percent of the property tax allocated to the Agency in the preceding fiscalyear. The DOF also has the authority to deny any administrative cost allowance based on the reasonableness of the estimated administrative costs incurred by theAgency. The amounts of property taxes allocated to the Agency are based on an approved ROPS during each annual period, commencing on July 1, 2017 and ending on December 31, 2042. The cumulative administrative cost allowances for all remaining terms equals approximately $563,000 and are included as enforceable obligations on the Last and Final ROPS (see Attachment B).", "Each annual administrative budget has been calculated based on estimated actual administrative costs for the remaining life of all enforceable obligations. Theadministrative cost allowances authorized under the Last and Final ROPS are intended to reimburse the Agency for expenses associated with implementing the Agency\u2019s duties under AB 26, AB 1484, and SB 107.", "Under SB 107, the DOF has 100 days to review and approve the Last and Final ROPS.", "A final decision regarding the Last and Final ROPS may not occur until after February1,2017, which is past the deadline for the Agency to submit an annual ROPS for fiscal year 2017-18. If the DOF denies the Last and Final ROPS, the Agency risks forfeiting Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Funds (RPTTF) for fiscal year 2017-18. Therefore, as a safeguard staff recommends that the Agency submit a ROPS and administrative budget for July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018 (ROPS 17-18) in early 2017.  If the Last and Final ROPS is approved by the DOF prior to February 1, 2017, preparation of the ROPS 2017-18 will be unnecessary.", "Next Steps", "In accordance with AB 1484 and SB 107, staff will forward the Agency-approved Last and Final ROPS to the Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller for review after approval by Oversight Board. Copies of the Last and Final ROPS, as approved by the Oversight Board, must be sent to the State Controller\u2019s Office and the DOF no later than November 15, 2016 and posted on the Agency\u2019s website. The DOF must make its determination on the Last and Final ROPS within 100 days from the submission date.", "#0", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Each June 1st and January 2nd through December 2042, the Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller will transfer property taxes into the Agency\u2019s cash account from which the Agency will pay enforceable obligations listed on the approved Last and Final ROPS. The Agency has already transferred approximately $12.2 million in unspent Wells Fargo loan proceeds to the Agency\u2019s cash account to prepay the loan. The loan balance of approximately $608,000 would be funded by RPTTF during the first period of the Last and Final ROPS.", "There are no other budgetary impacts associated with the adoption of the resolutions approving the Last and Final ROPS and administrative budgets. The Last and Final ROPS simply sets forth the Agency\u2019s existing financial obligations and administrative costs for the periods beginning July 1, 2017 through December 31, 2042."]}], [{"Title": "Vacant Property Study Session", "Department": "Code Enforcement (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review options available to City Staff;2. Provide policy guidance on the code modifications; and3. Direct staff to proceed with modifications to existing code.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its May 10, 2016 meeting, Council requested that staff return with proposals for the regulation of vacant buildings in Santa Monica, including proposals for registering vacant buildings, regulating the maintenance of vacant buildings, and requiring that the owners of buildings with valid permits for rehabilitation, repair, or construction of a building complete the work within a specified time certain from the date the permit was issued. Council also asked staff to review the Vacant Property Ordinance for the City of San Francisco.", "Staff conducted a field assessment of vacant commercial and residential buildings within city limits, researched city records of these vacant properties and conducted an analysis of vacant building and property maintenance ordinances of other California cities. Staff determined that there are currently 29 vacant properties, not including properties that are vacant due to active construction or vacant properties that are being offered for sale or lease and have no nuisance violations.", "After reviewing the options available to the City, staff concluded that it was necessary to conduct a study session with City Council to put forth a recommended action, provide available alternatives, and return to City Council with a proposed amendment to the existing code, if directed.", "Staff\u2019s recommendation is an amendment to SMMC 8.96 \u2013 Abatement of Public Nuisances to include additional violations related to vacant buildings, including but not limited to issues that are commonly associated with vacant and/or abandoned structures such as buildings left vacant and buildings left in a state of partial construction for an unreasonable period of time, and direct staff to return with a draft ordinance for consideration.", "Council could also consider these alternatives:", "\u00b7 Status Quo", "\u00b7 Establishing a Vacant Properties Registry", "Background", "At its May 10, 2016 meeting, Council directed staff to review the Vacant Property Registries of other cities, specifically San Francisco, with the purpose of determining whether or not such a registry would be appropriate to address vacant properties in the City of Santa Monica. Council asked staff to return with a recommendation that included alternative solutions for regulating vacant properties in Santa Monica.", "Existing Laws", "Both state and local law currently provides a substantial set of tools to remedy vacant properties that present safety concerns. However, such laws generally do not address issues related to aesthetics such as windows that have been boarded up. Under existing state and local law, a structure that is simply unoccupied (i.e. vacant) is not an illegal condition or a nuisance; rather, existing law addresses very specific conditions that exist on a property.", "Additionally, unoccupied properties with active construction are also not a violation of local law, even if the construction project leaves buildings in a state of partial construction for a very long period of time, as long as there are no nuisance, safety, or other code violations present.", "Local Laws:", "The City\u2019s Building Code outlines the requirements for the start and completion of construction (Attachment A). There is also authority in the Building Code to compel a responsible party to maintain buildings and structures, and parts thereof, in a safe and sanitary condition and maintain devices or safeguards that are required by the Building Code in conformance with the code under which it was installed (Attachment B).", "Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) section 7.44 \u2013 Weeds makes the presence of overgrowth or dead vegetation on the properties a nuisance condition.", "SMMC section 7.48.070 \u2013 Owner to maintain premises free of litter compels abatement of these conditions and makes the presence of junk, trash, or debris a nuisance, which includes the storage of furniture, appliances, or abandoned vehicles outdoors.", "For violations associated with unoccupied properties that are not covered under Chapter 7, staff takes enforcement action using SMMC 8.96 \u2013 Abatement of Nuisances. A list of what the City declares to be public nuisances can be found in SMMC 8.98.050 \u2013 Public Nuisances, included in Attachment C.", "State Laws:", "State law provides a stronger set of remedies for enforcing safety violations related to vacant structures.", "California Fire Code Section 311 \u2013 Vacant Premises provides the Santa Monica Fire Department (SMFD) with the authority to address vacant buildings that are unprotected and unsecured thereby allowing for the possibility (or existence of) illegal activities. Section 311 requires vacant buildings to be secured and protected, fire protection equipment be maintained, and even fenced and boarded if such measures are deemed necessary by SMFD to protect public safety. Similarly, the California Building Code authorizes the Building Official to take actions to protect public safety, up to and including demolition, if a vacant building presents imminent safety hazards, e.g. structure failure or collapse.", "Penal Code Section 372 provides that \u201cEvery person who maintains or commits any public nuisance . . . or who willfully omits to perform any legal duty relating to the removal of a public nuisance, is guilty of a misdemeanor.\u201d Penal Code Section 370 broadly defines \u201cpublic nuisance\u201d as \u201c[a]nything which is injurious to health, or is indecent, or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property by an entire community or neighborhood.\u201d California Courts have broadly interpreted this provision and have long held that properties that create dangerous conditions; disturb the public peace; or that unreasonably interfere with the community\u2019s enjoyment of peace, health, safety and convenience, constitute public nuisances. See, e.g., People v. Mason (1981) 124 Cal.App.3d 348 (excessive noise from a restaurant constituting public nuisance); San Diego County v. Carlstrom (1961) 196 Cal.App.2d 485; City of Bakersfield v. Miller (1966) 64 Cal.2d 93 (building and fire code violations constitute public nuisances); Miller v. Schoene (1928) 276 U.S. 272 (diseased trees are public nuisances); See People ex rel. Gallo v. Acuna (1997) 14 Cal.4th 1090, 1108-1109 (pervasive gang activities are public nuisances).", "Additionally, Health and Safety Code Sections 17960, 17980, 17980.6, 17980.7 and 17982 authorize the City to enforce the State housing and nuisance laws and seek the appointment of a receiver when a property owner fails to comply with an administrative enforcement order.", "While none of these state laws generally apply to aesthetics concerns, they provide very robust remedies to ensure that the public\u2019s health and safety are protected. The Santa Monica Police Department, Fire Department, Building and Safety Division and Code Enforcement Division, in cooperation with the City Attorney\u2019s Office, have had numerous successes in eliminating public nuisances using these state law remedies, and we remain confident that such remedies remain highly viable to protect public safety.", "More details regarding the existing state and local laws currently used to enforce violations commonly associated with vacant properties is included in this report as Attachment C.", "Discussion", "At its May 10, 2016 meeting, Council directed staff to review the Vacant Property Registries of other cities, specifically San Francisco, with the purpose of determining whether or not such a registry would be appropriate to address vacant properties in the City of Santa Monica.  Council asked staff to return with a recommendation that included alternative solutions for regulating vacant properties in Santa Monica", "Santa Monica law does not currently deem a vacant property in and of itself to be a violation of local law. Indeed, a property could be vacant for a number of innocuous reasons. For instance, a property owner may temporarily live overseas and may only return to his/her home here in Santa Monica infrequently, which results in the home being vacant through much of the year. This report focuses on nuisance conditions and other violations associated with vacant buildings, the authority granted to staff to address certain conditions, the limitations of authority in certain cases, and the options available for consideration.", "Types of Vacant Buildings", "The Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) does not specifically define what constitutes a vacant property. For the purposes of this study session, staff is not including vacant properties that have permitted active construction or are actively being offered for sale or lease, provided these properties are void of any nuisance conditions typically present when considering if the property has been abandoned or is a nuisance. However, properties that have active building permits but have not yet commenced construction are counted as vacant for purposes of this discussion.", "Although a building may be rendered vacant for the reasons outlined in the following list below, the building may still not violate any laws:", "\u00b7 abandonment;", "\u00b7 foreclosure;", "\u00b7 death of a property owner;", "\u00b7 a removal from the rental market pursuant to the Ellis Act;", "\u00b7 voluntary repair or rehabilitation;", "\u00b7 fire damage, or other unnatural cause", "\u00b7 natural disaster", "Types of Violations Associated with Vacant Buildings", "A building allowed to remain vacant does not in and of itself constitute a nuisance or a violation of any other laws. Complaints and concerns that staff receives from the public are typically regarding nuisance conditions that are commonly associated with vacant properties. Staff does not typically receive complaints from the public due to buildings merely being vacant.", "Common nuisance violations associated with vacant buildings include:", "\u00b7 miscellaneous junk, trash, and debris, appliance and other household items;", "\u00b7 abandoned or inoperable vehicles;", "\u00b7 inoperable/discarded household appliances;", "\u00b7 lumber and building materials except during construction operations; and", "\u00b7 access by unauthorized persons", "To address these concerns, Code Enforcement staff has used the local and state laws identified above to compel compliance with applicable codes to address some of the conditions that result from buildings sitting vacant for extended periods of time.", "As stated earlier, staff has been unable to compel responsible parties to eliminate some aesthetically blighted conditions through enforcement due to the absence of specific municipal codes to address these conditions. For example, Code Enforcement staff does not currently have the authority to take action against a property owner in cases where structures have been left in a state of partial construction, but the property is properly fenced, secured, maintained and does not otherwise pose any threat to public safety.", "Council has also expressed concern about the length of time a construction project is permitted to continue. Santa Monica Municipal Code 8.08.070 \u2013 Permit issuance, extension and renewal outlines the requirements for the start and completion of construction. This section states that building permits become null and void if:", "\u00b7 the building or work authorized by such permit is not started within 180 days from the date of permit issuance;", "\u00b7 the building or work authorized is suspended or abandoned at any time after the work has started, for a period of 180 days or more; or", "\u00b7 the time allowed to complete construction has been exceeded.", "The life of the permit varies from one to four years depending on the valuation of the construction project. An extension of time may be granted by the Building Official under certain circumstances, but the time set forth to complete construction may be extended no more than three times. Landmarks projects may be extended up to four times. Extensions of time are granted in 180-day increments.  Even if extensions are denied or all extensions are exhausted, the Municipal Code does not compel an owner to finish a project.", "Santa Monica\u2019s approach to permit extensions is in line with other local cities in that all allow for at least one extension of a building permit and possibly more with a justifiable reason.", "Santa Monica Vacant Building Inventory", "Code Enforcement staff conducted a field assessment of known vacant properties located within Santa Monica city limits. There are currently 29 vacant properties in the city known to staff. Included as Attachment D is a map that illustrates how these vacant properties are distributed throughout the city.", "Of the 29 vacant properties included in this analysis,", "\u00b7 15 are single family residences", "o 5 have been abandoned", "o 5 have permits to remodel or rebuild but construction has not commenced", "o 3 have constructions permits currently under review", "o 1 is vacant due to a fire", "o 1 is vacant due to the death of the property owner", "\u00b7 10 are multi-family residential properties", "o 6 have been vacated pursuant to the Ellis Act", "o 2 have been abandoned", "o 1 is vacant due to the death of the property owner", "o 1 is a delayed construction project", "\u00b7 3 are commercial properties", "o 2 have permits to remodel but construction has not commenced", "o 1 is a large development project under review", "\u00b7 1 is a mixed-use property with a permit to remodel, but construction has not commenced", "Of the 29 buildings currently vacant, only ten are vacant with no active project in the works or no Ellis withdrawal in process. Separately, there are 24 properties in Santa Monica that are pending Ellis Act removal and 34 properties that have been Ellised since 2011 that are in various stages of the waiting period.  Some of these properties could stand vacant for various periods of time in the future.", "Staff\u2019s analysis of the City\u2019s vacant buildings revealed varying degrees of maintenance. Staff has received 23 complaints over the past twelve months related to some of the vacant properties, including complaints about overgrown vegetation, weeds, debris, and trespassers. All 23 complaints have been investigated by Code Enforcement staff and enforcement action was taken when violations were discovered. In cases where vagrants and/or unauthorized persons have gained access to vacant properties, Code Enforcement staff works with SMPD to clear the property and with SMFD to secure the property.", "Staff received four complaints regarding vacant structures that alleged construction work without a required permit and were addressed through enforcement action using SMMC 8.08.050 \u2013 Permits required. Those cases were brought into compliance by compelling the responsible party to obtain all required construction permits and approvals.", "The Code Enforcement Division received a total of 3,160 complaints in the past twelve months. The 23 nuisance complaints related to vacant properties represent less than 1% of all complaints received by Code Enforcement.", "Case Examples", "3004 Broadway (Attachment E) has been in various stages of construction since 1996. Since then, 25 Code Enforcement cases have been opened for violations such as overgrown vegetation, weeds, trash and debris. These cases have been investigated and the violations either abated or unsubstantiated. Because the property is currently properly fenced, secured, maintained and does not otherwise pose any threat to public safety, no further enforcement actions are pending. Despite such, the Code Enforcement Division continues to receive intermittent complaints indicating that this unfinished building represents a visual blight.", "1512 Euclid (Attachment F) is an abandoned duplex with a history of complaints regarding overgrown vegetation and harboring vagrants. Through enforcement action, this property is currently secured and is not currently in violation of local law.", "Staff recently received complaints regarding the following \u201cvacant\u201d buildings in the city:", "900 Wilshire \u2013 Investigation revealed that 900 Wilshire is a commercial building not under any active construction. Immediately adjacent to 900 Wilshire sits a residential development under construction at 1211 9th St. (Attachment G). The adjacent property is not in violation of existing law and under the accepted definition of vacant properties is not included in this report as the construction is current and ongoing.", "1334 9th St. (Attachment G) \u2013 At the time staff received the most recent complaint, there were no existing nuisance violations on the property. A complaint received on 05/02/16 from SMPD revealed nuisance conditions on the property including discarded household items, abandoned/inoperable vehicles, and vagrants. Code Enforcement staff worked cooperatively with SMPD and the property owner representatives to address the conditions on the property using existing codes. The property owners worked with Code Enforcement and SMPD staff and removed all unauthorized persons from the property, boarded and secured the property, and removed all discarded household items and vehicles from the property. The property is currently void of any nuisance violations and the owners have obtained permits to remodel.", "1238-1242 10th St. (Attachment G) \u2013 At the time the most recent complaint was received there were no existing nuisance violations on the property. The property was undergoing permitted construction and was in compliance of all regulations except proper tenant notification of construction. The construction project was stopped by code staff until proper tenant notification was complete. The property owner\u2019s representative immediately complied and work commenced.", "1264 9th St. (Attachment G) - Property being vacated pursuant to the Ellis Act. No existing nuisance violations on the property.", "2318 Ocean Park Blvd \u2013 This property has been the subject of complaints about its blighted condition. The owner received a demolition permit in the summer of 2016 and the building is currently being demolished.", "The case examples of existing vacant properties in Santa Monica illustrate that while some vacant properties contain conditions that violate various sections of the municipal code, staff has addressed those issues through compliance efforts with existing statutes while other properties, considered eyesores by some neighbors, are not in violation of existing law.", "San Francisco\u2019s Vacant Property Registry", "Council asked staff to take a specific look at the vacant property registry adopted by the City of San Francisco in 2009. The ordinance (Attachment H) requires registration of vacant buildings, maintenance and securing of the exterior and interior of the vacant building and provides that a property in violation of the requirements is a public nuisance. Fire and liability insurance is also required of vacant and abandoned buildings.", "San Francisco defines a building as vacant or abandoned if it is:", "\u00b7 unoccupied and unsecured; or", "\u00b7 unoccupied and secured by boarding or other similar means; or", "\u00b7 unoccupied and unsafe as defined by their code; or", "\u00b7 unoccupied and has multiple code violations; or", "\u00b7 unoccupied for over 30 days", "A building in San Francisco is not considered vacant or abandoned if:", "\u00b7 There is a valid building permit for repair, rehabilitation, or construction of a building on the parcel and the owner completes the repair, rehabilitation, or construction within one year from the date the initial permit was issued; or", "\u00b7 The building complies with all codes, does not contribute to blight as defined, is ready for occupancy, and is actively being offered for sale, lease, or rent.", "Registration of a vacant and abandoned residential building in the City of San Francisco is required 30 days after it has become vacant or abandoned. Fees are due upon registration. Signs are required to be posted on registered properties that provide the name and contact information for the owner and owner\u2019s representative or the lender\u2019s name and contact information if the property has a notice of default or foreclosure recorded.", "Exterior maintenance requirements of vacant and abandoned buildings include:", "\u00b7 Landscaping and plant materials in good condition;", "\u00b7 Regular removal of exterior trash, debris, and graffiti;", "\u00b7 Exterior of the building in good condition that is structurally safe and preserves the physical integrity of the structure, including but not limited to paint and finishes, foundation, roof, chimneys, flues, gutters, downspouts, scuppers, flashing, skylights, windows, exterior stairs and decks;", "\u00b7 Prevention of criminal activity and trespass by unauthorized persons;", "\u00b7 Turning off utilities that are not necessary for the upkeep and maintenance of the building.", "Interior maintenance requirements of vacant buildings include:", "\u00b7 Preserving the interior of the building from damage by the elements or plumbing leaks, keeping it free from accumulation of garbage and other debris, and from infestation by rodents, insects, or other pests.", "Partially vacant commercial buildings in the City of San Francisco are covered under a separate ordinance No. 182-14. Under this ordinance, commercial buildings vacant for more than 30-days must be registered. Unlike vacant residential buildings, a fee is not required until 270 days after the commercial building has been registered.", "San Francisco\u2019s vacant property registry ordinance was adopted in 2009 in response to the housing crisis and continues to be actively enforced today. San Francisco currently has \u201cseveral hundred\u201d registered vacant structures and according to staff, the number is \u201csignificantly lower\u201d number than in years past.", "Santa Monica\u2019s Vacant Properties - Staff Recommendation", "Staff recommends that Council direct staff to bring back an amendment to SMMC 8.96 \u2013 Abatement of Nuisances that expands the types and scope of nuisance conditions deemed to be a violation of code and include violations for which Code Enforcement staff are currently not authorized to take enforcement action, such as:", "\u00b7 Residential or commercial buildings left in a state of incomplete construction, for a period of 12 months (excluding such time when work is in progress pursuant to a valid building or other construction permit)", "The City of Santa Monica Municipal Code does not currently authorize enforcement against a building that has been left in a state of partial construction for a long period of time and there are limited options to address aesthetics complaints made against such buildings, especially when conditions on the property do not pose any life safety hazard. Amending local law to preclude such long periods of unfinished construction would allow staff to compel an owner of a vacant building to resume abandoned/significantly delayed construction activity in a reasonable period of time.", "While state law authorizes the Fire Department to order boarding and securing, that authority is not available to Code Enforcement staff. Staff recommends amending local law to grant this authority to the Code Enforcement Division so that existing City enforcement staff can be available to address this concern.", "The advantages to amending the existing nuisance code include:", "\u00b7 Minimal staff time and resources to draft ordinance", "\u00b7 Reduces the need for potential additional staff resources", "\u00b7 Has the potential to address some of the community\u2019s aesthetics concerns related to construction projects that have not been completed", "The disadvantages to amending the existing nuisance code include:", "\u00b7 Besides partially completed construction, aesthetics judgements can be difficult to make objectively. This can make enforcement of the aesthetics component difficult.", "Alternatives:", "1. Status Quo", "Council could opt to direct staff to continue enforcing nuisance and other code violations associated with vacant properties by continuing to use local and state laws to compel compliance with such violations. With only 10 properties within city limits that do not have an active construction project, Ellised, or are not under current development review, Council could determine that while there are properties in the City that have been vacant for varying lengths of time, the City does not have a significant number of vacant properties and that staff is not experiencing significant challenges with addressing conditions on vacant properties that generate complaints. Staff would bring a cleanup ordinance back to Council to clarify and streamline requirements set forth in SMMC Chapter 8.96 \u2013 Abatement of Nuisances.", "The advantages of maintaining the status quo include:", "\u00b7 Maintaining current staff resources", "\u00b7 Ability to draw clear lines between safety concerns (which are actionable) and aesthetics concerns (which generally are not)", "The disadvantages of maintaining the status quo include:", "\u00b7 Two properties currently in the City that are in a state of partial construction will continue in their current state until the owners elect to move forward with a new construction project.", "2. Vacant Properties Registry", "A Vacant Properties Registry is a list of all vacant properties in the city, and typically includes fees for registration and requirements for maintenance of the properties.  Staff reviewed the vacant property policies of 29 California cities. Twenty-one of them have adopted registries to manage vacant properties. All but one adopted a Vacant Properties Registry in part or entirely as a response to the increased number of foreclosed properties resulting from the housing crisis of 2008-2009. The sudden increase in foreclosures meant a spike in vacant buildings, and residents complained that bank-owned properties were not being adequately maintained. For these reasons, these cities created registries to monitor and enforce the maintenance of these properties.", "Although the majority of these cities still enforce their registry requirements, they also report a significant decrease in the number of vacant properties as the number of foreclosures has significantly declined, and some cities have ceased enforcing their registries in favor of alternative measures. The City of Pasadena, for example, no longer enforces its Vacant Property Registry, but instead uses its Property Maintenance Ordinance. Pasadena reports that its Property Maintenance Ordinance is sufficient to ensure vacant properties are being adequately maintained (Attachment I). Pasadena\u2019s ordinance covers every issue that is commonly associated with vacant and abandoned structures including buildings left vacant and buildings left in a state of partial construction for an unreasonable period of time (14.50.040 - Prohibited activities or conditions, #13).", "In addition to Pasadena, eight of the surveyed cities have ordinances that provide for enforcement against properties that are left vacant due to construction delays or construction projects that have been abandoned through their adopted Property Maintenance Ordinances.", "The advantages of adopting a Vacant Property Registry include:", "\u00b7 Permit fees associated with registration will defray some staff costs", "The disadvantages of adopting a Vacant Property Registry include:", "\u00b7 Substantial staff resources to develop the program", "\u00b7 Substantial staff resources to administer the program depending on the number of registered properties and the frequency of monitoring requirements", "\u00b7 Staff resources to monitor vacant properties that otherwise do not have a nuisance or other condition injurious to the public", "\u00b7 Very low number of complaints regarding vacant buildings in Santa Monica", "\u00b7 Difficulty in defining which buildings are sufficiently \u201cvacant\u201d as to require registration", "Included as Attachment J of this report is a chart comparing how other local cities handle the regulation of vacant properties.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action, or as a result of maintaining the status quo. If Council were to direct staff to establish, maintain and monitor a Vacant Property Registry, staff resources would be necessary to:", "\u00b7 Draft a Vacant Property Registry ordinance", "\u00b7 Develop program guidelines", "\u00b7 Develop monitoring/enforcement policies and procedures", "\u00b7 Create documents and forms", "\u00b7 Conduct field survey of vacant properties", "\u00b7 Prepare and send property owner notifications", "\u00b7 Facilitate registry", "\u00b7 Inspect properties for compliance", "\u00b7 Enforcement", "\u00b7 Conduct statutory monitoring", "\u00b7 Maintain current list (additions and deletions)"]}], [{"Title": "Appeal 13APP011 of the Landmarks Commission's Designation of the Home Savings Building as a Landmark and Landmark Parcel Located at 2600 Wilshire Boulevard", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "06. Administrative Proceedings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council uphold the appeal, in part, and remand the pending application for Landmark designation to the Landmarks Commission for a hearing on the pending designation to be conducted by those Landmarks Commissioners appointed by the City Council after the initial designation hearing on December 9, 2013.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Landmarks Commission designated the Home Savings building, located at 2600 Wilshire Boulevard, as a City Landmark and Landmark parcel on December 9, 2013. The applicant filed a timely appeal on December 13, 2013 contending that the Landmarks Commission wrongly designated the building as a City Landmark and the property as a Landmark parcel. Subsequent to the filing of the appeal, a new development in case law established that the proactive designation procedure used in this case is legally problematic because it may not comport with Due Process requirements.", "The Landmarks Commission currently has one vacancy with the appointment of a new Commissioner anticipated in the near future. With the appointment of a new Landmarks Commissioner, four Commissioners, constituting a quorum, will have had no involvement in the filing or review of the original Landmark designation. These circumstances provide the opportunity for an unquestionably neutral determination of the pending designation.", "In order to ensure fair and impartial consideration of the Landmark designation, staff recommends that the City Council uphold the appeal, in part, and remand the pending Landmark designation to the Landmarks Commission, which will be heard after the Council appoints a new Commissioner to fill the existing vacancy on the Commission.", "Background", "The property is located on the southeast corner of Wilshire Boulevard and 26th Street. The two-story building, originally constructed in 1969 for bank use, is currently occupied by a retail tenant. There is a surface parking lot behind the structure and an open plaza area in front at the court of Wilshire Boulevard and 26th Street.", "Landmarks Commission Action", "On May 13, 2013, in accordance with authority granted under the Landmarks Ordinance, the Landmarks Commission proactively filed an application to designate the former Home Savings building as a City Landmark. The Landmarks Commission conducted a duly-noticed public hearing on the application at its December 9, 2013 meeting. As part of the public hearing, the Commission considered the following:", "\u00b7 A City historic consultant report from ICF International concluded that the property retains its architectural integrity and the integrated artwork captures the spirit of Santa Monica and represents the talents of noted artists. The report recommended that the building in its entirety be designated a City landmark as the last remaining example of a former Home Savings bank building and related artwork in the City of Santa Monica that was designed or collaboratively designed by Millard Sheets;", "\u00b7 A staff report that concluded that while the building itself was not exemplary, the prominent and distinctive art pieces were the most memorable and recognizable characteristics, and as such, these objects (sculptures, mural and stained glass) alone should be designated; and", "\u00b7 A report from the property owner\u2019s consultant, Chattel Architecture, that concludes that if the building were considered in a regional context, the building does not appear eligible for listing on the California register given it is a derivative, later and altered example of the Home Savings branch design. The nearly identical Anaheim branch is a better example. However, when viewed in the context of Santa Monica only, it may be eligible for designation as a Landmark.", "At the hearing, the Commission heard testimony from the public that generally endorsed the designation of the building in its entirety noting that the artwork loses context without the combined vision of Howard Ahmanson the businessman and Millard Sheets the artist, and that it is difficult to separate the building from the artwork. During deliberation, the Commission stated that the passing of Mr. Ahmanson did not diminish the significance of the Home Savings branches constructed after his death, which is the case for 2600 Wilshire Boulevard. The body discussed the accomplishments of Millard Sheets and stated that the building exemplified the integration of art and architecture.", "Although the building has been altered, the Commission found the changes were insignificant and did not negatively impact its historic integrity. The Commission acknowledged the personal criticism of the mural expressed by its artist Millard Sheets, but further noted that his reproach was due to its size and not its design. The Commission voted to designate the building as a City Landmark (6-0-1), with one member not able to participate due to a conflict. The Commission further identified the following as its character-defining features:", "\u00b7 The marriage between public art and commercial architecture;", "\u00b7 The simple rectangular, symmetrical massing;", "\u00b7 The flat roofline;", "\u00b7 The travertine cladded exterior with gold ceramic frieze at the top;", "\u00b7 The full-height window slits;", "\u00b7 The prominent mosaic at the focal point in front of the structure;", "\u00b7 The front plaza sculpture and the rear entrance;", "\u00b7 The stained-glass window;", "\u00b7 The structure\u2019s siting on the parcel; and", "\u00b7 The dolphin sculpture.", "Discussion", "Appeal", "The applicant filed a timely appeal on December 13, 2013 contending that the Landmarks Commission wrongly designated the subject property as a Landmark and Landmark Parcel. The appeal statement argues that the property did not meet the threshold of significance for a City Landmark. The City and the property owner subsequently agreed to continue the date for hearing the appeal, largely due to the property owner\u2019s desire to assess any preservation incentives that would be applicable to the property resulting from the Zoning Ordinance Update in 2015.", "In January 2015, while the appeal was still pending before the City Council, a California Court of appeal issued its ruling in Woody\u2019s Group, Inc. v. City of Newport Beach (2015) 233 Cal.App.4th 1012 (\u201cWoody\u2019s\u201d). In December of 2015, and January of 2016, although not raised at the initial hearing to designate the property, the property owner submitted materials to supplement the previously-filed appeal, asserting due process violations based on the court\u2019s ruling in Woody\u2019s and arguing that the Landmarks Commission\u2019s ex parte communications disclosures were inadequate.", "The Court\u2019s ruling in Woody\u2019s appears to preclude use of the proactive Landmark nomination process. The procedure has since been discontinued at the Landmarks Commission level but does not prevent individual Commissioners from filing an application so long as they recuse themselves from the designation hearing. This is the last outstanding proactive designation.", "In the intervening period, staff and the City Attorney\u2019s office have conferred on how best to proceed with review of the appeal that ensures fair and impartial consideration of the pending designation.", "Pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 9.56.040, the Landmarks Commission shall include at least one registered architect, at least one person with demonstrated knowledge of local history, at least one person with a graduate degree or demonstrated interest in architectural history, at least one person with practical or professional experience of architectural history, and at least one person with a California real estate license. The Landmarks Commission currently has one vacancy that is anticipated to be filled on a forthcoming Council agenda. With the appointment of the new Landmarks Commissioner, four Commissioners, constituting a quorum will have had no involvement in the filing or review of the original Landmark designation. These circumstances provide the opportunity for an unquestionably neutral determination of the pending designation.", "Upholding the appeal in part would not result in a substantive disapproval of the application for the Landmark designation of the building and parcel located at 2600 Wilshire Boulevard, and would allow the application to be further considered by the Landmarks Commission. Council remand of the pending designation to the Landmark Commission would address the due process issues raised by the Woody\u2019s case and provide for fair and impartial review of the pending application for designation. On remand, the Landmarks Commission\u2019s decision would be consistent with the Woody\u2019s ruling, and any decision rendered would be appealable to the City Council.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance Amending Chapter 4.12 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Creating a Civic Area Exemption Zone from Local Noise Regulations", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the ordinance amending Sections 4.12.020 and 4.12.030 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code to exempt activities undertaken on outdoor public property within a newly created Governmental/Commercial noise zone from local noise regulations.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its April 12, 2016 meeting Council directed staff to return with an amendment to the noise ordinance to generally exempt free speech activities in commercial zones between 7:00 am and 10:00 pm. Staff recommends the creation of a new predominately commercial noise zone along Ocean Avenue from Pico Boulevard to Arizona Avenue, and the area around City Hall between Ocean Avenue, 4th Street, Colorado Avenue, and Pico Boulevard. This proposal does not extend to the entire City, but does address the largest commercial zone where free speech is most commonly exercised. The zone is proposed to be called the Civic Area Noise Exemption Zone and would be exempt from all provisions of the Noise Ordinance.", "Background", "At its April 12, 2016 meeting a staff administrative item was presented to Council with background information and a recommendation regarding the Noise Ordinance. The staff report with attachments from this meeting is included with this report as Attachment A and provides greater background information on prior Council actions. At this meeting, Council directed staff to return with an amendment to the noise ordinance to generally exempt free speech activities in commercial zones between 7:00 am and 10:00 pm.", "Noise violations are currently enforced by both the City\u2019s Police Department and the Code Enforcement Division. Sworn police officers take the lead with events or complaints related to larger gatherings and after-hours complaints. Code Enforcement staff address primarily construction-related noise complaints.", "Discussion", "At the April 12, 2016 meeting Council directed staff to return with an amendment to the Noise Ordinance to eliminate any limitations to free speech activities taking place on outdoor public property (e.g. sidewalks or parkways) in commercial zones between 7:00 am and 10:00 pm.", "The City\u2019s Noise Ordinance (Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 4.12) currently exempts the following activities to varying degrees:", "The only limitation the Noise Ordinance currently places upon free-speech activities conducted on outdoor public property resides in SMMC Section 4.12.025, which generally prohibits noise that would \u201cunreasonably disturb the peace, quiet and comfort of persons of normal sensitivity\u201d and noise that is \u201cso harsh or prolonged or unnatural or unusual in [its] use, time or place as to cause physical discomfort to any persons of normal sensitivity\u2026.\u201d Such general prohibitions have been adopted in other cities and upheld by the courts. Of course, in addition to local law, state law, such as California Penal Code Section 415, also regulates noise on public (and private) properties.", "Given Council\u2019s direction to further relax the requirements set forth in SMMC Section 4.12.025, staff proposes amending the Noise Ordinance (see Attachment B) to exempt activities conducted on outdoor public properties between the hours of 7:00 am and 10:00 pm within the following geographic area, which is a predominantly governmental / commercial district:", "\u00b7 Palisades Park, between Colorado Avenue and Arizona Avenue;", "\u00b7 The sidewalks and parkways on both sides of Ocean Avenue, between Colorado Avenue and Arizona Avenue; and", "\u00b7 The area around City Hall bounded by Ocean Avenue, 4th Street, Colorado Avenue, and Pico Boulevard.", "The exempt zone is proposed to be called the Civic Area Noise Exemption Zone and activities undertaken upon outdoor public properties (e.g. sidewalks, parks, parkways) within this Zone would be totally exempt from all provisions of the Noise Ordinance, including SMMC Section 4.12.025. The area contains no hospitals or schools. However, the Santa Monica Senior center is within the newly proposed zone and Emeritus College, an education center for the older adult community, is located near the zone on Second Street between Wilshire Boulevard and Arizona Avenue.  Although the zone is predominantly governmental/commercial there are some residential units within and close to the zone. Map A below provides a map of the proposed Civic Area Noise Exemption Zone.", "Map A", "This zone is intentionally centered around the heart of the City Government, namely City Hall, as well as areas that serve as public gathering places. This approach, which allows for maximum freedom to communicate closest to the center of the Government, has been favorably upheld by the Ninth Circuit when it recently reviewed the City\u2019s Community Events Ordinance. See, e.g., Santa Monica Food Not Bombs v. City of Santa Monica, 450 F.3d 1022, 1048 (9th Cir. 2006) (\u201cWith respect to time-sensitive speech, large groups have the opportunity to speak on the City Hall lawn, an area abutting the primary symbol of governmental power and authority in Santa Monica. That location is likely in most instances to satisfy the locational interests of those speakers who wish to discuss public affairs in the City.\u201d)", "Expanding the exemption to cover all commercial areas in the City would be too broad due to the large number of mixed use buildings, which include residential uses, and close proximity to residential, educational, and hospital uses. Additionally, commercial areas in other areas of the City have greater neighborhood serving characteristics as opposed to the civic characteristics of the proposed exempt zone.", "If Council adopts staff\u2019s recommendation, SMMC Section 4.12.025 would continue to be enforceable within the proposed exemption zone during the hours of 10:00 pm to 7:00 am.", "Additionally, regardless of local law, Police officers would still enforce state law\u2019s noise regulations, including California Penal Code 415\u2019s prohibition against \u201cdisturbing the peace\u201d. California Penal Code 415 prohibits:", "1. Unlawfully fighting, or challenging another person to fight, in a public space,", "2. Disturbing another person by loud and unreasonable noise; if this is done willfully and maliciously, and", "3. Using offensive words in a public place, if the words are likely to provoke an immediate violent reaction.", "Alternatives", "Council could make no changes to the existing noise ordinance, since existing law would likely withstand a constitutional challenge and provides enforcement staff with the tools necessary to enforce noise related violations.", "As noted above, the Council could also expand the area covered by the relaxation of noise standards to a wider area of the City, either by designating the larger zone geographically or defining areas covered by a broader definition, for example all commercial, except within so many feet of uses such as hospitals or schools. Such an expansion has the potential for unintended conflicts and consequences, however, given the increasing mix of uses in the City\u2019s commercial zones.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Renewal of the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District and Amended and Restated Services Agreement", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Hold a final public hearing and adopt a Resolution renewing the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD); and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an Amended and Restated Services Agreement with Santa Monica Travel and Tourism, a California-based organization.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Recognizing that tourism is a mainstay economic driver in the community, and that strategic marketing provides an opportunity to increase local benefits from tourism while reducing external impacts, Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT) and the City\u2019s lodging businesses are seeking a renewal of the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD). Council\u2019s consideration of the adoption of a Resolution renewing the SMTMD represents the third and final step in the multi-step public hearing process required to renew the SMTMD. If the SMTMD is renewed, an additional nine and one-half years would be added to the term of the SMTMD and the additional responsibilities related to the management of the SMTMD would be reflected in the Amended and Restated Services Agreement (Services Agreement) between the City and SMTT. As the existing Services Agreement is set to expire on December 31, 2017, an extension of nine and one-half years to the Services Agreement is recommended in order to continue SMTT\u2019s existing services, programs and responsibilities related to renewing the SMTMD.", "Background", "The proposed Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) renewal was initiated by the Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT) in conjunction with Santa Monica lodging businesses for the purpose of extending a self-assessment on qualifying hotels to generate additional revenues for tourism promotion and marketing. The original SMTMD is effective for five years commencing on January 1, 2013 and expiring on December 31, 2017. The renewal of the SMTMD would extend the term by nine and one-half years beginning in January 1, 2018 through June 30, 2027. The renewal requires submittal of petitions from lodging businesses representing more than 50 percent of the total annual assessment.", "On August 23, 2016 (Attachment A), Council accepted petitions from qualified lodging businesses representing 70 percent of the proposed assessments and adopted Resolution No. 10987 (CCS) declaring its intent to consider renewal of the SMTMD and setting a public hearing for October 25, 2016, to receive additional public testimony on the renewal of the SMTMD. In addition, Council heard testimony from district members representing lodging businesses with an average daily rate of $100 to $199.99 (Tier 3 businesses), who provided input regarding the proposed assessments. Specifically, it was requested that the assessment formula for the Tier 3 businesses be reevaluated to address equity concerns.", "Based on the input received from the Tier 3 lodging businesses, the SMTMD Management District Plan was revised to reflect changes to the Tier 3 assessments. The SMTMD representative of the Tier 3 lodging businesses is supportive of the proposed changes. On September 28, 2016, the SMTMD Committee and the Santa Monica Travel and Tourism Board of Directors unanimously voted to support the modifications to the proposed SMTMD Management District Plan. On October 25, 2016 (Attachment B), Council reviewed and considered the revised SMTMD Management District Plan and held a public meeting to receive additional testimony on the renewal of the SMTMD.", "Discussion", "The proposed Resolution of Renewal (see Attachment C) sets forth the assessments that would be levied on lodging businesses in the SMTMD. The assessment rate is a fixed amount per occupied room, per night. The amount charged per occupied room per night is based on the business\u2019s average daily rate during the previous year. Inaccordance with the revised SMTMD Management District Plan that was reviewed by Council on October 25, 2016, the assessments rates are as follows:", "Tier", "Average Daily Rate", "Assessment Per Occupied Room Per Night", "1", "$300 and above", "$5.25", "2", "$200 - $299.99", "$4.25", "3", "$100 - $199.99", "$1.50", "Lodging businesses with an average daily rate less than $100 are not assessed and not included in the SMTMD. The assessments may be subject to an annual increase of no more than $0.10 per year for the Tier 3 lodging businesses and not more than $0.25 per year for the Tier 1 and 2 lodging businesses. The maximum assessment rate for each tier is summarized below:", "Fiscal Year", "Tier 3 $100 - $199.99", "Tier 2 $200 - $299.99", "Tier 1 $300 and Above", "2018*", "$1.50", "$4.25", "$5.25", "2018-19", "$1.60", "$4.50", "$5.50", "2019-20", "$1.70", "$4.75", "$5.75", "2020-21", "$1.80", "$5.00", "$6.00", "2021-22", "$1.90", "$5.25", "$6.25", "2022-23", "$2.00", "$5.50", "$6.50", "2023-24", "$2.10", "$5.75", "$6.75", "2024-25", "$2.20", "$6.00", "$7.00", "2025-26", "$2.30", "$6.25", "$7.25", "2026-27", "$2.40", "$6.50", "$7.50", "*Fiscal year 2018 covers a 6-month period (January - June).", "The SMTMD is estimated to generate approximately $4,130,000 in the first full year of operation. SMTMD assessment funds are intended to supplement, not supplant, existing City funding. The City would continue to allocate base funding to SMTT for tourism marketing through its annual budget process. The proposed assessments would be used to continue enhanced services of international marketing and sales campaigns to promote Santa Monica and its lodging establishments. An administrative fee is retained by the City to cover the City\u2019s administrative cost associated with monthly collection and transmittal of the SMTMD assessments to SMTT ($19,101 for FY 2015-16). The administrative fee would continue to be subject to an annual increase of five percent.", "In addition to adopting the attached resolution, staff recommends Council authorize modifications to the existing Amended and Restated Services Agreement with Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT) to incorporate the additional responsibilities related to the renewal of the SMTMD and to maintain the services provided by SMTT. SMTTwould continue to provide tourism and marketing programs, operate Visitor Centers, organize summits, conferences, and community events, and promote Santa Monica through print and social media outlets. The additional responsibilities related to the renewal of the SMTMD include providing enhanced sales and marketing services to promote assessed businesses as tourist, meeting and event destinations with the goal of increasing overnight visitation and room night sales. The modified Amended and Restated Services Agreement would become effective on January 1, 2018, concurrent with the commencement of the adopted SMTMD Management District Plan.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The City would retain $20,056 of the SMTMD assessments as an administrative fee to cover the City\u2019s costs associated with the monthly collection and transfer of the SMTMD assessments. A revenue budget of $20,056 is included in the FY 2016-17 Adopted Budget."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to One Unscheduled Vacancy on the Landmarks Commission for a Term Ending on June 30, 2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to One Unscheduled Vacancy on the Urban Forest Task Force for a Term Ending on June 30, 2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1540513800": [[{"Title": "Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (Metro) Elimination of Interagency Transfers", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Community & Government Engagement", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council:1. Adopt the proposed changes to the Metro Policy on Use of Interagency Transfers (IATs); and 2. Adopt the Title VI Equity Evaluation and Findings on the proposed transfer policy changes, conducted by Metro staff on behalf of the Los Angeles County region.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Los Angeles County\u2019s municipal transit operators are now on TAP (Transit Access Pass), the region-wide smart card program. As a result, Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (Metro), adopted a new transfer policy, which will require  a customer to make inter-agency transfers (IAT) only by using a TAP card.", "The new policy will eliminate paper IATs, which Metro anticipates will speed up boarding and reduce fraud. As required by Federal Law, a fare equity analysis was completed by Metro staff on behalf of the Los Angeles County transit operators to review the proposed change in transfer policy. Implementation of the IAT change would take place in March 2017. City Council action is requested to adopt the proposed changes on the use of IATs in Los Angeles County and approve the Title VI Equity Evaluation.", "Background", "The TAP Program is a countywide smartcard based fare collection system that is managed by Metro. All major Los Angeles County transit providers, including Big Blue Bus (BBB), participate in the program. Big Blue Bus currently participates in TAP by offering customers the ability to use the following fare products loaded on to TAP: a Metro EZ Transit Pass, an IAT, stored cash value, or any Big Blue Bus period pass. In FY 2015-16, 17% of Big Blue Bus trips were completed with a TAP card.", "Currently, when Big Blue Bus customers need to use more than one transit system to get to a destination they purchase an IAT for $0.50 to complete the ride. Customers buy the IAT on the first bus, then give it to the Motor Coach Operator on the second vehicle for fare payment. IATs are valid for two hours from the time purchased.", "Discussion", "On June 25, 2015, the Metro Board of Directors adopted the following changes to the IAT policy:", "1. Transfers between Los Angeles County transit operators will only be allowed using a TAP card. The change would allow agencies to eliminate paper transfers for customers who transfer within Los Angeles County.", "2. Transfer fare charges will be deducted from the TAP card upon the second boarding. Customers will no longer be required to purchase a transfer on the first boarding; instead the transaction will happen on the second boarding. The customer would simply tap for both boardings. The base fare would be deducted on the first vehicle and the transfer fare would be deducted on the second vehicle. Revenues are expected to remain unchanged as most riders who now transfer will continue to make two-way trips, in both the AM and PM commute times.", "3. The transfer window will be extended from two hours to two-and-a-half hours. The extra 30 minutes is given out of consideration for increased traffic congestion in the region and the distance of some routes.", "4. Provide for a single interagency transfer within the transfer window.", "There are several benefits to the policy change, including:", "1. Reduces boarding time \u2013 Under the new policy, the customer would not need to purchase an IAT from the Motor Coach Operator. The transfer would happen automatically upon making the transfer boarding, which will speed up boarding for all customers and reduce vehicle dwell time.", "2. Simplifies transferring \u2013 Restricting IATs to TAP cards eliminates the need to carry exact change to purchase a transfer as the transfer charge will be deducted from the stored value of a customer\u2019s TAP card.", "3. Promotes the use of TAP \u2013 Restricting IATs to TAP cards promotes the use of TAP cards, which will increase the efficiency and security of revenue collection by reducing cash handling requirements.", "4. Reduces fraud \u2013 Proof of payment for IATs is currently provided to customers in the form of a paper transfer by an operator. The operator punches the date and time that the transfer will expire, or the farebox issues a date- and time-stamped transfer ticket. Paper transfers are relatively easy to pass on to another customer, duplicate or resell. Transfers on TAP are not susceptible to such forms of fraud. In addition, the TAP card can be registered for balance protection, allowing the TAP card balance to be restored, should the card be lost or stolen.", "Once the program begins, if a customer pays a cash fare and does not have a TAP card to purchase an IAT they will pay a separate base fare when they board the second transit system. As a result, Big Blue Bus is working with Metro and the other Municipal Operators to ensure that customers are aware of the change in policy well before it is implemented in March 2017. Big Blue Bus staff is preparing a marketing plan which would provide BBB customers and community stakeholders with the information explaining the policy change.", "Fare Equity Analysis", "Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 protects persons from discrimination based on their race, color, or national origin. Under the Title VI program, transit agencies may be required to complete a fare equity analysis when there is a change to any fare, regardless of the amount of the increase or decrease. The analysis determines whether such a change will have a discriminatory impact based on race, color or national origin, and whether any identified disparate impacts can be mitigated. The fare equity analysis must be approved by the governing board of the transit agency prior to the implementation of the changes.", "The change to the regional IAT policy is considered a fare change. The Federal Transportation Administration permitted Metro to complete the fare equity analysis on behalf of the Los Angeles County transit operators who participate in the IAT program. The governing board of each of the transit operators must approve the fare equity analysis in order to meet the fare equity analysis requirement without having to conduct individual analyses by each transit operator.", "The fare equity analysis resulted in a finding that the proposed change results in a disparate impact to customers located within specific areas of the county. These areas of the county are served by Antelope Valley Transportation Authority, Foothill Transit, City of Gardena G-Trans, Montebello Bus Lines, and Torrance Transit representing a group of 800,000 individuals that do not currently have a TAP card and are not within walking distance of a place to obtain one.", "Metro\u2019s analysis concludes that while there is a disparate impact resulting from the changes to the regional IAT policy, there is legitimate justification for the changes and there are no alternatives that would have a less disparate impact on minority customers. To address the finding, Metro has approved the distribution of up to one million TAP cards free to customers purchasing transfers in advance of the effective date of the policy. Big Blue Bus will participate in the distribution of the TAP cards to its customers that may otherwise not have easy access to a TAP retail outlet.", "Big Blue Bus and Metro are working together to increase the number of locations where customers can purchase fare products and load passes. Within the BBB service area, customers can use the BBB Transit Store, TAP vending machines at Expo Line stations, Ralph\u2019s Supermarkets in Santa Monica, West Los Angeles and Pacific Palisades, check cashing stores in Westwood and Venice, and the TAPTOGO.net website. Metro is in discussions with Santa Monica College and Santa Monica Place to locate TAP machines in their facilities. BBB is also working with Metro to install TAP ticket vending machines at Pico/Rimpau Terminal and LAX Lot C Bus Terminal where many of our customers transfer systems.", "While BBB will be promoting the use of the TAP card for all transactions on the bus, cash will still be accepted to pay for base fares.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.#1"]}, {"Title": "Award Design Contract for the City Yards Modernization Project", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to execute a contract with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company, a California-based company, for design services for the City Yards Modernization in the amount of $10,000,000 (which includes an 8% contingency); and2. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 12, 2016, Council authorized staff to negotiate a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) with design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for design services for Phasing Package A (Attachment A) of the City Yards Modernization Project. This phase includes a new Fleet Maintenance building, Facilities Management, Resource Recovery and Recycling, Street Maintenance and Custodial Services Administration Building, Traffic and Facilities Shops as well as Wash Bays and Fuel Islands. Staff recommends a contract be awarded to Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for design services in an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 (including an 8% contingency). Additionally, $1,700,000 will be spent on associated direct owner costs in the design phase for surveys, permits, fees and management. All funds are included in the FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget. This is a design-build, or integrated project delivery, meaning that the designers and construction team are coordinating early in the design phase, resulting in savings during the construction phase.  The overall cost estimate for the City Yards Modernization Project Phasing Package A remains $114 million.", "Background", "City Yards Site Characteristics and Considerations", "The City Yards is a 14.7-acre site owned and operated by the City of Santa Monica located at 2500 Michigan Avenue, near the intersection of 24th Street and Michigan Avenue. The City took ownership of the site in the late 1940s and constructed three buildings to house City Yards operations occupying the land between Michigan Avenue and the former Santa Monica Rubbish disposal pit. The buildings were designed by Consulting Engineers Parker Zehnder and Associates to accommodate the needs and program requirements of the City at that time. Buildings included a small garbage transfer station and gas station, an auto repair and maintenance shop with two vehicle lifts, and a broom repair and blacksmith shop. Facilities shops, crew space and administrative space were sized to accommodate the staffing levels at the time. The balance of the site was occupied by a warehouse and open equipment storage bays. This property has been used as a base for a majority of the City\u2019s field maintenance operations, storage facilities, and other industrial uses since then.", "City Yards circa 1954", "These same three City Yards buildings from the 1940s still house a majority of the City\u2019s field maintenance operations today. Program needs have changed through the years, and the City Yards was adapted as-needed for various City functions resulting in an expedient but inefficient utilization of space. As additional shop space, maintenance space or office space was needed, the existing warehouse and open equipment storage bays were converted and reconfigured to accommodate these needs. Changing populations, growth, updates in technology, and differing service requirements have resulted in a series of haphazard updates throughout the site. This reconfiguration of old buildings is the result of a decades-long process of \u201cmaking do\u201d with a facility that the City outgrew many years prior.", "The original building envelopes and substandard structures remain in place at City Yards today. Some structures were installed as temporary trailers that became permanent housing for critical functions. These buildings have exceeded their expected service life and can no longer be utilized to support the current City Yards functions safely. City Yards functions include:", "\u00b7 Facilities Maintenance", "\u00b7 Custodial Services", "\u00b7 Street Maintenance", "\u00b7 Fleet Maintenance", "\u00b7 Traffic Operations", "\u00b7 Resource Recovery and Recycling", "\u00b7 Water and Wastewater Operations", "\u00b7 Household Hazardous Waste", "\u00b7 Fire Department Training Area", "The City Yards operates seven days a week and houses significantly more functions and employees than it was designed to accommodate. The scope and breadth of the operating divisions has evolved over time. Functional needs and space requirements are no longer met by the facilities for any of the operations housed at the City Yards. Deficiencies include inadequate maintenance shop space, vehicle hoists, and covered maintenance area for heavy duty vehicles. This results in the need to perform some vehicle maintenance outside the fleet shop space, creating site circulation constraints and hazardous conditions. Further deficiencies include inadequate employee restroom/locker facilities; limited parking for fleet, employee, and visitor vehicles; storage and traffic circulation constraints; and inadequate customer service facilities to serve members of the public at the various City Yards offices. In addition, a private recycling facility of rudimentary design utilizes a substantial portion of the site. Santa Monica is a rare municipality that performs many of these services in-house. The community has come to expect these services, but achieving high performance standards is difficult with substandard facilities.", "City Yards Master Plan History", "On October 8, 1996, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL Interplan, Inc. (RNL) for preparation of a Master Plan for the City Yards that would address the physical reorganization, renovation and rehabilitation needs of the City Yards. Between 2000 and 2009, Council changed direction in regards to the City operating a transfer facility at the City Yards. Current direction by Council is for the City to operate resource recovery transfer services through a contracted third-party provider.", "On October 24, 2000, Council approved the two proposed City Yards Master Plan alternatives in concept. One concept included the continued operation of a City-designed and constructed transfer station, while the second concept assumed contracted transfer station services with a third-party provider. On November 12, 2002, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL to complete full design and engineering services for a multi-phase construction process for the City Yards Master Plan Project anticipated to begin in 2005 and to be completed in 2010, including a City-operated transfer facility. However, subsequent changes in City Yards uses and space constraints necessitated an update to the City Yards Master Plan.", "On October 13, 2009, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL to update the City Yards Master Plan approved in 2000. The update was substantially completed in July 2010; however, the plan was not presented to Council due to additional scope requirements that required further Master Plan modifications, addressed in four subsequent modifications on September 13, 2011, February 14, 2012, September 11, 2012 and June 25, 2013.", "On December 16, 2014, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with International Parking Design, Inc. to prepare a parking study for the City Yards. The study reviewed financing options, economics, parking demand, and viability of a shared parking solution on the City Yards site. Parking is not a part of the Package A scope of work, but will be addressed in the future in coordination with adjacent private development at the Bergamot Arts Center.", "On January 27, 2015, Council approved the updated City Yards Master Plan by RNL in concept and authorized staff to issue a request for bids to contract with a design-build team for the initial concept design, cost estimation services and feasibility analysis, and to prepare a financing plan for the initial phases of the City Yards Modernization Project.", "On July 28, 2015, Council authorized staff to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (along with Miller Hull Partnership as the architecture firm) for these services.", "On July 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate a design Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) with design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC), a California-based company, for design services that includes schematic design, design development, construction documents, project management, and cost estimating for the City Yards Modernization Project in accordance with the proposed \u201cZipper\u201d Concept/Phasing Package A.", "The HDCC agreement represents three phases of this design-build project process: 1) feasibility and concept design; 2) project design; and 3) construction. The first phase has been completed, and the GMP for the design phase is herein presented for Council approval. After project design is completed, the construction (GMP) amendment would be presented to Council for approval.", "New Water Treatment Plant", "In support of the City\u2019s water self-sufficiency goals, a new water treatment plant (Olympic Treatment Plant) is planned to be located within the City Yards on the eastern portion of the site. Feasibility analysis is underway for this portion of the site, which will proceed separately, but in coordination with the City Yards Modernization Phasing Package A project. The work on this eastern portion of the City Yards site is envisioned to include the Olympic Treatment Plant, Water Resources and Public Landscape administrative offices, and Gandara Park reconfiguration.", "On August 12, 2014, Council authorized Black & Veatch to design and install a pilot treatment unit to study the different treatment technologies available to produce California Division of Drinking Water (DDW)-approved drinking water in the Olympic Well Field. The pilot treatment unit was staged at the City Yards due to its close proximity to source water and due to the availability of City-owned land being considered for the siting of a water treatment plant. The pilot study was completed in summer of 2016 and the study report will be completed in fall of 2016. The pilot study report will include the preliminary design criteria for the water treatment plant.", "On July 12, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to modify the agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC) to provide additional conceptual design scope of work related to the Olympic Treatment Plant, Water Resources, Gandara Park and Public Landscape project components.", "Sustainability Framework for the City Yards Modernization Project", "All components of the City Yards Modernization Project, including the water treatment plant, will proceed in a highly sustainable manner in order to turn the City\u2019s industrial campus into a valued community asset.", "On May 24, 2016, Council authorized a grant award of $1,487,609 from the California Energy Commission for the Santa Monica Advanced Energy District project proposal. The project will integrate a small, localized energy grid (a microgrid) consisting of onsite renewable energy generation and energy storage based at the City Yards and Bergamot Arts Station. The project will utilize four strategies to establish a multi-user microgrid. First, the City will own and operate its own microgrid, serving the City Yards facility. Second, the City will work with Worthe Development Group at the City-owned Bergamot Arts Station, to develop appropriate regulations and incentives through the entitlement and development agreement process and establish a unique public/private partnership model. Third, a master plan over this area will be developed to delineate the integration and interconnection between the City, the public, and the utility. And finally, the City will explore the value of its role as a Community Choice Aggregator to incentivize, construct, and generate retail power supply.", "On July 12, 2016, in addition to approving the City Yards feasibility analysis and proposed concept/phasing options, Council authorized the City Manager to register the City Yards as an eco-district with EcoDistricts Protocol, and staff reported that the design-build team would establish Envision certification targets as sustainability standards for the City Yards Modernization Project.", "Discussion", "The City Yards stands to be redeveloped sensitively to meet both the needs of City operations located at City Yards and to be a good neighbor for the surrounding community. Design work for the City Yards Modernization Project will proceed within the framework of both the EcoDistricts Protocol and the Envision sustainability infrastructure certification, with the aim of maximizing the sustainability and community benefit of the project.", "The EcoDistricts Protocol is a process-based collaboration framework that promotes the neighborhood/district-scale as the ideal size to achieve \u201cdeeper green\u201d sustainable development that cannot normally be achieved within a single green building. Opportunities to implement innovative community programming and to resource share could transcend project site boundaries. Examples include partnering the operations at City Yards and artists at Bergamot to upcycle goods found in the local waste stream as art; increasing the amount of training and services for the public via the shared use Community Room housing Rosie\u2019s Girls; or collectively creating a sense of place by making a bioregional library or gallery space.", "Emphasis will be placed on defining goals for three overarching imperatives:", "\u00b7 Equity", "\u00b7 Resilience", "\u00b7 Climate Protection", "As well as goals for six priorities:", "\u00b7 Place", "\u00b7 Prosperity", "\u00b7 Health and Wellbeing", "\u00b7 Connectivity", "\u00b7 Living Infrastructure", "\u00b7 Resource Restoration", "These imperatives and priorities align well with existing City priorities and will provide a natural connection to ongoing efforts such as the Sustainable City Plan and the Well-Being Index. The EcoDistrict protocol will also provide a framework to ensure effective collaboration with surrounding land uses and efforts, including but not limited to the City\u2019s own water treatment plant, Water and Public Landscape administrative offices, reconfigured Gandara park, the Bergamot Arts Center, Ishihara Park, Pico and Memorial Park neighborhood plans, and the Sustainable Water Master Plan.", "In addition to pursuing EcoDistrict certification, the design-build team will also pursue the Envision rating system for the City Yards Modernization project. Envision was determined a more appropriate rating system than the LEED rating system for this project type. Envision facilitates the development and maintenance of sustainable infrastructure and aims to improve the performance and resiliency of physical infrastructure. The rating system uses criteria from six categories for project certification: Quality of Life; Leadership; Resource Allocation; Natural World; Climate; and Risk. Achieving Envision certification would demonstrate the City\u2019s commitment to sustainable leadership by being one of the first municipal corporate yards projects in the country certified under the rating system.", "Design Costs", "Staff recommends a contract be awarded to Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for a design services Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) in an amount not to exceed $10,000,000. Included in this GMP is an 8% contingency and $750,000 for subcontractor pre-construction services, which is pulled from the construction budget. The net design fee amounts to 10% of the anticipated construction cost which is within the industry standard for projects of this type.", "The design fee includes services by 14 consultants for architectural and engineering services, schematic design, design development, construction documents, project management and cost estimating of Phasing Package A of the City Yards Modernization Project. Staff would return to Council for review and comments during the schematic design phase and when the construction documents are completed for authorization construction financing, and GMP amendment to authorize construction services.", "In addition to design contract costs, $1,700,000 in direct owner costs is included in the FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program budget for direct owner costs in the design phase. Direct owner costs include: environmental impact report preparation, site and utility surveys, fiber network hub design, utility relocation, project management, and design contingency in the event that plans for the adjacent water treatment plant and associated uses impact the City Yards Phasing Package A scope of work. In addition to standard costs, in this case the direct owner funds will also cover community engagement and registration related to the EcoDistrict protocol and Envision.", "This is a design-build, or integrated project, meaning that designers and construction team are coordinating early in the project design phase, resulting in savings during the construction phase. The overall cost for the design and construction of the City Yards Modernization Project Phasing Package A (Attachment A) remains at $114 million.", "Public Outreach", "Two community meetings were held to conduct public outreach in early 2016 for the City Yards Modernization feasibility analysis and concept design recommendations. In February 2016, the design-build team and City staff held a community meeting at Virginia Avenue Park to present the project vision and goals for improving the essential city services based out of the City Yards facilities. The purpose of this initial community outreach meeting was to hear the hopes, dreams, and concerns of the adjacent community near the City Yards. Attendees had an opportunity to discuss their ideas along with their responses to the project\u2019s goals. The design-build team documented the public comment received and attempted to visualize and prioritize these comments. The intended outcome was to understand what the community wants (or doesn\u2019t want) in the development of the project. Following are some of the specific comments from the community:", "\u00b7 Provide learning programs for broader groups", "\u00b7 Consciousness of the level of disruption to the neighbors", "\u00b7 Provide opportunities for public art", "\u00b7 Use the City Yards project to enhance Stewart St. Park and solve some of the current challenges there", "\u00b7 Connection to adjacent neighborhood to NE/ provide connection from the mobile home park to Bergamot", "\u00b7 Mindfulness of overlap between pedestrians / cars / heavy equipment moving in & out of site", "\u00b7 Allow for more visibility into the City Yards - celebrate the functions there", "\u00b7 Enhance Michigan Street - Street trees, planting buffer", "\u00b7 Community Room", "\u00b7 Provide more space to Rosie\u2019s Girls (a community program)", "\u00b7 Pursue net-positive energy", "\u00b7 Produce electricity for the neighborhood", "\u00b7 Focus on opportunities for water re-use", "\u00b7 Greater operational efficiency to conserve resources", "\u00b7 Composting opportunities", "The results of the first community meeting influenced the City Yards concept designs, and as a follow-up, a second community meeting was held in March 2016. The design-build team and staff presented the updated concept design options, and the community offered more feedback based upon their evaluation of the concept design options. If Council authorizes the design phase to commence for the City Yards Modernization Project, further community outreach would occur during the design process of Phasing Package A.", "Next Steps", "Staff anticipates the following project timeline:", "\u00b7 Schematic design - fall 2016 - spring 2017", "\u00b7 Design development, regulatory approvals - spring 2017 - winter 2017", "\u00b7 Construction documentation - winter 2017 - summer 2018", "\u00b7 Return to Council for authorization of a Guaranteed Maximum Price for construction and to approve construction financing - summer 2018", "\u00b7 Site preparation and start of construction - fall 2018", "\u00b7 Estimated completion of construction - summer 2021", "Additionally, based on Council direction on July 12, 2016, the design-build team will provide additional feasibility and concept design scope of work related to the Olympic Water Treatment Plant, Water Resources Administrative Offices, Public Landscape relocation from Colorado Yards, and the reconfiguration of Gandara Park. Staff will return to Council with the updated feasibility analysis after the conclusion of this work.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to HDCC is for an amount not to exceed $10,000,000. Additionally, direct owner costs for design phase work are $1,700,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014028.589000.", "The previously approved feasibility analysis provided an estimated cost in the amount of $114 million to complete the design and construction of Phasing Package A. The FY16-18 CIP biennial budget appropriated $11.7 million in Charnock settlement funds in FY 2016-17 to fully fund the design phase, and $38.3 million in remaining available Charnock settlement funds in FY 2017-18 to partially fund project construction. The unfunded construction budget is estimated to be $64 million and is proposed to be bond financed. The General Fund would not bear the full burden of debt service; costs would be allocated to other funds with associated operations at the City Yards, including Resource, Recovery and Recycling and the Vehicle Management Fund. Adjacent Water and Wastewater plans are anticipated to be funded with Gillete/Boeing settlement funds, though cost estimates are pending. Staff will return to Council with more detailed cost estimates and financing plans for both the City Yards construction and for the adjacent Water Treatment Plant and associated project components."]}, {"Title": "Airport Lease Approval for Campclar Corporation, DBA Spitfire Grill Restaurant, at 3300 Airport Avenue", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease agreement with Campclar Corporation, DBA Spitfire Grill Restaurant (Campclar), for restaurant space located at 3300 Airport Avenue, Suite 1, reflecting the general terms and conditions in the report; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with the recently adopted Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Leasing Policy, the City is moving forward with leasing city-owned properties. The City owns the building at 3300 Airport Avenue, Suite 1, which currently houses Spitfire Grill Restaurant (operating under Campclar Corporation). The proposed lease agreement with Campclar is for approximately 5,844 rentable square feet, comprised of 4,782 rentable square feet of interior dining and office space, and 1,062 square feet of exclusive use of outdoor dining space.", "The proposed lease agreement with Campclar is for a period of five years, with an option to extend for an additional five year period. The base rent begins in year one at $2.74/sq. ft.", "Background", "Spitfire Grill Restaurant, operating under Campclar, has been located at 3300 Airport Avenue, Suite 1, since 1992. The Spitfire Grill Restaurant provides breakfast, lunch and dinner service for Airport tenants and the surrounding community. It features indoor dining and a large outdoor dining patio abutting Airport Avenue.", "In April 1992, the City entered into a month-to-month lease agreement with Campclar for the property located at 3300 Airport Avenue.", "On December 5, 2000 (Attachment A), Council approved Santa Monica Airport Non-Aviation Leasing Guidelines for specified properties including 3300 Airport Avenue, Suite 1, allowing for long-term leases at the Airport. On March 1, 2001 the City entered into a ten-year lease agreement with Campclar to operate the Spitfire Grill Restaurant with a term ending in Feb 28, 2011.", "On May 09, 2006 (Attachment B), the City entered into a new lease agreement with Campclar, for a period of nine years, terminating on June 30, 2015. The new lease was necessary because a section of the outdoor dining area leased by Campclar had to be relocated due to the construction of Airport Park. Additionally, the new lease included leasehold improvements to the restrooms, outdoor patio dining area, exterior fa\u00e7ade, lighting, and kitchen area.", "On June 30, 2015, all Airport leases expired, including the lease for Campclar, which has been operating under a holdover agreement since that date.", "On July 14, 2015 (Attachment C), the City Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Campclar for a term not to exceed June 30, 2018. Negotiations were unsuccessful due to the short lease term, which was deemed unfeasible by Campclar.", "On March 22, 2016 (Attachment D), the City Council approved the Santa Monica Airport Leasing and Licensing Policy for the leasehold and license management of properties at the Santa Monica Airport, and authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute leases at the Santa Monica Airport in accordance with the policy.", "Discussion", "In August 2016, the City\u2019s broker, Commercial Realty Group (CRG), notified staff that it had an offer from Campclar to lease the subject property. The proposed lease with Campclar is for the Spitfire Grill to continue its operation as a full service restaurant. The total rentable square feet is 5,844, comprised of 4,782 rentable square feet of interior dining room, office space, and common area bathrooms; and 1,062 square feet of exclusive use of outdoor dining space. The proposed lease would be for a term not to exceed five years with a monthly rental rate of $12,958.10 per month adjusted annually by 3%. This proposal includes an option to renew for an additional five years at fair market value, however the increase in rent shall be no less than 3% greater than the rent in the last year of the initial lease term.", "Additionally, the City would authorize a rent credit in the amount of up to six months rent following the tenant\u2019s completion of tenant improvements within the premises.", "Tenant must complete the tenant improvements within the first twelve months of the lease in order to receive the tenant improvement credit.", "It should be noted that the space is currently occupied and operated by Campclar, hence there is no change in use. Although Campclar would modify the building with interior tenant improvements, Campclar does not propose to expand the building. Campclar would be required to comply with all City building code regulations and planning standards as a condition of the lease. Finally, the lease is consistent with the terms of the voter-approved Measure LC passed in 2014 to regulate future use of Santa Monica Airport property.", "Annual rent paid by Campclar to the City would be between $155,497 for year one and $175,013 for year five, before rent credits. The proposed rent reflects market price. Securing this tenant helps ensure the Airport Fund\u2019s financial self-sufficiency and allows it to repay its debt obligation to the City.", "Commencement Date: Upon execution of lease document or November 1, 2016, whichever comes later.", "Term Ends: 60 months from the date of lease execution; slated for October 31, 2021.", "Options:  Option to renew for an additional five years at fair market value.", "Base Rental Rate: $12,958.10 per month Modified Gross", "Rent Breakdown as follows:", "Interior Restaurant: 3,471 square feet @ $3.15 /sq. ft.", "Office Space: 322 square feet @ $2.75 /sq. ft.", "Common Area Bathroom / Hallway Space: 470 square feet @ $0.00", "Closet Outside Bathrooms: 135 square feet @ $1.75 /sq. ft.", "Outdoor Dining Space: 1,062 square feet @ $0.85 /sq. ft.", "Escalations: 3% per year starting at the anniversary of the execution date of the lease.", "Tenant Improvement Credit: Tenant shall receive a rent credit that is equal to up to six months rent, based on second year base rent, for a total not to exceed $80,081 for improvements completed within the first 12 months of the lease.", "Real Estate Commission", "A real estate commission fee of $14,909 based on 2% of the value of the total 5-year lease term, would be due to Corporate Realty Group (CRG) upon execution of the proposed lease agreement.", "It should be noted that if Campclar exercises its option to renew for an additional five-year lease at fair market value, the City would have a future commission obligation to CRG. This obligation would be based on 1.5% of the value of the total lease term for years six through year ten.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The recommended lease agreement with Campclar Corporation will generate an estimated $103,655 (base monthly rent x 8 months) in Airport revenues for FY2016-17 in account 33431.402120, if the lease is executed on November 1, 2016. The FY 2016-17 revenue budget assumed a lower lease amount from the property due to the month to month hold over lease. The new lease is estimated to increase revenues by $27,107. Revenue account #33431.402120 should be increased by $27,107 for the FY 2016-17 budget.", "A real estate commission fee of $14,909 would be due to Corporate Realty Group (CRG) upon execution of the proposed lease agreement. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Works Department and will be charged to account 33431.555060."]}, {"Title": "Approval of Professional Services Agreement for Santa Monica Airport Security Enhancement Project", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP Airport Security Enhancement Project to Birdi & Associates, Inc., a California-based corporation, to provide consulting services in connection with designing a security system to upgrade what is currently being used by the Santa Monica Airport;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Birdi & Associates, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $163,350 for one year, with one additional one-year renewal option of $47,850, for a total amount not to exceed $211,200 (including a 10% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and3.  Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Although the City Council voted to close the Santa Monica Airport by June 2018 or as soon as legally feasible, the City will continue to operate the Airport in a safe and secure manner so long as it remains open. The Santa Monica Airport currently has an Access Control System that controls and monitors all vehicle gate access onto the airfield as well as 24/7 patrol provided by Santa Monica Police Department Public Service Officers. In response to Council\u2019s direction to evaluate the Airport\u2019s current security system and develop enhancements where necessary, the Santa Monica Airport is seeking consulting services to design and upgrade the Santa Monica Airport\u2019s security system.", "In March 2016, the City published a request for qualifications to provide consulting services in designing and upgrading the Santa Monica Airport\u2019s security system. Four firms were shortlisted and interviewed. In July 2016, the City solicited requests for proposals from two of the four shortlisted firms. Staff recommends Birdi & Associates, Inc. as the best firm to provide these services in an amount not to exceed $211,200 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On October 27, 2015, Council directed staff to explore expanding security measures including passenger and pilot screening, and screening of others working on aircraft at the Airport.", "Although the City Council has voted to close the Airport by June 2018 or as soon as legally feasible, the City remains committed to ensuring the safety and security of its Airport is maintained. Staff direction was given at the August 23, 2016 (Attachment A) meeting where Council\u2019s direction was to enhance Airport security.", "The current security system at the Santa Monica Airport is called Brivo Access Control System. Brivo Access Control System is a hosted system that provides security gate access control monitoring and also provides a badging and credential system for tenants who are granted airfield access. The Airport\u2019s perimeter is also secured by a perimeter fence and it is patrolled by the Santa Monica Police Department Public Service Officers 24/7. Although no significant security issues have occurred, it is important to constantly evaluate and keep improving the established security system.", "Discussion", "As exemplified by the Council\u2019s commitment to outstanding police and fire services, public safety is the most important priority of the City. Regardless of location, maintaining a safe and secure environment, including the airport, is paramount. Although there have been no significant problems at the Airport do date, it is imperative to constantly evaluate current practices and make continuous improvements, as necessary. Therefore, acquiring the services of a consultant to evaluate and enhance the airport\u2019s security to ensure that it meets Federal, State, and local regulations and provides an improved level of security and safety for the people that utilize the airport facilities is essential.", "The current security system has been in place for many years, therefore, the consultant will be tasked with designing a system that will address, at a minimum, any gaps of the airport\u2019s vehicle and pedestrian access points; the airport\u2019s perimeter fence; and access points from buildings that are alongside the airport\u2019s restricted area of the airport. Additionally, the consultant would study avenues to ensure the security of passengers and screening of pilots and others working in restricted areas of the airport.", "Consultant Selection", "On March 29, 2016, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ#32916) for Airport Security Enhancements for the Santa Monica Airport. The RFQ was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 74 vendors downloaded the RFQ. The following eight (8) firms responded:", "Birdi & Associates, Inc.", "BSecure Corporation", "Convergint Technologies", "Elert & Associates", "Reem Aviation Security Consultants, LLC", "Safeguard on Demand LLC", "Siemens", "Triad Consulting System Design Group", "Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Public Works, the Santa Monica Police Department, Information Systems, and the City Manager\u2019s Office. Evaluation was based on the following criteria: knowledge and prior experience with Airport Security, references and experience of key personnel based on resumes showing technical knowledge and relevant experience, evaluation of firm\u2019s previous projects of comparable level of complexity and nature, training and proven expertise in the area of work required, firms proposed work plan, and knowledge of Federal Aviation Administration and Homeland Security Airport Security Regulations and best practices particularly as it relates to small reliever airports in highly urbanized settings. This evaluation allowed staff to short list four firms who were then invited to interview and present their airport security work plans. Staff then shortlisted two pre-qualified firms:", "Birdi & Associates, Inc. and Triad Consulting System Design Group. On July 18, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Airport Security Enhancements for the Santa Monica Airport to the two shortlisted firms. Both firms submitted proposals. Responses to the RFP were evaluated on: experience and technical competence; ability to meet work plan and timelines; ability and past experience in assembling a highly qualified team; description of previous project experiences to show how quality control was achieved for former clients; cost of services; cost control; performance within budget allocations; and breadth of service by demonstrating the ability to provide innovative solutions, recommendations, and improvements. Birdie & Associated, Inc. demonstrates a clear understanding of the scope of services, has many years of experience in Airport security systems (including Ontario International Airport, Van Nuys Airport, Los Angeles International Airport, and San Diego International Airport) and has a highly qualified project team. Based on these criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, Birdi & Associated, Inc. is recommended as the best qualified firm. Additionally, staff contacted references and all reported Birdi & Associates, Inc. work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner.", "Project timeline", "Staff anticipates that the design phase of the project will occur during FY2016-17 and the construction phase during FY2017-18.  Staff will return to Council for approval of the construction contract and a phasing schedule of the enhancements at a future date.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Birdi & Association, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $211,200. The Airport Security Project would cost $163,350 in FY2016-17. Funds in the amount of $125,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Budget. Implementation of the program requires an FY 2016-17 appropriation of $38,350 to account C334035.589000. The agreement will be charged to account C334035.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Lease Modifications for off-site City office space", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to:1) Negotiate and execute a lease modification with Folke Investment, LLC at 1437 4th Street, Suites 300 and 310, to extend the lease terms of each for three years beginning May 1, 2017 and August 1, 2017, respectively, with an additional one-year option. The first-year annual lease expense would be $488,313 (Suite 300) and $69,741 (Suite 310) for a combined total lease expense of $2,369,756 for the proposed four-year occupancy period;2) Negotiate and execute a lease modification including any necessary related business terms with AMDA, LLC at 1901 Main Street to extend the lease term for two years beginning May 1, 2018, with an additional one-year option, for a first-year annual lease expense of $962,458 and a total expense of approximately $3,033,445 during the proposed three-year occupancy period; and3) Negotiate and execute a lease modification with Wilshire & 5th LLC at 1212 5th Street, Suite 300 to extend the lease term for three years beginning February 1, 2017, with two additional one-year options, for a first-year annual lease expense of $205,692 and a total expense of approximately $872,966.64 during the proposed five-year occupancy period.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Several City workgroups currently lease space in privately owned offices. Once the City Services Building is completed in 2020, and the relevant phase of the City Yards Modernization in 2021, the workgroups will be consolidated in City-owned facilities. In the meantime, four leases will be expiring in the next year or two, and staff recommends that the leases be extended to coincide with the planned opening of the new City facilities. Extending the existing leases would allow the relevant City workgroups to be housed during the interim period at prevailing market rates while avoiding the additional expense of relocation to new facilities following by relocation to the new City facilities.", "Additionally, staff evaluated options related to occupying or leasing a City-owned office building located 1632 5th Street, as the current tenant intends to move out by November30, 2016. Given the costs associated with retrofitting the building for City use, as well as the building\u2019s limited ability to provide for public interface, staff recommends that the City continue to lease the building.", "Background", "Since City Hall was constructed in 1938, the City\u2019s services and staffing levels have evolved and increased to serve the needs of an active community and a vibrant commercial center.  Because City Hall is at capacity, some City workgroups have been located in privately owned office space in off-site locations.", "On April 28, 2015, Council authorized a contract with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for design services (Attachment A) for the City Services Building. The design services are currently in process with completion of construction anticipated for the third or fourth quarter of 2020.", "As contemplated in the City Services Feasibility Study (Attachment B), the City would develop a \u201cone stop\u201d City Hall complex, consolidating services that would include a permit counter, housing counter, and space for other city departments. As part of the effort, all but one of the City workgroups that currently lease privately owned office space would eventually move into the new City Services Building and City Hall for the purposes of centralizing services and eliminating leasing costs in the future. The other City workgroup, the Water Resources Division in Public Works, would move to the City Yards as part of the Modernization Plan in 2021. The four off-site City leases are briefly summarized below:", "Leased Office Space", "Department / Division", "Served", "Council Authorization", "Lease Expiration", "Leased Square Footage", "1433 Fourth Street, Suite 300", "Public Works / Engineering and Architecture Services Divisions", "Sept. 26, 2006", "(Attachment C)", "April 30, 2017", "7,751 sq. ft.", "1433 Fourth Street, Suite 310", "Community and Cultural Services /", "Cultural Affairs Division", "Feb. 13, 2007", "(Attachment D)", "July 31, 2017", "1,107 sq. ft.", "1901 Main Street", "Housing and Economic Development, part of  Information Systems", "Jan. 8, 2008", "(Attachment E)", "April 30, 2018", "13,386 sq. ft.", "1212 Fifth Street, Suite 300", "Public Works / Water Resources Division", "July 12, 2011", "(Attachment F)", "Jan. 31, 2017", "4,140 sq. ft.", "The City also leases space at 1717 Fourth Street, which serves the Finance Department and Office of Sustainability and the Environment. Because the lease for the site expires in 2020, a lease extension is not necessary at this time.", "In addition to being a lessee, the City owns and leases properties. In 2006, the City acquired a small office building at 1632 5th Street as a part of the land assemblage within the block bounded by Fourth Street, Fifth Street, Colorado Avenue, and Olympic Boulevard for future public purposes including light rail transit, parking, affordable housing, or other public uses. At the time of acquisition, the building was occupied by a single tenant and the City assumed the tenant\u2019s lease. The long-term tenant has provided notice that they will move out by November 30, 2016. At this time, there are no immediate plans for redevelopment of the site.", "Discussion", "Given the off-site City workgroups\u2019 needs for office space until the City Services Building and City Yards space is completed, staff studied the costs and benefits of occupying the City-owned building at 1632 5th Street for City purposes, as well as extending and modifying the existing leases. Staff\u2019s analysis has demonstrated that the estimated costs of the City\u2019s off-site workgroups relocating and temporarily occupying the City-owned building exceeds the benefits the City would gain in occupying the building. The following summary describes the recommendations associated with each property.", "1632 5th St.", "The City-owned property at 1632 5th St. (5th St. Building) is a four-story office building with two levels (one below grade) of parking providing 39 spaces and approximately 13,125 square feet of net usable Class B office space. The building was designed to accommodate a residence on the top floor, though that space has been modified for office use. The office tenant at the 5th St. Building has given notice and will vacate the property by November30,2016. The City receives annual rental revenues of approximately $675,000 from the property.", "Staff studied the feasibility of relocating off-site workgroups to the 5th St. Building; however, it is too small to serve the Housing and Economic Development (HED) Department, and its configuration would not accommodate the direct customer service functions of HED. Staff evaluated the costs of relocation and tenant improvements to occupy the building for any of the other three off-site City workgroups. The City\u2019s Engineering and Architecture Services (AES) Divisions estimated that, at minimum, relocation costs would be approximately $125,000 for each workgroup and an initial capital investment of at least $400,000 would be necessary to make basic tenant improvements such as painting and City network connections to the building. AES also indicated that depending on the tenant improvements required for occupancy, the 5th St. Building may need to meet current building and safety standards, including Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) improvements and seismic upgrades that are estimated at a minimum of $4.0 million. Potential savings in occupancy costs would not warrant the short-term investment to comply with current ADA and seismic standards, particularly if private tenants could occupy the space without significant investment.", "Staff also evaluated the amount of lease revenue that could be produced from the continued lease of the 5th St. Building in the current market.  Based on recent prevailing market lease rates of $4 to $5 per square foot for Class B office space, the building could generate approximately $800,000 to $1,000,000 in annual lease revenues for theCity. The lease terms could be structured with provisions that the tenant accept the property in an \u201cas-is\u201d condition, with no warranty and full responsibility for all building maintenance and expenses. Discussions with brokers who are active in the area have indicated that there are a variety of tenants who are willing to lease space without making significant improvements.  The net result of leasing the space is that the City would not need to fund tenant improvements, maintenance, or operational expenses nor incur relocation costs and would receive a lease revenue stream to help off-set leasing costs elsewhere.", "1437 Fourth Street", "The lease for 1437 Fourth Street, Suite300 expires on April 30, 2017 and has no additional options to extend. Theproperty owner has agreed to extend the lease term for three years with an additional one-year option, allowing the City to extend the lease as far as April 30, 2021. The annual lease payment and associated parking expense would be $488,313 for the first year of the extended term. All other terms and conditions in the lease would remain ineffect.", "The lease for 1437 Fourth Street, Suite 310 expires on July 31, 2017 and has no additional options to extend. The property owner has agreed to extend the lease for three years with an additional one-year option, allowing the City to extend the lease as far as July31, 2021. The annual lease payment and parking expense would be $69,741 for the first year of the extended term. All other terms and conditions in the lease would remain ineffect.", "1212 Fifth Street", "The 1212 Fifth Street lease expires on January 31, 2017 and has no additional options to extend. The property owner has agreed to extend the lease term for three years with two, one-year options, allowing the City to extend the lease as far as January 31, 2022. The annual lease payment and parking expense for the first year of the lease extension would be $205,692. All other terms and conditions in the lease would remain in effect.", "1901 Main Street", "The lease for 1901 Main Street expires on May 1, 2018 and provides a five-year option to extend until May 1, 2023.  Under the current lease term, the City would need to exercise its option to extend in 2018, but that would commit the City to an additional five years, extending the lease three years beyond the relocation date into the City Services Building. Therefore, staff has been in discussions with the property owner to modify the lease term and option period to align with the relocation into the City Service Building. The property owner has agreed to extend the base term by two years with a one-year option, allowing the City to extend the lease as far as April 30, 2021. The annual lease payment and associated parking expense would be $962,458 beginning May 1, 2018. All other terms and conditions in the lease would remain in effect.", "By negotiating extensions to the current leases, the City is able to extend and align the expiration of the lease terms with the move-in period for the City Services Building and City Yards. The estimated costs related to the off-site workgroups\u2019 temporarily relocating and occupying the 5th Street Building exceeds the benefits the City would gain leasing the property in \u201cas-is\u201d condition for approximately $800,000 to $1,000,000 annually.", "Based on the known and the unknown costs for the City to occupy 1632 Fifth Street, staff recommends seeking private tenants to lease the building. The projected lease revenue would off-set a portion of the expense for the City offices that are in leased space. To implement the leasing, staff would seek real estate brokerage services to help market and lease the building and return to Council for approval to enter into a professional services agreement.", "Alternative Actions", "As an alternative to the recommended actions above, Council could consider the following options:", "1. The City could pursue alternative office locations to lease rather than extend the leases in the current occupied office spaces. However, the City would incur the costs of relocation twice in moving from the current office space to an interim office space before the final relocation into the City Services Building. In addition, the lease rates proposed in the extensions are comparable within the market. Savings may not be realized as current fair market lease rates are expected to remain competitive. Additionally, the City could incur additional expenses to build out new tenant improvements in an interim office space. As a result, the costs to lease new office spaces may exceed the costs to extend the current leases.", "2. The City-owned 5thSt. Building could be retained for City use and not leased out. However, staff\u2019sevaluation demonstrates that there is no significant economic benefit to invest in relocating and improving the 5thSt. Building for any of the four off-site City workgroups. In addition, there are currently no other City office needs that would require using the building for City use now or in the near future. Staff proposes to lease the 5thSt. Building for a term of three years and offer two, one-year options at the City\u2019s sole discretion which would provide the City with the rights and flexibility to occupy the building in the mid-term if needed.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action as a result of the recommended action. If Council authorizes staff to negotiate and execute lease modifications, staff would seek appropriate budget adjustments during the 2017-19 Biennial Budget adoption."]}, {"Title": "Consultant for Multiuser Microgrid Design Services under California Energy Commission Grant", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #83 to Arup North America, Ltd., a California\u2013based company, for professional services to aid in design and development of the proposed microgrid at the City Yards and Bergamot Station; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Arup North America, Ltd., a California\u2013based company, for professional services to aid in design and development of the proposed microgrid at the City Yards and Bergamot Station in an amount not to exceed $1,114,752 over a 2-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On March 25, 2016, the City of Santa Monica received a grant award of approximately $1.5M from the California Energy Commission for its Santa Monica Advanced Energy District project proposal. The intent of the project is to integrate a small, localized energy grid (microgrid), consisting of onsite renewable generation and energy storage, based at the City Yards and Bergamot Arts Center. This microgrid would provide efficient, reliable, cost-effective energy that has a low environmental and carbon impact. On July 7, 2016, City staff published a Request for Proposals to provide multiuser microgrid design services as required by the Office of Sustainability and the Environment. Staff recommends Council approve the selection of Arup North America, Ltd. and authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Arup for a total amount not to exceed $1,114,752.", "Background", "On November 24, 2015, the California Energy Commission (CEC) released a grant funding opportunity entitled \u201cThe EPIC Challenge: Accelerating the Deployment of Advanced Energy Communities.\u201d  On February 17, 2016, staff submitted an application to the CEC. On March 25, 2016, the CEC issued a notice of proposed awards, naming the City as one of several grant recipients in the State. On June 14, 2016, Council adopted a resolution to accept the grant award.", "This grant is a part of a two-part grant program in which Phase I funds up to a maximum of $1.5M are to be used to plan, design and permit projects that incorporate local renewable energy generation, grid reliability and community energy resilience. A Phase II grant will be issued in early 2018, which would fund up to $8M for construction of such a project. This is a separate competitive grant process that would be available to all Phase I recipients, including the City.", "Discussion", "The traditional utility grid \u2013 where large centralized power plants transmit energy in one direction \u2013 is currently undergoing a major transformation. As local energy resources like rooftop solar and energy storage systems continue to proliferate, utility-scale assets like power plants, power lines and transformers, are giving way to smaller-scale systems that are privately owned by the energy users themselves. Local energy resources provide local benefits to the users by providing lower costs of energy, reliability and control over energy sources. These local energy resources also have the ability to provide benefits to the utility grid that reduce the need for large-scale power plants, distribution lines and substations, and accommodate local control of energy systems. Planning for local energy resources can help to solve many issues as increasing local energy generation, electric vehicle charging, and plug loads continue to transform and stress the aging electric grid infrastructure.", "The CEC grant solicitation called for applicants to propose measures to plan, design and permit projects that:", "\u00b7 Minimize need for new energy infrastructure costs, such as transmission and distribution upgrades.", "\u00b7 Provide energy savings by achieving and maintaining zero net energy community status (accounting for behavior and increasing loads from vehicle and appliance electrification).", "\u00b7 Support grid reliability and resiliency by incorporating technologies such as energy storage.", "\u00b7 Are financially attractive from a market standpoint (developers, home buyers, renters).", "\u00b7 Provide affordable access to renewable energy generation, energy efficiency upgrades, and water efficiency and reuse technologies that reduce electricity consumption for all electric ratepayers within the community.", "\u00b7 Makes use of smart-grid technologies throughout the community.", "The City applied for and was awarded a grant of $1,487,609 to design and develop a multiuser microgrid, known as the Santa Monica Advanced Energy District, which would be based at the City Yards facility. This multiuser microgrid would be designed, developed and incorporated into the City Yards Modernization Project.", "The Santa Monica Advanced Energy District is an important and valuable element of the anticipated redevelopment approach and planned use of the City Yards and surrounding areas. By integrating site-based renewable energy sources, like rooftop solar, with emergency power capability, battery storage and sophisticated load management technologies through a microgrid-based design, this project would provide robust resiliency features and disaster preparedness to critical municipal services located at the City Yards.", "The project would utilize four strategies to establish a multiuser microgrid. First, the City would own and operate its own microgrid, serving the City Yards facility. Second, the City would work with Worthe Development Group at the City-owned Bergamot Arts Center, through the entitlement and development agreement process to possibly connect that project to the City Yards microgrid and possibly expand the microgrid to the Bergamot Arts Center. While not critical to success of the microgrid project, establishing the requirements and protocol for the private development would provide a foundation for future integration. Thirdly, a master plan for this area would be developed to delineate the integration and interconnection between the City, the public and the utility. And finally, the City would explore the feasibility to incentivize, construct and generate retail power supply as part of a broader community choice energy program. Under this model, community choice aggregation (CCA) could afford the City the opportunity to build and supply excess renewable energy to CCA customers.", "Contractor Selection", "On July 7, 2016, City staff published a Notice Inviting Bids to provide multiuser microgrid design services in accordance with City specifications. The Request for Proposals was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 44 vendors downloaded the request for proposals documents. Five responses were received and publicly opened on July 28. The five responses were from Arup North America, Ltd, DNV-GL, Integral Group, Base Energy and Solar Forward.", "The proposals were evaluated based on experience, technical competence, ability to meet the proposed work plan timelines, references and cost of services.", "A selection committee consisting of representatives from the Office of Sustainability and the Environment and the Public Works Department reviewed the applications and scored all responsive proposals on August 18, 2016. The final scores were averaged and then used to select the winning bidder: Arup.", "Arup was selected based on its technical experience in advanced distributed energy planning and project management, as well as its cost of services. Arup has designed or is designing micro-grids and advanced energy systems around the world and has significant expertise in this field. Current projects include the design of the largest privately-owned microgrid in the USA, currently under development in Northern California and a community-based micro-grid in Cambridge, MA. Arup has been involved in power generation and alternative energy systems for more than 20 years, including the design of micro-grids, renewable energy systems, co-generation and tri-generation systems, energy storage and the planning of advanced approaches to infrastructure for communities around the world. Arup has extensive current and past experience in assessing and implementing advanced energy systems at the building, community and city level. Located in Playa Vista, Arup\u2019s proximity to Santa Monica for close collaboration will provide a great value to the project and to the existing City Yards project team. This also limits the amount of grant funding that would be spent on travel for other firms that required air travel. Arup will provide high-level planning, engineering, and energy analysis across all involved project sites as well as transaction advisory services to identify the governance and financial organization for a multiuser microgrid based within the City Yards.", "Arup\u2019s team of subconsultants consists of UC Irvine\u2019s Advanced Power and Energy Program (UCI), Energy Environment Economics (E3) and ICLEI \u2013 Local Governments for Sustainability (ICLEI). UCI provides industry expertise and field research covering the utilization of local energy resources, like solar, battery storage and connected and controllable energy loads from a systems perspective. Arup will provide an analysis of the various microgrid scenarios considered on this project, including the preparation of load flow simulations, and what role electric vehicle charging can play in the project. They will also provide support during interactions with Southern California Edison, with regards to how the microgrid will interact with Edison\u2019s utility grid. E3 will perform cost-benefit analysis for the various microgrid scenarios, in line with the California Standard Practice Manual for cost-effectiveness evaluation. Value implications would be focused on the participants of the microgrid, nonparticipating ratepayers, the utility and society as a whole. ICLEI provides a global network and tools for local governments leading in climate change and sustainability efforts. ICLEI also supports the climate action planning tools that are used by the City and that of hundreds of other local governments around the world. ICLEI will conduct research on successful microgrids, district energy plans, and barriers to microgrid/district energy development in order to inform the design of this project. ICLEI will also document the project process, prepare case studies, prepare an outreach plan and support the City in sharing its grant-funded efforts. ICLEI's climate action planning tools will also be tested to better understand the GHG emissions impact from microgrids.", "Arup, and its team, will liaise and collaborate with the existing City Yards redevelopment design-build contractor, Hathaway Dinwiddie, to incorporate the additional considerations necessary for a microgrid. Grant funds in the amount of $372,857 will support the additional scope of work and budget for Hathaway Dinwiddie and its project team beyond what has been proposed in their guaranteed maximum price bid. This will be incorporated into the guaranteed maximum price for design that will be presented to Council for approval along with the City Yards feasibility study later this year. All activities described will be fully funded by the grant from the CEC.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Arup North America, Ltd. is for an amount not to exceed $1,114,752. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. The agreement will be charged to CEC grant expense account C209195.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Purchase of Specialized Response Vehicle - Revision", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to submit a certification letter to the California Office of Emergency Services (Cal OES) to participate in the California Public Safety. Procurement Program (1122 Program), which would allow the purchase of a Specialized Response Vehicle from Lenco Industries, Inc., a Massachusetts-based company, for a total amount not to exceed $316,701; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 (b) Competitive bid procedures have already been utilized, such as in purchasing from Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, or from cooperative purchasing agencies consisting of such agencies, and these materials and services are supplied to the City at the same or better price, as was obtained through competitive bid procedures of Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, or cooperative purchasing agencies consisting of such agencies.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "We live in a time of vulnerability to global terrorism and domestic gun violence.  Events such as the Boston Marathon bombing and the recent San Bernardino terrorist attack demonstrate that an incident of terrorism can happen anywhere. Additionally, the spree shooting incident, which occurred in Santa Monica on June 7, 2013, brought home the importance of well-trained and appropriately equipped first response personnel. The Police Department continues to train its officers to be prepared to respond to a variety of potential incidents. The Department also continually reviews and assesses its emergency response inventory to ensure the proper equipment is in place and is readily available should the need arise. The Police Department has identified the need to replace a decades old emergency response vehicle with a more contemporary specialized response vehicle. The proposed vehicle would enable first response personnel to enter highly dangerous and dynamic environments to rescue members of the public or downed officers with minimal risk.", "The Santa Monica Police Department previously anticipated procuring a Specialized Response Vehicle directly from Lenco Industries, Inc. (Lenco), as stated in the staff report dated May 24, 2016. Staff is recommending instead that Santa Monica certify under the California Public Safety Procurement Program (1122 Program) and procure the vehicle from Lenco Industries, Inc. via the 1122 Program. This is a requirement of the UASI grant program and ensures access to the most competitive pricing. Under the 1122 program, Santa Monica would be certified to use pricing available from Federal General Services Administration contracts. Under this revised purchasing approach, the vendor and equipment would remain the same, but the ordering and payment would work differently. The California Office of Emergency Services (Cal OES) has been designated as the Lead Agency for the California 1122 Public Safety Procurement Program (1122 Program). Under the 1122 program, Cal OES would facilitate placing the order and making payment once the equipment has been delivered. This means that instead of Santa Monica entering into a contract and paying Lenco directly, Santa Monica will instead place the order through Cal OES. This method of procurement meets all Santa Monica and UASI grant procurement guidelines.", "Consistent with the May 24th staff report, the proposed specialized vehicle would be constructed by Lenco Industries, Inc. Lenco Industries, Inc. has built hundreds of specialized response vehicles and is widely regarded as an industry leader in the construction of these vehicles. Lenco Industries, Inc. provides different options which allow the custom design of the vehicle to meet current and future Police Department needs. Based upon the proposed design and the ability to purchase the vehicle using competitive pricing available from a pre-existing GSA contract via the 1122 Program, staff recommends award of the contract to Lenco Industries, Inc. in the amount of $316,701.", "Background", "Recent events of terrorism and mass shootings have highlighted the need for local law enforcement to be well prepared to respond to those incidents which pose a substantial threat to public safety. Specialized response vehicles provide law enforcement with a unique tool to better protect the public. Last year, the tragic events in San Bernardino, California demonstrated the value of these specialized response vehicles. These vehicles can be used to evacuate members of the public, or, if necessary, rescue injured members of the public or officers during incidents involving active shootings. During the San Bernardino incident, the world watched live images of local law enforcement agencies using various specialized rescue vehicles to rescue members of the public who were trapped in offices during an extremely dangerous, evolving situation; these vehicles were also instrumental in enabling the officers to safely engage and stop the threat posed by heavily armed suspects who were intent on committing more mayhem even as they attempted to escape.  Specialized response vehicles can be used to safely deliver officers, medical personnel, and needed life-safety equipment to those areas where in-progress shooting or other mass casualty incident is occurring. The use of a specialized response vehicle under these circumstances enables a rapid response while minimizing the risk of injury or death to responding public safety personnel. In addition to the tactical benefits, these vehicles are equipped to detect Chemical, Biological, Radiologic, Nuclear and Explosive (CBRNE) materials thereby enabling first response personnel to enter affected areas that would otherwise be inaccessible without significant risk.", "In 2006, the Police Department obtained a High Mobility Multipurpose Wheeled Vehicle (HMMWV), commonly referred to as a Humvee, through what was then known as the Department of Defense, Defense Reutilization and Marketing Office (DRMO) program. The program enabled the military to transfer surplus equipment that would otherwise not be available or would be cost prohibitive for local law enforcement agencies to acquire. The Police Department obtained the used vehicle and modified it to maximize its usefulness as an urban rescue and transport vehicle. As the vehicle has aged, replacement parts have become more difficult and more costly to obtain, resulting in the vehicle being out of service for extended periods of time.", "In order to address these challenges, Santa Monica PD applied for and was initially granted $200,000 in UASI grant funding for a specialized response vehicle. At a later date, through a modification, an additional $10,000 was granted. The grant funds were accepted by Council on March 22, 2016. In addition to funds of $210,000 available from the grant, the project also required a budget transfer of $106,701 from operating account 01304.544010 to CIP account C019139.589000. On May 24, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Lenco for the vehicle purchase. Action is required to now procure the vehicle differently, via the 1122 program.", "When Santa Monica previously planned to buy the vehicle directly, the plan was to use competitive pricing from the pre-existing GSA contract. However, the grant procurement guidelines require that the purchase go through the Cal OES 1122 program in order to use the pre-existing GSA contract pricing in the amount of $316,701.", "Discussion", "Specialized Response Vehicle", "A specialized response vehicle would provide the Police Department with the ready capability to enter a variety of dangerous or hazardous situations while also providing the appropriate level of protection for the first response personnel. This vehicle can also serve in a rescue capacity, allowing public safety personnel to enter dangerous situations in order to render aid by extracting downed officers or injured citizens who cannot get to safety.", "The proposed vehicle would be able to transport up to 12 first response personnel, including paramedics. This heavy-duty, wheeled vehicle, constructed with ballistic materials capable of withstanding high-capacity rifle fire, would be used to enter those dynamically evolving circumstances constituting a direct and immediate threat to public safety. The proposed vehicle would also be fully equipped to detect CBRNE materials thereby enabling emergency services personnel to safely enter an area to mitigate a potential threat associated with dangerous materials.", "The proposed vehicle, funded in part by the 2015 Urban Areas Security Initiative (UASI) grant, would be considered a regional asset to be operated by the City\u2019s first response personnel in accordance with established mutual aid response protocols which require a response to critical incidents occurring in neighboring communities.", "California 1122 Public Safety Procurement Program", "The California Office of Emergency Services (Cal OES) has been designated as the Lead Agency for the California 1122 Public Safety Procurement Program (1122 Program). This authority is derived from The National Defense Authorization Act (Section 1122), which provides authority for state and local governments to purchase equipment for counter-drug, homeland security and emergency response activities from specific federal sources, including General Services Administration (GSA) contracts, which is what the Police Department would utilize for this project. The 1122 Program is a valuable opportunity for local governments throughout the country to participate and save substantial dollars for their counter-drug, homeland security and emergency response activities. The federal contracts in the 1122 program all satisfy the requirements of the Competition in Contracting Act.", "A purchasing advantage is achieved through discounts that are available to the Federal Government due to large volume purchases. In this instance, the Police Department endeavors to use the 1122 program to purchase a specialized response vehicle utilizing GSA pricing available from Lenco Industries, Inc.", "In order to use the CA 1122 program for purchases, the qualifying agency making the purchase, the Police Department, would request certification within the 1122 program. Once certified, staff would provide Cal OES with the order details and Cal OES would place the order. Santa Monica would provide advance transfer of funds to cover the purchase request before the requisition for equipment is forwarded to the vendor by the 1122 Program staff. Cal OES would handle vendor payment once the equipment is delivered and confirmed to be working.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Lenco Industries, Inc., furnish and deliver a state-of-the-art specialized response vehicle. The purchase would be made through the Cal OES 1122 Program, which allows Santa Monica to make the purchase based on the GSA contract. This item has already been competitively bid by the Federal Government and ensures a purchasing advantage due to the large volume purchases made by the Federal Government that are reflected in the GSA pricing. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 (b).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase to be made from Lenco Industries, Inc., through the Cal OES 1122 Program, is for an amount not to exceed $316,701. In addition to funds of $200,000 available in CIP account C209139.589000 and $106,701 in CIP account C019139.589000, the purchase requires a budget transfer of $10,000 from account 20304.555409 to C209139.589000: The purchase will be charged to the following accounts:", "C209139.589000", "$210,000", "C019139.589000", "$106,701", "TOTAL", "$316,701"]}, {"Title": "2016 Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1.  Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $7,710.68 from the United States Department of Justice (US DOJ) for the 2016 Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP) grant;2.  Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant; and3.  Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) has been awarded a two-year grant of $7,710.68 from the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ), Bureau of Justice Administration (BJA) as part of the 2016 Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP) grant program. This grant would reimburse SMPD for 50 percent of the cost of approximately twenty replacement bulletproof vests purchased under the program. Funds must be spent by August 31, 2018.", "Discussion", "The Bulletproof Vest Partnership (BVP), created by the Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant Act of 1998, is a unique U.S. Department of Justice initiative designed to provide a critical resource to state and local law enforcement.", "Since 1999, more than 13,000 jurisdictions have participated in the BVP Program, with more than $412 million in federal funds committed to support the purchase of an estimated 1.2 million bulletproof vests. The Office of Justice Programs BJA administers the BVP Program.", "Bulletproof vests save lives by protecting officers from gunfire. The vests are an important resource for officer safety, which was one of the six main pillars identified in the Final Report of the President\u2019s Task Force on 21st Century Policing released in 2015. The report states that every law enforcement officer should be provided with a bulletproof vest and that all law enforcement agencies should adopt policies that require officers to wear bulletproof vests.", "The Santa Monica Police Department currently provides a vest to every law enforcement officer and has a policy mandating that officers wear the vests. The City has been a recipient of these grant funds previously in 2006, 2010 and 2013 - 2015. These grant funds would help SMPD to continue to meet the mission of providing every law enforcement officer with a bulletproof vest. The 2016 program funding would provide for approximately 20 replacement vests. Bulletproof vests are on a three year replacement cycle because of the degradation of the Kevlar from repetitive use; additionally, body moisture reduces the vest's ability to maintain the threat level guaranteed, a circumstance that voids the manufacturer's warranty. The current grant award of $7,710.68 would support the purchase of the vests through August 2018.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $7,710.68 grant from the US Department of Justice Bulletproof Vest Partnership requires the following FY 2016-17 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20304.403753 in the amount of $7,710.68.", "2. Appropriate $7,710.68 to account 20304.578853 to reflect receipt of the US Department of Justice Bulletproof Vest Partnership Grant."]}, {"Title": "Modification to the Water-efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the Resolution Updating Water-Efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards referenced in Chapter 8.108 Subpart A to implement new landscaping, irrigation and water conservation requirements.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Water-Efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards are a companion document to the Green Building Ordinance and include prescriptive requirements for the design, installation, and maintenance of landscapes to reduce water use. The current Green Building Ordinance, Chapter 8.108 Subpart A and the attached proposed 2016 Water- Efficient Landscape Standards (Standards) (Attachment A), exceed the State\u2019s Model Water Efficient Landscape Ordinance requirements in order to further reduce landscape water use by as much as 30% in new development, re-landscape projects, and maintenance of existing landscapes. These proposed changes would allow new innovative irrigation devices, broaden the use of alternate water supplies, and clarify specific requirements for the design, installation, and maintenance of public and private landscaping and irrigation. The companion resolution makes local climatic, geological or topographical findings which support the adoption of the proposed Standards. These updates will enable the City to meet established goals for climate and sustainability established in the Sustainable City Plan and the Sustainable Water Master Plan.", "Background", "The City of Santa Monica has a history of adopting local requirements to advance sustainability in the built environment that exceed state minimum requirements. The Green Building Ordinance, Subpart A sets definitions and applicability for landscaping and irrigation regulations in new developments, re-landscape projects and existing landscaping. The Standards are a companion document to the Green Building Ordinance and include prescriptive requirements for the design, installation, and maintenance of landscapes to reduce water use.", "On April 22, 2008, Council adopted the Green Building Ordinance 8.108, Subpart B relating to landscape and irrigation regulations that promote the use of climate-appropriate plants and water-efficient irrigation systems.", "On September 10, 2009, the State adopted the Model Water Efficient Landscape Ordinance (MWELO) in Chapter 2.7 (commencing with Section 490) of Division 2 of the Department of Water Resources Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations which regulates the types of plants and irrigation equipment that can be installed in new or modified private and public landscape projects that are 2,500 square feet or larger.", "On December 8, 2009, Council adopted modifications to that Ordinance and adopted the Water-Efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards (Standards) to comply with the State MWELO.", "On December 13, 2011, Council adopted modifications to the Green Building Ordinance to include exemptions for landscapes in registered historical sites, botanical gardens, and arboretums to clarify definitions and acceptable water-saving equipment.", "On April 1, 2015, the Governor\u2019s Executive Action B-29-15 required the Department of Water Resources to update the State MWELO through an expedited process to limit the amount of turf in landscapes and make landscapes more water-efficient.", "On July 15, 2015, the State MWELO was updated in compliance with the Governor\u2019s Executive Action B-29-15. Santa Monica\u2019s existing Water Efficient Landscape Ordinance was already as effective as the updated State MWELO.", "On October 27, 2015, Council adopted modifications to the Green Building Ordinance, including changing the landscaping requirements from Subpart B to Subpart A and to simplify plan check, ban new sprinkler systems, limit high and moderate water use plants to no more than 40% of the total landscape area, require dedicated landscape meters, and require specific types of leak detection equipment and other irrigation devices.", "Discussion", "Over the past year, several homeowners, landscape architects, landscape designers, irrigation manufacturers, green roof manufactures, and City staff from Public Landscaping and Engineering Division met with OSE staff to discuss various aspects of the Standards. All of these individuals and companies wanted to provide solutions to help themselves and/or others better comply with the intent of the Standards. The discussions focused on clarification of definitions, applicability, plant choices, and/or irrigation devices. As a result, OSE staff included their suggestions into an updated draft. These recommendations were presented to the American Society of Landscape Architects chapter meeting on July 28, 2016 and to the Task Force on the Environment on September 19, 2016. Feedback was incorporated into the proposed Standards found in Attachment A.", "Staff is now proposing minor changes to the Water-Efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards to clarify definitions, allow a broader range of new water-saving irrigation devices, promote non-potable water supplies, and allow the installation of specific plants and trees appropriate for the climate and local conditions. A landscape that is designed using these new and existing prescriptive measures ensure that only the most water-saving devices and climate-appropriate plants are installed. Landscape water budget calculations based on these requirements show at minimum a 30% savings compared to traditional landscapes. These changes will provide clear direction to individuals designing landscapes and those checking plans, would allow for landscape design flexibility, and encourage the use of innovative water-savings irrigation devices.", "Proposed Modifications to the Water-Efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards", "Proposed Modification", "Reason For Proposed Modification", "Clarify the water feature definition to include non-submerged vertical surface area as part of the 25 square feet limitation calculation and include ponds to distinguish it from other water elements in the landscape.", "Clarifying the surface area of water features provides clear direction to designers submitting plans. Including ponds in the definition of a water feature will distinguish it from other water elements in the landscape and will eliminate the need for a cover, so that for instance, a koi pond would not need a cover to comply with safety regulations.", "Allow alternative leak detection devices to be used in lieu of master valves and flow sensors for all public and private landscaping.", "New technologies are emerging that provide effective leak detection capabilities at lower costs than traditional equipment currently required in the Standards.", "Require dedicated landscape meters for all commercial landscapes and residential landscapes with over 5,000 square feet of irrigated landscape area.", "Requiring dedicated landscape meters for large projects with irrigation may incentivize customers to save water by designing landscapes that require less irrigation; thereby, eliminating the need for a dedicated irrigation meter. Dedicated irrigation meters cost about $2,500.", "Allow overhead irrigation for green roof landscapes when using an approved alternative water source.", "Holistic landscaping including green roofs can provide multiple benefits such as increased insulation and stormwater retention. However, the additional water use could be offset by using alternate water supplies such as rainwater. These systems typically function better with spray irrigation compared to drip irrigation.", "Only ban locally invasive plant material that presents a specific threat to Santa Monica and its surrounding natural environment.", "There are some species of plants that are listed as invasive plants but have not proven to have an environmental impact in Santa Monica, such as Mexican Fan Palm which is a tree installed in many public parks, open spaces, and parkways.", "Remove ambiguous turf prohibition language that applies to \u201cnarrow and irregularly shaped\u201d areas ten feet wide or less.", "Clarifies direction for the designer and plan checker.", "Remove precipitation rate limit on irrigation emission devices for new Public Landscape and Commercial projects.", "Provides design flexibility to allow for larger selection of high-efficiency nozzles and potential rebate funding.", "For trees only, allow stream bubbler devices that pop up from underground heads to deliver water at or near ground level in order to assist tree feeder root development.", "Provides design flexibility to allow for larger selection of irrigation devices that are suited for watering trees efficiently and effectively.", "The proposed modifications listed above would strengthen the ordinance by clarifying requirements, allowing new and innovative technologies, promoting alternate water supplies, and providing clear direction to designers and plan checkers. Lastly, allowing newer water-saving technologies will provide design, installation, and maintenance flexibility. The updated Standards and plan submittal checklist would be posted on the City\u2019s website. Training for City staff and landscape professionals would be conducted after adoption of the Standards. These updates would also be included in the installation guidelines for the sustainable landscape rebate program.", "The attached Green Building Ordinance Evidence of Record 2015 (Attachment B) summarizes how the City\u2019s Ordinance and Standards comply with the State MWELO requirements. The Evidence of Record is required when modifications are made to the Green Building Ordinance, Subpart A and/or the Water-Efficient Landscape and Irrigation Standards.", "Policy Options", "As an alternative to adopting these proposed modifications to the Standards, the City could keep the current Standards or adopt the State Model Water Efficient Landscape Ordinance. The MWELO includes many of the prescriptive measures in the current and proposed Standards but sets a lower minimum water savings threshold. The modifications proposed are minor and would not affect the efficacy of water-savings. They are primarily intended to provide design flexibility and clarification of definitions.", "Task Force on the Environment Action", "On September 19, 2016, the Task Force on the Environment unanimously approved the recommendations listed in this staff report.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Design Contract Modification for Transportation and Parking Services Center Project (TAPS) at Parking Structure No. 5", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to Agreement #10044 (CCS), in the amount of $150,000, with Studio Jantzen Corporation, a California-based company, for additional design services for the Transportation and Parking Services Center Project (TAPS) at Parking Structure No. 5. This will result in an amended agreement, with a new total amount not to exceed $484,299, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is constructing a Transit and Parking Services Center (TAPS) on the ground floor of Parking Structure No. 5, located at 1440 4th Street, to provide one-stop shop services to the public for parking and transit-related business. Studio Jantzen was selected to provide design services for the project. A modification to the professional services agreement would provide for additional ground-level tenant improvement design and construction administration services. The additional design services are needed because coordinating the new trellis structure, restroom plumbing, and head clearance issues within the existing building proved more complex and revisions are required to modify the project\u2019s final design. The agreement modification to be awarded to Studio Jantzen is $150,000 with a new total amount not to exceed $484,299.", "Background", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A), the City Council authorized executing a professional services agreement with Studio Jantzen in an amount not to exceed $252,698 for the Transit and Parking Services Center (TAPS) project. Studio Jantzen commenced design work on June 25, 2015. Both the schematic and design development phases for the tenant improvement scope of work are complete. Project scope of work included public counters and offices for Big Blue Bus staff and Transit & Parking Services staff, new public restrooms in Parking Structure No. 5, improvements to the parking structure facility street facade, and overall pedestrian experience improvements. The TAPS Center project would provide public services and restroom facilities within close proximity to the Expo Light Rail Terminus Station.", "On October 13, 2015, the Parking Structure No. 5 facade design was presented to Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) for review and to collect input. DTSM requested additional facade work including a public art element to enliven the space during evening hours.", "In January 2016, the Parking Structure No. 5 facade design was presented to the Architectural Review Board and direction was provided to better address the existing art in place by Cliff Garten.", "Studio Jantzen redesigned the facade/public art elements. In April 2016, Studio Jantzen presented the updated Parking Structure No. 5 fa\u00e7ade design to the Architectural Review Board, and the revised facade was approved.", "To date, two modifications were completed. One was to add contingency funds to the contract within the not to exceed Council approved amount. The other modification", "authorized additional design services in the amount of $81,601 for a total not to exceed amount of $334,299, per Attachment B. Based on Studio Jantzen\u2019s structural assessment of Parking Structure No. 5, the additional design services included extensive grading changes, survey services, design changes, and incorporating revisions to the fa\u00e7ade design approved by the Architectural Review Board.", "Discussion", "Constructed in 1969, Parking Structure No. 5 was not originally built for ground-level occupied space. In the 1980s, the structure was retrofitted for multiple retail tenants to occupy the ground-level space. The TAPS Center project goals are to rebuild the parking structure ground floor to satisfy the new tenant requirements, and to provide enhanced public amenities like restrooms and an improved pedestrian experience while meeting all applicable codes and ordinances.", "In order to meet the new tenant requirements, public restrooms and pedestrian experience, the scope of work has increased and requires the removal of all existing tenant walls, floor slabs, and nonstructural elevation elements. The Parking Structure No. 5 ground-floor fa\u00e7ade would be pushed out to the sidewalk for the TAPS Center project. The head height clearances between the floor slab and above structural beams have required extensive surveying to identify all areas where clearances do not meet building codes requiring modification. Additionally, numerous ramps and stairs have been added to create the floor level changes required to meet building codes.  The new public restrooms increase the volume of water required in this area, and therefore requires new water lines and sewer lines to be installed to the building. The facade relocation has created issues in regards to waterproofing and structural connections that require additional detailing. Coordination of interior floor heights and sidewalk elevations have necessitated more survey work. Costs for survey services, design changes, extensive grading changes and facade treatments have exceeded initial estimates and therefore require this modification. Moving the ground-floor facade to the sidewalk addresses a primary goal for the TAPS project to improve the pedestrian experience by eliminating the dark, recessed access to the ground-floor spaces.", "Contrasted with the originally proposed scope of work, the Studio Jantzen project team has identified additional changes required in final design and construction administration services based upon structural assessments. Because of the numerous slab heights and low structural beams, the coordination of building systems (air ducts, plumbing lines, electrical and data conduits and lighting) was complicated. The coordination of new floor slab levels with existing foundation footing heights had to be reworked based upon surveys of actual conditions. The new facade treatments necessitated coordination with the existing fa\u00e7ade.  Also, the addition of the public restrooms increased plumbing scope. New supply and waste infrastructure had to be installed from third court to the facility to accommodate the new volume of use.", "In preparation for the TAPS Center project scope of work, staff investigated existing conditions.  This work was completed while the Parking Structure No. 5 facility was occupied which prevented thorough investigation. The idiosyncrasies of the building structure were not apparent. These unforeseen issues caused additional work to complete the final design.", "It is anticipated that additional consultant hours will be needed for greater oversight during construction due to the non-conforming structure. Modifying the professional services agreement contract with Studio Jantzen would ensure the additional project scope of work is addressed by the Studio Jantzen design team, and adequately ensures the coordination of all building systems to reduce conflicts as the TAPS Center project progresses to the construction phase.", "The TAPS Center project has increased in scope. The size of tenant occupied spaces increased by opting to push the building edge to the sidewalk, improvements were added to the parking structure fa\u00e7ade, the store front window system was changed, and a public art element was added in the form of a trellis on the new fa\u00e7ade.", "Staff recommends a third modification to agreement #10044 (CCS) in the amount of $150,000 with Studio Jantzen Corporation, a California-based company, for additional design services for the Transportation and Parking Services Center Project (TAPS) at Parking Structure No. 5. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $484,299, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Vendor Selection", "On November 29, 2014, the City issued a Request for Proposals for design and engineer services for the TAPS Center project. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Eight firms responded, and staff interviewed the top four architectural firms. Studio Jantzen was selected as the best qualified firm based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 and on proposal completeness, relevant experience, project approach, strength of the project team, quality of the design portfolio, proposed cost and firm location.", "Next Steps", "TAPS Center project construction plans are in the plan check process. Construction is estimated to start in late Fall 2016 with completion by the end of 2017. TAPS services are currently located in Parking Structure No 5 and will be relocated into a temporary trailer located on 5th street between Arizona and Santa Monica Boulevard for the period of construction.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Studio Jantzen is $150,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $484,299. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. The agreement will be charged to account C010162.589019. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Purchase of 27 Gillig CNG Buses for Replacement", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to Agreement #9855 with Gillig, LLC, a California-based company, to furnish and deliver twenty 40-foot buses in an amount not to exceed $13,680,737, and seven 30-foot transit buses in an amount not to exceed $4,717,157, powered by Renewable Compressed Natural Gas (RCNG), for a total amount not to exceed $18,397,894. This would result in a third-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $44,581,412, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Big Blue Bus (BBB) has developed a bus replacement plan that enables BBB to replace buses that have reached their useful life cycle of twelve years. The goal of the replacement plan is to purchase new vehicles that have the latest environmentally-friendly propulsion technology and to continue to further reduce emissions. The recommended purchase of the 27 Gillig CNG buses would be powered by a new Cummins Near-Zero emission change that runs on Renewable Compressed Natural Gas. The new Near-Zero engine reduces harmful NOx emissions by 80%, and the use of Renewable Natural Gas reduces Green House Gases. This combination would make these vehicles the cleanest operating buses in BBB\u2019s fleet. The purchase of these buses meets the goal of reducing transit bus emissions.", "BBB recommends the purchase of twenty 40-foot CNG transit buses that would enable the timely replacement of twenty 2004 LNG New Flyer 40-foot transit buses that will have reached the end of their 12-year useful life cycle by the delivery date of the new buses.", "The purchase of seven 30-foot CNG transit buses would enable BBB to meet operational needs for vehicles with a smaller footprint and turning radius, as they would improve maneuverability in narrow streets and intersections. The seven 30-foot buses would replace seven 2004 LNG New Flyer 40-foot transit buses that have reached the end of their 12-year useful life cycle.", "The total combined purchase amount for seven 30-foot CNG transit buses and twenty 40\u2011foot CNG buses including spare parts, training and warranty, is not to exceed $18,397,894.", "Background", "BBB has 50 Liquid Natural Gas (LNG) buses that are due for replacement. The buses were purchased in 2004 and have reached their useful life of 12 years or 500,000 miles per Federal Administration (FTA) guidelines. The recommended purchase of twenty 40-foot and seven 30-foot CNG transit buses would replace twenty-seven 2004 40\u2019 LNG buses that have reached the end of their lifecycle. Thus far, 40 buses have been purchased and delivered through Agreement 9855.", "On January 14, 2014, the City entered into Agreement #9855 with Gillig, LLC to purchase up to 99 vehicles of 30-, 35-, and 40-foot, low floor, CNG powered transit vehicles.", "On June 10, 2014, Council authorized the purchase of eleven 40-foot buses and the City Manager to execute the first modification to Agreement #9855 for an amount not to exceed $6,763,405.", "On April 14, 2015, Council authorized the purchase of four 30-foot buses and twenty-five 40-foot buses and the City Manager to execute a second and third modification respectively, to Agreement #9855 for an amount not to exceed $19,420.112.", "Staff is recommending the purchase of twenty 40-foot and seven 30-foot CNG transit buses and that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to Agreement #9588 for an amount not to exceed $18,397,894. If the purchase is approved, the remaining number of transit buses eligible for purchase through agreement #9855 buses would be 32.", "The recommended action would result in a fourth modification to purchase twenty 40-foot buses at $630,035 per bus and seven 30-foot buses at $614,579 per bus, including tax, delivery, ADA compliance, and extended warranties. Additional costs in the amount of $500,000 for spare parts and special tools, $150,000 for technical training and $845,138 for contingency would bring the modification total amount to not to exceed $18,397,894.", "Discussion", "Big Blue Bus is committed to further reducing harmful gas emissions. BBB\u2019s bus replacement plan helps meet the goal of timely replacement of vehicles that have reached their useful life of twelve years and continue to further reduce emissions. The current plan includes phasing in four zero-emission buses by 2018, five by 2022, and continued replacement of CNG buses with electric buses over the next eight years. Because the industry has yet to fully embrace this technology due to facility and electrical grid infrastructure costs, the current plan is subject to change. At this time, staff is in the process of evaluating proposals from qualified vendors to conduct a \u201cTechnology Neutral Study for the Big Blue Bus Fleet Plan.\u201d This study/analysis will include the opportunities and challenges of operating electric vehicles in an urban transportation environment, electric vehicle range, vehicle cost, BBB facility infrastructure cost, industry best practices, sources of electricity and carbon offsets, and evaluating potential funding opportunities.", "The purchase of 27 Gillig buses, with the near-zero engines, is in line with BBB\u2019s bus replacement plan to continue to provide reliable, safe and up to date vehicles to deliver the highest level of service quality to our customers, while also achieving the Council goal of a zero carbon emission bus fleet by 2030.  In order to achieve the goals of the BBB fleet replacement program these vehicles will replace buses purchased in 2004 that have surpassed their useful life. As part of the progression toward a zero-emission bus fleet, the new buses would have the lowest NOx emissions of any bus in BBB\u2019s fleet, allowing BBB to reduce emissions in its fleet while investigating the best path to zero emissions.", "The 27 new Gillig CNG-powered buses would be equipped with the new near-zero emission engine that reduces harmful NOx emission by 80%. In combination with the use of Renewable Compressed Natural Gas (RCNG), the 27 new transit buses would be the lowest exhaust emission vehicles in BBB\u2019s fleet. These buses would produce 876 pounds of NOx emissions per year; the transit buses they would replace produce 42,821 pounds of NOx. The total reduction of harmful NOx would be 41,975 pounds.", "Staff is recommending the purchase of more 30-foot buses as BBB has implemented new service on corridors where a 30-foot bus may be more suitable than a 40-foot vehicle. As staff continues to improve service on the new north-south corridors and other corridors in the service area where a 40-foot bus would not be operable due to street width and turn radii, having 30-foot vehicles to provide service is extremely beneficial. BBB currently operates 30-foot buses on Route 18 (4th Street and Montana Avenue), Route 43 (26th Street), as well as Route16 (20th Street).", "At this time, staff recommends replacing twenty-seven 40\u2019 transit buses, which have reached their useful life of 12 years, in the following manner:", "Recommended Purchase", "Number of Buses", "Purchase Justification", "Delivery Schedule", "40' CNG powered Gillig buses", "20", "Replace (20) 2002 and 2004 40-foot LNG buses", "20 months from order placed", "30' CNG powered Gillig buses", "7", "Replace (7) 2004 40-foot New Flyer LNG buses on routes where shorter buses are recommended", "20 months from order placed", "The cost of the buses is as follows:", "(20) 40-foot CNG Gillig Buses", "Base      $10,695,180", "ADA      $889,480", "Tax      $1,016,042", "Contingency     $630,035", "Spare Parts     $300,000", "Training     $150,000", "Total       $13,680,737", "(7) 30-foot CNG Gillig Buses", "Base      $3,644,508", "ADA      $311,318", "Tax      $346,228", "Contingency     $215,103", "Spare Parts     $200,000", "Total       $4,717,157", "Total modification amount to Agreement #9855 in a total not to exceed $18,397,894.", "Vendor Selection", "Santa Monica's Big Blue Bus, along with 21 other agencies, participated in a joint procurement to purchase buses. Central Contra Costa Transit Authority (CCCTA), in Concord, California, the lead agency, issued a Request for Proposal (RFP) for the production and delivery of 30-, 35-, and 40-foot heavy-duty low floor transit buses. CCCTA determined Gillig, LLC was the best bidder, with the understanding that Council approval would be obtained separately through the term of the contract to authorize the purchase of buses in quantities and configurations to be specified, in conformance with the contract documents. A maximum of 99 buses would be purchased under this contract contingent on funding availability.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The modification of Agreement #9855 with Gillig, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $18,397,894. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement budget. The purchase will be charged to account C410519.589000."]}, {"Title": "Historic Property Preservation Agreement (Mills Act Contract) between the City of Santa Monica and the Property Owners of Two Designated City Landmarks located at 504 Pier Avenue and 305 Alta Avenue, and Six Contributing Structures within the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District Located at 150-156, 212, 234, 302-312, 437-441 and 614-618 San Vicente Boulevard", "Department": "Design & Preservation (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the resolutions authorizing the City Manager to negotiate and execute the Historic Property Preservation Agreements (Mills Act Contracts) between the City of Santa Monica and the property owners of two designated City Landmarks located at 504 Pier Avenue and 305 Alta Avenue, and six Contributing Structures within the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District Located at 150-156, 212, 234, 302-312, 437-441 and 614-618 San Vicente Boulevard.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Mills Act is a state law that enables local governments to enter into contracts with owners of qualified historic properties to authorize a property tax reduction. The Mills Act is one of the few financial incentives available to owners of historic properties, and is an important tool for implementing the City\u2019s Historic Preservation Element goals: to promote the designation and long-term preservation of historic resources through the provision of incentives and technical assistance.", "The City requires Mills Act Contract applicants to provide a report prepared by a qualified architect describing the condition of the structure and its rehabilitation/restoration and maintenance needs in order to ensure the resource\u2019s historic integrity and structural stability. These recommendations in the architect\u2019s report are reflected in the proposed ten-year rehabilitation/restoration and maintenance plan which becomes an attachment to the Mills Act Contract entered into between the City of Santa Monica and a property owner. Staff verifies the information contained in the report and may identify additional restoration and maintenance items as necessary.", "Execution of the pending Mills Act Contracts (Attachments Q through X) will result in reduced property tax revenue to the City estimated at $34,745 for FY 2017-2018 and a similar amount annually thereafter. On average, the eight contract applicants are estimated to experience an initial property tax savings equal to approximately 70.0 percent of their total tax obligation; the highest being 89 percent and the lowest being 57.8 percent. Mills Act contracts are approved by Resolution of the City Council (Attachments I through P)", "Background", "In 1991, as part of a comprehensive revision to the City\u2019s Landmarks Ordinance, the City Council authorized designated Structures of Merit, Landmarks, and contributing structures located in designated Historic Districts to be considered qualified historic properties eligible for historic property contracts submitted pursuant to the provisions of California Government Code Sections 50280-50290. As a result, property owners of such designated historic properties may file a Mills Act Contract application. In 2014, the Council passed an Ordinance that revised the City\u2019s Mills Act Program by narrowing contract eligibility requirements and expanding applicant submittal requirements.", "Once approved, a Mills Act contract requires the County Tax Assessor\u2019s office to determine the value of the historic property based upon its current net operating income, rather than upon the traditional assessed valuation method resulting, in most cases, in a property tax reduction. For residential or commercial structures that are rented, the net operating income is determined based on actual rents received. For residential and commercial structures that are owner-occupied, the net operating income is determined by the income the property would produce if rented. In exchange for a property tax reduction, the owner agrees to protect, maintain and, if necessary, restore the historic property.", "Under the traditional method of determining property taxes, properties are reassessed when sold. However, since Mills Act contracts run with the property, subsequent owners may realize greater tax benefits, as the assessed property value typically increases when the property is sold, resulting in an even greater difference between the property taxes under the assessed valuation method versus the property tax calculation permitted by the Mills Act contract. This can be a significant marketing feature for the property in terms of future sales and is considered an important historic preservation incentive because the property will be maintained. Similarly, the obligations and property tax reduction benefits associated with the Mills Act contract are also binding upon successive property owners during the contract term.", "The initial Mills Act contract term is a minimum 10-year period. Each year on the anniversary of the effective date of the agreement, also known as the renewal date, a year is automatically added to the initial 10-year term of the agreement. This effectively makes the term of the contract at least 10 years, but possibly indefinite unless the owner or City submits a notice of non-renewal. A notice of non-renewal could be initiated by the City if the property owner is not fulfilling the obligations (i.e. scheduled improvements or maintenance) specified within their contract with the City. If such a notice of non-renewal were submitted, the contract would remain in effect for the balance of the term remaining, either from its original date of execution if within the initial 10-year term, or from the date of the last one-year renewal of the agreement.", "Alternatively, the owner may petition the City to initiate an immediate cancellation, which would result in payment of a penalty equal to 12.5% of the property\u2019s assessed current fair market value, as determined by the County Assessor as though the property were free of the contractual restriction. The City may also cancel the contract in the event of a breach of contract conditions, whereby the property owner would be subject to pay the same 12.5% penalty.", "The terms of the contract also state that the agreement may be amended, in whole or in part, if both the owner and the City agree to execute a recorded document to memorialize the contract amendment.", "Mills Act contracts are time-sensitive and must be recorded by the end of the 2016 calendar year in order to take effect the following year. The County Assessor will make a final determination of the taxes due when the approved Contract is submitted and recorded, and will continue to conduct property tax assessments on an annual basis.", "Property owners are required to obtain all applicable entitlements such as a Certificate of Appropriateness, and all associated building permits, for work proposed in the 10-year restoration/maintenance plan. Furthermore, all work proposed in the 10-year restoration/maintenance plan must comply with \u201cThe Secretary of the Interior\u2019s Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties with Guidelines for Preserving, Rehabilitating, Restoring & Reconstructing Historic Buildings\u201d (Weeks & Grimmer, 1995).", "Property owners are also required to submit a report to the City on a biennial basis to demonstrate compliance with contract terms. In 2016, staff initiated a contract monitoring effort for 62 of the City\u2019s existing contracts, to ensure that contractual terms and obligations are being fulfilled and the properties are appropriately maintained.  Staff reviews the reports received and may conduct site inspections to confirm the completion of work tasks as part of its assessment.", "Discussion", "There are eight applications for consideration in 2016; two single-family residences located at 504 Pier Avenue and 305 Alta Avenue that reflect the early development of their respective neighborhoods; and, six Contributors within the recently established San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District, all of which are located along the namesake San Vicente Boulevard. An additional contract application was presented to the Landmarks Commission for the Landmark Santa Monica Bay Telephone Company building located at 3355 Barnard Way, however, the applicant has since withdrawn this request. In accordance with SMMC 9.56.270(G), all applications are eligible for consideration as there are no confirmed or outstanding code violations; the properties are current in property tax payments; and, all work that had been previously conducted was done in a manner that is consistent with the Secretary of the Interior\u2019s Standards. The specific details of each property are discussed below.", "504 Pier Avenue (Plate 1)", "The two-story, E.J. Vawter house is a rare hybrid example of Queen Anne and the American Foursquare styles, and was designated a City Landmark on September 8, 2014 based on its unique architecture, association with the locally prominent Vawter family, and as a representative example of the shift from rural to urban culture in Ocean Park during the early 20th century.", "Plate 1: E.J. Vawter House, an 1890 rare architectural hybrid of the Queen Anne and American Foursquare styles.", "An architect\u2019s report was prepared by Kaplan Chen Kaplan. The report assesses the condition of the primary residence and identifies repair, restoration/rehabilitation and maintenance needs (Attachment A) along with a general schedule for completion of work. As noted, the exterior of the residence and some of the more prominent features are described as being in good condition and repair. The kitchen flooring is damaged and should be repaired. Plumbing connections should be evaluated and changed as needed. Otherwise, the majority of work proposed is maintenance related.", "The applicant has submitted a 10-year Maintenance Plan and Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan describing tasks that will be undertaken to address the identified concerns and ensure on-going maintenance. These tasks are estimated to have an annual costs of approximately $2,850 for maintenance and $35,900 for the repair activities efforts that are scheduled within the initial 10-year contract period.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 77.9 percent.", "305 Alta Avenue (Plate 2)", "The two-story Mel Uhl house is a Mediterranean/Classical Revival-styled single-family residence. It was designated a City Landmark on August 10, 2015 as an embodiment of the early development of the Palisades Tract and as an excellent example of its architectural style.", "Plate 2: The Palisades Tract\u2019s, Mel Uhl House (1913)", "An architect\u2019s report was prepared by Historic Resources Group to assess the condition of the primary residence and identify repair, restoration/rehabilitation and maintenance needs (Attachment B) along with a general schedule for completion of work. The report concludes that the residence has settled unevenly creating structural concerns and rendering certain windows and doors inoperable. The roof is also in need of significant repair to avoid water penetration. The residence\u2019s electrical, heating and plumbing systems are outdated and need upgrading. Due to foundation subsidence, the floors and walls are uneven.", "The applicant has prepared a 10-year Maintenance Plan and a Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan describing tasks that will be undertaken to address the identified concerns. In sum, all identified rehabilitation tasks are projected to cost $1,720,000 over the initial ten year contract period. The on-going maintenance is estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $21,000.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 89 percent.", "150-156 San Vicente Boulevard (Plate 3)", "Overcliff Manor is a 16-unit, Mid-Century Modern apartment complex located at 150-156 San Vicente Boulevard. The building is a Contributing Structure of the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District and is an excellent example of its Mid-Century architectural style.", "Plate 3: The Mid-Century Modern architectural style is embodied in Overcliff Manor (1949).", "An architect\u2019s report was prepared by Chattel, Incorporated, (Attachment C) which concludes that although the general condition of the complex is good, its buildings\u2019 structural (foundation) systems needs retrofit work as they lack framing anchors and cripple wall reinforcement (due to plumbing leaks). In addition, the electrical system is in poor condition as all of its main switching gears, breakers, protection devices and internal components are old and have reached the end of their useful lives. Landscaping and exterior drainage improvements have also been identified to safeguard the integrity of the building\u2019s foundation.", "In addition to a Maintenance Plan, the applicant has developed a 10-year Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan describing tasks that will be undertaken to address the identified concerns. The identified maintenance tasks are estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $22,000 with all identified restoration/rehabilitation tasks projected to cost $565,000 over the initial 10-year contract period.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 65.1 percent.", "212 San Vicente Boulevard (Plate 4)", "As the only Streamline Moderne-styled apartment complex in the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District, the building was identified as a Contributing Structure when the District was designated by the City Council.", "Plate 4: The only Streamline Moderne example in the Historic District is located at 212 San Vicente Boulevard (1937).", "As part of the Mills Act application, an architect\u2019s report was prepared by Chattel, Incorporated. The report assesses the condition of the primary residence and identifies repair, restoration/rehabilitation and maintenance needs (Attachment D) along with a general schedule for completion of work.", "As discussed in the assessment report, although the general condition of the complex is described as good, the buildings\u2019 structural system needs to be retrofitted to safeguard against future damage that could result from an earthquake. In addition, the electrical, plumbing and HVAC systems are described as being in poor condition and need to be modernized. Most of the character-defining windows (steel and wood-frame) are original and in relatively good shape, with some repair and in-kind replacement identified. Landscaping and exterior drainage improvements have also been identified to safeguard the integrity of the building\u2019s foundation. The applicant\u2019s 10-year Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan describes the tasks that will be undertaken to address the identified concerns at a projected cost $546,100 over the initial 10-year contract period. In addition, all maintenance related activities are estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $27,700.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 57.8 percent.", "234 San Vicente Boulevard (Plate 5)", "Villa Vicente is an apartment complex located at 234 San Vicente Boulevard and designed and constructed in the Mid-Century Modern architectural style. It has been identified as a Contributing Structure in the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District. The complex has the signature courtyard element, although its placement on the lot has the courtyard opening toward the rear of the property.", "Plate 5: Villa Vicente, constructed in 1953 in the Mid-Century Modern style.", "As part of the Mills Act application, an architect\u2019s report was prepared by Chattel, Incorporated. The report assesses the condition of the primary residence and identifies repair, restoration/rehabilitation and maintenance needs (Attachment E) along with a general schedule for completion of work. The complex has some structural deficiencies (cracking in the foundation and load-bearing issues with the joists) that are of concern and must be addressed to preserve its integrity and historic character. In addition, the utility systems have also been found to be in poor condition and have reached the end of their useful lives. Some of the original windows had been replaced in the past with contemporary vinyl sliding sash windows. These are recommended for replacement with more appropriate aluminum sash windows. Landscaping and exterior drainage improvements have also been identified to safeguard the integrity of the building\u2019s foundation. These issues are addressed in the Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan. Maintenance activities are estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $27,860 with all identified restoration/rehabilitation tasks projected to cost $1,153,800 over the initial 10-year contract period.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 66.1 percent.", "302-312 San Vicente Boulevard (Plate 6)", "The Nida Apartments are one of the few American Colonial Revival styled complexes in the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District and as such are noted as being a Contributing Structure .", "Plate 6: The interior courtyard of the Nida Apartments (1941, expanded in 1956).", "The architect\u2019s report that was prepared by Chattel, Incorporated (Attachment F) notes that the general condition of the complex is good with the most significant issue to be addressed being the age and condition of the buildings\u2019 utility systems. Overall maintenance and upkeep is estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $29,560. The restoration/rehabilitation tasks included in the 10-year plan are projected to cost $759,200 over the initial contract period.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 62.1 percent.", "437-441 San Vicente Boulevard (Plate 7)", "A Mills Act Contract application was submitted for the Minimal Traditional apartment complex located at 437-441 San Vicente Boulevard, a Contributing Structure within the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District.", "Plate 7: This Minimal Traditional style complex was originally constructed in 1941 and expanded in 1948.", "As part of the Mills Act application, an architect\u2019s report was prepared by Chattel, Incorporated. The report assesses the condition of the buildings and identifies repair, restoration/rehabilitation and maintenance needs (Attachment G) along with a general schedule for completion of work. The building is generally described as being in good condition with only limited areas of deterioration, including damaged footings and worn roof shingles. The utility systems have also been found to be in poor condition and have reached the end of their useful lives. Landscaping and exterior drainage improvements have also been identified to safeguard the integrity of the building\u2019s foundation.", "In addition to the Maintenance Plan, which is estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $28,400 to implement, the applicant has developed a 10-year Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan that describes the rehabilitation/restoration tasks that will be undertaken to address the identified concerns. These described activities are projected to cost $419,400 over the initial 10-year contract period.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 85.7 percent.", "614-618 San Vicente Boulevard (Plate 8)", "The complex at 614-618 San Vicente Boulevard apartment complex was originally constructed in 1948, and was found to be a Contributing Structure in the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District when it was designated in December 2015.", "Plate 8: Constructed in 1948, this complex combines the American Colonial Revival style with Hollywood Regency elements in a stylistic courtyard setting.", "As part of the Mills Act application, an architect\u2019s report was prepared by Chattel, Incorporated, assessing the present condition and suggesting repair, restoration/rehabilitation and maintenance tasks (Attachment H) along with a general schedule for completion of work. As discussed more fully in the architects report, the building is generally described as being in good condition with only limited areas of deterioration, primarily damaged footings and worn roof shingles. The utility systems have also been found to be in poor condition and have reached the end of their useful lives. Landscaping and exterior drainage improvements have also been identified to safeguard the integrity of the building\u2019s foundation. The maintenance tasks outlined in the report are estimated to have an annual cost of approximately $33,360. The tasks described in the Restoration and Rehabilitation Plan are projected to cost $743,100 over the initial 10-year contract period.", "Staff estimates that the new contract will result in a property tax reduction equating to approximately 73.9 percent.", "Commission Action", "The Landmarks Commission reviewed the proposed Mills Act Contract requests at its special meeting held on September 12, 2016 and its regular meeting on October 10, 2016. The Commission noted the quality of the application submittals and appreciated the thorough documentation and analysis presented in each request. The Commission endorsed the eight requests and directed staff to forward a recommendation to the Council in support of all applications. An additional contract application was presented to the Landmarks Commission for the Landmark Santa Monica Bay Telephone Company building located at 3355 Barnard Way, and was supported, however, the applicant has since withdrawn this request.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. Execution of these Mills Act Contracts would result in a reduction in annual property tax revenue to the City in the estimated amount of $34,745 for FY 2017-18 and subsequent years thereafter. A summary financial analysis table is included as Attachment Y."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid #82 to EcoMotion to Provide Program Services Under the Solar Santa Monica Program", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council:Award RFP #60 to EcoMotion, a Los Angeles-based company, to provide program services under the Solar Santa Monica program; andAuthorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with EcoMotion, in an amount not to exceed $75,000, for one year, with four- additional, one-year renewal option(s) in the amount of $75,000, on the same terms and conditions for a total contract amount not to exceed $375,000 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "For over 10 years, the Solar Santa Monica program has provided community services to residential and business property owners seeking to install solar energy systems. The services provided are community branding, outreach and education, industry and regulatory updates, and solar and financial analysis. Staff issued a request for proposals to solicit ongoing consulting services. After reviewing the submitted proposals, the selection committee determined that EcoMotion was the best bidder. Under the new contract, EcoMotion would continue to implement the Solar Santa Monica program, as well as to provide additional energy consulting services as necessary. These services would be provided for an amount not to exceed $75,000 for one year.", "Background", "Council approved development of the Community Energy Independence Initiative Demonstration Project on March 14, 2006. To implement the program, the City developed a suite of services to support property owners in their solar procurement process.", "A competitive bidding process solicited proposals from consultants to provide services to provide community outreach and technical assistance for solar procurement. On September 12, 2006, Council awarded a $532,098 contract for Phase 1 of the Community Energy Independence Initiative to EcoMotion. The Phase 1 demonstration project consisted of conducting focus group research to determine the major barriers to solar adoption and creating the program that would later be branded as Solar Santa Monica, including establishing a network of solar providers, developing a marketing strategy, developing solar site evaluation procedures, developing templates for solar analysis reports and conducting solar analysis of residential and commercial property in Santa Monica. On January 22, 2008, Council approved a six month extension of the demonstration through FY 2007-08 for $236,050. On September 23, 2008, Council awarded a contract of $483,750 to EcoMotion to continue providing services under Solar Santa Monica for FY 2008-2009. On September 8, 2009, Council awarded a $250,000 contract to EcoMotion to continue providing services under Solar Santa Monica for FY 2009-10.  On July 27, 2010, Council awarded a $150,000 contract to EcoMotion for FY 2010-11.", "On August 23, 2011, Council awarded a $75,000 contract to EcoMotion for FY 2011-12; this contract was extended through FY 2013-2014. On September 24, 2013, Council awarded a $75,000 annual contract, with a not to exceed amount over a three-year period of $225,000. This latest contract with the City expired July 31, 2016.", "Since 2006, the program, known as Solar Santa Monica, has successfully catalyzed a fivefold increase in solar installations in Santa Monica. There is now over 5 megawatts of solar capacity installed in Santa Monica.", "Discussion", "Solar Santa Monica provides free technical assistance to residential and commercial property owners. The services include: energy efficiency recommendations, rooftop analysis for solar feasibility, financial payback and solar bid comparison. Solar Santa Monica provides impartial analysis based on estimated solar energy system performance, cost, assumptions and included services and warranties. Solar Santa Monica has been instrumental in supporting Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) as a financial vehicle for solar energy systems as well as virtual net energy metering for multifamily properties.", "As the interest and complexity of energy has changed with the recent industry and public interest in electric vehicles and energy storage, the services of Solar Santa Monica must also adapt to the new landscape. Staff developed a new Request for Proposals that would allow for the program to provide technical assistance with integrating energy storage and electric vehicle charging into solar energy systems.", "Contractor Selection", "On June 22, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide professional consulting services for Solar Santa Monica in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 78 vendors downloaded the bid. Five proposals were received and publicly opened on July 13, 2016. All five proposers were interviewed on August 15, 2016 and were evaluated based on the criteria in the municipal code, including: price, experience, ability to deliver program services, quality of work and innovation.", "EcoMotion, the City\u2019s current vendor for the Solar Santa Monica program, was found to be the best bidder based on its skills and experience in providing community outreach & education, on-call services and innovations. EcoMotion has extensive experience as solar advisors to cities, corporations, and campuses across the country. EcoMotion is currently the solar advisor for the Los Angeles Metro system. For several years, EcoMotion served as Solar Advisor for the Association for the Advancement of Sustainability in Higher Education (AASHE). In this capacity, EcoMotion\u2019s solar team provided no-cost initial project consultation for AASHE\u2019s 862 members.", "During the contract term, EcoMotion would provide technical assistance to property owners, including the City, in the procurement process for solar energy systems, EV charging systems and energy storage systems and serve as a community brand and resource for going solar. A performance target of 500 kW of annual installed solar capacity would be established for the contract term.", "Financial Impact and Budget Action", "The contract to be awarded to EcoMotion is for an amount not to exceed $375,000. Funds of $75,000 are available in the FY 2016-2017 budget in the City Manager\u2019s Office. The contract will be charged to account 01226.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Accept Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant (JAG)", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1.  Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant award in the amount of $28,199 from the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant (JAG) for implementation of the JAG 2016 Crime Impact Project;2.  Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant; and3.  Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) has been awarded a grant of $28,199 under the 2016 Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant Program (JAG), which is administered by the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ). The funds must be utilized by the end of the grant period, September 30, 2019. No local matching funds are required.", "To reduce crime and ensure the safety and wellbeing of the City, SMPD utilizes a variety of public safety and quality of life strategies, including the use of focused operations that are supported by both sworn officers and civilian staff. In order to prevent a reduction in routine service responses and to maintain the quality of regular service, these supplemental crime suppression efforts are staffed using personnel on overtime. The JAG grant would provide additional funding for overtime costs associated with SMPD\u2019s citywide crime reduction efforts. These grant activities support the Police Department mission of safeguarding the community by improving the quality of life.", "Background", "The JAG program is a formula grant that provides funding to support a range of program areas including law enforcement. Formula allocations are awarded by the DOJ to each State and then to local jurisdictions based on population and crime statistics.", "Santa Monica has been an annual recipient of varying amounts of Justice Department grant funds for the past ten years. Past projects supported by this funding have included interoperable communications equipment, funding of overtime for crime control operations, funding for certified crime lab services, and funding for DNA forensic testing.", "With the launch of Expo line and the increasing number of visitors to the City, SMPD plans to leverage 2016 JAG funds to fund additional overtime operations that will address identified public safety challenges. Without the additional funds from JAG, the opportunity to run focused operations targeting specific issues and concerns is reduced.", "Discussion", "In 2016, the JAG funds would fund overtime to reduce crime and ensure the wellbeing of City residents and visitors. More specifically, SMPD would use the funds to plan crime control operations that specifically target priority crimes and public safety issues and quickly respond to unplanned neighborhood crime and public safety concerns. Collectively, these strategies meet unfunded needs and will serve to improve quality of life by reducing area crime and social disorder while also providing an opportunity to expand community-police partnerships.", "To meet the grant conditions, SMPD provided a 30-day period for public comment on the proposed use of the funds. The City of Santa Monica met this condition by issuing a public service announcement from July 14, 2016 - August 13, 2016. The announcement was posted on the Police Department\u2019s website. No responses were received in opposition to the use of the JAG Program funds.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $28,199 grant from U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant requires the following FY 2016-17 budget changes:", "1. Establish a revenue budget at account 20304.403638 in the amount of $28,199.", "2. Appropriate $28,199 to account 20304.578844 89012W to reflect receipt of the U.S. Department of Justice (DOJ) Edward Byrne Memorial Justice Assistance Grant."]}, {"Title": "Fourth Modification with Innovative Resources Consultant Group, Inc., for Staff Development, Team Building, and Coaching Services.", "Department": "Finance Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to Agreement #2814 in the amount of $120,000 with Innovative Resources Consultant Group, Inc., a California-based company, for staff development, team building and coaching services. This will result in a five-year and four-month amended agreement for a new total amount not to exceed $199,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "For over ten years, the City has used the services of Innovative Resources Consultant Group, Inc. (IRCG) to provide teams and individual staff with facilitation and leadership training and coaching. The proprietary Personalysis\u00ae methodology used by IRCG requires staff to submit completed questionnaires that note their strengths in different situations. Over time, IRCG has worked on separate contracts and projects with the Planning and Community Development, Housing and Economic Development, Finance, Community and Cultural Services and Human Resources Departments, and with the City Manager\u2019s Office. Work with each department has resulted in a large inventory of employee data that is warehoused by IRCG and accessed on a frequent basis as departments conduct training for shifting teams or responsibilities. To comply with the City\u2019s procurement thresholds and better track and report on the use of this sole source consultant, and to ensure that the confidentiality of personnel data is maintained through a standardized agreement, staff recommends that all work with IRCG be included in a single, citywide agreement, and that the consolidated contract be extended.", "Background", "Innovative Resources Consultant Group, Inc. (IRCG) has provided teams and individual staff in the Planning and Community Development, Housing and Economic Development, Finance, Community and Cultural Services and Human Resources Departments and the City Manager\u2019s Office with facilitation and leadership training and coaching through a number of contracts with individual departments. Over the past 10 years, the City has paid approximately $222,000 to IRCG on six separate agreements. At this time, one agreement remains open. On February 4, 2014, the City entered into agreement No. 2814 for coaching services for the Community and Cultural Services Department for a not to exceed amount of $7,500 and an agreement term expiring on December 31, 2014. Three additional modifications were executed between December 16, 2014 and June 16, 2016, expanding the project scope to include ongoing leadership style workshops for division teams as well as coaching services, and increasing the contract authority to $79,000 and the term to June 30, 2017. Other teams throughout the City have used IRCG to conduct similar staff development, and plan to continue to use these services in the future.", "Discussion", "IRCG utilizes a proprietary Personalysis\u00ae methodology to gather information on staff\u2019s style strengths that is then used to improve team dynamics and communication through workshops and smaller sessions, assist individuals in improving their leadership and management skills, and facilitate strategic planning. This work is done in a productive manner that focuses on people\u2019s strengths, and has proven to be a nonjudgmental, user-friendly, and therefore an effective tool among departments. This is also one of a number of tools and services that the Human Resources Department taps into to develop staff. Based on recent history, it is anticipated that the City would require an average of up to $40,000 per year in additional services over the next three years, for a total contract amount not to exceed $199,000.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "For over ten years, departments have contracted with IRCG, Inc. to build an inventory of individual staff profiles that may be accessed, using IRCG consultants, to facilitate training and coaching. These profiles are completed using the proprietary Personalysis\u00ae methodology. While other contractors may be certified to use this methodology, IRCG currently warehouses the staff profiles. Additionally, the services that IRCG provides are made more effective and efficient due to the deep understanding of the City\u2019s professional culture and staff relationships that IRCG has developed. The City last conducted a competitive bid for similar services in September 2012 for the Housing and Economic Development Department; at that time staff selected IRCG out of nine respondents as the best proposer to provide organizational development, team-building, and strategic planning services. The nature of the information that IRCG has collected could raise privacy concerns, and staff has determined that confidentiality can be better ensured through a unified and standardized agreement. Staff has determined that IRCG is exclusively qualified to perform this work, and therefore the agreement may be handled as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to IRCG is $120,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $199,000. The contract amounts would be charged to various accounts as departments identify a need for services. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget within the department operating budgets and would be encumbered as needed. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}], [{"Title": "Study Session on Civic Center Multi-Purpose Sports Field Options", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": "Director Susan Cline", "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council conduct a study session to review and provide direction to staff on a preferred option for advancing the development of the Civic Center multi-purpose sports field.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Development of a multi-purpose sports field in the Civic Center is at a point where direction is needed from the Council to proceed. Staff has received two proposals from landscape architecture firms for the design of the temporary sports field in the Civic Center. Both proposals exceed the funds approved in the FY16-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. Separately, City staff has had some initial discussions with Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) staff regarding a possible opportunity to form a partnership to address permanent options for field space and parking.", "Background", "On February 9, 2016 (Attachment A) staff presented the Civic Working Group Final Report and proposed next steps to the Council. Council directed staff to explore the possibility of placing a temporary field at the corner of 4th and Pico, to work with partners such as the School District and College on funding options and to return to Council in May with cost estimates. At the May 24, 2016 Council budget study session (Attachment B), funding totaling $200,000 was identified in FY16-17 as part of the FY16-18 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) for design of the field. Based upon a very preliminary analysis in May, it was noted in the report that a temporary field for soccer and lacrosse (60 X110 yards plus sideline space), lighting, fencing and a temporary restroom trailer would displace approximately 430 surface parking spaces and that replacement of the parking would need to be addressed prior to seeking Coastal Commission approval for the field project. (Attachment C) Following considerable discussion and in response to public testimony, Council adopted a motion directing staff to earmark funds for the construction of the Civic Center multi-purpose sports field and to provide quarterly updates to Council on the status of the project to ensure that it moves forward as quickly as possible. The FY16-18 adopted CIP Biennial Budget includes $200,000 in FY16-17 for the design of the Civic Center sports field and the five year CIP budget plan for FY16-17 through FY20-21 assigns reserve funds for the construction of the Civic Center sports field in FY18-19.", "Recently, SMMUSD staff approached City staff with interest in exploring the possibility of developing a permanent multi-purpose sports field at the Civic Center with subterranean parking.", "The discussion below provides a quarterly update on the project status including identification of several options for consideration by the Council including providing staff with direction on whether to proceed with feasibility and design of a temporary multi-purpose sports field or to direct staff to pursue the idea of a partnership project with SMMUSD that would accommodate subterranean parking as well as a permanent multi-purpose sports field and return to Council with a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) to formalize discussions with SMMUSD and outline the issues to be addressed.", "Discussion", "Status of Request for Proposals", "On July 21, 2016 staff issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to three prequalified firms to provide a feasibility planning analysis and design of a single multipurpose sports field with synthetic turf suitable for regulation California Interscholastic Federation (CIF) soccer, lacrosse, rugby and the possibility of accommodating CIF High School softball use. Field lights, fencing and temporary restrooms were identified as components to be included. The RFP asked that the firms responding provide costs for a feasibility/concept phase and a design development/construction document phase. Proposals were received from Rios Clementi Hale Studios (RCHS) and AHBE Landscape Architects. The Office of James Burnett respectfully declined to submit a proposal due to the firm\u2019s workload and belief that they were not a good fit for the limited scope of the project. Both of the proposals exceed the $200,000 budgeted in FY16-17 for design by a substantial amount as follows:", "RCHS: Phase 1: $149,075", "Phase 2: $653,725", "TOTAL $802,800", "AHBE: Phase 1: $ 59,910", "Phase 2: $364,060", "$423,970", "Discussions with SMMUSD", "In response to Council direction, staff has been in regular contact with SMMUSD staff regarding the development of the temporary field in the Civic Center. Recently, SMMUSD staff expressed interest in exploring the feasibility of forming a partnership to address both the field and the parking loss on the site by jointly funding the development of parking as part of a permanent multi-purpose sports field.  Use of the field and parking along with other issues such as ownership/possessory interest rights of the improvements and land, allocation of responsibility for design and construction, provision for interim parking for the public and City employees during construction, financing of development, responsibility for maintenance and operations of the parking and sports field facilities, use of parking revenues and managing a coordinated schedule of events would need to be fully negotiated as part of any future agreement should this concept put forward by SMMUSD staff move forward.", "Parking Considerations", "There are currently approximately 1000 parking spaces in the surface parking lot. Based upon further analysis that was completed in preparing to issue the RFP for the temporary field, it is estimated that a temporary field would result in the removal of closer to 600 parking spaces currently serving City Hall, the Santa Monica County Courthouse, Samohi, the Civic Auditorium and other surrounding uses.", "Based upon an initial analysis, it is estimated that if two levels of subterranean parking were to be developed on the site, each level could accommodate approximately 350 spaces for a total of approximately 700 spaces. Relocation of sewer and utility lines would need to occur as part of a below grade structure, but the existing storm drain on the Civic site would not be affected given its location below the Early Childhood Education Center (ECEC) footprint. Analysis would also be needed to determine whether the existing below grade monitoring wells located on the property adjacent to Pico Boulevard would be affected by subterranean parking. As shown on Attachment C, the location of the proposed Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) would not be affected if this concept were to proceed.", "It is estimated that a project of this scale would range between $80-85 million based upon a rough order of magnitude cost analysis.  A full financing plan would be needed to address the full cost of implementing this concept.", "If parking were to be provided below grade, it would enable the sports field to be installed as a permanent facility rather than a temporary facility including associated amenities such as a permanent restroom facility, storage and field lighting. Additionally, providing parking below-grade would be of benefit to the long term repurposing the Civic Auditorium.  City staff continue to have concerns about the feasibility of securing Coastal Commission approval for a temporary field at the Civic Center without identifying replacement parking and believe that providing parking below grade would address this concern. It is likely that a partnership project of this scope would require four years to implement from start to finish which would extend the timeframe outlined for the temporary field by a minimum of an additional year. While there would need to be amendments made to the 2005 Civic Center Specific Plan (CCSP) to implement this concept, it would address many of the goals outlined in the CCSP which called for parking to serve the needs of Civic Center activities, shared use of parking, placing parking below grade as part of the Auditorium Special Use District and development of a sports field at the southeast corner of the Civic Auditorium parking lot.", "Options for Consideration and Next Steps", "The Council has several options to consider in providing direction to staff as outlined below.", "A. Direct staff to identify additional funds for procurement of services from one of the two firms that submitted proposals to develop the design of the temporary multi-purpose sports field and return to Council with an award recommendation; or", "B. Direct staff to reissue the RFP to a wider range of potential firms for the design of the temporary field in an effort to identify a fee proposal that is aligned with the $200,000 budget in the FY16-17 CIP budget; or", "C. Direct staff to continue discussions with SMMUSD staff to include the necessary steps that the District would need to take with the School Board with the intent to return to Council with a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) to outline issues to be addressed and formalize discussions with SMMUSD for a partnership project in the Civic Center that would include subterranean parking and a permanent multi-purpose sports field with associated permanent amenities.", "One option that the Council could consider would be to direct staff to proceed with Options B and C concurrently so as not to lose time should Option C not move beyond the discussion stage. Based upon the direction of the Council, staff will proceed accordingly.", "Environmental Statement", "CEQA review is not required for a Council study session to review and provide direction to City staff on the potential Civic Center multi-purpose sports field project. City Council direction to procure services for the conceptual design and/or planning activities for the Civic Center is not a project under CEQA because it is an activity that is excluded from the definition of a project by Section 15378(b) of the State CEQA Guidelines. The proposed actions involve an administrative activity of government, which will not result in direct or indirect physical changes to the environment. Furthermore, Council direction for Staff to procure feasibility and planning studies for possible future actions at the Civic Center are also statutorily exempt under Section 15262 of the State CEQA Guidelines. Prior to any future approval actions for the project, City staff will complete a CEQA review and provide the appropriate environmental documentation for Council consideration.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary. Staff will return to Council with any budget enhancements including a financing strategy that considers competing priorities and responds to the direction provided."]}], [{"Title": "Findings of Local Climatic, Geological and Topographical Conditions and Adoption of the 2016 California Building Standards Codes and Santa Monica Local Amendments", "Department": "Building & Safety (PCD)", "Sponsors": "Fire Chief Bill Walker", "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt a resolution that provides findings of local climatic, geological and topographical conditions as required to adopt local amendments to the California Building Standards Code;2. Introduce for first reading an ordinance that adopts the 2016 California Building Standards Code, excluding the 2016 California Energy Code, and Santa Monica local amendments to the California Building Standards Code, excluding amendments to the 2016 California Energy Code and energy amendments to the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code;3. Introduce for first reading an ordinance that adopts the 2016 California Energy Code and Santa Monica local amendments to the 2016 California Energy Code and energy amendments to the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code; and4. Instruct staff to file the adopted resolution and ordinances with the California Building Standards Commission following the second reading of the ordinances but at least 30 days before the effective date of the Codes.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The 2016 Edition of the California Building Standards Code, together with local amendments and findings, are being presented for City Council adoption. The resolution, presented as Attachment A, sets forth the local climatic, geological and topographical conditions and findings that are required to support the adoption of the local technical code amendments. The ordinance, presented as Attachment B, sets forth the adoption of the 2016 Edition of the California Building Standards Code, excluding the 2016 California Energy Code and the Santa Monica local amendments to the California Building Standards Code, excluding amendments to the 2016 California Energy Code and energy amendments to the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code. If the Council adopts the proposed resolution and the accompanying ordinance, they would become effective on January 1, 2017.", "The ordinance, presented as Attachment C, sets forth the adoption of the 2016 California Energy Code and Santa Monica local amendments to the 2016 California Energy Code, and local energy amendments to the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code. If Council adopts the proposed ordinance, then a filing will be made with the California Energy Commission of Santa Monica\u2019s energy amendments and a cost-effectiveness study. The California Energy Commission will hold a public hearing to discuss and approve Santa Monica\u2019s energy amendments to the 2016 California Energy Code and 2016 California Green Building Standards Code. Following this approval, this ordinance will be presented to Council for second reading with an effective date 30-days from second reading.", "All local Santa Monica amendments to the State technical codes are necessary because of local climatic, geological and topographical conditions. These amendments provide for higher orders of structural safety, fire safety, occupant safety, energy efficiencies and environmental conservation. As required by State law, all local amendments are more stringent than State law\u2019s requirements and each amendment is justified with appropriate findings.", "Specific amendments presented for adoption include greater requirements in structural design and construction due to the presence of earthquake faults in Santa Monica. In pursuit of greater environmental and energy efficiency, higher levels of energy efficiency for all new buildings are proposed and, an amendment for electric vehicle charging capacity in new non-residential buildings. The ordinance also includes an administrative amendment to allow greater enforcement of development agreement conditions during the construction of buildings.", "Discussion", "Pursuant to the Health and Safety Code, the California Building Standards Code applies throughout the State of California. This set of 2016 building standards incorporates by reference various model codes with amendments created by applicable State agencies. The California Building Standards Commission publishes amended codes once every three years. One hundred and eighty days later, all cities and counties must follow the published standards unless the local jurisdiction amends them as allowed by law.", "Cities and Counties may make amendments to the California Building Standards Code based on local climatic, geological and topographical conditions, provided that the amendments are not less restrictive than the State requirements. For amendments to be effective, the local governing body must make specific findings that are presented in the Resolution, approve an ordinance adopting the amendments, and file a copy of the express findings and the local ordinance with the California Building Standards Commission. These requirements apply to both new and previously adopted local amendments.", "Summary of the 2016 California Building Standards Code", "Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations is also known as the California Building Standards Code. Adoption of these State codes is part of staff\u2019s recommendations to Council, which includes the following:", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 2:  2016 California Building Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 2.5:  2016 California Residential Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 3:  2016 California Electrical Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 4:  2016 California Mechanical Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 5:  2016 California Plumbing Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 6:  2016 California Energy Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 9:  2016 California Fire Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 10:  2016 California Existing Building Code", "\u00a7 Title 24, Part 11:  2016 California Green Building Standards Code", "Building and Fire Life Safety Commission Action", "On August 25, 2016, the Building Officer and the Fire Marshal held a public meeting with the Building and Fire Life Safety Commission to present proposed local amendments and findings. The Commission reviewed the staff recommendations and provided recommended changes to the technical content of staff\u2019s proposed amendments. Staff agreed with the Commission\u2019s recommendations and incorporated them into this recommendation to the Council. At the end of the hearing process, the Commission unanimously recommended that the City Council adopt the proposed resolution and accompanying ordinances.", "Stakeholder Engagement", "The process of building code development and publication of the codes by the State of California is an open public process. The City of Santa Monica follows the same open process as the California Building Standards Commission throughout the development and rendering of Santa Monica\u2019s proposed amendments. Upon receiving the State building codes for adoption, the City of Santa Monica participated in a collaboration of regional building officials in developing local amendments to the State building codes. This collaborative committee is known as the Los Angeles Regional Uniform Code Program and also includes design professionals, contractors and stakeholders in the development and building industry. Staff from Santa Monica Building and Safety\u2019s Division participated in the committee throughout the development of the local amendments.", "The majority of the amendments proposed for construction in Santa Monica were applied from the Los Angeles Regional Uniform Code Program which allows regional consistency in building design, construction, safety, occupancy and energy efficiency. The public hearing held with Santa Monica\u2019s Building and Fire-Life Safety Commission discussed each of the proposed local amendments in an open public process. Public notification of the effective date of the building code will be published on the City\u2019s website and informational notices will be available at City Hall\u2019s Permit Center. All local amendments approved by City Council will also be published on the City\u2019s website in advance of the effective date of the code on January 1, 2017.", "City of Santa Monica Amendments", "Staff recommends Council adopt the proposed local amendments to the 2016 Building Standards Code as they are more stringent than the State building codes, and because they are justified by local climatic, geological or topographical conditions. Recognizing the specific seismic conditions of Santa Monica with known earthquake faults in the City, and the special environmental conditions of the City\u2019s beach community, all recommended amendments are presented with a higher order of seismic safety, structural safety, fire protective measures, occupant safety and energy efficiencies. The majority of the amendments, particularly for the Building Code and Residential Code, were discussed, conceived, and authored by the collaborative group of building officials in Los Angeles County. All of Building and Safety\u2019s engineering staff participated in each of the committees of this collaborative group and staff finds that the technical suggestions of the collaborative group are applicable to Santa Monica and thus are recommending them for adoption.", "Amendment for Non-Residential Electric Vehicle Charging", "This amendment will require the main electrical service for new non-residential buildings to include capacity for future electric vehicles (EV) which will allow the buildings main infrastructure to be EV ready. Staff found that the major challenge to adding electric vehicle charging equipment in existing buildings is the limited capacity of the existing electrical service. This amendment will allow building owners and tenants in new non-residential buildings greater options as electric vehicles are desired in the future.", "In addition to the capacity requirements for the main electrical service, this amendment will also require the installation of a minimum one-inch electrical raceway at designated parking spaces for electric vehicles. This amendment will work in conjunction to the existing EV requirements in the current zoning ordinance.", "This amendment will also augment existing EV requirements for multi-family dwelling and mixed-use occupancies that Council approved on October 22, 2013. Further, this amendment is more stringent than EV requirements of the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code.", "Energy Code Amendments", "Consistent with Santa Monica\u2019s leadership in energy efficiency and environmental conservation, the ordinance (Attachment C) proposes a higher level of energy compliance above the standards of the 2016 California Energy Code. For new single-family, duplexes and multi-family residential buildings up to three stories, a fifteen percent (15%) increase in energy efficiency is proposed. For new multi-family buildings four-stories and greater, new non-residential buildings and new hotels and motels, a ten-percent (10%) increase is proposed.", "In addition to the 15% increased energy requirements for low-rise residential buildings, new buildings in this category are proposed to achieve an Energy Design Rating of Zero. Energy Design Rating is defined in the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code and is the combined energy efficiency and onsite renewable generation to meet Zero Net Energy. The United States Department of Energy has defined a Zero Net Energy, or Net Zero Energy building as \u201can energy-efficient building where, on a source energy basis, the actual annual delivered energy is less than or equal to the on-site renewable exported energy.\u201d This proposal will allow Santa Monica\u2019s newly constructed low-rise residential buildings to be ahead of the State\u2019s proposal for Zero Net Energy in the 2020 California Energy Code.", "Although the local ordinance proposal for increased energy compliance is in addition to the increases in the new 2016 Energy standards, the proposed energy amendments are being presented as achievable and cost-effective. With Santa Monica\u2019s current requirement that all new buildings must install a photovoltaic solar energy system, this renewable source will provide greater energy efficiency allowing the proposed amendments to be attainable by design, material and equipment efficiencies.  Standard design practices in the energy modeling of buildings will allow the goal of increases in energy efficiency to be achieved and in-lieu or offsite components will not be necessary.  As required by the California Energy Commission, a cost-effectiveness study of the higher energy efficiency proposals have been analyzed and have proved to provide savings through greater energy efficient design.", "While it is desired to implement the proposed energy amendments for new buildings in conjunction with the January 1, 2017 effective date of the 2016 Building standards, the proposed amendments and the cost-effective study must be submitted to the California Energy Commission following Council\u2019s First Reading. The Commission would then approve the amendments allowing scheduling of Council\u2019s Second Reading hearing. If the California Energy Commission\u2019s public hearing of Santa Monica\u2019s amendments is scheduled after the Statewide effective date of the 2016 Building Standards Code on January 1, 2017, then the unamended provisions of the 2016 California Energy Code will be enforced with local energy amendments to follow after Council\u2019s Second Reading.", "Therefore, it is recommended that Council approve the amendments to the 2016 California Energy Code and energy amendments of the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code as a separate ordinance (Attachment C) so that staff may bring a Second Reading Staff Report to Council following the approval by the California Energy Commission.", "Administrative Amendment Reference to Development Agreements", "Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 8.08.030 - Power and Duties of the Building Officer contain the provisions for Orders to Stop Construction Work (8.08.030(f)) and Suspension or Revocation of Permits or Certificate of Occupancy (8.08.030(g)). Both of these subsections are proposed to include provisions to stop construction work, or suspend or revoke a building permit if a violation of a Council approved development agreement condition is found in the course of construction.", "Although such enforcement of development agreement conditions is currently being practiced through the board authority of the Building Officer, the recommended language would clearly state the importance of adherence to conditions for development projects and would provide concluding codification.", "Summary of Changes and Recommended Amendments", "Changes to Article VIII, Building Regulations, of the Santa Monica Municipal Code are proposed including updating references to previous building code editions, amendments to the State codes and addition or revisions of local amendments.", "The changes in the set of recommended codes incorporate the building industry\u2019s latest technical provisions and safety standards and offer the highest order of building and construction safety regulations, or the \u201cStandard of Care\u201d. Major changes in the California Building Standards Code that continue to promote this Standard of Care are:", "\u00b7 Greater design and construction allowance for podium deck construction when utilizing a three-hour horizontal assembly - California Building Code.", "\u00b7 Allowance of cross-laminated timber, Type IV Construction methods - California Building Code.", "\u00b7 Greater requirements for carbon monoxide detection protections - California Building Code.", "\u00b7 New 2016 California Existing Building Code (as a replacement of Chapter 34 Existing Structures) - California Building Code.", "\u00b7 More restrictive provisions for one-and-two family dwelling exterior projections - California Residential Code.", "\u00b7 Greater protections for underfloor protection in one-and-two family dwellings where there is underfloor storage of fuel-burning - California Residential Code.", "\u00b7 Increased provisions for direct-current applications - California Electrical Code.", "\u00b7 Expanded area requirements for arc-fault circuit interrupter protection in dwellings - California Electrical Code.", "\u00b7 Requirement of rapid shutdown of solar photovoltaic systems - California Electrical Code.", "\u00b7 Increased provisions for outdoor mechanical ventilation based on room dimensions - California Mechanical Code.", "\u00b7 Greater requirements for restaurant grease hoods - California Mechanical Code.", "\u00b7 Greater water conservation means with required reduced flow rates for plumbing fixtures - California Plumbing Code.", "\u00b7 Requirement that all hot water piping to be insulated - California Plumbing Code.", "\u00b7 Increase in energy efficiency from current State Energy Standards to approximately 22 to 28% in residential occupancies, and 2 to 5% in non-residential occupancies - California Energy Code.", "\u00b7 All lighting in dwellings must be high-efficacy - California Energy Code.", "\u00b7 Home Energy Rating System (HERS) verification required for domestic hot water heating - California Energy Code.", "Proposed are several administrative amendments but mostly editorial in nature. The administrative amendments are summarized as follows:", "62 Existing Amendments - No Change", "38 Existing Amendments - Editorial Modification", "11 Existing Amendments - Deletion", "2 New Proposed Administrative Amendments", "__________________________________________", "102 Total Administrative Amendments", "Technical amendments that are proposed are intended to provide a higher order of structural safety of buildings, fire safety in the prevention or event of a fire, electrical safety in operation and use of electrical equipment, higher sustainable practices in resource conservation. Important to safety in the design and construction of building is seismic safety in basic building elements. Many of the requirements in the California Building and Residential Codes that reference Seismic Design Categories E and F - Santa Monica\u2019s seismic zone classifications - are modified to provide more stringent requirements. The technical amendments are summarized as follows:", "62 Existing Amendments - No Change", "38 Existing Amendments - Editorial Modification", "5 Existing Amendments - Deletion", "6 New Proposed Technical Amendments", "__________________________________________", "106 Total Administrative Amendments", "Local Administrative Code Amendments", "Major changes to the administrative provisions of Chapters 8.04, 8.08, 8.20 and 8.52 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Delete duplication of terms that are already defined within the Municipal Code or the California Building Code.", "\u00b7 Delete term \u201cTechnical Codes\u201d, a term that was previously defined in an obsolete code. The term has been replaced with references to the \u201cCalifornia Building Standards Code\u201d, \u201cApplicable Codes and Standards\u201d, and terms more precisely fitting such as \u201cThis Code\u201d and \u201cThis Chapter\u201d.", "\u00b7 Add reference to Development Agreements for Stop Work Orders (Section 8.08.030(f)).", "\u00b7 Add reference to Development Agreements for Suspension or Revocation of Building Permit (Section 8.08.030(g)).", "\u00b7 Add exemption to building permit requirement for water-savings programs under the authority of the City of Santa Monica (8.08.050(h)).", "\u00b7 Deletion of Section 8.08.120 Structural Observation. These requirements exist in the State Building Code.", "\u00b7 Deletion of Chapter 8.20 Special Provisions for Hillside Buildings. These requirements are proposed to be incorporated into Chapter 8.12 Building Code.", "\u00b7  Deletion of Chapter 8.52 Swimming Pools, Spas and Hot Tubs Code. These requirements are proposed to be incorporated into Chapter 8.12 Building Code.", "Local Amendments to the California Building Code", "Changes to the Building Code provisions of Chapters 8.12 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Building Code as the Building Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.12.010)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Addition of language to clarify that essential facilities fall into Risk Category IV for structural safety. (Section 8.12.040)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Supplemental Land Hazard Zone. (Section 8.12.050)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment deleted. Openable window guardrail section is to be deleted and replaced by a new section that follows California Building Code requirements. (Section 8.12.060)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Fire Retardant Roofing. (Section 8.12.070)", "\u00b7 New amendment to the California Building Code. Add allowance to Section 403 high-rise building requirements in coordination with Fire Code amendment Section 8.44.090.", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code to remain. Prohibit spaced sheathing board as a base for rooftops where concrete or clay tile is installed. (Section 8.12.080(a))", "\u00b7 New amendment to the California Building Code. Omit Importance Factor in formula for building separation in important facilities. (Section 8.12.080(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code to remain. Restrict allowance for light frame construction lateral force resisting systems to not include one-and-two family dwellings over two stories. (Section 8.12.080(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code to remain. New amendment for wood diaphragms ties and calculated shear in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.080(d))", "\u00b7 Existing amendments to the California Building Code to remain. Chapter 8.20 Special Provisions for Hillside Buildings proposed to move to Chapter 8.12. (Section 8.12.080(e))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Amendment to provide structural safety standards for suspended ceilings and appendances above suspended ceilings. (Section 8.12.080(f))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Define specific requirements for the design professional performing general structural observation when required by the code. (Section 8.12.090(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified.  Requirements for seismic resistance structural observation with an allowance for certain single-family dwellings. (Section 8.12.090(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Requirement that certain structural anchors in concrete must have continuous special inspection and tests. (Section 8.12.090(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Requirement that single-family dwellings have seismic resistance seismic inspection. (Section 8.12.090(d))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Amend requirement for special inspection for connection grade beams. (Section 8.12.090(e))", "\u00b7 Delete previous amendment to the California Building Code. Delete amendments and reference standard for joist hanger capacity and joist hanger testing. (Section 8.12.090(f))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict permanent wood foundations in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F due to unknown performance in a seismic event and the ability to withstand surrounding elements. (Section 8.12.100(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict the prescriptive design of foundation walls in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.100(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code to remain. Additional requirements for stepped footings in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.100(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Provide limitations for the prescriptive design method of footings for light-frame construction in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.100(d))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict allowance of timber footings in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F due to unknown performance in a seismic event and the ability to withstand surrounding elements. (Section 8.12.100(e))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict allowance of timber deep foundations designed as poles or piles in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F due to unknown performance in a seismic event and the ability to withstand surrounding elements. (Section 8.12.100(f))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code deleted. Structural wall piers are referenced in American Concrete Institute standard design. (Section 8.12.110(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict uses of plain structural concrete as minimum reinforcement, provide for additional reinforcing methods and clarify plain concrete footings for single-family dwellings up to three stories. (Section 8.12.110(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Clarification of calculated methods for concrete members by standard references. (Section 8.12.110(c))", "\u00b7 New proposed amendment to the California Building Code. Elimination of Chapter 34 in the state building code and general references were cause for deletion of existing amendment. New language proposed for Existing Concrete and Masonry Fireplaces and Chimneys. (Section 8.12.120(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict use of staples to resist or transfer seismic forces in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.140(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict use of wood in retaining and crib walls in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F due to unknown performance in a seismic event and the ability to withstand surrounding elements. (Section 8.12.140(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code to remain. Require nails installed with a mechanical driver to meet same dimensions as hand-driven nails in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.140(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code to remain. Require more stringent specifications for hold-down connectors for seismic design protection. Specific component and install methods for Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.140(d))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Restrict use of staples for wood frame diaphragms and higher application of wood diaphragms in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.140(e))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Design and installation requirements for wood frame shear walls in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.140(f))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. More stringent requirements for braced wall line support in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. (Section 8.12.140(g))", "\u00b7 New amendment to the California Building Code. Greater seismic provisions in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F for alternative bracing with thicker wood paneling, nail size and nail spacing (Section 8.12.140(h))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. Provide for more stringent requirements for braced wall sheathing. (Section 8.12.140(i))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Building Code modified. More stringent requirements for sheathing attachment in Seismic Design Categories D, E, F. Staples fasteners are not allowed. (Section 8.12.140(j))", "Local Amendments to the California Existing Building Code", "New adoptive provisions of the 2016 California Existing Building Code of New Chapter 8.18 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Existing Building Code as the Existing Building Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.18.010)", "\u00b7 New amendment. Include Scope of the City of Santa Monica Existing Building Code. (Section 8.18.020)", "Local Amendments to the California Residential Code", "Changes to the Residential Code provisions of Chapter 8.22 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Residential Code as the Residential Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.22.010)", "\u00b7 Delete existing amendment to the California Residential Code. Delete previous requirement of window sill height to be consistent with State Code. (Section 8.22.025(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for woodframe structures carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for slopes steeper than 33.3% carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Determination of parameters for Seismic Design Categories. (Section 8.22.030(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Amendment for irregular buildings carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(d))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for construction of floors carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(e))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Requirement for the anchorage of equipment installed in attic spaces. (Section 8.22.030(f))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for openings in horizontal diaphragms carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(g))", "\u00b7 Delete existing amendment to the California Residential Code. Delete previous amendment to single top plate in stud walls, Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.030(h))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Modify requirement for length of braced wall panels based on Seismic Design Category. (Section 8.22.030(h))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Provide more stringent requirements for allowed material types for bracing methods and restrict material types with unknown performance in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.030(i))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for alternative braced wall panel carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(j))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendments to improve the performance of the portal frame method with hold-downs. (Section 8.22.030(k))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Requirement for minimum length of braced wall panels where portal frames support roof structures. (Section 8.22.030(l))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Require the minimum length of braced wall panels in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.030(m))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for Method CS-PF carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(n))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment to delete braced wall panel of Chapter R602 carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(o))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Amendment for additional requirements for opening in horizontal diaphragms carried forward. (Section 8.22.030(p))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Design requirements for parapet walls in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.030(q))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Stricter requirements for masonry element reinforcing. (Section 8.22.030(r))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Retain prohibition of wood foundations in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.050(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Requirement for higher structural design in continuous footings in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.050(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Prohibition of wood foundation walls in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.050(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code to remain. Retain amendment for vertical reinforcing for concrete and masonry chimneys. (Section 8.22.060(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Restrict the use of staples for wood fastening methods in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.080(a))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to the California Residential Code modified. Restrict the use of staples in roof, floor, subfloor and braced wall panels in Seismic Design Category D. (Section 8.22.080(b))", "Local Amendments to the California Electrical Code", "Changes to the Electrical Code provisions of Chapter 8.24 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Electrical Code as the Electrical Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.24.010)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment modified. Delete requirements for approval of electrical appliances, devices, materials and equipment as this requirement is duplicative of national codes and standards. (Section 8.24.040)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment deleted. Delete requirements for temporary service poles and feeder poles as requirements exist in the technical codes and standards. (Section 8.24.060).", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Used materials. (Section 8.24.050)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Protection of metallic enclosures in a marine environment. (Section 8.24.090)", "Local Amendments to the California Mechanical Code", "Changes to the Mechanical Code provisions of Chapter 8.28 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Mechanical Code as the Mechanical Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.28.010)", "Local Amendments to the California Plumbing Code", "Changes to the Plumbing Code provisions of Chapter 8.32 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Plumbing Code as the Plumbing Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.32.010)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Water Softener Using Dry Wells For Discharge is required to protect local water supply. (Section 8.32.040)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Seismic gas shutoff devices. (Section 8.32.070)", "Local Amendments to the California Energy Code", "Changes to the Energy Code provisions of Chapter 8.36 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Energy Code as the Energy Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.36.010)", "\u00b7 New local amendment. Energy efficiency of new low-rise residential buildings to use fifteen percent (15%) less energy than energy budget allowances in the 2016 energy standards, and to achieve an Energy Design Rating of Zero. (Section 8.36.020)", "\u00b7 New local amendment. Energy efficiency of new high-rise residential buildings, new non-residential buildings, and new hotels and motels to use ten percent (10%) less energy than energy budget allowances in the 2016 energy standards. (Section 8.36.030)", "Local Amendments to the California Fire Code", "Changes to the Fire Code provisions of Chapters 8.40 and 8.44 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Fire Code as the Fire Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.40.010)", "\u00b7 New amendment to State Code added. Operational permit required for temporary sales lots. (Section 8.40.020(a)4.)", "\u00b7 New amendment to State Code added. Submission requirements of fire-life safety system reports. (Section 8.40.020(b))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Building address identification requirements. (Section 8.40.020(c))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Problematic Systems and Systems Out of Service. (Section 8.40.020(d))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Firewatch. (Section 8.40.020(e))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Standby pipe requirements. (Section 8.40.020(f))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Eliminate allowance for fire extinguishers in multi-family residential units as an exception to requiring fire extinguishers in corridors. (Section 8.40.020(g))", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code modified. Update Chapter reference for seizure of fireworks to be consistent with State code. Allowance of seizure to include police authority. (Section 8.40.020(h))", "\u00b7 Delete existing local amendment. Solar photovoltaic standards and requirements for rooftop fire safety is duplicative in State Code. (Section 8.40.030)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment modified. Degree of Occupancy Hazard Table to add determination by fire official and add Group F and Group L occupancies. Clarify language for retrofit of fire sprinklers in existing buildings. (Section 8.44.050(a))", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Allowances for sprinkler exceptions. (Section 8.44.050(b))", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Minimum requirements for non-occupied buildings. (Section 8.44.050(c))", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment modified. Add allowance of alternate materials and methods for exception to high-rise building requirement. (Section 8.44.090)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Smoke Detectors - Existing Residential Occupancies. (Section 8.44.100)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Standards for Fire Protection Systems. (Section 8.44.110)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Seismic Protection of Fire Sprinkler Systems. (Section 8.44.120)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Fire Alarm Requirements. (Section 8.44.140)", "Local Amendments to the California Green Building Standards Code", "Changes to the Green Building Standards Code provisions of Chapter 8.106 of the Municipal Code include:", "\u00b7 Adopting language for the 2016 California Green Building Standards Code as the Green Building Code of the City of Santa Monica. (Section 8.106.010)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Definition of Sustainability. (Section 8.106.050)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Definition of unshaded to clarify unshaded applicability to roof areas. (Section 8.106.050)", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Require that all residential additions and alterations shall comply with respective provisions of the State code. (Section 8.106.053)", "\u00b7 New amendment to State Code added. Add requirement for greater energy efficiency and Energy Design Rating for new low-rise residential consistent with Section 8.36.020 of the Santa Monica Energy Code. (Section 8.106.054)", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Residential solar requirements for solar pool heating and required installation of a photovoltaic system for new low-rise residential buildings. (Section 8.106.055)", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Flashing Details. (Section 8.106.070)", "\u00b7 New amendment to State Code added. Add requirement for greater energy efficiency for new high-rise residential, non-residential and hotel and motel buildings consistent with Section 8.36.030 of the Santa Monica Energy Code. (Section 8.106.075)", "\u00b7 Existing amendment to State Code to remain. Non-residential solar requirements for solar pool heating and required installation of a photovoltaic system for new high-rise residential, non-residential, hotel and motel buildings. (Section 8.106.080)", "\u00b7 Existing local amendment to remain. Electric vehicle charging capacity requirements for new multi-family buildings and mixed-use occupancy buildings. (Section 8.106.100(a), (b))", "\u00b7 New local amendment added. Non-residential electric vehicle charging capacity requirements and installation of raceway for electric vehicle parking spaces. (Section 8.106.100(c))", "Next Steps", "Following Council\u2019s adoption of the resolution and ordinance (Attachment B), staff, upon instruction from the Council will file the adopted resolution and ordinance with the California Building Standards Commission thereby making the Attachment B adopted local amendments legally enforceable on January 1, 2017.", "Following Council\u2019s adoption of the ordinance (Attachment C), staff will file the local energy amendments and cost-effective study to the California Energy Commission for approval. Upon the Commission\u2019s approval, staff will provide the Staff Report to Council for the Second Reading Hearing with an effective date of all energy amendments 30-days from Second Reading.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Fiscal Year (FY) 2015-16 Year-End Budget Changes and FY 2016-17 Budget, Position and Compensation Changes", "Department": "Finance Department, Budget Division", "Sponsors": "Director Susan Cline, Director Donna Peter", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council, Housing Authority and Successor Agency to the Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency:1. Approve changes to the FY 2015-16 Revised Budget as detailed in the in Attachment A; and2. #0Approve changes to the FY 2016-17 Adopted Budget as detailed in Attachment B.ApprStaff also recommends that the City Council:1. Review the City\u2019s year-end financial status;2. Approve the write-off of various outstanding loans to the former Redevelopment Agency and the Airport; 3. Adopt a Resolution establishing classification and salary rates for various positions detailed in Attachment C; and4. Approve the position and classification changes detailed in Attachment D.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Each year at this time, we reconcile actual results of the prior Fiscal Year with the adopted budget. The General Fund ended FY 2015-16 with revenues $7.3 million greater than estimated actuals, and operating expenditures $5.5 million below budget, for a net $12.8 million positive impact as compared to budget. These reflect unaudited year-end results. As in years past, staff recommends that surplus funds, the majority of which are one-time, be allocated to expenditure control savings accounts and one-time capital and operating project contingencies. Staff also recommends various changes to the FY 2015-16 Revised Budget to reflect significant events and to adjust Capital Improvement Program budgets.", "Non-General funds ended the year with revenues $24.6 million greater than estimated actuals, and operating expenditures $18.4 million below budget, for a $43 million positive impact compared to budget. These funds will be used to build reserves, fund ongoing operations, and support future capital projects.", "Staff recommends $10.1 million in total expenditure adjustments for FY 2015-16, $3.1million in the General Fund and $7.0 million in other funds. In the General Fund, the changes are to write off a portion of the loan repayment obligation from the Airport to the General Fund, write off previous City loans to the former Redevelopment Agency, and to make adjustments to the contribution from the Water Fund to the General Fund to reflect a delay in hiring Water Conservation Unit staff. In other funds, significant changes are to write off a loan from the Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) Fund to the former Redevelopment Agency and make adjustments to projects and activities funded with Miscellaneous Grants, Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax, Low/Moderate Income Housing Asset, Vehicle Management, Self-Insurance, and Parking Authority funds.", "Staff also recommends $2 million in expenditure adjustments in FY 2016-17, a decrease of $0.1 million in the General Fund, and an increase of $2.1 million in other funds. These changes include staffing and classification-related adjustments, expenditure control budget adjustments, costing of living adjustments, and reimbursement for radio upgrade purchases.", "Background", "On June 23, 2015 (Attachment E), Council adopted the FY 2015-16 Budget as the first year of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget; and adopted the second year of the FY2014\u201116 Capital Improvement Program budget. On October 27, 2015 (Attachment F) and January 26, 2016 (Attachment G), Council approved certain revisions to the FY2015-16 Revised Budget that adjusted revenues, expenditures and staffing. Changes included in this staff report represent the final modifications to FY 2015-16.", "On June 14, 2016 (Attachment H), Council adopted the FY 2016-17 Budget as the second year of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget; and adopted the first year and approved the second year of the FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget. Staffing changes and expenditure control savings allocations are the first modifications to this budget.", "Santa Monica\u2019s AAA credit rating (maintained by fewer than a dozen of California\u2019s 488 cities) validates the City\u2019s long-term commitment to sound fiscal management practices, including using conservative assumptions for budget planning; maintaining and building healthy reserves; investing in capital infrastructure; and using one-time revenues for one-time expenses.", "Discussion", "The year-end report provides Council with an overview of the City\u2019s financial performance as compared to budget, and aligns budgets with significant operational shifts whose impacts were not known until the last half of FY 2015-16. The information gathered during staff\u2019s review of year-end budget performance will inform the upcoming financial status update, to be presented to Council in January 2017, as well as the FY2017-19 biennial budget process that will be completed in June 2017.", "Fiscal Year 2015-16 Budget Year-End Status", "General Fund", "The City ended the year with greater revenues and lower expenditures than budgeted. General Fund revenues were $7.3 million, or 2.1%, greater than the FY 2015-16 estimated actual amount. Approximately $1.4 million of the increase is anticipated to be on-going, including greater than anticipated revenue increases from property taxes, transient occupancy taxes, and license, permit, and fee revenues, partially offset by lower than anticipated increases in sales, utility, and parking taxes, as well as less revenues from parking citation fines. The remaining $5.9 million of the increase is from atypical levels of activity in charges for services, documentary transfer tax and various other sources.", "Including the adjustments in this report, General Fund net expenditure savings were $5.5 million, or 1.5%, below budget. This amount includes $6.6 million from operating expenditure savings, offset primarily by the appropriation of one-third of non-salary savings back to the departments as part of the expenditure control budgeting program. Over 89% of department savings was due to approximately 124 vacant positions throughout the year due primarily to retirements as well as the normal time lag in filling public safety positions. Remaining supplies and expenses savings indicate prudent spending on ongoing operations.", "On May 24, 2016, staff presented Council with the General Fund Financial Status Update that showed positive balances during the first three years of the five-year forecast and projected shortfalls of $3.5 and $6.4 million (1.6% of the General Fund Budget), respectively, in the last two years. The next financial status update, which will be presented to Council in January 2017, will inform the Council and community of the City\u2019s current and projected fiscal status as the City enters the FY 2017-19 biennial budget process. FY 2015-16 year-end results are better than projected, but are primarily one-time in nature and therefore would not impact future year projections in a significant way. Staff recommends that the $12.8 million in FY 2015-16 General Fund savings be appropriated for expenditure control budgeting, and set-aside for one-time capital and operating contingencies.", "Other Funds", "Significant revenue variances in other funds, totaling $24.6 million more than estimated actuals, include:", "\u00b7 Special Revenue Source (04) Fund \u2013 FY 2015-16 revenues were $18.9 million higher than the estimated actual, primarily due to one-time developer contributions. Key among these were profit sharing revenues from the Civic Center Village ($14.5 million).", "\u00b7 Miscellaneous Grants (20) \u2013 FY 2015-16 revenues were $23.1 million less than the estimated actual, reflecting the timing of the receipt of funds for certain grants.", "\u00b7 Water (25) Fund - FY 2015-16 revenues were $2.2 million higher than the estimated actual, primarily due to higher than anticipated water sales as conservation began to decrease late in the fiscal year after the State and Metropolitan Water District relaxed mandatory conservation goals. Additionally, certain development-related fees were greater than anticipated due to the impact of several large projects.", "\u00b7 Resource Recovery & Recycling (27) Fund - FY 2015-16 revenues were $1.5 million higher than estimated actuals, primarily due to enhanced collection efforts on outstanding items due from private haulers, customers, and construction & demolition permits.", "\u00b7 Wastewater (31) Fund - FY 2015-16 revenues were $1 million higher than estimated actuals, primarily due to higher than projected sewer service charges and capital facility fees related to new development.", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus (41) Fund \u2013 FY 2015-16 revenues were $20.5 million higher than estimated actuals, primarily due to a one time settlement payment from the State related to condemnation action initiated by Expo for City property located at 4th Street and Colorado Boulevard.", "Other funds ended the fiscal year with expenditures $18.4 million or 8.4% below budget. Savings in other funds were due to approximately 37 vacant positions throughout the year, Liquid Natural Gas (LNG) fuel savings, timing of grant expenditures, water conservation program savings, hazardous waste program savings, and Hyperion sewer system maintenance savings, partially offset by higher than anticipated costs for temporary employees and overtime. As projected, the Housing Authority Fund and Cemetery Fund required General Fund operating subsidies.", "Non-General fund one-time operating expenditures savings and revenues of $24.6million will contribute towards enterprise and internal service reserves and support future capital projects.", "Fiscal Year 2015-16 Operating and Capital Budget Changes", "General Fund", "Recommended changes include $10.1 million in adjustments: a $3.1 million increase in the General Fund and $7 million in other funds. In the General Fund, a budget adjustment of $0.5 million is proposed to decrease the contribution from the Water Fund to the General Fund, reflecting a delay in hiring Water Conservation Unit staff, and a budget appropriation of $2.5 million is proposed as part of an accounting adjustment to write-off a portion of the General Fund\u2019s loans to the Airport and to the former Redevelopment Agency.", "Other Funds", "In other funds, significant budget adjustments reflect appropriations of $0.5 million for operating and maintenance costs for the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF), $0.7 million for the transfer of unspent RDA bond proceeds to the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund, $0.4 million for grant-funded projects, $0.6 million for repair parts and commercial repairs that have increased with growth of the fleet, $1.7 million for greater than expected payment of liability and workers\u2019 compensation claims, $0.6 million for the transfer of capital assets from the Parking Authority Fund to the General Fund, $1.9 million as part of an accounting adjustment to correct and write-off a portion of a loan made from the Community Development Block Grant Fund to the former Redevelopment Agency, and $0.1 million for unanticipated capital project cost overruns.", "Loan Write-offs", "Recent events have necessitated adjustments to the City\u2019s balance sheet to write off various loans that have been deemed uncollectable. On July 15, 2016, loans from the General Fund to the Airport were modified in accordance with a proposed corrective action plan submitted to the FAA. This adjustment resulted in the reduction, or write-off, of a portion of the loan balances and the interest accrued as of June 30, 2015. While the total amount written off totals $2.1 million, only $1.7 million of this amount, representing principal, is shown as an expenditure in Attachment A. The remaining amount of $.4 million, representing accrued interest, is adjusted on the General Fund balance sheet as a decrease in deferred revenue.", "During FY 2015-16, the California Department of Finance made its final determinations on the repayment of loans made by the City to the former Redevelopment Agency. Based on research conducted during the dissolution process, and as confirmed in communications with the Department of Finance and the State Controller\u2019s Office, staff decided not to pursue repayment for two loans, from the General Fund and the CDBG Fund. While the total amount written off is $7.9 million, only $2.7 million represents principal and is shown as an expenditure in Attachment A, while the remaining amount represents accrued interest and is adjusted on the balance sheet as a decrease in deferred revenue.", "In all cases, the changes impact the fund balance only by the amount of the principal. Staff is requesting Council approval of these loan write-offs.", "Fiscal Year 2016-17 Operating and Capital Budget Changes", "Recommended changes include a net $2 million in adjustments: a net $0.1 million decrease in the General Fund and a $2.1 million increase in other funds. The budget changes reflect personnel changes, expenditure control budget adjustments, cost of living adjustments, reimbursement to the General Fund for radio upgrade purchases, capital project budget corrections, and a set-aside for performance management and engagement. Remaining one-time savings and revenue surplus from FY 2015-16 will be also set aside in the City\u2019s reserves for items such as the Civic Center Sports Field, potential litigation costs that are currently unknown, and capital project contingencies.", "Performance Management and Engagement", "Staff recommends appropriating $950,000 in year end savings to be used over the next three years to accelerate the City\u2019s progress on achieving the Council\u2019s five Strategic Goals, improve day-to-day responsiveness to residents, better measure performance and contribute to a more data-driven and tech-savvy working culture. Included in this work will be an effort to engage residents and other key community stakeholders in a community-wide discussion involving the Council and City staff to define how the City can best meet the evolving needs of our community going forward. This would provide an overall framework for the Strategic Goals; integrate the City\u2019s pioneering work in community wellbeing; incorporate long-standing principles of sustainability; and align existing and future work efforts, and would also serve as the basis for measuring progress toward shared community goals and priorities. This engagement initiative is integral to a coordinated change-management strategy for the City to adapt and modernize its process and services, including the implementation of a Customer Relationship Management (CRM) system. A citywide CRM would establish a two-way communication tool to provide residents with a single-point of access to inform the City about complaints, learn about specific services, and provide the City with more targeted opportunities to inform residents about events, services and activities that affect them.", "Personnel Changes", "This report includes staffing adjustments to reflect ongoing operational changes, and the results of classification and compensation studies. A Salary Resolution detailing new classifications and salary rates is reflected in Attachment C. Staffing adjustments are detailed in Attachment D. These changes result in an increase of 26.9 Full Time Equivalent (FTE) employees \u2013 1.9 FTE increase in the General Fund and 25.0 FTE increase in the Airport Fund. Together, position changes result in a net increase of $1.8million in FY 2016-17 for eight months of staffing \u2013 an increase of $0.2 million in the General Fund and $1.6 million in the Airport Fund.", "Staff recommends the following shifts: 1) transfer the Office of Pier Management from the Public Works Department to the Housing and Economic Development Department, 2) transfer the Office of Sustainability & the Environment from the City Manager\u2019s Office to the Public Works Department, and 3) transfer the Wellbeing Project from the Community and Cultural Services Department to the City Manager\u2019s Office. The newly\u2011titled Office of Civic Wellbeing would collaborate with teams throughout the organization as well as with a wide range of community partners to strengthen the health and wellbeing of our community and all who are part of it. The addition of 1.4FTE positions would support this effort. Additionally, an increase of a 0.5 FTE as\u2011needed grant-funded position would support the Library Department.", "On August 23, 2016 the City Council adopted a policy to declare that the City would exercise its rights under federal law to establish a City-operated FBO service. The policy directs the City Manager to replace all current private fixed base operators such as Atlantic Aviation and American Flyers (each an \u201cFBO\u201d and collectively the \u201cAirport FBOs\u201d) with fixed base operations provided by the City on an exclusive proprietary basis, on or before December 31, 2016, or as soon as practicable thereafter. Under the authority of the adopted policy, staff recommends the addition of up to 25.0 FTE positions to support fixed based operations to the extent legally required.", "Next Steps", "As the final step in the close of FY 2015-16, Council will receive the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report later this fiscal year. Staff will consider impacts of year-end results and any other significant budget adjustments with its regular six month financial status update to Council in January 2017.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The budget changes recommended for FY 2015-16 result in a $10.1 million, or 1.9%, net increase over the FY 2015-16 Revised Budget. Detail for these changes is in Attachment A. Recommended FY 2016-17 expenditure changes result in a $2 million or 0.4% increase over the expenditure budget. Detail for FY 2016-17 changes is in Attachment B.#1"]}], [{"Title": "Public Meeting on the Renewal of the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Review the revisions to the proposed Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) Management District Plan renewal; and 2)  Hold a public meeting and receive comments regarding the proposed renewal of the SMTMD.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As the success of a diversity of lodging options is important in Santa Monica, Santa Monica Travel and Tourism revised the proposed Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) Management District Plan by reducing the proposed assessments for the lowest-cost lodging options.  Council now has the opportunity to consider the revised Management District Plan and receive additional public input regarding the renewal.  This is the second step in the three-step process for renewing the SMTMD. The final hearing and Resolution of Renewal to levy the assessment is scheduled for November 1, 2016.", "Background", "At its meeting on August 23, 2016 (Attachment A), Council received public input regarding the proposed renewal of the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD), accepted petitions from qualified lodging businesses, and adopted Resolution No. 10987 (CCS) declaring its intention to consider renewal of the SMTMD and setting a public meeting to receive additional testimony on the proposed renewal.", "Following the adoption of the Resolution of Intention, the City mailed formal notices with copies of the Resolution (Attachment B) to inform the affected lodging businesses of the opportunity to provide written protest and public input concerning the proposed renewal of the SMTMD. The City Clerk\u2019s office received one letter of protest (Attachment C) in response to the notice.", "Discussion", "The proposed SMTMD renewal was initiated by the Santa Monica Travel and Tourism in conjunction with Santa Monica hotels for the purpose of extending a self-assessment on qualifying hotels to generate additional revenues for tourism promotion and marketing. At the Council meeting on August 23, 2016 (Attachment A), speakers representing the lodging businesses with average daily rates of $100 to $199.99 (\u201cTier 3\u201d) provided input regarding the proposed assessments. Specifically, it was requested that the assessment formula for the Tier 3 businesses be reevaluated to address equity concerns.", "Based on the input received, the SMTMD Management District Plan has been revised with the following proposed changes to the assessment rate for Tier 3 lodging businesses:", "Tier", "Average Daily Rate", "Assessment Per Occupied Room Per Night", "1", "$300 and above", "$5.25", "2", "$200 - $299.99", "$4.25", "3", "$100 - $199.99", "$3.25 1.50", "\u00b7 The Tier 3 assessment rate would be reset to begin at $1.50 rather than the current rate of $3.25 per occupied room, per night. The proposed change would take effect on January 1, 2018, to coincide with the commencement of the SMTMD renewal period.", "\u00b7 The Tier 3 assessment rate may be subject to an annual increase of no more than ten cents ($.10) per year rather than twenty-five cents ($.25) per year. Theproposed change would also take effect on January 1, 2018 to coincide with the commencement of the proposed SMTMD renewal period.", "There are currently 36 lodging businesses in operation in Santa Monica with two new hotels under construction, the Courtyard by Marriott and Hampton Inn & Suites, both of which are anticipated to open in January 2017. These two new hotels are expected to be in the Tier 2 assessment category. In 2016, 11 lodging businesses were in Tier1, 10 in Tier 2, and 11 in Tier 3. Lodging businesses with an average daily room rate less than $100 are not included in the SMTMD nor assessed. Assessment rates are derived from the previous year\u2019s average daily room rate.", "The SMTMD budget impact of the proposed changes to the Tier 3 assessment rate is estimated to be approximately $320,000 annually, resulting in an anticipated annual SMTMD operational budget of $4,130,000, rather than $4,450,000, for the commencement of the SMTMD renewal period. In summary, the total service plan budget for the nine and one-half years of the SMTMD is projected to be approximately $57 million if the maximum assessment rates are adopted annually. TheSMTMD anticipates the proposed changes in the Tier 3 assessment could be implemented without noticeably significant impacts to future marketing and promotional programs. There are no additional changes to the proposed SMTMD Management District Plan.", "The SMTMD representative of the Tier 3 lodging businesses is supportive of the proposed changes. On September 28, 2016, the SMTMD Committee and the Santa Monica Travel and Tourism Board of Directors unanimously voted to support the modifications to the proposed SMTMD Management District Plan. A clean version of the revised SMTMD Management District Plan for January 1, 2018 through June 30, 2027, incorporating the proposed changes to the Tier 3 assessment and SMTMD budget, is provided in AttachmentD and a redlined version comparing the revisions from the previously proposed SMTMD Management District Plan is provided in Attachment E.", "The next step in the SMTMD renewal process is a final public hearing scheduled for November1, 2016. At that meeting, Council would consider adopting a Resolution renewing the SMTMD, if there is no majority protest.  A majority protest is defined as written protests received from owners of the lodging business within the proposed district which would pay 50 percent or more of the estimated total assessment of the entire SMTMD. Protests are weighted based on the assessment proposed to be levied on each lodging business.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no fiscal impact related to considering the revised SMTMD Management District Plan and holding a public hearing to receive additional testimony on the renewal of the SMTMD."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to One Unscheduled Vacancy on the Landmarks Commission for a Term Ending on June 30, 2017", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to One Unscheduled Vacancy on the Urban Forest Task Force for a Term Ending on June 30, 2017", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmembers McKeown, Himmelrich, and O'Day that, in keeping with the City\u2019s long commitment to the environment and sustainability, the Council join the California Legislature and our Congressman Ted Lieu in supporting the concept of a Carbon Fee and Dividend to tax the CO2 equivalent of fossil fuels at the source and refund the proceeds to resident households.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmember McKeown that the Council allocate $15,000 to the Samohi Choral Music Program and $15,000 to the Samohi Wind Ensemble for their April 2017 trips to Europe and Washington, D.C. respectively. These funds would be used exclusively to assist lower income students to travel with their fellow performers and would be allocated to match private funds raised by the two musical groups, with the first 50% of funds available for disbursement when an equal amount has been generated from other sources. The donations would be made to Santa Monica Arts Parents Association - Vocal Music and to Santa Monica Arts Parents Association - Band, both of which are divisions of SMAPA, a 501(c)(3).", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1538094600": [[{"Title": "Authorization to Execute a Contractual Services Agreement with Yardi Systems, Inc.", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Yardi Systems, Inc., a California-based company, for real property and asset management software licensing and maintenance. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 (d) and is for an amount not to exceed $14,933 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal option(s) subject to annual cost of living increases not to exceed 3%, plus a 10% contingency, for a total amount not to exceed $87,212 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City manages 590 leases and license agreements for City-owned assets and properties such as offices, hangars, and land leases. These leases are managed by the Santa Monica Airport and Housing and Economic Development\u2019s Economic Development Division. Since 2007, the City has used Yardi Systems, Inc.\u2019s (Yardi), Yardi\u2019s Voyager\u00ae, a proprietary and web-based comprehensive real estate property and asset management software, to manage commercial real estate operations, execute leasing, run analytics, and provide accounting process services.  The City competitively bid the software in 2007 and has successfully used it since that time. Although the City Council voted to close the Airport by June 2018, there is a need to maintain the software in the interim, therefore staff recommends a one-year agreement with Yardi to receive critical software updates and support, with four one-year options to renew at the City\u2019s sole discretion, each of which are subject to a cost of living increase not to exceed 3% per year. This allows staff flexibility to rebid the software, if needed, when the long-term needs of the Airport are better understood while ensuring continuity of service in the short-term.", "Background", "Yardi Systems, Inc. (Yardi) has provided real estate property and asset management software services to the Economic Development Division (EDD) and the Airport Division since November 21, 2007. Staff uses Yardi to execute leasing, run analytics, and provide accounting process services, performing multiple property management tasks including but not limited to: generate courtesy notices to tenants on a monthly basis; record payments, late fees and security deposits collected on a monthly basis;  prepare month-end reports on lease/ license agreement  monies charged and monies received for submission to Finance; track tenant insurance documentation; track lease/license expiration dates; maintain tenant contact information; and assess Consumer Price Index increases on an annual basis.", "The City entered into agreement No. 1573 for licensing and software maintenance for an amount not to exceed $35,900 in year one, for software license and hosting fees for up to six (6) ledger users and one (1) read only user at $15,500 per year, subject to annual cost of living increases, automatically renewing after each maturity period. The contract also authorized additional payments for ongoing staff training. The EDD and the Airport Divisions pro-rate the total expense based on the number of users per department.", "To date, the City has spent $159,106 with Yardi. This amount includes the $35,900 in FY 2007-2008, for year one, and subsequent payments totaling $123,206 for annual software license and hosting fees for up to six (6) ledger users and one (1) read only user, subject to annual cost of living increases, and expenses related to additional ongoing staff training. It should be noted that in 2012 the City reduced the number of ledger users to five (5), lowering the annual licensing fee to $14,139 beginning in FY 2012-13, subject to annual cost of living increases.  EDD has two (2) ledger users, and the Airport has three (3) ledger user licenses and one (1) read-only license.", "Discussion", "Yardi\u2019s Voyager\u00ae software is a web-based, fully integrated platform to manage commercial real estate operations, execute leasing, run analytics, and provide accounting process services. Yardi\u2019s Voyager\u00ae software database and accounting processing are key features of Yardi that support the management of City owned real estate property assets. Yardi\u2019s software license and hosting fees include critical software updates as well as technical support via Yardi\u2019s toll free phone line.", "Continuing payments to this vendor will exceed the authority of the City Manager by December 1, 2016; therefore, staff requests approval to enter into a new licensing and services agreement in an amount not to exceed $14,933 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal option(s) subject to annual cost of living increases not to exceed 3% on the same terms and conditions, plus a 10% contingency, for a total amount not to exceed $87,212 over a five-year period. The EDD and Airport Division recommend a one year agreement with Yardi to receive critical software updates and support.", "Currently, EDD manages 150 leases and license agreements in Yardi, and the Airport manages 440 leases and license agreements in Yardi, including offices, hangars, and land leases. Due to the current phasing out of master tenants at the Airport, staff anticipates additional leases to be tracked on Yardi in the coming year. In FY 2015-16 EDD staff used Yardi to track a total of $10,859,577 in revenues and fees, and the Airport tracked a total of $5,734,915.", "Staff requests to continue using Yardi\u2019s Voyager\u00ae software as the City\u2019s leasing data and records are currently incorporated into this system. It would be prohibitively expensive to replace the software with another property management system, transfer the data accurately and retrain staff on a new system.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In 2007, staff requested proposals for a web-based, fully integrated platform to manage commercial real estate operations, execute leasing, run analytics, and provide accounting process services for the EDD and Airport Divisions. Based on proposals submitted, Yardi Systems, Inc. was recommended as the best bidder, and an agreement was authorized by the City Manager\u2019s office.", "Yardi Systems, Inc. is the only vendor that can provide maintenance and support for its proprietary Voyager software system and is therefore the exclusive vendor pursuant to Section 2.24.080(d) of the Municipal Code. Staff recommends Yardi Systems, Inc. to furnish and deliver/provide software updates and support for its propriety Voyager software system as an exception to the competitive process. This purchase meets the City\u2019s exception to competitive bidding criteria. Competition does not exist because Yardi Systems, Inc. is the only vendor that possesses the unique capability to meet the particular requirements of critical software updates and support, as its Voyager software system is proprietary, copyrighted and updates and support are only available from Yardi Systems, Inc.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Yardi Systems, Inc. is for a total amount not to exceed $87,212.  Funds of $14,933 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Works and Housing & Economic Development Departments. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Department & Division", "Amount", "33431.588500", "Public Works - Airport", "$9,189", "012681.555060", "Housing & Economic Development \u2013 EDD", "$5,744", "TOTAL", "$14,933", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Construction Contracts for Street Light Modernization Project in Sunset Park Neighborhood", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Bid #SP2406 to Servitek Solutions, Inc., a California-based company, for the Street Light Modernization Program - Project 1; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Servitek Solutions, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $ 1,501,116 (including a 10% contingency); 3. Award RFP #SP2406 to Psomas, a California-based company, for construction management and inspection services for the Street Light Modernization Program \u2013 Project 1; 4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Professional Services Agreement with Psomas, in an amount not to exceed $187,530 (including a 10% contingency); 5. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Street Light Modernization Program - Project 1 would replace deteriorated high-voltage series electrical circuits and High Pressure Sodium (HPS) lighting fixtures with modern, reliable, 120-volt electrical circuits and Light Emitting Diode (LED) lighting fixtures on various residential streets located within the Sunset Park area.  These upgrades would result in reduced energy use and subsequent savings to the City. This project is the first in a multi-year five-part program to modernize the remaining high-voltage series street lighting within the City.", "In July 2016, the City solicited bids for construction services. Staff recommends Servitek Solutions, Inc., as the best bidder for the Street Light Modernization Program - Project 1, for an amount not to exceed $ 1,501,116 (including a 10% contingency).", "Additionally, in June 2016, the City requested proposals from pre-qualified construction management firms for construction management and inspection services for the Street Light Modernization Program - Project 1. Staff recommends Psomas to provide construction management and inspection services for this project in an amount not to exceed $187,530 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "The City Council appropriated funds in the Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget for fiscal year 2014-2016 and 2016-2018 to replace deteriorated series street lighting circuits and HPS fixtures with modern, reliable, multiple circuits and LED lighting fixtures, as part of the City\u2019s on-going program to modernize the remaining series circuit lighting within the City.  Series street lighting represents older technology based on high voltage circuitry with lighting fixtures connected in \u201cseries\u201d similar to Christmas lighting that may result in an entire circuit being disabled if a single light fixture goes out. Modern street lighting systems use standard 120-volt circuitry, connected in \u2018parallel\u201d that continues to operate even if one or more individual fixtures goes out. In addition, 120-volt circuitry supports modern energy-saving LED fixtures as well as other smart technologies. To date, approximately 70% of the existing series street lighting circuits in the City have been upgraded to modern 120-volt systems under this CIP. Consistent with efforts to preserve the \u201cdark night sky\u201d the LED cobra head replacements would have a 0 up-light rating, the fixtures would have an internal level ensuring that the light is directed downward, as well as other specifications that address the preservation of the \"dark night sky.\" In 2012, approximately 600 LED fixtures were installed at various locations throughout the City using American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (ARRA) funds. Fixtures were upgraded in neighborhoods including North of Montana, Sunset Park, Ocean Park, Wilshire-Montana and Mid-City. An additional 1200 HPS fixtures are currently being replaced with LED fixtures as part of the ongoing On-Bill Financed LED Street Light Conversion Project.", "This first project under the modernization program is located on various residential streets within the Sunset Park area as follows:", "\u00b7 Bay Street from Lincoln Blvd. to 16th Street", "\u00b7 Grant Avenue from Lincoln Blvd. to 16th Street", "\u00b7 Pacific Street from Lincoln Blvd. to 16th Street", "\u00b7 Pearl Street from Lincoln Blvd. to 16th Street", "\u00b7 Cedar Street from Lincoln Blvd. to 15th Street", "\u00b7 Pine Street from Lincoln Blvd. to 15th Street", "\u00b7 Maple Street from Lincoln Blvd. to 16th Street", "\u00b7 10th Street from Pico Blvd. to Ocean Park Blvd.", "\u00b7 11th Street from Pico Blvd. to Ocean Park Blvd.", "\u00b7 Euclid Street from Pico Blvd. to Ocean Park Blvd.", "\u00b7 14th Street from Pico Blvd. to Ocean Park Blvd.", "\u00b7 16th Street from Pico Blvd. to Ocean Park Blvd.", "The locations chosen were prioritized based on the maintenance and outage history provided by staff from Public Works. Future projects under the modernization program will address series street lights in the North of Montana, Ocean Park and Mid-City areas as shown under Attachment 1, contingent on adequate funding.", "Contractor Selection \u2013 Construction", "On July 6, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Street Light Modernization Program - Project 1 to replace deteriorated series street lighting circuits and fixtures with modern, reliable, multiple circuits and LED lighting fixtures in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-two vendors downloaded the bid. Five bids were received and publicly opened on July 28, 2016. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Base Bid", "Servitek Solutions, Inc.", "$1,364,651", "International Line Builders, Inc.", "$1,579,737", "Belco Elecnor Group", "$1,776,622", "Comet Electric", "$1,788,702", "Select Electric, Inc.", "$1,953,441", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, capacity to perform the work, experience on similar projects, availability of material, equipment and qualified staff, understanding of the project requirements, ability to meet the desired time frames, and performance of similar projects. Based on these criteria, Servitek Solutions, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Staff contacted references provided by Servitek Solutions, Inc. for similar projects for the Los Angeles Unified School District, the Palm Springs Airport, Metro, and Caltrans. All references reported that the work was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractor's State Licenses Board that Servitek Solutions' license is current, active, and in good standing.", "Consultant Selection - Construction Management", "On September 22, 2015, the City issued Request for Qualifications (RFQ) for construction management and inspection services for upcoming construction projects. The RFQ was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. One hundred twenty-four vendors downloaded the RFQ. Twenty-five firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department.", "Evaluation was based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC Section 2.24.073, with specific review of the following: technical competence, staffing capability, project approach, past performance, dispute resolution, quality control, cost control, management services, customer service, and the ability to meet required time frames. The top three firms (Hill International, Psomas and Willdan) were invited to submit scope and fee proposals in June 2016.", "Based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Psomas as the best qualified firm to provide construction management and inspection services based on its qualifications and its directly related experience providing similar services for municipal agencies. Services provided by Psomas would include construction management, continuous inspection of the contractor\u2019s work, verification and management of field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigation of impacts as a result of the construction activities, attendance of contractor\u2019s safety meetings, attendance of periodic progress meetings, recordkeeping of all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work performed during construction, and public outreach.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach during construction of this project would be provided by the City\u2019s construction management consultant as part of the construction management effort. Public outreach would include notifications distributed to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope of the project, potential impacts including night work, and schedule with periodic updates and weekly updates on the City\u2019s \u201cKnow", "Before You Go\u201d (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily", "Press. Updates regarding the project would be provided on the City\u2019s website and various social media channels.", "Properties impacted by the project will receive two construction notices. The first general notice would be mailed to properties adjacent to the proposed work two weeks prior to the start of construction. A second two-day notice would be subsequently hand-delivered to each adjacent property with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts, and contact information. The notices would be prepared by Public Works staff and distributed by the contractor.", "Construction Schedule", "Construction work is tentatively scheduled to begin in November 2016, pending material availability. Construction duration is for a period of approximately six months.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Servitek Solutions is for an amount not to exceed", "$1,501,116 (including a 10% contingency). The Professional Services Agreement to be awarded to Psomas is for an amount not to exceed $187,530 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program", "budget in account C010724.589000."]}, {"Title": "Proposed Rent Subsidy Pilot Program: Preserving Our Diversity", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the proposed Preserving Our Diversity pilot program (POD Program) Guidelines, as outlined in Attachment A, to provide rental assistance to extremely low-income residents experiencing severe rent burden.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Data from several hundred Santa Monica low-income households that participated in a recent written survey indicates many residents are paying a disproportionate amount of rent for their housing.  At the lowest income levels, households paying unaffordable rents are left with approximately $200 a month for household necessities, which can result in long-term residents having to leave Santa Monica. To further one of the City Council\u2019s Strategic Goals of maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, Council approved funding for a pilot program to provide rental assistance to a limited number of existing residents. Implementing the proposed Preserving Our Diversity (POD) Pilot Program provides an opportunity to gauge the efficacy of preserving housing affordability through a locally designed and funded rental-assistance program. The primary goal of the proposed Program is to help extremely low-income residents stay in their homes and mitigate economic displacement by reducing household rent burden and achieving a feasible level of affordability.", "Background", "In December 2015, the Housing Commission presented a report to Council recommending affordable housing strategies that could help preserve Santa Monica\u2019s economic diversity and bolster housing security for residents (see Attachment B). Oneof the strategies discussed in the Commission\u2019s report aims to \u201cassist lower-income Santa Monicans to remain in their rent-controlled homes.\u201d The report discusses federal data indicating that 6,325 Santa Monica households with very low incomes are spending more than half of their incomes on rent. A key rationale of the rental assistance strategy is stemming the ongoing loss of affordable, rent-controlled apartments, which occurs when long-term residents vacate their homes and rents become decontrolled. Lower income households are more likely than higher income households to be economically displaced due to unaffordable rent. In such cases, existing affordability of rent-controlled residences is lost as rents for new tenants are set at market rates.", "Responsibility for aiding economically-strained households has traditionally fallen on Federal, State and County governments. Santa Monica, however, has for more than three decades been a leader in local government policy initiatives to support affordability, particularly in regard to housing. The City was one of a handful of cities statewide with a program of rent control for apartments, a contentious policy choice that has nonetheless made a huge impact not only on the ability of thousands of residents to continue to live here during times of rapidly increasing rents, but also to ensure a far more economically diverse community make-up. The City was also a pioneer in leveraging affordable housing funding, particularly from redevelopment, and has aggressively pursued \u201cinclusionary zoning\u201d policies. Yet with changes in State law affecting local rent control protections and the demise of redevelopment, market forces are continuing to place local residents in a tight squeeze to afford rent and hang on to their homes. While there is risk in stepping into that gap, the downside risks of not exploring new solutions leaves many Santa Monica households vulnerable.", "On May 10, 2016 (see Attachment B), Council directed staff to explore creating a local rent-subsidy program to assist low-income Santa Monica residents who currently live in rent-controlled apartments and are severely rent burdened. Additionally, as part of the FY2016-17 budget approved on June 14, 2016, Council allocated $300,000 for a pilot program providing rental assistance to rent-burdened households living in rent-controlled apartments, for the purpose of preserving housing affordability (see Attachment C.) \u2018Rent-burdened\u2019 is a national affordable housing metric and describes a household paying more than 30 percent of income for rent. \u2018Severely rent-burdened\u2019 designates a household paying more than 50 percent of income for rent.", "Renter Needs Survey", "To assess the magnitude of rent burden among residents in rent-controlled residences, staff conducted a Renter Needs Survey (Survey) from June 24, 2016 to July 18, 2016. The Survey also functioned as a pre-application for the POD rental-assistance pilotprogram. Potential participants were informed of the Survey/pre-application by a flyer included in the annual June 2016 Rent Control Board mailing to approximately 27,500 rent-controlled tenants, as well as postings on City websites, advertisement in local papers, and outreach to businesses, churches, libraries, supermarkets, and social service agencies. The Survey asked ten questions about each household, including size, income, rent, tenure in Santa Monica, and demographics (See Attachment D.)", "As of July 18, 2016, 814 surveys were received by mail or online via Survey Monkey. Analysis of the surveys was narrowed to the 678 containing complete information, and further narrowed to the 433 households living in rent-controlled residences not already subsidized by the City, County, or federal government, or subject to affordability covenants. The survey data is self-reported and would be verified during the eligibility verification process.", "Key Findings", "The key findings of the Renter Needs Survey include:", "\u00b7 76% of the 433 (330) households are rent-burdened", "\u00b7 36% of the 433 (155) households are severely rent-burdened", "o 79 of 155 households are extremely low-income", "o Of the 79 households, the average:", "\u00a7 age = 68", "\u00a7 household size = 1.2", "\u00a7 monthly rent = $954", "\u00a7 income = $1,144 (monthly); $13,728 (annual)", "\u00a7 rent-to-income ratio is 83%", "\u2018Extremely low-income\u2019 describes households with incomes less than 30 percent of the median income (e.g., annual income of less than $18,250 for a 1-person household). Additionally, affordable rent is defined as 30 percent of gross income. To relieve the average rent burden of one of the 79 households mentioned above, the household needs $611 per month in rental assistance, or $7,332 annually. Providing rental assistance to all 79 extremely low-income households who are severely rent-burdened would cost $579,228 annually (excluding program administraion costs). The table below demonstrates the rental subsidy calculation:", "Rent Subsidy Calculation", "Monthly Rent", "$954", "Tenant\u2019s Portion", "(30% of monthly income of $1,144)", "($343)", "Rent Assistance Needed", "$611", "Annual Rent Assistance", "$7,332", "Cost to Serve 79 Households", "$579,228", "See Attachment E for charts illustrating detailed demographic characteristics of the 433 Survey-respondent households living in rent-controlled residences, including information about household size, tenure in Santa Monica, senior status, and rent vs. income.", "Discussion", "Survey data from the 433 households experiencing rent burden indicates the scope of need far exceeds the capacity of the proposed pilot POD Program, which has a $300,000 budget ($200,000 for direct rental assistance and $100,000 for program administration.) Completely relieving rent burden for the 79 households mentioned above would require annual subsidies almost three times ($579,228) the direct rental assistance budget. Incrafting the proposed POD Program, staff considered three main factors for prioritizing assistance: 1) income level; 2) rent-burden level; and 3) length of residency.", "Extremely low-income households are economically vulnerable given minimal monthly income available after paying rent. Survey responses indicate there are 84 extremely low-income households who are rent-burdened (not just severely rent-burdened), with $216 per month available on average. Similarly, this population is experiencing the greatest rent burden, with 92 percent of the extremely low-income households also classified as severely rent-burdened (79 out of 84) and are likely at the greatest risk of being displaced and possibly becoming homeless. Therefore, prioritizing extremely low-income households would have a similar result to targeting severely rent-burdened households, given the significant overlap between the two groups.", "With respect to rent-burden level, the proposed POD Program could seek to eliminate rent burden by providing assistance to reduce household rent payments to 30 percent of income. Analyzing the same 79 households mentioned previously, and based upon the $200,000 rental assistance budget, approximately 27 households could be served (average monthly subsidy of $611). Alternatively, the Program\u2019s goal could be to reduce, rather than eliminate, rent burden. For example, reducing rent burden to 40 percent of household income would enable the Program to serve more households because the rental assistance per household would be lower. Under the 40 percent scenario, approximately 33 households could be served (average monthly subsidy of $496). Taking the approach one step further, reducing rent burden to 50 percent of income level would allow the Program to serve approximately 43 households. Three options for the pilot POD Program are summarized below:", "Option 1: Eliminate rent burden by reducing rent to 30 percent of household income", "o estimated number of households served: 27", "Option 2: Reduce rent burden to 40 percent of household income", "o estimated number of households served: 33", "Option 3: Reduce rent burden to 50 percent of household income", "o estimated number of households served: 43", "A fourth option (Option 4) could be to provide a set amount of monthly rental assistance, depending on qualifying income category. For example, a monthly subsidy based upon the following income categories:", "o extremely low income: $500", "o very low income: $400", "o low income: $300", "The fixed-amount method differs from the other three options because it would serve households in all low-income categories rather than just those at the lowest income level (i.e., extremely low-income). The number of households that could be assisted would depend on the monthly subsidy allocated to each income group. Using the example provided above ($500 to $300), approximately 13 households in each of the income categories could be assisted, for a total of 39 households. Using a lower standard subsidy \u2013 for example, $400, $300, $200 - would increase the number of households that could be assisted to approximately 18 in each income category, or 54 total households. Using a higher standard subsidy amount than presented in the example would have the opposite effect.", "Staff recommends implementing the pilot POD Program using Option 2, and prioritizing extremely low-income and severely rent-burdened households. Option 2 balances a significant reduction in rent burden with assisting more households than Option 1. Additionally, the Survey data indicates that the households experiencing the most substantial economic challenges are both extremely low-income and severely rent-burdened. Furthermore, the recommended approach would serve primarily (89%) long-term Santa Monica residents.", "Threshold Eligibility Criteria", "Staff recommends the following threshold household eligibility criteria for the proposed POD Program (household must meet all criteria below):", "o Submitted a complete Renter Needs Survey by July 18, 2016 at 5 p.m. PST", "o Living in a Santa Monica rent-control apartment for at least 10 years;", "\u00d8 Excludes households living in deed-restricted affordable housing, and properties purchased, rehabilitated, or constructed with financial assistance from the City, Los Angeles County, or the federal government, as well as inclusionary affordable apartments subject to the Affordable Housing Production Program;", "o Not currently participating in, or previously terminated from, any Santa Monica Housing Authority rental subsidy programs;", "o No household members convicted of violent crime which occurred within the last 5 years, or are registered sex offenders.", "Priority Criteria", "o Extremely low income (less than 30 percent of median income; see Attachment F);", "o Severely rent-burdened (rent exceeds 50 percent of gross household income)", "\u00d8 Prioritization among the households would be implemented by serving households in order of highest rent burden to lower rent burden. For example, a household with a rent burden of 80 percent would have priority over a household with a 75 percent rent burden.", "Housing Commission Input", "As mentioned earlier in this report, the Housing Commission\u2019s December 2015 report to the City Council regarding affordable housing strategies recommended implementing a local rent subsidy program. Draft guidelines for the proposed POD Program were reviewed and discussed by the Housing Commission at its June 16, 2016 meeting (see Attachment G). Commissioners had a wide-ranging discussion and provided feedback regarding various methods for prioritizing program participants and utilizing the available funding. One approach discussed is to use the limited funds to reduce rent burden to a level below 50 percent of income \u2013 such as 40 percent of income - rather than all the way down to 30 percent of income, thereby allowing the program to assist more households. Another approach discussed was targeting low-income households rather than extremely low-income households, also with the intent of assisting more households (and based upon an assumption that reducing rent burden would require less assistance for low-income households versus extremely low-income households). The Housing Commission decided not to take action on specifics of the draft guidelines.", "Next Steps", "With Council approval, staff would implement the Program and provide a subsequent report to Council, including the total number of households assisted and an evaluation of the Program\u2019s impact on housing retention. Staff would provide written materials to Program participants at the outset to make clear the temporary (pilot) nature of the Program, including the stipulation that rental assistance funding is authorized for only twelve months. Staff would also like to remind the Council that discontinuing rental assistance to initial participants of the POD Program could be disruptive to those households.", "Ultimately, there is insufficient local resources to indefinitely continue, much less expand, such a program. It is hoped that what is learned from this pilot will help frame future regional, State and even Federal policy to address the challenges of affordable housing for millions across California and the nation.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The Preserving Our Diversity Pilot Program will cost $300,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Housing and Economic Development Department. Program expenditures will be charged to account 04264.577290. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Memoranda of Understanding with Organizations and Individuals for CityTV's Production and Distribution of Video Content", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Office of Communications", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute Memoranda of Understanding to document and ensure accountability with organizations and individuals for the Office of Communications, CityTV, to produce, distribute and archive video content.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff requests Council authorization for the City Manager to enter into Memoranda of Understanding (MOU), when necessary, with organizations and individuals for CityTV to produce and distribute video content regarding topics of interest to the Santa Monica community. CityTV has a history of working with community partners for production services on an informal basis and requests to formalize future relationships with MOUs. These MOUs would provide clarity regarding the responsibilities and expectations of each party, including schedule, scope of work, deliverables, ownership and use of content, and associated costs based on the Council adopted fee schedule for CityTV production services. Content produced with partners would target the Santa Monica community and would be distributed on the City\u2019s website, social media accounts, or television channels.", "Background", "Over the years CityTV has produced and distributed a variety of video content in partnership with different organizations and individuals, however these arrangements had not been formalized. Past productions have included Connie Martinson Talks Books, Cheap Eats, Forever Yoga, Metro Motion, Little League Championship Game, Twilight Concert Series, election coverage with the League of Women Voters, and SMMUSD School Board Meetings.", "On April 12, 2016 Council authorized the City Manager to enter into a MOU with the Metropolitan Transit Authority for production of Metro Motion, and on July 26, 2016 Council authorized the City Manager to enter into separate MOUs with the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District for filming of School Board Meetings and with the Santa Monica Pier Corporation for filming of the Twilight Concert Series. The MOUs authorized by Council outlined responsibilities of each party and included distinct rates for CityTV production services for a limited time based on historical charges, community benefit, and the need for organizations to have time to budget accordingly.", "Council approved a fee schedule for CityTV production services as part of the FY 16-17 budget adoption on June 14, 2016. This fee schedule will be utilized for future partnerships requiring video production services, with costs detailed in each MOU.", "Discussion", "The Office of Communications seeks to establish a standard practice of formalizing relationships with organizations and individuals for CityTV production services by entering into MOUs that outline expectations, responsibilities, and costs associated with the work performed by CityTV. Akin to minor contracts that fall under the City Manager\u2019s current scope of authority, it would facilitate fostering new programming opportunities to enter into written agreements without having to go through the time and process of City Council review for each and every one.", "The Office of Communications is working to develop new programming during FY 2016-17 and utilization of MOUs to formalize relationships is consistent with other partnerships entered into by the City, such as the partnership between the City and Platia Productions to present AltCar Expo and Conference. Staff requests blanket authorization for the City Manager to enter into MOUs for partnerships requiring CityTV\u2019s services in an effort to be flexible and responsive in a timely manner to video production opportunities that may be of interest to the community. These MOUs would provide clarity regarding responsibilities and expectations of each party, including schedule, scope of work, deliverables, ownership and use of content, and associated costs based on the Council adopted fee schedule for CityTV production services. The fees charged for CityTV services may result in an increase of revenue to the City, dependent upon the number of and scope of the partnerships that are developed.", "The Office of Communications is currently in discussions with Kaiser Permanente (Kaiser) and Office of Wellbeing staff to develop an agreement for CityTV to produce a series of segments based on findings from the Wellbeing Index. Kaiser leadership used the Wellbeing Index to better understand the Santa Monica community in preparation for opening its local medical office this past spring. In recognition of the value that the City\u2019s Wellbeing Index provided them and for the community overall, Kaiser approached the City with the desire to partner and promote the Wellbeing Index findings, health linkages and community resources using co-created programming on City TV, and at Kaiser produced community events. The costs associated with production of the segments, as outlined in the fee schedule, would be borne by Kaiser. These costs, and other terms associated with this partnership, as well as partnerships developed with other organizations or individuals requiring City TV services, would be specified in MOUs to provide clarity and foster successful working relationships.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future."]}, {"Title": "Approval of Final Sale of City-Owned Property at 2018 19th Street", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Purchase and Sale Agreement with CBI, LLC regarding the City-owned property at 2018 19th Street; and2. Adopt a resolution to approve the final sale of property at 2018 19th Street, pursuant to SMMC Section 2.24.110(g).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Redevelopment Agency funded a loan for the purchase of 2018 19th Street by a non-profit housing entity for a proposed affordable housing development. During the predevelopment phase, the proposed development was determined financially infeasible. Subsequently, the property was conveyed to the Redevelopment Agency in 2009 in exchange for cancellation of the loan. As affordable housing development on the site would result in an inefficient use of affordable housing funds, Council authorized the sale of the property, with the sale proceeds to be redirected toward a more optimal affordable housing use. Two solicitation processes resulted in a high bid of $1.3 million. If approved, the saleproceeds would be deposited into the City\u2019s Low and Moderate Income Housing Asset Fund to create future affordable housing opportunities.", "Background", "The property located at 2018 19th Street is a 7,996-square-foot, vacant parcel located in the first block north of Pico Boulevard, as shown in Attachment A. The property was originally acquired by Habitat for Humanity with funds from the City\u2019s Redevelopment Agency for development of affordable, ownership housing. The property was conveyed to the Redevelopment Agency in 2009, and subsequently to the City in 2012, because Habitat for Humanity determined that development of affordable housing on the site was financially infeasible (see May 26, 2009 staff report provided as Attachment B).", "Staff has examined various strategies to create affordable housing opportunities on the site. The site has a zoning designation of R-2, which would only support a development of approximately five residences with minimal opportunity to leverage other sources of funding. The small economy of scale achievable at the site would result in a prohibitively high per-unit development cost, thereby requiring a large City subsidy to achieve affordability and financial feasibility.", "On May 12, 2015, Council adopted Resolution 10878 declaring that 2018 19th Street is not needed for any public purpose and authorized the sale of the property (see Attachment C). Proceeds from the sale must be deposited into the City\u2019s Low and Moderate Income Housing Asset Fund, and would be used to create future affordable housing opportunities with potential to assist a greater number of households than possible at the property.", "Discussion", "Pursuant to City Council action and CAL. GOV. CODE \u00a7 54222, public agencies were offered the opportunity to purchase the property prior to the property being available for sale to the general public. No interest was expressed by any public agencies during the 60-day offer period.", "To comply with SMMC Section 2.24.110 (d) allowing for sale by competitive proposals andnegotiation, staff issued a Request for Sealed Bids (RSB) seeking proposals to purchase the property on October 7, 2015. The RSB was advertised through PlanetBids, a web-based system utilized by the City for procurement, which requires interested parties to register to receive RSB updates. Additionally, the RSB was posted in the Santa Monica Daily Press, on the City\u2019s website, and online through ForSaleByOwner.com. Several interested parties commented to staff that the City\u2019s use of PlanetBids for real estate transactions is onerous and unconventional. Despite considerable interest during the seven-week RSB period, only four formal offers were received by the November30,2015 deadline. The purchase offers received for the property ranged from $152,000 to $1.115 million, each less than the December 1, 2015 appraised value of $1.275 million. In December 2015, the property was offered exclusively to the four proposers with a minimum asking price of $1.275 million. None of the four proposers submitted subsequent bids.", "In May 2016, the City revised its approach to marketing the property by removing the requirement that bidders must register with PlanetBids to receive RSB updates for the sale of this property. Staff issued a second RSB seeking offers no less than the appraised value of $1.275 million for the property. The second RSB was advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press, on the City\u2019s website, online through ForSaleByOwner.com, and through PlanetBids. After seven weeks on the open market, staff received one all-cash offer of $1.3 million from Cross Border Investments, LLC (CBI) with a 14-day due diligence period and 21-day escrow period. CBI is a limited- liability company registered with the State of California. The offer expires on November1, 2016.", "The property\u2019s market interest and value have been tested three times (initial RSB, exclusive offer to four bidders, and second RSB). The CBI, LLC offer is greater than the minimum price established by a current appraisal by a qualified real estate appraiser. Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Purchase and Sale Agreement with CBI, LLC. Sale proceeds would be deposited into the Low and Moderate Income Housing Asset Fund for use toward affordable housing.", "To comply with SMMC Section 2.24.110(g) regarding approval of final sale of real property, Council must adopt a resolution approving final sale, which must be passed by an affirmative vote of five members of the City Council. A copy of the resolution is attached as Attachment D.", "Alternatively, City Council at its discretion may reject the CBI proposal and may direct staff to re-advertise.", "Environmental Analysis", "Sale of the property is categorically exempt from environmental review pursuant to CEQA Guideline 15312, as it involves the sale of surplus governmental property for which the use of the property has not changed since it was conveyed to the City. Should the successful purchaser of the property pursue development of the site, such development would be subject to CEQA review.", "Alternatives", "The site could be made available to housing providers for the purpose of developing affordable rental housing. One challenge with development of the site is the combination of small-lot size and low-density zoning, which diminishes the potential for leveraging federal low-income housing tax credits, a primary source of affordable housing funding. Tax credits typically fund 40 to 50 percent of total development costs and eligible tax credit developments cannot exceed per-unit development costs limits established by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee (CTCAC). Given the imputed land value of $1.275 million and estimated construction costs, any proposed development would likely either exceed the CTCAC development costs limits or not be prioritized for a funding award. Therefore, the development would require an exceptionally large City subsidy, representing approximately 80 to 90 percent of the development costs, to achieve affordability and financial feasibility. As a result, the City\u2019s ability to support affordable housing with the available funds would be significantly diminished.", "Next Steps", "With Council authorization, staff would proceed to complete the sale of the property.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Staff estimates that the sale of the property will generate approximately $1.3 million in revenues in FY 2016-17; the actual amount will vary depending on final negotiations and closing costs. Sale proceeds would be deposited into the Low and Moderate Income Housing Asset Fund (15 Fund) account 15264.401801 for use toward future affordable housing."]}, {"Title": "Proposed Revisions to TORCA Home Ownership Loan Terms", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Allow modifications to the loan terms for up to 17 remaining participants of the Tenant Ownership Rights Charter Amendment (TORCA) loan program to be revised from a fixed due date to due-on-sale or transfer.2.  Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to modify the terms of up to 17 remaining TORCA loans to due-on-sale or transfer of the condominium, upon request by the borrower, and based on a determination that the borrower would be economically unable to repay the loan on the fixed due date.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Santa Monica administers the Tenant Ownership Rights Charter Amendment (TORCA) loan program, which provided deferred payment loans from 1994-2001 to qualifying borrowers in exchange for a proportionate share of the property\u2019s appreciated value. The TORCA loan program has enabled over 50 Santa Monica low- and moderate-income households to purchase their apartments as they converted to condominiums. In order to facilitate continued housing stability for households with outstanding shared-appreciation loans, staff recommends creating an option for income-qualified households to extend loan terms from fixed due dates to terms that would require repayment upon sale or transfer. TheCity\u2019s proportionate share of appreciation would be retained during the extensionperiod.", "Background", "From 1991 to 2001, the City\u2019s Tenant Ownership Rental Conversion Act (TORCA) loan program provided deferred-payment, shared-appreciation, second-mortgage loans to assist low- and moderate-income renters in purchasing their apartments as they converted to condominiums. TORCA loans financed the gap between the purchase price and the bank loan for which the resident qualified and covered from 14 percent to 60 percent of the original purchase price. On average, the original purchase price for TORCA residences was $128,000. The TORCA program issued 53 loans of which 36 have been repaid and 17 remain outstanding.", "On December 11, 2012, City Council authorized staff to allow the option of 10-year extensions to the original 20-year loan terms to coincide with the typical 30-year term of a TORCA homeowner\u2019s primary mortgage (see Attachment A). Currently, eight loans have 30-year terms with fixed payment due dates between 2023 and 2031 (two of the eight originally had 20-year terms and have been granted 10-year extensions). Nine loans are in the initial 20-year term, with due dates through 2018.", "The deferred payment aspect of the TORCA loan means no payment is required during the loan term. However, at the loan due date, the shared-appreciation feature of the loan requires the borrower to repay the City the original loan amount plus a share of the appreciated value of the condominium. The City\u2019s share of the appreciation is equal to the proportion of the City loan relative to the original purchase price, and is calculated on the difference between the original purchase price and the market value on the loan due date, as determined by an appraiser. The following provides an example of how the shared-appreciation calculation works:", "TORCA Shared-Appreciation Loan", "Repayment Scenario", "Original Purchase Information", "Original Purchase Price", "$125,000", "TORCA Loan", "$54,000", "TORCA Percentage of Price", "43%", "Appreciation Calculation", "Current Market Value:", "$525,000", "Original Sales Price:", "($125,000)", "Appreciation:", "$400,000", "TORCA Repayment Calculation", "City Share of Appreciation (43%)", "$172,000", "TORCA Loan Amount:", "$54,000", "Repayment Due to City:", "$226,000", "The pending balloon payment associated with TORCA loans presents a financial challenge for remaining low- and moderate-income borrowers who wish to stay in their homes after the loan due date, rather than sell their residence to repay the loan. In the past year, staff has spoken to several borrowers who are concerned that loan repayment at the end of the fixed term would be economically infeasible or a significanthardship. Using July 2016 estimates from Zillow.com, staff calculates that TORCA condominiums for the remaining 17 borrowers have appreciated by an average of 268 percent since their original purchase. Borrowers may have retired in recent years and live on fixed incomes. Others may be elderly, and their age, or combination of age and income, may be a barrier to securing new mortgages that could repay the Cityloans.", "On February 11, 2016 and July 21, 2016, the Housing Commission considered potential options for TORCA borrowers regarding loan repayment (see Attachments B and C). Several ideas about repayment were discussed by Commissioners, including:", "\u00b7 City\u2019s \u2018fair share\u2019 of the TORCA loan investment in any extension scenario;", "\u00b7 Decreasing the owner\u2019s share of appreciation in exchange for a loan extension;", "\u00b7 Historic fair return;", "\u00b7 Risk of not being repaid after some form of extension;", "\u00b7 Family members possibly contesting a loan extension;", "\u00b7 City buying TORCA condominium at loan maturity, then renting to former owner at 30 percent of household income; also, City selling or transferring the condominium when the resident vacates (for a profit or to another low-income household); and", "\u00b7 Available information about how many of the remaining TORCA borrowers would actually need a loan extension.", "The Housing Commission discussed that allowing the extension of TORCA loans for borrowers unable to refinance or to repay the TORCA loan would avert potential displacement. At its July 21, 2016 meeting, the Housing Commission recommended creating an option (see Option 1 below) for the remaining TORCA borrowers to extend their loan due dates.", "Discussion", "To address the challenge of TORCA borrowers who are unable to repay the loan at the due date, three options could be offered:", "Option 1:  Extend the loan term via loan amendment to due-on-sale or transfer, wherein the City receives the same shared-appreciation proportion as the original loan during the extended loan term; or", "Option 2: Extend the loan period via loan amendment to due-on-sale or transfer, wherein the City receives an increased shared-appreciation proportion during the extended loan term; or", "Option 3: City purchases the condominium for the owner\u2019s portion of appreciated value (i.e., owner\u2019s equity), then rents to the former owner at 30 percent of the owner\u2019s household income; when the former owner vacates, the City:", "\u00b7 sells the condominium for market value and dedicates the proceeds for affordable housing uses; or", "\u00b7 sells the condominium to a low- or moderate-income family at an affordable sales price; or", "\u00b7 transfers the condominium to a nonprofit housing organization willing to own and operate it as affordable housing.", "Staff and the Housing Commission recommend Option 1 as the approach would assist TORCA borrowers who are elderly or with low or moderate incomes. Option 1 allows owners to remain in their homes and to retain ownership of a valuable and likely appreciating asset during an extended term when the first mortgage will likely be paid-off, thus freeing up household income to pay for living expenses. A \u2018due-on-sale or transfer\u2019 loan provision would retain the City\u2019s proportion of appreciation throughout the extended loan term. Option 1 is consistent with TORCA loan program\u2019s original goals of preventing resident displacement, enhancing housing stability, and facilitating affordable homeownership.", "Eligibility measures for allowing the conversion of the TORCA loan from a fixed date to due-on-sale or transfer would involve the following: 1) assessment of borrower income category (i.e., low- or moderate-income household); 2) proportion of income used for housing costs (mortgage, property taxes, homeowner association fees, and property insurance); 3) assets in excess of the equity in the TORCA residence; and 4) feasibility of obtaining a bank loan to repay the TORCA loan. Additionally, as a condition of amending the loan terms, the City\u2019s deed of trust for the TORCA loan must remain in the same lien position and would not be subordinate to additional debt secured subsequent to the original TORCA loan, unless otherwise agreed to by the City in its sole discretion.", "Specific eligibility criteria would include borrower situations in which assets are less than three times the amount of the TORCA loan repayment (excluding the TORCA residence equity), and include one or more of the following conditions:", "\u00b7 housing costs (including the aforementioned new bank loan) would exceed 40 percent of gross income;", "\u00b7 age or permanent disability prevents gainful employment; or", "\u00b7 inability to obtain a new mortgage to repay the TORCA loan is documented by bank lenders.", "Alternatively, the City could implement Option 2 or Option 3.", "Option 2 would allow residents who are unable to obtain or afford market-rate loans to repay the TORCA loan, to remain in their homes beyond the loan due date in exchange for increasing the City\u2019s share of appreciation. While the City could benefit financially from the approach compared to Option 1, the option shifts the proportionate share of appreciation from the homeowner to the City. The option reflects a direct but deferred cost to the borrower in exchange for the loan extension. Determining the \u2018fair\u2019 amount of increased appreciation share for the City under this scenario could be challenging, and may compel the resident to sell their home rather than accept the City\u2019s terms for extending the loan.", "Option 3 would transition the resident from an owner to a renter and the City from a lender to a landlord, until the former owner vacates. The approach would require the City to employ cash resources and assume landlord responsibilities, which entails significantly more liabilities and staff resources than performing the role of lender. Conversely, owners with limited financial resources could benefit from the opportunity to cash-out on owner equity. Subsequently, the condominium could be: 1) sold and the proceeds targeted to affordable housing uses; 2) sold with an affordability covenant to a qualifying low- or moderate-income household; or 3) transferred to a nonprofit organization to operate as affordable rental housing. The scattered locations of the 17 TORCA residences could make it challenging for either the City or a nonprofit organization to operate as affordable rental properties.", "If City Council approves an approach for extending the remaining TORCA loans, staff would contact the borrowers about the potential for extending the loan due date and the process for applying for an extension.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. The financial impact of allowing loan extensions to due-on-sale or transfer is expected to defer loan repayment revenue, from the existing due dates over the next 15 years to future dates. As many as 17 loan due dates may be extended for qualifying borrowers. The amount of the outstanding loan principal of the 17 loans is $907,659, and the current estimated City accumulated appreciation is approximately $2,350,000. Staff cannot reasonably predict how many of the 17 remaining borrowers may request and qualify for an extension, and if granted, when the condominiums would be sold or transferred (triggering the loan repayment). During any extension period, the City share of appreciation for each loan remains the same as during the initial loan period. Historical trends indicate that real estate values increase over the long-term but can decrease in the short-term. Therefore, the City\u2019s share of accumulated appreciation associated with extended loans may increase or decrease from the amount otherwise expected at the original loan due date."]}, {"Title": "Modify Purchase Order for Personal Protective Equipment", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Increase the award of Bid #4215, awarded to Municipal Emergency Services Inc., a Connecticut-based company, for the purchase of firefighting personal protective equipment, from $165,000 to $450,000;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Municipal Emergency Services Inc. for firefighting personal protective equipment in the amount not to exceed $450,000 over the three year agreement and on the same terms and conditions; with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Fire Department is requesting a modification to an existing purchase order for personal protective equipment (PPE). This equipment is used by personnel for protection under a myriad of fire ground and emergency response conditions. Each Firefighter requires a primary set of turnouts, and a reserve set that can be used when the frontline set becomes contaminated following a fire or other significant exposure and requires cleaning. To accomplish this the Department needs to purchase up to thirty additional new sets of turnouts each year. The maximum lifespan of a set of turnouts is 10 years, but some may not last that long due to damage or severe wear.", "Following a formal bid process in FY2015-16, Municipal Emergency Services Inc. was recommended as the best bidder to provide and deliver firefighting personal protective equipment. The current purchase order with MES is not to exceed $165,000. However, after auditing the current inventory, and accounting for the new recruit academy of 17 firefighters who all require a new set and access to a reserve set, the current purchase order requires modification. The Fire Department is requesting an increase to the current purchase order authority for the three year term to a total not to exceed $450,000.", "Background", "The National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) sets the standard governing the requirements for structural firefighting protective clothing and for proximity firefighting protective clothing. NFPA 1971 protects firefighting personnel by establishing minimum levels of protection from thermal, physical, environmental, and blood-borne pathogen hazards encountered during structural and proximity firefighting operations. PPE typically has a useful life of ten years and must be replaced prior to the end of its useful life or replaced sooner if damaged beyond repair. In addition, NFPA standards recommend that each firefighter be equipped with two sets of turnouts to avoid contamination after a fire or other hazardous response which require decontamination of worn garments prior to be being placed back into service. The Department provides this equipment for each firefighter.", "On October 27, 2015 (Attachment A), Council awarded Bid #4215 to Municipal Emergency Services Inc., a Connecticut-based company, for the purchase of firefighting personal protective equipment and authorized the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Municipal Emergency Services Inc. for firefighting personal protective equipment for a total not to exceed $165,000.", "Structural firefighting turn out gear has not been funded out of an expenditure line item for the fire department. This has resulted in the purchasing and subsequent inventory being somewhat inconsistent. After a thorough audit and taking into account seventeen new firefighters coming on at one time, the department requires a significant expenditure in this area to meet the needs of our personnel.", "Discussion", "In 2016, the Fire Department responded to over fifteen thousand calls for service, and officers must don personal protective equipment to protect the firefighter\u2019s body from injury when responding to emergency incidents. Personal protective equipment is worn to protect the firefighter from harmful environmental conditions and physical injury during fire and rescue incidents. The hazards addressed by protective equipment include physical, electrical, heat, chemicals, biohazards, and airborne particulate matter.", "A recent comprehensive analysis of Fire Department PPE revealed significant deficiencies in the replacement of aged and worn PPE. The Fire Department expects to purchase 25-30 sets of PPE in an annual cycle that allows for future budget planning and is consistent with national best practices. In addition to replacing suits for existing personnel, the Department recently hired seventeen firefighter recruits and must purchase equipment for these new officers. Currently, these recruits use rented equipment from 911 Safety Equipment, LLC, a New York-based company.", "Vendor Selection", "In August 2015, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to deliver firefighting personal protective equipment as required by the Fire Department in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 460 vendors were notified, of which 35 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on September 11, 2015 per Attachment A. In addition to price, bids were evaluated based on ability to deliver and compliance with bid specifications. Bid specifications adhere to regional specifications as developed by the Los Angeles Region Fire Agencies with some slight variation. Additionally, Municipal Emergency Services Inc. is recommended as the best and lowest bidder to provide personal protective equipment in accordance with the City specifications. MES is a regional provider of firefighting equipment and is well positioned to deliver PPE within the specifications outlined in the bid.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The purchase order awarded to Municipal Emergency Services Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $165,000. The Fire Department is requesting a three year total amount not to exceed $450,000. $55,000 is currently available in the FY2016-17 budget in the Fire Department Division 01313. The purchase order will be charged to account 01313.533010. Additional funding for this fiscal year and future fiscal years is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Accept California Office of Traffic Safety Grant", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant award in the amount of $300,000 from the California Office of Traffic Safety for the Selective Traffic Enforcement Program. 2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) has been awarded a $300,000 Strategic Traffic Enforcement Program (STEP) grant from the California Office of Traffic Safety (OTS) for a year-long program of special enforcement and education efforts to prevent traffic-related deaths and injuries. SMPD would use the funding as part of the City\u2019s ongoing commitment to maintain safe roadways to improve quality of life. No local matching funds are required.", "The STEP grant would provide funding for an array of best practice strategies to impact traffic safety including training, community education, equipment to support the grant activities, and strategic enforcement to promote bicycle, pedestrian, and motorist safety for all ages. These efforts are consistent with the overarching goals of the Vision Zero and 8 to 80 programs, both of which were identified as Council priorities during the FY 2015/17 budget adoption process; the activities associated with this grant are also consistent with Santa Monica\u2019s goal of enhanced mobility, identified in August 2015.", "Discussion", "OTS STEP grant funding is specifically directed toward law enforcement traffic safety operations. The Police Department has received such grants annually for more than ten years. Safe movement throughout the city is an ongoing high priority at both the state and local levels, particularly as Santa Monica has experienced a substantial impact to traffic flow in the Downtown area as a result of the return of METRO\u2019s Light Rail Service in May 2016. Following the 2015 launch of the Breeze Bike Share program, there has been a significant increase in the number of community members and visitors who, in lieu of driving, are opting to use bicycles as an alternative transportation modality. This grant award would support and enhance the Police Department\u2019s efforts to promote safe movement throughout Santa Monica.", "The STEP grant program would be implemented and administered by the Police Department's Traffic Enforcement Unit in three phases. Phase one consists of the creation of operational plans, training, and a press release announcing the grant award. In phase two, the Police Department's Traffic Enforcement Unit would begin conducting various traffic safety operations, including bicycle and pedestrian enforcement operations, DUI saturation patrols, DUI check points, distracted driving operations, traffic enforcement operations, and motorcycle safety operations. Phase three would consist of data collection, analysis, and comparison of the grant performance measures against actual grant enforcement and educational goals.", "Additionally, the STEP program would include 14 traffic safety educational presentations reaching a target audience of at least 500 community members; enhanced participation in the Pacific Coast Highway (PCH) Task Force meetings; targeted enforcement along the PCH corridor within Santa Monica; participation in the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration Summer and Winter Mobilization to effectively address DUI drivers; participation in the annual National Distracted Driving Awareness Month in April 2017; and participation in the annual Click It or Ticket mobilization period in May 2017.", "With this grant, the goal is to utilize both education and enforcement strategies to provide enhanced roadway safety for residents and visitors to the City of Santa Monica while also ultimately reducing the number of persons killed or injured in all categories of traffic collisions. Key performance measurements outlined in the grant would include the following:", "\u00b7 A set of 18 goals that aim to reduce the number of persons, including bicyclists and pedestrians, killed and injured in all types of collisions.", "\u00b7 A set of 16 objectives focused on accomplishing the grant enforcement and community education activities, as well as attending trainings.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $300,000 grant from California Office of Traffic Safety requires the following FY 2016-17 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20306.406858 in the amount of $300,000.", "2. Appropriate the following expenditures to reflect receipt of the Selective Enforcement Traffic Program grant:", "$29,000 expenditure cost at account 20306.576516.", "$271,000 personnel cost at account 20306.511490 89011W."]}, {"Title": "Cancellation of Regular City Council Meetings Scheduled for November 8 and December 27, 2016, and Scheduling Special Meetings for November 1 and December 6, 2016", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council vote to:1) cancel the regular meetings scheduled for November 8 and December 27, 2016, due to a lack of quorum, and2) schedule special meetings for November 1 and December 6, 2016."}, {"Title": "Award Contract with RNC Capital Management LLC to Provide Investment Management Services", "Department": "Finance Department, Revenue Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year professional services agreement with RNC Capital Management LLC, a California-based company, to provide investment management services for the Cemetery and Mausoleum Perpetual Care Funds. Fees depend on the value of the funds under management and additional pass-through amounts for investments in certain instruments. Based on the value of the portfolio as of June 30, 2016, staff estimates annual fees would be approximately $69,000.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City requires consulting services to manage investment of the Woodlawn Cemetery and Mausoleum perpetual care funds, which are subject to different requirements than other City funds. Council approved Nelson Capital Management (Nelson Capital) as the investment manager in June 2014. RNC Capital Management LLC (RNC) served as the former investment manager, from 1992 through 2014.", "Following operational and ownership changes at Nelson Capital that affect the consultant\u2019s ability to meet City needs, staff recommends that the City enter into a new agreement with RNC Capital for perpetual care fund investment management.", "The new contract would be for a total of five years, ending in 2021, with a $69,000 estimated annual cost.", "Background", "The City owns and operates Woodlawn Cemetery and Mausoleum. A portion of the sale of each burial plot, crypt, or niche is set aside for perpetual care services and is deposited into the Cemetery or Mausoleum perpetual care fund, as appropriate. The income from these funds is used to pay for perpetual care costs. Perpetual care funds have a distinct set of investment guidelines, which are set by Council rather than by State law as is the case for other City investments, and which therefore require the specialized investment expertise and continuous monitoring of an investment manager.", "RNC managed the City\u2019s investments for the Cemetery and Mausoleum perpetual care funds from 1992 until 2014. On April 8, 2014, Council authorized the City\u2019s current agreement with Nelson Capital following a competitive process (Attachments A, B). The current agreement provides a term of five years, ending in 2019.", "Discussion", "Staff recommended Nelson Capital as the firm best able to meet the City\u2019s needs following the 2014 Request for Proposal process. Specific decision factors included Nelson Capital\u2019s approach to developing an investment plan for the portfolio consistent with the Cemetery and Mausoleum\u2019s long-term goals, the ability to tailor the portfolio to meet these goals, and the firm\u2019s expertise in the areas of socially responsible investing. At the time of the agreement, Nelson Capital was a wholly owned but separately operated subsidiary of Wells Fargo Bank. In May 2016, Nelson Capital advised the City that it would merge into the Wells Fargo Private Bank Wealth and Management Group (Wells Fargo) as of June 30, 2016. This change would require the City to modify and re-sign the agreement, as Nelson Capital no longer exists as an entity, and provides the option to reconsider and potentially terminate the agreement. The change would also result in the Cemetery and Mausoleum portfolio and the City\u2019s overall portfolio being handled by the same custodian. After a review and analysis of the changes that would occur under new management, and taking into consideration the preference to maintain some diversification in the City\u2019s various investment activities, staff recommends that the City enter into a new agreement rather than transferring the current contract. Staff further recommends that the City enter into a new agreement with RNC Capital Management LLC (RNC).", "The factors leading to the selection of Nelson Capital no longer apply following the elimination of Nelson Capital and the departure of the Senior Portfolio Manager responsible for managing these funds. Staff therefore recommends that the City terminate its current agreement and award the contract for investment services to RNC, based on the strength of its proposal and long-term, successful relationship with the City. RNC was the second ranked firm in the June 2014 competitive process, and managed the Cemetery and Mausoleum portfolios from 1992 through 2014. RNC has agreed to honor its 2014 proposal terms, including a fee at the current rate of 0.6% of the value of the portfolio. The term of the contract would be five years.", "Vendor Selection", "Staff created a qualified list of vendors to provide perpetual care fund investment services through the 2014 competitive process. Due to this recent process, staff was able to select from an existing qualified list of vendors, rather than reissuing a request for proposals.", "RNC\u2019s proposal was the second choice of the Selection Committee out of six bidders in 2014 (Attachment C), and has a strong record of investment performance. As a former manager of the Cemetery and Mausoleum Perpetual Funds from 1992 through 2014, RNC is very familiar with the goals and objectives of the portfolio, including the socially responsible guidelines. RNC\u2019s experience during its tenure included implementing prior divestment of City funds from South Africa, Myanmar, and Arizona based companies, and the current policy of fossil fuel divestment. RNC currently manages over $4 billion in assets.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The annual fee for the investment management services will not change from the current rate of 0.6% of the value of the portfolio. Certain additional pass-through fees could apply if investments are made in certain products, such as mutual funds. The value of the account as of June 30, 2016 was approximately $11.5 million. Therefore, annual fees at the current portfolio value would be approximately $69,000 ($11.5 million x 0.6%). Fees in subsequent years will vary based on the value of the investment portfolio.", "Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in division 37641. The agreement will be charged to 37641.555060. Future funding is contingent on Council approval and budget adoption."]}], [{"Title": "Airport Park Expansion Modification to the Design Agreement", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the conceptual direction for the Airport Park Expansion Project based upon the Phase 1-feasibility analysis, public input and proposed concept design; and direct staff to proceed with design and construction documents.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to the Professional Services Agreement No. 10238 (CCS) in the amount of $1,113,561 (includes a 10% contingency) with Rios Clementi Hale Studios (RCHS), a California-based company, to provide Phase 2 - design services for the Airport Park Expansion Project. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,324,761, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. 3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is committed to an expansion of Airport Park that will more than double the available park acreage. The design of the expansion is focused on adding amenities, including needed additional playfields, in the context of a much larger and more varied mix of active and natural park uses anticipated with the future closure of Santa Monica Airport.", "As part of this phase of Airport Park expansion, a community design process has been completed for the new park space. Three concept schemes were presented to the community online and at the site as well as to the Recreation and Parks and Airport Commissions for public review and input. Based on that feedback, the proposed hybrid concept offers expanded outdoor leisure and recreational opportunities for the community, including sports fields, pickleball courts, Community Gardens, native meadow habitat, pathways and children\u2019s play and picnic areas. Staff recommends that Council provide input and approve the recommended hybrid concept and authorize modification of the agreement to Rios Clementi Hale Studios (RCHS) for Phase 2 design services in the amount $1,113,561 (includes a 10% contingency) for a total not to exceed amount of $1,324,761.", "Background", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A), the City Council heard a presentation by staff regarding the Santa Monica Airport and future options regarding its operations and the City's use of the land now occupied by the Airport. Reflecting Santa Monica\u2019s commitment to parks and open space, as part of a larger Council action, the City Council unanimously voted to provide direction to staff to develop recreational uses (primarily sports fields) on the twelve-acre non-aviation parcels at the Santa Monica Airport and to do so within three (3) years.", "Following a competitive process, on January 26, 2016 (Attachment B), the City Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with RCHS in an amount not to exceed $211,200 (includes a 10% contingency) for the feasibility study and design of the Airport Park Expansion Project. Execution of the first modification to include reimbursables to the contract is complete and within the Council approved contract amount.", "On August 9, 2016 (Attachment C), the City Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc., a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $257,933 (includes a 10% contingency) to provide environmental consulting services to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) in regards to land use at the Santa Monica Airport.", "Discussion", "Based on a thorough examination of the site opportunities (2 relatively flat six acres parcels) and constraints (limited access and bifurcation by Donald Douglas Loop) with the directive to maximize sports fields on the site, the design team developed three concept schemes (Attachment D/Exhibit 1).", "Option 1, Runway: Major features of Option 1 include four synthetic turf fields comprised of the existing FIFA regulation size field, one new FIFA regulation size field and two small, multi-purpose fields; retention of Donald Douglas Loop in its current location, resulting in bifurcation of the park; 60 community garden plots in a slightly isolated location between a new 250 space north parking lot and broad recreational path; modification of the existing south parking lot resulting in a new drop-off area and reduction in the size of both the existing children\u2019s playground and dog park.", "Option 2, Landing Strips: Major features of Option 2 include four synthetic turf fields, unlike the previous scheme, in addition to the existing FIFA regulation size field, two new FIFA regulation size fields are proposed with one small, multi-purpose field; realignment of Donald Douglas Loop to the western boundary of the park resulting in continuity of the park space and greater safety for users of the park: placement of 60 community garden plots in a very isolated location between the flight runway and a new 218 space north parking lot; and similar to Option 1, modification of the existing south parking lot resulting in a new drop-off area and reduction in the size of both the existing children\u2019s playground and dog park.", "Option 3, Flight Path: Major features include three synthetic turf fields, two new FIFA regulation size fields, in addition to the existing FIFA regulation size field; realignment of Donald Douglas Loop is extended to include the northern park edge allowing visitors to the Airport Administration Building, as well as, users of a newly incorporated northern drop-off to proceed without circulating through a new 60 space north parking lot; 60 community garden plots are centrally located within the park adjacent to other new park amenities; and unlike the previous schemes, in addition to the south parking lot remaining unchanged, the size of the existing children\u2019s playground and dog area are retained.", "Vendor Selection", "RCHS\u2019 clear understanding of the project and knowledge of the project site, combined with the firm\u2019s collaborative abilities, professionalism and performance record during Phase 1 of the Airport Park Expansion project demonstrate their qualification to provide Phase 2 design services. Execution of a second modification to the contract with RCHS would facilitate the momentum of the project and prevent a delay to the overall project schedule.", "The agreement modification to be awarded to RCHS for Phase 2 design services including schematic design, design development, construction documentation and reimbursable expenses is $1,113,561. The amount includes a 10% contingency and results in an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,324.761.", "Public Outreach", "On June 18, 2016, a community event was held at Airport Park and was attended by approximately 106 people. Prior to the event, staff sent email announcements and reminders to the City's parks interest list that includes several thousand community members and all neighborhood organizations. The event was also marketed on the City's social media accounts and City TV, through a press release to local newspapers, advertisements in the Santa Monica Daily Press and with fliers distributed to local businesses and at the COAST event.", "At the community event, Mark Rios, principal at RCHS, presented the three concept schemes and invited participants to offer commentary on the amenities and sports field options provided. The entire consultant team was available to meet with interested community members and answer questions. Written input was gathered at the event on \u201cpassports\u201d (Attachment E/Exhibit 2). In order to gain a more comprehensive sampling of public opinion, the presentation and a survey were offered online until July 10, 2016, with an additional 583 respondents participating. Full results of public input gathered at the community event and online are attached as Attachment F/Exhibit 3.", "Public surveys solicited demographic information including respondent age, neighborhood of residency and park specific feedback consisting of favored Santa Monica parks and preferred amenities. Surveys from the public event also invited respondents to identify the mode of transportation utilized to attend the event. Noteworthy, 75% of all respondents who participated at the workshop or took the survey are residents of Santa Monica; approximately 73% reported being either field sports athletes or responsible for care of an athlete, and the desirability to open the park to a pedestrian and cyclist access point on Centinela Avenue averaged 44% for \u201cabsolutely\u201d and 37% for \u201cmaybe.\u201d Also, of significance, the top five favorite amenities selected at the park were (in descending order of importance): sports fields, gardens or landscapes, wildlife habitat, children\u2019s playground and a walking/cycling promenade. Concept Option 2 was the preferred design scheme, selected by 60% of all respondents as their first choice.", "Commission Actions", "Recreation and Parks Commission: On July 21, 2016, the three concept schemes were presented to the Recreation and Parks Commission, along with the data collected from the community on their preferences for park amenities. The Commission adopted a unanimous motion in favor of Option 3, Flight Path, and recommended the addition of a \u201cloop\u201d pathway to surround the combined park areas; provision of a pedestrian entry at Centinela Avenue; placement of the Community Gardens away from the runway and within close proximity to other new amenities; retention of the size of both the existing children's playground and dog park, and that consideration be given to add concessions, a water feature and pickleball courts.", "Airport Commission: On July 25, 2016, the three concept schemes were presented to the Airport Commission, along with the data collected from the community on their preferences for the park. The Commissioners did not have a preference for any particular concept option, preferring to defer to public input and the recommendations of the Recreation and Parks Commission.", "Recommended Hybrid Concept", "Based on the Council directive to maximize sports fields, community input, and the recommendations of the Recreation and Parks Commission, the design team re-examined the initial concept schemes and developed a new hybrid concept balancing active recreation amenities including fields and play spaces, with landscaped less formal areas and organized to facilitate further expansion of the park in the future.", "RECOMMENDED HYBRID CONCEPT", "Like the three concept schemes, the proposed hybrid concept intersperses garden and green space among fenced synthetic turf sports fields and similar to Option 3, relocates Donald Douglas Loop to the south and west preventing bifurcation of the park by the roadway. To further maintain continuity of the park and in response to community input from gardeners and Commissioners, the hybrid concept places 60 new community garden plots away from park edges to a more central location within the park, making them readily accessible to other park amenities including a generously sized, natural turf multi-purpose area for gathering and informal play use. As proposed, the gardens are still in close proximity to parking since gardeners routinely bring supplies to their plots. Naturally landscaped areas interspersed throughout the design incorporate vegetation selections offering shade, seasonal variation and bird and butterfly habitat, and serve as high-performance ecological counterpoints to the athletic spaces. Diverse programs and the varied topography provides interest by inspiring play and contrasting with the minimal slope required of the fields. The hybrid concept supports spaces for sports viewing, children\u2019s play spaces, native meadow habitat to capture and treat site storm water, shaded picnic areas, and strolling gardens.", "Comparable to Option 3, in addition to the existing regulation-sized FIFA field, the hybrid concept incorporates two new regulation-sized FIFA fields, each suitable for lacrosse and capable of division to accommodate three simultaneous soccer matches on each field.  The hybrid concept locates shaded spectator areas overlooking the FIFA fields in close proximity to sun-screened children's play spaces, retains the size of the existing children\u2019s playground and dog park areas, and, at the request of Recreation and Park Commission, integrates a maximum of six pickle ball courts.", "The broad multi-purpose recreational path as shown in all three concept schemes is retained in the hybrid scheme and traverses the length of the park towards a large flexible-use green space adjacent to Donald Douglas Loop and the Barker Hanger. Additionally, the hybrid scheme incorporates an extensive loop path as suggested by public input and recommended by the Recreation and Parks Commission. The loop and multi-purpose paths provide access to two new restroom facilities that augment the existing restroom building located at the park's midpoint and serve the play fields, pedestrian entry and the new north parking lot. Accessed by Donald Douglas Loop, the new north parking lot accommodates approximately 128 vehicles, 70 more than currently available, and together with the existing and unchanged 58-stall south parking lot, provides parking for approximately 186 vehicles.", "Staff believes that the proposed hybrid scheme meets the goals for providing additional athletic fields and other park amenities to serve a broad range of users. Additionally, staff finds that the hybrid scheme is designed to allow for further park expansion in the future.", "Next Steps", "Upon Council approval of the recommended conceptual direction for the design of the Airport Park Expansion Project, staff anticipates the following next steps:", "\u00b7 Preparation of an EIR and CEQA approval.", "\u00b7 Staff to return to Council by December 2016 with proposed guidelines and regulations for the east six acres parcel to facilitate interim public use of this space until the park expansion is constructed.", "\u00b7 Staff to return to City Council in early 2018 for approval of the final design and award of a contract for construction commencement in Spring 2018.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to RCHS for Phase 2 design services including schematic design, design development, construction documentation and reimbursable expenses is $1,113,561 (includes a 10% contingency), for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,324,761. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in accounts:", "C019120.589000  $1,094,045", "P019120.589000  $19,516", "TOTAL   $1,113,561", "While General funds have been identified to support the design phase for the Airport Park Expansion Project, alternative financing will be required for the construction phase. Estimated construction phase costs total approximately $39.3 million, which is more than the General Fund CIP annual allocation will be able to support. Alternative financing could come from a variety of sources including parks and recreation development impact fees, bond proceeds from a potential future County parks bond measure, and proceeds from a potential future local general obligation bond. Staff will continue to explore alternate financing options and provide recommendations to Council for the construction contract and also to add money for RCHS to complete final design services in the construction phases related to bidding and construction administration work."]}], [{"Title": "Resolution Adopting the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Initial Study/Mitigated Negative Declaration for the Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project and Project Approval", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution (Attachment A) for the Initial Study/Mitigated Negative Declaration and Mitigation Monitoring and Reporting Program for the environmental review phase of planning the City of Santa Monica\u2019s proposed Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) which takes an integrated approach to treating stormwater runoff, brackish groundwater, and municipal wastewater for beneficial (non-potable) reuse.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is in the process of applying to the State Water Resources Control Board (State Water Board) to fund the City\u2019s Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP). The City\u2019s proposed SWIP utilizes an integrated water resources approach to advance treat stormwater runoff, brackish/saline-impaired groundwater, and municipal wastewater for immediate non-potable reuse in accordance with state regulations and County of Los Angeles Public Health Department Guidelines and, when properly permitted, for indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge. The project would support the City in achieving its goal of water self-sufficiency by 2020, while improving beach water quality and providing for compliance with new State non-point source pollution control regulations.", "Following guidelines from the State Water Board, an environmental evaluation was a required part of the funding application process. A California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Initial Study/Mitigated Negative Declaration (IS/MND) was prepared for the SWIP (Attachment B). The IS/MND determined that the SWIP would not have a significant impact on the environment with the implementation of certain mitigation measures. This report recommends that the City Council adopt the resolution for the final IS/MND, thereby completing an important step in the State Water Board funding application process for the SWIP.", "Background", "On January 26, 2016, the City Council adopted a resolution (Attachment C) authorizing City staff to file applications with the State Water Board requesting funding from various State programs including Proposition 1 and the Clean Water State Revolving Fund (CWSRF), and to negotiate funding for the proposed SWIP with the State Water Board. Currently, the City\u2019s water supply is a combination of imported water and local groundwater. Long term, the City is committed to become sustainably independent from imported water by continued conservation and increasing reliance on its groundwater resources. For non-potable reuse, the City has historically harvested and treated urban runoff at its Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF). However, a drying climate and the City\u2019s successful conservation efforts have reduced the amount of runoff available at the SMURRF.", "Increasingly, forward-thinking water experts and public agencies are taking a \u201cOne Water\u201d approach that integrates fresh water supply; stormwater reuse and flood control; wastewater reuse; and groundwater management as interrelated opportunities. The SWIP adopts this framework to help secure the City\u2019s water future by leveraging use of existing City infrastructure and by linking together three distributed water reuse elements into a single cohesive and comprehensive project. Advanced treated water (runoff, brackish impaired groundwater, and municipal wastewater) produced from the SWIP would be used to meet existing permitted non-potable reuse demands such as landscape irrigation. When properly permitted, a significant portion of the advanced treated water would be utilized for future indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge. Combined, the three SWIP elements would produce approximately 1,680 acre-feet per year (AFY) of new water.", "The SWIP has three basic elements (Attachment D) all designed to function as a cohesive and integrated system for the harvesting, treatment and conjunctive reuse of all nonconventional water resources that are available to the City (i.e. stormwater, brackish/saline impaired groundwater, and municipal wastewater).", "\u00b7 SWIP Element 1, a shallow brackish/saline impaired groundwater supply well, would be installed in geologic sediments beneath the Beach Maintenance Yard to replenish a City stormwater harvest tank near the Santa Monica Pier during dry weather. The City recently received a $3.7M Clean Beaches Initiative grant to construct this 1.6 million gallon tank. Runoff and impaired groundwater from the tank would be piped to the City\u2019s existing SMURRF. As part of Element 1, the SMURRF would also be upgraded with the installation of a containerized reverse osmosis unit capable of treating both captured stormwater and brackish/saline impaired groundwater for permitted non-potable distribution and future permitted indirect reuse (aquifer recharge).", "\u00b7 SWIP Element 2 would provide a source of recycled water for permitted conjunctive reuse via the construction of a new below ground Advanced Water Treatment Facility to treat up to 1 million gallons per day (MGD) of municipal wastewater. Treatment would include, among other things, membrane bioreactors, membrane filtration, reverse osmosis, and advanced oxidation. Future permitted reuse may include, among other things, irrigation and aquifer recharge.", "\u00b7 SWIP Element 3 would include added infrastructure to further improve stormwater harvesting and reuse. Two below-grade runoff harvest tanks totaling 4.5 million gallons would reduce ocean discharges and divert the harvested runoff to the treatment facility. One tank would be constructed upgradient beneath Memorial Park and the other below ground at a location on the Civic Center Parking Lot. The subject tanks also provide for compliance with new State Enhanced Watershed Management Plan for Santa Monica Bay Jurisdictional Group 2 and 3 and Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System permit requirements for nonpoint source pollution control, and would help improve beach water quality by decreasing the amount of runoff discharged to the ocean at the Pico-Kenter Outfall.", "Discussion", "Environmental review of the potential impact of nearly all proposed projects is required under California law as well as the terms of the anticipated State funding. An Initial Study/Mitigated Negative Declaration (IS/MND) was prepared pursuant to State Water Board requirements for project funding and Sections 15063(c) and 15070 of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) in order to determine whether any significant impacts to the environment would result from the SWIP. A draft IS/MND was circulated for a 30-day public review period beginning on July 19, 2016, ending on August 20, 2016. Public notification (Attachment E) included a printed announcement in the Santa Monica Daily Press on July 19, 2016, posting of the draft CEQA document to the City\u2019s Water Resources Division website, and mailed notifications to the State Clearinghouse, relevant agencies, and all City addresses within 500 feet of the SWIP element sites.  Several comment letters and an e-mail were received from the public. Staff prepared responses to all comments. Those materials are presented in the final IS/MND.", "The final IS/MND determined that the proposed SWIP would not result in significant impacts to the environment with the incorporation and implementation of mitigation measures in the areas of Biological Resources, Cultural Resources, and Construction Effects. Mitigation measures include the use of cultural resource monitors during earth disturbing activities, and biological resource monitoring (birds and bats) during construction. Construction effects will be mitigated by adherence to City Municipal Code pertaining to work hours. Less than significant or no impacts would occur with respect to Aesthetics/Shadows, Agriculture and Forestry Resources, Air Quality, Greenhouse Gas Emissions, Hydrology and Water Quality, Land Use and Planning, Mineral Resources, Population and Housing, and Public Services, Utilities, and Mandatory Findings of Significance. To ensure mitigation measures are properly implemented, a Mitigation Monitoring and Reporting Program has been prepared and will be enforced during construction and operation of the SWIP. The proposed mitigation measures are provided in the final IS/MND.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. The cost of the project is approximately $56 million. The City is currently seeking a combination of State grant money and low interest financing to fund the project. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future."]}], [{"Title": "Recommendation to accept Grace Phillips' resignation from the Clean Beaches Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez, Mayor Pro Tem Winterer, and Councilmember McKeown that Council authorize $5,000 in Council contingency funds for a contribution to the creation of the Venice Japanese American Memorial Monument, to honor the approximately one thousand Americans of Japanese ancestry forcibly relocated at the start of World War II from their homes in Santa Monica, Malibu, and Venice to the Manzanar War Relocation Camp in the Owens Valley, losing their homes, their businesses, and their liberties", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer, Councilmember Davis, and Councilmember O\u2019Day that the City Council support the Safe, Clean Neighborhood Parks Measure of 2016 (Measure A) which will provide funding for: protecting and preserving parks and natural areas; providing safe places to play; protecting clean water resources, including rivers and creeks; removing asbestos, mold and lead paint from aging recreation centers; reducing gang activity; ensuring that drinking water is safe at park and recreation centers; and protecting clean and safe beaches.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember O'Day for the City Council to adopt a resolution in favor of Proposition 67 on the November 8, 2016 ballot to protect the ban on plastic bags.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1536885000": [[{"Title": "Proclamation declaring September 23rd, 2016 as Vin Scully Day in Santa Monica", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "City Manager's Report: Update on Santa Monica Farmers Markets", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Big Blue Bus Fuel and Wash Construction Contract", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #2371 to JR Universal Construction Inc., a California-based company, for the modernization of the fuel and wash building and replacement of the existing bus wash apparatus;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with JR Universal Construction Inc., in an amount not to exceed $1,684,000 (includes a 10% contingency); and3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Big Blue Bus seeks to replace its bus wash apparatus and upgrade the fuel and wash support facilities in an effort to provide a more energy efficient wash system, improve upon a safe work environment, and continue its uninterrupted service to the citizens. In May 2016, the City solicited bids for construction services associated with the improvements. Three bids were received and opened on July 11, 2016. Staff recommends JR Universal Construction Inc. as the best bidder for the BBB Fuel and Wash Upgrade Project in an amount not to exceed $1,684,000.", "Background", "Providing clean and attractive buses is a key part of the strong local and regional appeal of the Big Blue Bus. The existing BBB fuel and wash apparatus was installed in 2002. The facility is open seven days a week and services approximately 165 buses per night. The manufacturer\u2019s life expectancy of the bus wash is 15 years. Based upon 165 buses being washed nightly, the current bus wash and support facilities have processed approximately 770,000 to 840,000 bus washes over the last 14 years. Due to the major wear and tear, the rising costs to maintain the current bus wash, and its lack of modern energy efficiencies, the wash has come to the end of its service life.  The support facilities have also endured 14 years of industrial related service. The facility is open to all of the outside weather elements and sees high volumes of vehicles and employee traffic. During the fuel and wash hours of 6:00 pm to 5:00 am the facilities support up to 20 employees. During the daytime hours of 5:00 am to 6:00 pm the facilities are used by other personnel for restroom services, fare media processing, and maintenance related services. The current office space is deficient and needs design upgrades creating more workable space to maximize efficiency. This project would modernize the fuel and wash building by replacing the existing bus wash apparatus including all brushes, motors, mechanisms, rollers, pumps, holding tanks and filters. The design criteria of the retrofit would emphasize durability as well as energy and water efficiency. Additionally, the roof membrane would be replaced, light fixtures would be upgraded to reduce energy costs, and the finishes and furniture would be replaced in the men's and women's restrooms, break room, fare media offices and supervisor\u2019s office.", "Discussion", "Contractor Selection", "In May 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to replace and upgrade the wash apparatus of the existing BBB fuel and wash building in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fifty-two vendors downloaded the bid and twelve prospective bidders attended a pre-bid job walk. Three bids were received and publicly opened on July 11, 2016. The bid results are as follows:", "Bidder       Total Bid Amount", "JR Universal Construction Inc.   $1,530,414.72", "West Valley Investment Group   $1,548,000.00", "USS Cal Builders     $1,718,800.00", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, JR Universal Construction Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder. Staff contacted references provided by JR Universal Construction Inc. for prior project experience at Tower Jazz Semiconductor, the County of Los Angeles and City of Santa Monica. All respondents reported that work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that JR Universal Construction Inc. has a license that is current, active, and in good standing.", "Schedule", "Construction work is tentatively scheduled to begin in October 2016 and be completed in spring 2017. During construction, the buses will be washed every other night using only one lane while portions of the apparatus are replaced. The bus wash will be completely closed for a maximum of three weeks while the final cut over phase is completed.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to JR Universal Construction Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $1,684,000 (includes a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C410826.589000 (Facility Upgrades and Renovation)."]}, {"Title": "1342 5th Street Parking Lot Construction Contract", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2235 and 2363 to All American Asphalt Corporation, a California-based company, for the 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with All American Asphalt Corporation, in an amount not to exceed $601,700 (includes a 10% contingency); and3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements Project would improve three contiguous land parcels on 5th Street. Parcels 1 and 2 are being prepared according to an in-progress land exchange for the Fire Station No. 1 Project, and would be used as public parking until the property exchange is completed. Parcel 3 would be used for the installation of a temporary trailer by the Parking Operations Division and would have nine public parking spaces. The temporary trailer would be used for public counters and staff offices by staff located in Parking Structure #5, in preparation for the Transit and Parking Services (TAPS) Project. Staff recommends All American Asphalt Corporation as the best bidder for the 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements Project in an amount not to exceed $601,700.", "Background", "This project will facilitate two important capital projects being undertaken: to replace the current Downtown fire station; and to upgrade the dreary fa\u00e7ade and facilities on the first floor of Parking Structure #5 on 4th Street. The Fire Station No. 1 Project will be constructed on 7th Street on a property identified as the most suitable location, and for which real estate negotiations are underway. The existing Fire Station No. 1 was built in 1955 and the facility has surpassed its expected useful life span. The City is in negotiations for a property exchange with the private owner of the 7th Street property for the City-owned 5th Street property. Under separate contract, set to begin in September 2016, the City is demolishing the existing Carlson Appliance Building. The construction of 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements will take place after the demolition of Carlson\u2019s to turn that property into a temporary public parking lot. The Transit and Parking Services (TAPS) Project will construct offices for the City\u2019s Big Blue Bus and Parking Operations staff, public restrooms and retail space at Parking Structure #5. Public counter services provided by TAPS staff cannot stop during construction in Parking Structure #5; therefore, staff would be relocated to a temporary trailer located at the 1342 5th Street parking lot until the TAPS Project estimated completion date of Late 2017. To prepare for the installation of a temporary trailer on-site, utility construction is required.", "Discussion", "Construction of the 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements include installation of site utilities necessary to move forward two separate City projects: Fire Station No. 1; and the TAPS Project in Parking Structure #5. Both projects are finalizing design and are preparing for the bidding of construction services, with estimated construction start dates of December 2017 for Fire Station No. 1 and February 2017 for TAPS. Both projects have been approved by the Planning Commission and the Architectural Review Board. The two components of the 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements Project were bid together to minimize disruption to the public and to attract a greater number of bidders.", "The schematic design and original project cost estimate for the 1342 5th Street Parking Lot were based on development requirements utilizing a Temporary Use Permit (TUP). It was decided later on in project review by Planning and Community Development staff that the project per City codes met the requirements for a Conditional Use Permit (CUP). The additional requirements of a CUP development (landscaping, irrigation, lighting, storm water runoff mitigation, EV charging stations, bike parking) increased the construction cost by roughly $110,000. Staff recommends transferring $110,670 in budget savings from the Citywide Tenant Improvement budget to cover the additional cost of the parking lot construction.", "Contractor Selection", "On June 30, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide construction services for the 1342 5th Street Parking Lot Improvements Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Seventy vendors downloaded the bid. Eight bids were received and publicly opened on August 1, 2016. Bids included:", "Contractor      Amount", "Golden Sun Firm & Co., Inc.    $345,000", "Custom Design Construction   $398,000", "All American Asphalt Corporation   $547,000", "Minako America Corporation   $577,000", "Sully-Miller Contracting Company   $585,200", "Concept Consultant, Inc.    $606,776", "Line Tech Contractors    $637,000", "Palp, Inc. DBA Excel Paving Company  $721,000", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. All American Asphalt Corporation offered the best verifiable experience for the construction of asphalt parking lots, for major utility connections and for the landscaping services in a busy downtown/urban area. Staff contacted references provided by All American Asphalt Corporation and verified information provided in the vendor\u2019s bid package. Golden Sun Firm & Co., Inc. was nonresponsive due to lacking references and Custom Design Construction withdrew its bid. Based on these criteria, All American Asphalt Corporation is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to All American Asphalt Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $601,700 (includes 10% contingency). Funds are available in FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. Award of the contract requires a budget transfer of $110,670 from account C010162.589000 to account C019115.589000. The contract", "will be charged to the following accounts:", "C010162.589019", "$ 56,850", "C040162.589000", "$ 90,000", "C019115.589000", "$ 454,850", "TOTAL", "$ 601,700"]}, {"Title": "Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District to Fund Water Use Audits and Infrastructure Retrofits", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) between the City and the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) to fund water use audits and retrofits in an amount not to exceed $300,000 for one year, with two additional one-year renewal option(s) totaling $549,000, on the same terms and conditions, for a total amount not to exceed $849,000 over a three-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report requests Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) between the City and the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) to fund water use audits and retrofits in an amount not to exceed $300,000 for one year. This is one of the key strategies to conserve water  outlined in the Sustainable Water Master Plan and part of the City\u2019s drought response to reach and maintain a 20% water use reduction citywide.", "Only five inches of rain fell in the Santa Monica area during the 2015-2016 rainy season, which was significantly below the 14 inch average for the region and the 30 inches of rain that was anticipated due to El Ni\u00f1o conditions. Drought conditions continue in Santa Monica even though the Governor ended the mandatory water conservation reductions in May 2016. As of July 2016, citywide water use has been reduced 19.6% compared to 2013, however water use has been increasing in all sectors since the start of the year. Therefore, it is prudent to install permanent water savings infrastructure such as toilets, urinals, and irrigation equipment at SMMUSD schools and administrative offices within the City of Santa Monica. The total water savings potential at SMMUSD facilities will not be known until the audits are completed, but based on audits of similar facilities they are expected to reduce water use by 20% or more and result in significant ongoing cost savings.", "Background", "On January 25, 2011, City Council directed staff to develop a Sustainable Water Master Plan (SWMP) that would include a roadmap to water self-sufficiency, including a 20% reduction in water use citywide. Kennedy/Jenks Consultants (KJC) was selected to develop the plan. Water use trends, high water users, and potential water savings measures were identified and analyzed using the Alliance for Water Efficiency\u2019s Conservation Tool. Top water users including the City of Santa Monica, SMMUSD, large medical offices, laundromats, and landscapes, were identified. Specific water conservation strategies were recommended including costs and projected water savings. The final plan, which was adopted by Council on October 28, 2014 includes the expansion of water conservation programs and rebates, as well as the installation of additional groundwater wells, greywater systems and rainwater harvesting systems to increase local water supplies.", "On August 12, 2014 Council adopted a resolution declaring a Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage which changed the drought response from a voluntary 20% reduction in water use to a mandatory 20% reduction. Council also directed staff to return with a detailed Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage implementation plan, including: proposed amendments to the Water Conservation Ordinance (SMMC 7.16) and the Water Shortage Response Plan (WSRP), a financial impact analysis to address revenue reductions, additional staffing, program implementation costs, and an implementation timeline.", "On April 1, 2015 Governor Brown issued an Executive Order to direct the State Water Resources Control Board (SWRCB) to implement restrictions for a statewide cutback in potable urban water use of 25% through 2016. The SWRCB was directed to establish a framework of reduction levels for individual water suppliers.", "On May 18, 2016 the SWRCB extended the Drought Emergency Water Conservation regulations through January 2017 and allowed water agencies to define a customized water conservation standard based on their specific circumstances and report monthly, thus replacing the percentage reduction-based water conservation standard established by the State in January 2015.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s drought response policies and programs build upon the programs and projects outlined in the SWMP. These coordinated efforts are achieving water use reductions while creating a sustainable water portfolio. As of July 2016 citywide water use has been reduced 19.6% compared to 2013 water usage. Local groundwater wells are now providing nearly 75% of Santa Monica\u2019s total water demand, reducing the need for imported water. During FY 2015-16 the City was able to meet all water needs using local supplies for a period of 64 days, due in a large part to conservation efforts of residents and businesses.", "The City\u2019s groundwater is recharged by rain. Only five inches of rain fell in the Santa Monica area during the 2015-2016 rainy season, which was significantly below the 14 inch average for the region and the 30 inches of rain that was anticipated due to El Ni\u00f1o conditions. Even though the state lessened its drought response requirements, Santa Monica continues to take a long-range water management approach to ensure a resilient and healthy water supply portfolio amid the uncertainty of climate change, watersupply availability, and waterdemands.", "The suite of water conservation programs adopted by Council as part of the SWMP includes the completion of indoor and outdoor water audits and retrofits at SMMUSD schools and facilities in order to cut water use by at least 20% from 2013 levels. Unlike the City, SMMUSD does not have a revenue fund that is restricted to the installation of water conserving devices. The estimated costs to audit the indoor plumbing fixtures and landscaping as well as potential retrofits were based on comparisons to City facilities and landscapes. The analysis included in the SWMP was based on SMMUSD saving at minimum approximately two million gallons of water each year. Staff is requesting that Council negotiate an MOU with the District and authorize $300,000 for FY 2016-17 to fund the initial water audits and retrofit phase of the project with two additional one year renewal options to complete the prioritized retrofit recommendations totaling $549,000 in an amount not exceed to $849,000.", "This MOU would provide funding to SMMUSD to hire a consultant to perform both indoor and outdoor audits; provide a detailed report including specific recommendations and return on investment analysis; a timeline for installation; and priority retrofits. Staff estimates that audits may cost about $200,000. Retrofits of leaks, irrigation runoff, and water-wasting plumbing fixtures may cost at minimum $100,000.", "Based on the terms of the MOU, SMMUSD would implement their bid process to select a vendor for the audits. SMMUSD would request funding from the City for these audits prior to commencement. Following review and approval by City staff, the City would provide funding. Once the audits are completed SMMUSD would provide the audit reports to the City with priority projects identified. Following review and approval by City staff, the City would provide funding for selected projects prior to commencement. Milestones and water-savings would be tracked. If projects fail to meet the agreed upon terms, SMMUSD would be required to reimburse the City", "An indoor water audit includes inspecting the make, model, flush volume and performance of each fixture such as toilets, urinals, showers, faucets, cooling towers, washers, and pre-rinse spray valves. Mapping each fixture; analyzing historic water use; inspecting the water meters; and checking for leaks. Specific recommendations for retrofits or repairs as well as the retrofit costs and calculation of return on investment are included in a detailed report. Each audit can take up to eight hours depending on the size of the facility.", "An outdoor water audit includes an irrigation catch-can test to determine the location, efficiency, alignment, spray patterns, and performance of each spray head. It also includes an analysis of the irrigation controllers, watering schedules and electrical connections. In addition, the audits typically include an analysis of plant materials and recommendations for retrofitting to climate-appropriate plants. Specific recommendations for retrofits or repairs and a calculation of retrofit costs and return on investment are included in a detailed report. These audits can take several days for each campus and cannot be performed during school hours.", "Staff recommends that these funds be provided to allow SMMUSD to hire a consultant to complete the audits due to their complexity and the large number of facilities owned and maintained by SMMUSD. City staff has begun auditing some SMMUSD facilities as part of its citywide water conservation efforts and, to date, seven indoor water audits have been completed. These audits recommend the replacement of water-wasting fixtures such as showers, faucets, and urinals. However, staff\u2019s workload is full and it has been difficult to allocate 6 to 8 hours at a time to complete each indoor water audit. A consultant would be able to systematically and efficiently complete water audits throughout the district in a timely manner which will allow for earlier completion of retrofits and greater ongoing water savings. Staff will continue to seek additional resources to offset the costs for audits and retrofits for SMMUSD.", "The funds provided to SMMUSD as part of this MOU would pay for audits and retrofits for facilities located within the City of Santa Monica. The West Basin Municipal Water District provides water to SMMUSD schools in the City of Malibu and has hired a vendor to provide free indoor and outdoor water audits and reports for SMMUSD for those facilities.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Execution of a Memorandum of Understanding with the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District requires a FY 2016-17 budget appropriation of $300,000 to account 25671.577830. Future year funding is contingent on Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Contractual Services Agreement for Water/Wastewater Equipment Welding Services", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4253 to Paul's Welding, a California-based company, for water and wastewater equipment welding and metal fabrication services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Paul's Welding in an amount not to exceed $530,000 over a five-year period, including increases based on State prevailing wage rate adjustments, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City contracts for welding and metal equipment fabrication services in order to properly maintain its water and wastewater distribution systems, facilities and vehicles. Fabrication and repairs are needed for various equipment including storm drain screens, maintenance hole covers, vault lids/frames/covers, bypass brackets/stands, water meter covers, trench plates and tools. In July 2016, the City solicited bids for such services. After reviewing the one bid received, staff recommends Paul's Welding to provide welding services for a total not to exceed amount of $530,000 over a five-year period.", "Due to the amount of welding and specialized metal fabrication required, contractor services are required. Therefore, the recommended actions are consistent with the Council-approved Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-Needed Staff for Non-Professional Services and meet the criteria for space requirements, capital/equipment requirements, risk, and workforce flexibility.", "Background", "Prior to 2013, welding services were informally bid. On July 23, 2013, Council awarded Paul\u2019s Welding a 3-year blanket purchase order valued at $240,000, per Attachment A.", "Discussion", "The City owns and maintains water and wastewater equipment and facilities located throughout Santa Monica and West Los Angeles. Welding and metal fabrication services are required to install new equipment and repair existing items such as storm drain catch basin screens, maintenance hole covers, vault lids/frames/covers, bypass brackets/stands, and water meter covers. Custom fabrication is required in many instances due to the variety of sizes of meters and associated covers/screens within Santa Monica's inventory. Welding may be needed on various maintenance vehicles such as trailers, lifts, and portable pump equipment along with welding in the field to facilitate trench plate installation and removal for work involving excavation such as water/wastewater main or valve repairs and replacements. Confined space and short notice/after-hours work may occasionally be required.", "Method of Service", "On January 13, 2015, Council adopted a Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-Needed Staff for Non-Professional Services (Attachment C). This policy includes criteria under which contracting for a public service is appropriate. Staff has reviewed the service needs, and recommends providing welding services through a contractor due to the following criteria:", "\u00b7 Capital / Equipment Requirements \u2013 Hiring staff would require procurement of a welding truck and assorted equipment such as acetylene torches, compressed gas tanks and other welding supplies and safety gear. In addition, space would need to be identified for welding, storage, and parking. The current City Yards location, where Water/Wastewater operations are housed, is already at capacity. It would be difficult to add additional parking and work space at this location without incurring significant additional expenses.", "\u00b7 Specialized/Technical Expertise - Service requires technical or specialized expertise that City staff could not or does not provide, and is outside of core services mission of the department.", "\u00b7 Risk - Some welding of water and wastewater equipment may take place in the field, potentially in confined spaces and subterranean locations.", "\u00b7 Workforce Flexibility \u2013 Demand for welding may be intermittent or unpredictable. There are high volume needs at times, with approximately 50 welding/metal fabrication jobs per year, but frequently two or three weeks may go by at a time with no work required.", "Vendor Selection", "On July 6, 2016, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to provide welding and metal fabrication services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 122 vendors were notified and 11 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on July 21, 2016 per Attachment B. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; one vendor indicated the scope of services did not fit its business model and the others did not respond. The required welding work is both specialized and localized which reduced the number of bids submitted. And although staff bid the work, this could have easily been viewed as a sole source procurement given the work and conditions.", "Paul's Welding, a Santa Monica-based sole proprietorship, has performed welding services satisfactorily for Water Resources and other City divisions since 1999. Paul's Welding is able to fabricate custom-sized storm drain screens and vault lids and perform other welding work to specifications quickly and efficiently with little direction from Water Resources staff due to experience gained over the past 16+ years. Based in Santa Monica, Paul's Welding can respond promptly to emergency and other short-notice welding jobs. Paul's Welding also bid the minimum prevailing wage rate for the Operating Engineer Group 6/Welder job classification (straight time total hourly rate of $67.72). Staff verified that the Welding (C60) contractor's license for Paul's Welding is current, active and in good standing. Based on these criteria, Paul's Welding is recommended as the best bidder to provide welding services for water/wastewater facilities, equipment, and vehicles.", "Alternatives", "If the City were to provide welding services using in-house staff, staff estimates that Year 1 costs would be $61,832 higher, assuming an estimated $100,000 in contract expenditures in Year 1. The higher cost is largely due to the need to purchase a welding truck, welding equipment, tools, and safety. To bring the service in-house, a 1.0 FTE Welder Fabricator would be needed along with significant training on water/wastewater equipment welding specifications. Over the five-year agreement period, lower City staffing costs slightly offset the higher up-front costs associated with completing the work in-house, for a total estimated cost increase of $54,942 over the five-year period for the in-house option.", "Perhaps more significant than additional costs associated with hiring in-house are risk and the existing space constraints. Currently Water/Wastewater staff do not have a space to perform welding operations at the City Yards location. Space would need to be identified if a Welder Fabricator were hired in-house, and the City Yards facility is currently at capacity. In addition, risk is closely related to specialized and technical expertise. If staff was to be hired, some of the welding of water and Wastewater equipment may take place in confined and subterranean locations that pose greater risks to the City. By engaging an outside party specialized in this service or activity, the City transfers or spreads risk to the other party specifically set up to manage that risk.", "Should the City opt to hire a Welder Fabricator for water and wastewater facilities and equipment, the agreement with Paul's Welding could be reduced in value and/or term.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Paul's Welding is for an amount not to exceed $530,000. Funds of $100,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts. Future", "year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "Account Number Amount", "25671.555010 $ 80,000", "31661.555010 $ 20,000", "TOTAL   $100,000"]}, {"Title": "Amendment to Westside Cities Council of Governments Joint Powers Authority Agreement", "Department": "City Council", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Mayor and City Manager to execute a First Amendment to the 2007 Amended and Restated Joint Exercise of Powers Agreement (JPA) for the Westside Cities Council of Governments (WSCCOG), to allow the County of Los Angeles to appoint a senior-level staff member as the alternate voting representative should the Governing Board Representative be unable to attend a meeting.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Westside Cities Council of Governments (WSCCOG) is a regional cooperative effort between five member cities and the County of Los Angeles to leverage their influence at the State and Federal level for the benefit of the region. The Board of Directors meets bimonthly to discuss matters of regional importance but struggles to have voting representation at its meetings from all of the member entities. In an effort to have voting representation from all entities moving forward, the WSCCOG is proposing an amendment to its bylaws to allow the County of Los Angeles to designate a senior-level staff member to cast a vote should the elected official be unable to attend a meeting.", "Background", "The Westside Cities Council of Governments (WSCCOG) is a Joint Powers Authority (JPA) created by the cities of Santa Monica, Beverly Hills, Culver City, West Hollywood, Los Angeles (Districts 5 and 11) and the County of Los Angeles (Districts 2, 3 and 4). The WSCCOG was formed to preserve and enhance the quality of life in the region by building relationships, maximizing resources, promoting policy and advocating for the benefit of its approximately 750,000 residents, 60,000 businesses and visitors. The Board of Directors is comprised of a Delegate and Alternate from each of the member entities, appointed by their respected legislative bodies.", "The WSCCOG and its bimonthly meetings provide a forum for discussion and communication between the member cities and through the role of its Executive Director, the WSCCOG has formalized representation and advocacy with government agencies at the local, state and federal level. The WSCCOG also monitors legislation that could have an impact on the region and seeks opportunities for regional, state and federal funding. The WSCCOG Board has historically focused on issues such as transportation, mobility, economic health, sustainability, land use, housing, social services, homeland security and public safety.", "Discussion", "At its meeting on June 25, 2016 the WSCCOG board discussed a proposed amendment to the 2007 Joint Powers Authority agreement (JPA) to allow member representatives to designate a non-elected official member as an alternate voting member. The thought was that this would be a feasible means to increase participation from all member entities, especially the County and City of Los Angeles whose elected representatives often face scheduling challenges that prevent them from regular participation in the WSCCOG meetings.", "The Board was presented with three alternatives modeled after JPA agreements from neighboring subregional COGs including San Gabriel Valley COG, South Bay Cities COG, San Fernando Valley COG and Gateway Cities COG. These alternatives included the designation of a non-elected official as an alternate voting member or an ex-oficio member as well as the option of teleconferencing for board members to participate and vote remotely.", "After all three alternatives were discussed amongst the board, they approved the recommendation to allow only the County of Los Angeles to appoint a senior-staff person as the alternate representative. The board then directed the WSCCOG Counsel to draft language on the proposed amendment to the JPA to be taken before each member city\u2019s respective legislative body. The proposed language is below; changes are underlined.", "Section 2. Section 5.B.3 of the JPA Agreement is amended to read as follows:", "3. The Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles shall designate the chief of staff or a senior-level staff member from the office of the appointed Governing Board Representative as an alternate representative to serve in the absence of the Governing Board Representative (\u201cAlternate Governing Board Representative\u201d).", "Section 3. Section 5.C of the JPA Agreement is amended to read as follows:", "A. Eligibility. No person shall be eligible to serve as a Governing Board Representative or an Alternate Governing Board Representative unless that person is, at all times during the tenure of that person as a Governing Board Representative or Alternate Governing Board Representative, a member of the legislative body of one of the appointing Members, except for the Alternate Governing Board Representative from the County of Los Angeles, who shall be employed as the chief of staff or a senior staff member to the County\u2019s Governing Board Representative pursuant to Section 5.B.3 above. In addition, the Governing Board Representative and the Alternate Governing Board Representative of the City of Los Angeles must be a council member from a district that is located immediately adjacent to any portion of the cities of Beverly Hills, Culver City, Santa Monica, or West Hollywood. The designation of a Governing Board Representative and Alternate Governing Board Representative shall be evidenced in writing to the Chair of the WSCCOG. Should any person serving on the Governing Board fail to maintain the status as required by this Section 5, that person\u2019s position on the Governing Board shall be deemed vacated as of the date such person ceases to qualify pursuant to the provisions of this Section 5 and the Member shall be entitled to appoint a qualified replacement.", "Next Steps", "Member cities of the WSCCOG will take the proposed amendment to the JPA before each of their legislative bodies for action and approval of the amendment. Approval by four of the six member cities\u2019 legislative bodies is needed for the agreement to be amended.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Construction Contract for Berkeley Street Traffic Improvements", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2412 to Hardy & Harper, Inc., a California-based company, for the construction of the Berkeley Street Traffic Improvements;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Hardy & Harper, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $269,100 (including a 15% contingency); and3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In response to resident concerns about vehicle speeds and pedestrian safety along Berkeley Street between Wilshire Boulevard and Stanford Street, the Planning and Community Development Department conducted a traffic engineering evaluation of this roadway segment. Traffic improvement plans were developed based on the results of the evaluation that include the installation of traffic calming median islands, curb return bulb-outs, and the realignment of an intersection. On August 3, 2016, four bids were received for the construction of the Berkeley Street Traffic Improvements. After evaluating the bids received for this project, staff recommends Hardy & Harper, Inc. for the construction of the Berkeley Street Traffic Improvements Project (Project) in an amount not to exceed $269,100 (including a 15% contingency).", "Background", "In the landmark Land Use and Circulation Element of Santa Monica\u2019s General Plan (adopted in 2010), two of the identified core values were to \u201cPreserve Existing Neighborhoods\u201d and to \u201cManage Traffic and Congestion.\u201d The City has consistently worked with residential neighborhoods to address the challenges of preserving their character and quality of life in the face of cut-through regional traffic.", "In January 2012, residents living on Berkeley Street and in the general vicinity of the project raised their concerns about vehicle speed and pedestrian safety to the City. In response, the City hired Stantec Consulting Services (Stantec) in November 2012 to conduct an engineering evaluation of the traffic and pedestrian conditions on Berkeley Street between Wilshire Boulevard and Stanford Street. The September 2013 engineering evaluation confirmed the residents\u2019 concerns, showing that over 90% of the vehicles travelling on Berkeley between Wilshire Boulevard and Stanford Street exceeded the posted speed limit of 25 mph. Initial traffic data and traffic calming concepts were presented to the community at February 2013 Northeast Neighbors Community meeting. Over the next year the City worked collaboratively with Stantec and the community to refine the proposed traffic calming improvements. On February 11, 2014 (Attachment A) Council authorized the City Manager to execute a first modification to Professional Services Agreement #2589 with Stantec Consulting Services, Inc. to provide design services to implement recommendations of the Berkeley Street Traffic Engineering evaluation. City staff subsequently worked with Stantec Consulting Services to complete the design plans and construction documents for the project.", "Discussion", "The project will consist of the following improvements: realignment of the intersection with Stanford Street from a skewed alignment to a \"T\" alignment; installation of three median islands (located between Stanford Street and Lipton Avenue); a traffic calming circle at the intersection with Lipton Avenue, along with two curb extensions; channelizers at the intersection of Wilshire Boulevard; and new streetscape landscaping and irrigation at the Stanford Street and Lipton Avenue intersections.", "Contractor Selection", "On July 8, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for SP2412 in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1832 vendors were notified. Fifty-two vendors downloaded the bid. Four bids were received and publicly opened on August 3, 2016.", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "Hardy & Harper, Inc.", "$234,000", "All American Asphalt", "$258,645", "Vido Samarzich, Inc.", "$278,860", "PALP Inc. DBA Excel Paving Company", "$287,385", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff verified that Hardy & Harper, Inc.'s license is active and in good standing with the Contractor's State License Board of California. Staff contacted references at other local agencies for whom the contractor completed projects similar in cost and scope to the Berkeley Street Improvements project to substantiate the company's competence. Based on these criteria, Hardy & Harper, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The construction contract to be awarded to Hardy & Harper, Inc. Is for an amount not to exceed $269,100 (including a 15% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in accounts C017080.589000 (Berkeley Traffic Engineering) and account M200152.589780 (Annual Paving), which will fund project-related repaving costs. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "C017080.589000   $250,116", "M200152.589780   $18,984", "TOTAL  $269,100"]}, {"Title": "Agreement Modification No. 5 to Provide Additional Services for the Downtown Community Plan Program Environmental Impact Report", "Department": "City Planning (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fifth modification to Agreement #9687 in the amount of $25,300 with AMEC Foster Wheeler Corporation, a London-based company, for additional scope of work related to the Downtown Community Plan Environmental Impact Report. This will result in a five-year amended agreement, with a new total amount not to exceed $991,300, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On January 22, 2013, the City entered into Contract No. 9687 with AMEC Foster Wheeler Environment & Infrastructure in the amount of $601,000 to prepare the Downtown Community Plan Program EIR (formerly named the Downtown Specific Plan Program EIR) in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act. The initial contract was funded by a grant from the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Authority. Council modified the contract on March 18, 2014 in the amount of $170,000 for additional scope of work to respond to community, Planning Commission, and Council requests to support completion of the Downtown Community Plan and Program EIR. On November 26, 2014 the City Manager's office executed a contract extension allowing AMEC to continue to provide services through December 2015. On December 14, 2014, Council authorized a third modification in the amount of $120,000 to conduct further analysis of circulation options, including one-way streets, in the Downtown. Furthermore, on November 24, 2015, a fourth modification in the amount of $75,000 and an extension of the contract was authorized by Council to conduct sewer monitoring tests in support of the Program EIR.", "The DCP Draft Program EIR was circulated for public review in February 2016. Responses to comments on the Draft EIR raised issues regarding confusion in the EIR Project Description and Land Use/Planning analysis. A fifth modification in the amount of $25,300 is requested to recirculate portions of the Draft Program EIR for public review.", "Background", "Completing the Downtown Community Plan (DCP) is a crucial element of implementing Santa Monica\u2019s overall planning vision, the Land Use and Circulation Element of the General Plan (LUCE) adopted back in 2010. A Program Environmental Impact Report (Program EIR) is required by the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) in order to consider adoption of the DCP.", "On August 1, 2012, the City of Santa Monica was awarded grant funding by the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority (Metro) in the amount of $601,000 to complete environmental clearance for the Downtown Community Plan (DCP - formerly named the Downtown Specific Plan). On January 22, 2013, the Council accepted the Metro grant for preparation of the DCP Program EIR and approved a contract with AMEC for $601,000 to prepare the Program EIR. On March 18, 2014 Council authorized a first modification to Contract No. 9687 in the amount of $170,000 to allow AMEC to conduct additional work necessary to respond to Community, Planning Commission and Council requests and to complete the Program EIR. On November 26, 2014, the City Manager\u2019s office executed a second modification for an extension allowing AMEC to continue to provide services through December, 2015. On December 14, 2014, the City Council authorized a third modification to Contract No. 9687 in the amount of $120,000 to complete additional circulation studies for the Downtown, synthesize data produced by the studies, include the results as an alternative in the Program EIR and attend meetings and hearings in conjunction with the study. A fourth modification in the amount of $75,000 and a contract extension through December 2017 was authorized on November 24, 2015 by Council to conduct sewer monitoring tests in support of the Program EIR.", "In February, 2014, the Draft Downtown Specific Plan document was released for public review. The draft plan document was utilized in the preparation of the Draft Program EIR.  In February, 2016, the Draft Program EIR was released for public review. Subsequent to release of the Draft Program EIR, the revised Draft DCP document was published.", "Discussion", "This contract modification would expand the scope of work for the Program EIR to recirculate portions of the Draft Program EIR to respond to public comments about changes in the plan since the initial project scoping done two years ago.", "On February 3, 2016, the Draft Program EIR was released for a 90-day public review period (exceeding the minimum 45-day public review as required by law). The project description of the Draft Program EIR reflected the 2014 draft of the Downtown Specific Plan. Subsequent to the release of the Draft Program EIR, changes were made to the plan and a revised draft DCP was published. These changes included a name change in the plan to the Downtown Community Plan, reduction in the number of large sites, inclusion of a future Gateway Master Plan, and consolidation of Downtown subareas.", "Although the revised draft DCP does not significantly alter the analysis or produce substantial new information in the Draft Program EIR, a number of public comments received on the Draft Program EIR called for the recirculation of the Draft Program EIR to minimize confusion and to provide clarity. As such, this contract modification is requested to provide for additional scope of work needed to recirculate portions of the Draft Program EIR and to respond to additional public comments. Completion of the Program EIR is required by State law prior to consideration of adoption of the final DCP, and provides an important public information and review process that complements the five years of outreach that has been conducted for the DCP.", "A significant community engagement program is currently underway to gather input for the final draft of the DCP. In addition to neighborhood and stakeholder meetings, City staff has held and continues to hold community workshops as well as small group discussions based upon an online questionnaire available at www.downtownsmplan.org.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On September 25, 2012, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for preparation of the DCP Program EIR to three qualified firms on the City\u2019s Pre-qualified list of environmental consultants. All three firms provided their proposal on the Program EIR. The firms and their proposal were reviewed based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073. AMEC was the lowest bidder. Based on AMEC\u2019s demonstrated knowledge of the City and CEQA, a strong record of preparing legally defensible environmental documentation in the City and other jurisdictions, comprehensive scope of work, and flexible approach, AMEC was selected as the best qualified firm to provide environmental consulting services for the DCP Program EIR.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to AMEC Corporation is $25,300, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $991,300. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The agreement modification will be charged to account 01266.555060 Professional Services."]}, {"Title": "First Modification to Contract No. 9710 with Hewlett Packard for the Purchase, Installation and Maintenance of Desktop Computers", "Department": "Information Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Agreement # 9710 CCS in the amount of $700,000 with Hewlett Packard, a California-based company, for the purchase, installation, and maintenance of desktop computer equipment. This will result in a four-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $2,300,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Information Systems Department (ISD) administers the City\u2019s Computer Equipment Replacement Program (CERP), which covers the purchase, installation and maintenance of the City\u2019s desktop computer systems, laptops, printers, servers and other computer equipment. Approximately 800 computer systems will reach end-of-life and will need to be replaced this year to ensure that they remain functional and compatible with new software systems, and remain covered for product support. The majority of these replacement systems are purchased through the City\u2019s existing agreement with Hewlett Packard (HP). Under the agreement, HP provides equipment, installation and maintenance services for the City\u2019s desktop computers. The agreement with HP will soon reach its not to exceed contract threshold of $1,600,000. The remaining contract balance on the agreement is approximately $428,000, which is insufficient to complete the purchase of all systems required for this year\u2019s computer replacement cycle. Therefore, staff recommends modifying the agreement with HP to increase the contract amount by $700,000, for a new total amount not to exceed $2,300,000 in order to complete the FY 2016-17 system refresh and to accommodate for future growth for the remainder of the contract term, which ends on June 30, 2017.", "Background", "Unlike most city governments which purchase computer equipment on a \"pay as you go\" system, Santa Monica installs, supports and maintains the City's computer technology under a centralized purchasing program that ensures adequate reserves for timely replacement. Currently, our Information Services Department (ISD) manages approximately 2,100 desktop computer systems, laptops and tablets, 300 auxiliary computers monitors, 300 printers, 350 servers, various network equipment and all enterprise software. CERP was established to standardize the City\u2019s technology and to ensure that computer equipment is properly maintained, refreshed regularly, and remains compliant with modern technology requirements in order to better guarantee performance and service resolutions. Funding for the future replacement of equipment included in CERP is established at the time of purchase. As new equipment is purchased, staff sets aside an annual 20%-25% (depending on the equipment life cycle) of the equipment purchase price in the Computer Technology Replacement and Services Fund in order fund future equipment replacement.", "The City\u2019s desktop computers are replaced on a four-year replacement cycle. The replacement cycle was originally setup so that approximately 25% of the systems are replaced each year during year 1 and year 2 of the cycle and approximately 50% are replaced during year 4. No equipment is scheduled for replacement on year 3. Year 3 is the off-year, which staff utilizes to evaluate and identify new technologies to roll-out for the upcoming four-year replacement cycle and to bid out, negotiate and finalize the new contracts for the purchase of equipment. Any new systems purchased during the cycle, which reach end of life on an off-year, are moved up and aligned with year 4 of the corresponding cycle.", "On February 12, 2013 (Attachment A), Council authorized a four-year contract with HP in an amount not to exceed $1,600,000 for the purchase of desktop computer equipment, installation services to refresh all end-of-life systems and four-year warranty for product replacement, including on-site maintenance support.", "This fiscal year is year 4 of the replacement cycle, approximately 800 computer systems are due for replacement. The contract with HP does not have sufficient contract authority remaining to purchase the systems needed to complete the current replacement cycle.", "Discussion", "ISD administers the City\u2019s CERP, which covers the purchase, installation and maintenance of the City\u2019s desktop computer systems, laptops, printers, servers and other computer equipment. The equipment for CERP is purchased from various manufacturers; however, the majority of the replacement desktop systems are purchased through the City\u2019s master agreement with HP. Under the agreement, HP provides equipment, installation and maintenance services for the City\u2019s desktop computers. The agreement with HP will soon reach its not to exceed contract amount of $1,600,000. The original HP contract amount was established to account for the replacement of approximately 1,500 desktop computers during a four-year replacement cycle, which was an estimate of the count of computer systems in the City\u2019s inventory at the time and did not account for future growth. Since contract inception, ISD has experienced an unanticipated upsurge in requests for new desktop computer systems. ISD has purchased approximately 300 more HP systems than original projected due to a rise in demand for equipment related to new City programs, such as the opening of Pico Library; new laptop kiosks at the Main Library; new systems for the Big Blue Bus Dispatch Office; as well as systems for new hires throughout the organization and various other City projects. During this same period, there has also been an unexpected increase of approximately 180 requests to purchase auxiliary computer monitors for existing desktop systems. Staff are expanding their use of dual monitors because second monitors expand their desktop workspace, enabling them to multi-task by working on multiple programs and documents at once.", "The two trends mentioned above have resulted in an unanticipated increase in the purchase of equipment from the HP contract. These purchases have exhausted the contract available balance earlier than projected. Currently, the contract has a balance of approximately $428,000, which is insufficient to complete the purchase of all systems required for the current computer replacement cycle. During this cycle, approximately 800 systems are due for replacement. It is imperative that the City\u2019s computer hardware be replaced on a four-year refresh cycle to ensure that computer hardware remains reliable and up-to-date. Computers that are over four years old are no longer covered by the manufacturer warranty and demonstrate an increased rate of failure.", "At this time, staff recommends modifying the contract with HP to increase the not to exceed contract amount by $700,000 to complete the current system refresh and to accommodate for future growth for the remainder of the contract term. Funding for equipment replacement has been set aside as part of CERP and is available in the Information Technology Replacement and Services Fund.", "Before the contract with HP expires, staff will conduct a competitive bidding process to select a computer hardware vendor for a new multi-year contract. The bidding process will help to establish competitive pricing for the purchase of best in class, reliable hardware, including desktops, laptops, tablets, and monitors. The City is also in the process of shifting to a more mobile workforce with the addition of mobile computer hardware like laptops and tablets. The new contract amount will reflect the cost to replace the current inventory of systems as well as account for future growth based on purchasing trends. Looking further into the future, the new City Services Building has strict power requirements that dictate the type of computer hardware that will be purchased. As mobile hardware manufacturers are continuing to improve power and battery efficiencies, it is very likely that the computer hardware selected for the majority of staff in the City Services Building will be mobile hardware.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On August 31, 2012, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for the purchase, installation, and maintenance of City desktop computer equipment. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 490 vendors were notified and 55 vendors downloaded the RFP. Four firms responded. Staff interviewed the four firms. Proposals were submitted by the following firms: Dell, HP, Lenovo and Quatro Tech. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Information Systems Department. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: product approach, ability to meet the City\u2019s technical specifications and requirements for product support, and cost.", "Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended HP as the best bidder to provide desktop computer equipment and services in accordance with the City specification. HP was the lowest bidder and best met the City\u2019s technical specifications and requirements for product support.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to HP is $700,000, for an amended contract total not to exceed $2,300,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program in account C55000313.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "License Modification for Seasonal Ice Skating Rink", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to execute a first modification to the License Agreement with Downtown Santa Monica Inc., a California-based Corporation, for the installation and operation of a seasonal ice rink on City property between the months of October and February. The modification would extend the term of the agreement with four, one-year option periods and replace one parcel in the license area, 1326 5th Street, for another parcel, 1323 5th Street. Theexisting term of five years, combined with the recommended four, one-year options, would result in an amended license agreement not to exceed nine years in total.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Modifications to the license agreement for the seasonal ice skating rink are intended to extend and enhance the annual holiday activity in Santa Monica\u2019s Downtown.  Since2007, Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) has produced a successful public ice-skating rink on City-owned surface parking lots at the corner of 5th Street and Arizona Avenue.  The existing license agreement is set to expire at the end of the 2017/18 holiday season. DTSM has requested an extension to the term in order to accommodate its mid-term planning and future programming for the seasonal activities.  In addition, the City requires the use of a portion of the southernmost parcel of the license area during the upcoming winter season. DTSM has requested to replace the unavailable parcel with a City-owned surface-parking parcel across the street and to activate the replacement parcel as part of its seasonal celebrations.", "Background", "For the last ten years, Downtown Santa Monica Inc. (DTSM) has transformed a city-owned surface parking lot at 5th Street and Arizona into \u201cICE,\u201d a winter event featuring an ice rink, cabanas, food service, and holidayd\u00e9cor, as part of its broader \u201cWinterlit\u201d seasonal activities.  ICE events attract approximately 60,000 skaters per season and many spectators, growing into a beloved local tradition.", "The most recent license agreement approved by Council on December 11, 2012 (Attachment A) granted DTSM annual use of the six-parcel site as a seasonal, public ice-skating rink during the months of October through February for one dollar per season. The initial term of the agreement was for one year with four, one-year options to extend, for a total license term of five years.", "The license area at 5th Street and Arizona is part of a larger 112,000-square foot land assemblage that is being considered for a public-private partnership, mixed-use development. The proposed development is in the early stages of environmental review and land use entitlements and is not expected to break ground for several years.", "Discussion", "The license agreement is in the fourth year of its term and is set to expire at the end of the 2017/18 winter season.  DTSM has requested to extend the license term to facilitate its mid-term planning and programming of upcoming ICE/Winterlit activities.  Staffrecommends adding four additional one-year extension options to the existing term of the license agreement to allow DTSM to seasonally program ICE/Winterlit through the 2021/22 season. If the mixed-use development proposed for the site initiates construction during the extended license term, the existing agreement has provisions allowing for termination at the City\u2019s discretion. The other terms and conditions of the license agreement would remain unchanged. DTSM would continue to assume responsibility for all costs associated with the operation of the ice skating rink including staffing, ancillary facilities and equipment, utility charges, and the $1 license fee charged by the City annually. In the past, revenues from admission fees, skate rentals, and sponsorships have covered the rink\u2019s approximately $850,000 operating budget. The license of the lot as an ice rink for the months of October through February results in foregone parking revenues to the City totaling approximately $100,000 per season. City and DTSM staff have discussed options for relocating the ICE/Winterlit operations in the future if the proposed mixed-use development at the site commences construction during the license term.", "In addition, DTSM has been notified by the City that a portion of the southernmost parcel, located at 1326 5th Street (see Attachment C), licensed to DTSM for ICE/Winterlit is needed by the City for construction staging relating to an adjacent public works project scheduled to occur during the FY 2016/17 license period. DTSM has confirmed it can relinquish its use of the 1326 5th Street parcel from the license area without affecting its ICE/Winterlit operations; however, DTSM has requested to replace the parcel with another parcel, a City-owned surface parking lot located at 1323 5th St., which is across the street from the license area. The parcel replacement would allow DTSM to expand community activities associated with its Winterlit programing, potentially including activities such as an outdoor cinema, a holiday market, and food trucknights. The replacement parcel would be used in conjunction with the ICE/Winterlit program between the months of October and February.", "The 1323 5th Street parcel is one of the subject parcels of a land exchange approved by Council on August 14, 2012 (Attachment B).  Staff anticipates that sale of the parcel could occur during the 2016/17 season; therefore, staff recommends the inclusion of a 15-day termination clause in the license modification related to the 1323 5th Street parcel if there is a need to terminate use early.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. If there are any future budgetary changes, they will be reflected in future budgets. DTSM\u2019s use of the 1323 5th St. parcel will not significantly impact the City\u2019s projected parking revenues due to the small number of parking spaces being eliminated."]}, {"Title": "Reed Park Improvements Construction Contract Change Order", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Agreement #10297 (CCS) in the amount of $150,000 with BrightView Landscape Development, Inc., a Maryland-based company, for additional construction services on the Reed Park Improvements Project. This will result in a one-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $743,483.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is currently in construction to improve the northeast quadrant of Reed Park by adding new landscaped pathways, exercise equipment, picnic areas, and chess tables with seating at strategic locations throughout the park.  Since the start of construction, the project has encountered a number of issues with the intended design, and uncovered unforeseen conditions that were beyond what was anticipated such as conflicts with existing trees, unknown underground utilities, and the decision to plant new sod in the open grass areas.  Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to execute a first modification to construction contract #10297 (CCS) for $150,000 with an amended new total amount not to exceed $743,483.", "Background", "Contractor Selection", "On March 7, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services of the Reed Park Improvements project, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Three bids were received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016. Bids were evaluated based on criteria including fees, previous experience on similar projects, record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, understanding the project scope, approach to the work requirements, qualifications of proposed staff, and scheduling of project activities. Based on these criteria, BrightView Landscape Development, Inc., the lowest bidder, was recommended as the best bidder.", "On May 10, 2016 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City to enter into a construction contract with BrightView Landscape Development, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $593,483 for the construction of the Reed Park Improvements Project.", "Discussion", "The Reed Park Improvements Project began construction on July 25, 2016. The project has encountered a number of issues with the intended design, and uncovered unforeseen conditions that were beyond what was anticipated. In an attempt to save existing trees that are currently in the way of the new site improvements, the construction contract documents called for the three trees to be transplanted within the boundaries of the project.", "In order to provide the trees with the best chance of survival, additional equipment is required to relocate the trees to new locations within the park. By spreading them out further into the park, conflicts with other existing trees will be minimized, thus allowing for a better opportunity to thrive in the new locations. The original project design planned to re-seed the existing lawn area rather than replace the area with new sod. However, given the time frame of the project and the desire to open all of Reed Park for public use as soon as possible, the best option for the project is to plant new sod.", "Finally, a number of unforeseen conditions were discovered as the demolition phase of the project began. There are conflicts with existing site utilities and conflicts with the condition of existing concrete structures. Some utilities will require rerouting, while others will remain in place and the park design will be altered around them. A number of existing concrete pads and walkways will need replacement due to their poor condition.", "These scope changes and unforeseen conditions have resulted in change order costs exceeding the 10% contingency approved for this project. Based upon work to date, staff recommends amending the construction contract with a first modification for $150,000 to ensure the timely completion of the Reed Park Improvements Project.", "Construction Schedule", "The anticipated completion date for construction work at Reed Park is the end of 2016.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to BrightView Landscape Development, Inc. is $150,000, for an amended contract total not to exceed $743,483. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019058.589000."]}], [{"Title": "Introduction for First Reading of a Proposed Ordinance Regulating the Construction of Private Wells", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an ordinance establishing conditions for construction of private wells in the City.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Neither State law nor current City ordinances prohibit an individual property owner from constructing a private well for irrigation purposes on their property. Only a drilling permit from the Los Angeles County Health Department is required to construct a well. Given the City\u2019s experience with past contamination events, current drought conditions, and required compliance with newly enacted State Groundwater Management law, among other reasons, staff believes it is appropriate for Council to consider adopting a new ordinance to establish a permit for private wells in the City. It would require submission of information to the City which would be beneficial to future groundwater management efforts by the City, including depth, volume and water quality data.", "Background", "Neither State law nor current City ordinance prohibits an individual property owner from constructing a well on their property. However, well installations are regulated under State law through standards adopted by the Department of Water Resources. Any wells which are constructed by private property owners in Santa Monica can be used only for irrigation, not for domestic (indoor) use. There are six known privately owned wells in Santa Monica at this time.", "A State ordinance which directly addressed the construction, alteration, maintenance, and destruction of wells was enacted by the State Water Resources Control Board in February 1990. Pursuant to the Water Code, if a city did not adopt its own ordinance by then, the model code has the same effect as an adopted ordinance and a city must enforce the model code. Since Santa Monica did not adopt its own ordinance, enforcement of this ordinance became the responsibility of the Los Angeles County Health Department. Presently, individuals need only obtain a drilling permit from the Los Angeles County Health Department to proceed with construction of a private well. The City can still adopt its own ordinance as long as it meets or exceeds the standards contained in certain technical bulletins published by the Department of Water Resources.", "Given the increased importance of local water management during the ongoing drought, particularly in the context of Santa Monica\u2019s goal of becoming water self-sufficient in the future, it is timely to re-examine local regulation of private well drilling. The majority of Santa Monica\u2019s water supply is produced from local groundwater supplies within the Santa Monica Groundwater Basin. The Santa Monica Basin is currently non-adjudicated and encompasses an area of 50 square miles on the Los Angeles coastal plain. The Santa Monica Basin is classified as a medium-priority basin by the State Department of Water Resources. Pursuant to the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act of 2014 (SGMA), all medium and high priority groundwater basins are required to prepare a groundwater management plan by 2022. The basin underlies the entire City limits and extends beyond City boundaries to the north, east, and south. These other portions of the basin to the north, east, and south underlie the City of Los Angeles.", "Discussion", "The regulation of private wells in Santa Monica is appropriate in the context of past, present, and future water use and water reliability. This context includes:", "\u00b7 Past groundwater contamination caused by methyl tert-butyl ether (MTBE, a gasoline additive) and industrial solvent releases;", "\u00b7 The semi-arid nature of the region\u2019s climate, and the continuing challenge to align water use for residential landscaping with the limitations of the City\u2019s climate;", "\u00b7 Consideration of potential climate change impacts;", "\u00b7 Past and present drought, and the City\u2019s responsibility to meet the basic indoor water needs of residents, rather than the discretionary outdoor uses;", "\u00b7 The City\u2019s Water Shortage Response Plan which addresses specified levels of water use and restrictions on certain uses in response to drought pressures;", "\u00b7 The development of a Sustainable Water Master Plan and its goal of water self-sufficiency by 2020; and", "\u00b7 Requirements established by the recently enacted Sustainable Groundwater Management Act of 2014, which requires the establishment of a management entity for the Santa Monica Basin by 2017 and adoption of a plan for sustainability by 2022.", "The City\u2019s groundwater sources must be protected against overdraft and contamination so that the City may continue to provide the necessary volume of potable water to its customers within the health and welfare guidelines promulgated by various State and Federal regulatory agencies. Management of the Santa Monica Basin groundwater resources, protection of the potable supply from potential cross-connection with private wells, and the ongoing management of the City\u2019s efforts toward self-sufficiency, among other issues, support this effort to gain as much knowledge as possible from all activities which may have an impact on the quality or quantity of local groundwater. No City ordinance currently exists which requires any person wanting to construct a private well within the City to notify the City, nor to provide valuable information such as depth, volume, and water quality information, among other information, to the City.", "The attached proposed ordinance would address this challenge. It would require that well construction meet the State well standards currently in place and a permit be obtained from the City of Santa Monica. Permit conditions would allow for inspections, reporting, metering, water quality testing, and proper abandonment, among other issues.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. Staff anticipates minimal financial or operational impact in the form of increased staff effort to process and review permit applications. In conjunction with the FY 2016-17 Citywide Cost of Services Study, an appropriate permit fee will be developed to cover this cost."]}], [{"Title": "Venue Guarantee Letters with LA 2024 Exploratory Committee (LA 2024) and International Olympic Committee (IOC) for Beach Volleyball during 2024 Olympics", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to submit a venue guarantee letter to LA 2024 for use of Santa Monica State Beach for Beach Volleyball during the 2024 Olympics; and2. Authorize the Mayor to submit a letter in support of the Candidature Questionnaire for the City of Los Angeles to the International Olympic Committee.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Los Angeles is one of four cities bidding to host the 2024 Olympic and Paralympic Games (Games). The LA 2024 Exploratory Committee (LA 2024) is seeking both a venue use guarantee letter from Santa Monica to stage beach volleyball on Santa Monica State Beach and a separate letter to the International Olympic Committee (IOC) agreeing to certain assurances as part of the Los Angeles Candidature Questionnaire.", "The guarantee letter provides conceptual approval on the part of the venue owner and agreement to minimum terms that would form the basis of the Venue Use Agreement that would be executed in the future, should LA be successful in winning the bid. The minimum terms specify the Exclusive Use Period, which would begin on April 1, 2024 for a portion of the 1550 lot and on June 1, 2024 for the beach area, and run through August 18, 2024 for both the 1550 lot and the beach. The rental fee would be based on the formula used for large events in the 1550 lot, as established by the 1550 Lot Cultural/Entertainment Policy, and the formula used to calculate the fee for private use of the beach. Based on the preliminary plan, the fee, based on current rates, would be approximately $3.7 million and includes rental of the 1550 lot and the beach area as well as reimbursement for loss of parking revenue. Operational costs for other City departments would be negotiated as part of the Venue Use Agreement.", "The IOC letter provides a number of commitments by the City such as not staging major public events during the Games, protecting the marketing rights of the Organizing Committee for the 2024 Games (OCOG), providing basic public services during the Games, and working cooperatively with the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, which is charged with providing security during the Games.  LA 2024 has presented a preliminary plan to the City and has briefed a number of boards and commissions, beach residents, and the Pier lessees on the concept. The IOC will select the host city in September 2017; if LA wins the bid, detailed plans would be developed and a full planning process, similar to what has been used to successfully stage the LA Marathon, would be initiated to examine and address all challenges.", "Background", "Spearheaded by LA Mayor Eric Garcetti, Los Angeles officially launched its bid to host the 2024 Olympic and Paralympic Games (Games) on September 1, 2015 with a unanimous vote by the LA City Council in support of the city\u2019s quest to host its third international Olympiad.", "Although Boston was initially selected as the preferred venue by the US Olympic Committee, their subsequent withdrawal cleared the way for LA to seek to bring the Summer Games back to the United States for the first time in what would be 28 years since the Atlanta Summer Olympics in 1996.  Los Angeles is one of just four international finalists for the 2014 games along with Rome, Paris and Budapest.", "The LA 2024 Exploratory Committee (LA 2024) officially launched the two year effort to secure the bid at a ceremony at the Annenberg Community Beach House immediately following the LA City Council vote. The announcement was purposefully held on Santa Monica State Beach to highlight the key role that beaches have played in the development of new and exciting sports and inspiring a new generation of athletes.", "The two year bid process culminates in September 2017 with the International Olympic Committee\u2019s (IOC) selection of the Host City. Over the next twelve months, LA 2024 will submit a number of documents and presentations to the IOC as well hosting an Evaluation Committee visit. The other three cities vying for the 2024 Olympic bid are Paris, Rome and Budapest.", "Discussion", "As part of the bid process, LA 2024 is required to submit a venue guarantee from each of the proposed venues to the IOC in October 2016. The venue guarantee letter (Attachment A) establishes the minimum terms (dates of exclusive use, rental fee, municipal services, merchandising, broadcasting rights, exclusive concession rights) that would form the basis of the Venue Use Agreement that would be executed in the future, should Los Angeles be awarded the bid. As part of the Candidature Questionnaire that LA 2024 must submit to the IOC, each venue has been asked to submit an accompanying letter that provides assurances of commitments required by the IOC. The IOC letter (Attachment B) includes the following commitments:", "\u00b7 City would not stage major events during the period that would conflict with the Games", "\u00b7 City would take reasonable measures to protect the marketing rights of the OCOG", "\u00b7 City would provide the normal base level of public services during the Games", "\u00b7 The City would require that all construction would comply with local planning, environmental, health and safety, labor and anti-corruption laws", "\u00b7 The City would make the operations of the City\u2019s Transportation Management Center available to support the Games transport and traffic solutions", "\u00b7 The City would work cooperatively with the Department of Homeland Security which is charged with providing security during the Olympic Games", "Since the Games are eight years away, the proposal for beach volleyball on Santa Monica State Beach has been presented as a guarantee of minimum terms, with the details and solutions to the many challenges to be addressed during the seven years of planning prior to the Games. In an effort to mitigate concerns that the Council might have making this commitment so far in advance, LA 2024 has provided a side letter (Attachment C) that makes clear that absent a mutual agreement on the definitive venue use agreement, the venue use guarantee would be rendered null and void years prior to 2024. LA 2024 has proposed having the definitive agreement completed by December 31, 2018.", "LA 2024 Beach Volleyball Proposal", "Beach volleyball is the only Olympic activity proposed for Santa Monica. The Games are scheduled to begin on July 19, 2024 and run through August 4, 2024; the Paralympic Games are held two weeks after the Olympic Games, however, beach volleyball would not be part of the Paralympic Games and would not be held in Santa Monica.", "LA 2024 is proposing to stage the beach volleyball venue on the beach, north of the Santa Monica Pier, between Lifeguard Stations 14 and 15; the proposed concept plan is shown in Attachment D. The proposed 12,000 seat temporary stadium would be built on the sand, just north of the 1550 lot and would include a center competition court. Additional warm up and practice courts would be located on the sand as well as tents for the athletes. The entire 1550 lot would be used during the month of July and throughout the Games to stage operational and broadcast components. Additional highlights of the proposed plan include the following:", "\u00b7 There would be two volleyball sessions per day during the two week run of the Games, including night games; spectators would be expected to arrive at staggered times to enjoy the Olympic festival atmosphere", "\u00b7 Ticket holders would enter the venue at the beach level after walking down the Pier; LA 2024 would build an additional set of stairs from the Pier south of the existing stairs and would build an accessible ramp from the Pier to the venue entrance on the beach", "\u00b7 The entire site, including the 1550 lot and sand area, would be surrounded by a 10\u2019 security fence; the proposed plan shows the fence in front of three residences", "\u00b7 A temporary bike path would be constructed on the sand to go around the site and under the Pier to meet the existing bike path south of the Pier", "\u00b7 A portion of the 1550 lot would remain open next to the Pier and controlled to provide access for deliveries to Pier businesses and the northeast portion of the lot would be open for parking for the nearby residents; the Broadway overpass would also remain open", "\u00b7 No onsite parking would be available to Olympic ticket holders; all attendees would be expected to arrive at all venues by public/alternative transportation", "\u00b7 Security within the venue would be under the direction of the federal government, which is charged with providing security at the Olympic Games", "\u00b7 The preliminary construction plan would phase the closure of the 1550 lot and the beach area as follows:", "o April and May 2024: 400 spaces in 1550 lot would be occupied", "o June 2024: 800 spaces in 1550 lot would be occupied as well as the beach construction area", "o July 1, 2024 - August 4, 2024: entire 1550 lot (1175 spaces except for controlled areas) and entire beach area fenced off", "o August 5, 2024 - August 18, 2024: tear down; 800 parking spaces occupied in 1550 lot", "The rental fee would be based on established formulas that are used to calculate the rent for large scale events in the 1550 lot and for the permitted use of portions of the public beach by the private beach clubs and properties along Palisades Beach Road. The use of formulas would allow adjustments to be made to preliminary projections as conditions change over the next eight years. Based on the preliminary plan and construction schedule, the rental fee would be approximately $3.7 million in 2016 dollar as shown below.", "This is based on the established rates for use of the 1550 lot as part of the 1550 Lot Cultural/Entertainment Policy that are currently set at $1.37 per square foot for timed events and $1.08 per square foot for untimed events plus the potential  parking revenue loss. The rental rate for the 475,765 square foot area of the beach is based on the $5.50 per square foot per year rate that was established in the 2012 appraisal for beach recreation use. The rental fee would be adjusted by the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Los Angeles-Orange-Riverside County area published by the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the cumulative increase from December 2016 through December 2023. Since these rates are for property rental, they are not tied to a cost of service limit and market rates may be charged. Given that parking rates are expected to increase during the next eight years and additional parking spaces are planned as part of the Deauville site underground storm water project, there would need to be adjustments in the parking revenue loss calculation for the 1550 lot that would be possible under the proposed formulas. Additional operating and staff costs for City departments would be determined as part of the Venue Use Agreement.", "Closing the 1550 lot for the month of July and reducing capacity during the months preceding the Games would be a major impact. Although traffic and circulation patterns may be different in 2024, a major initiative would be planning for alternative parking and transportation options along with the communication plan for informing residents and visitors of how best to access the Pier and beach area prior to and during the Games. These options, which might include shuttles from the south beach lots and use of satellite parking lots close to Expo stations at the east end of the city, as well as communication strategies, would be considered during negotiation of the Venue Use Agreement.", "Public Outreach", "Staff worked with the LA 2024 Communications Team to schedule a number of presentations to beach residents, several Boards and Commissions, and the Pier lessees to solicit feedback on the proposal to hold beach volleyball on Santa Monica State Beach as part of the 2024 Olympic Games. The following is a summary of these community discussions.", "Beach residents", "All residents living north and south of the proposed site and businesses on Ocean Avenue were sent postcard invitations to attend a presentation on July 11, 2016. Only a handful of residents attended the meeting and related their neighbors\u2019 view that they did not attend since this is so far off in the future. Those in attendance were very supportive of the Games and thought the impacts would be manageable for the nearby residents.", "Planning Commission", "LA 2024 made a presentation to the Planning Commission on July 13, 2016. Commissioners were generally supportive and excited by the possibility of the Games in 2024. Comments included a reminder that the Pier is a local landmark so that any temporary additions would need to be done sensitively as well as seeking assurance that all traces of the Games would be removed. LA 2024 was asked if the location could be moved further north or if south beach had been considered. Moving further north would impact more residences and south beach would be too far from the Expo station, which would be the primary transit mode for visitors. Commissioners also asked what kind of permit process would be required and staff noted that a Coastal Permit would be necessary as well as State Department of Parks and Recreation review since the beach is State owned.", "Santa Monica Pier Corporation", "There was a lively discussion at the Pier Board meeting on July 18, 2016. Many Board members expressed concern about the impact the closure of the 1550 lot would have on Pier businesses and asked LA 2024 if there was provision for helping tenants who are negatively impacted or providing for a minimum guarantee for proven business loss. Others questioned whether crowd modelling would be done and if there is precedent for making temporary improvements more permanent or if improvements could be made earlier than the Games. Several Board members acknowledged the once in a generation event and the long-term visibility and exposure that the Games would bring to the Pier. There was discussion of the need to better understand the economics of the Pier businesses and to do advanced planning to help mitigate potential losses.", "Recreation and Parks Commission", "The Recreation and Parks Commission was briefed on the plan at its meeting on July 21, 2016. Commissioners asked if the location could be moved further south and if some of the improvements could be left behind. Commissioners voiced support for having a legacy of the Games remain, such as the practice courts along with a plaque. Following a generally positive discussion, the Commission voted to unanimously support Olympic beach volleyball on Santa Monica Beach with a recommendation that some permanent structures remain.", "Santa Monica Pier Lessees Association", "LA 2024 presented the proposed plan to the Santa Monica Pier Lessees Association (SMPLA) on August 31, 2016. The lessees voiced serious concerns about the impact eliminating public parking in the 1550 lot would have on their businesses and asked if the venue could be moved further south and not take up the parking lot. The issue of sufficient capacity on the Pier to handle the additional crowds coming to the beach volleyball venue was also mentioned. Several suggestions to mitigate the impacts on the Pier businesses include having the City ask for more money to give to the lessees in the form of rent credit or business loss recovery, working with the Pier on cooperative concession opportunities, and providing City resources to expand capacity on the Pier to accommodate more pedestrians.", "State Department of Parks and Recreation", "The State, acting through its Department of Parks and Recreation, is the fee owner of Santa Monica State Beach (\u201cthe Beach\u201d). The City is the exclusive operator of the Beach in accordance with the Operating Agreement between the State and the City.", "Because the Operating Agreement requires the State to consent to the use of the Beach for other than use and enjoyment by the general public, the City has obtained the State\u2019s consent to allow the use of the Beach for the 2024 Olympic beach volleyball event.", "Alternatives", "The City Council could chose to not approve the venue use guarantee letter and take Santa Monica out of consideration as the beach volleyball venue. During the public outreach process, this question was raised by a number of people and LA 2024 responded that if Santa Monica passes, there are many other beach cities that would be interested in hosting beach volleyball.", "Environmental Analysis", "Conceptual approval for the Olympic Games is statutorily exempt from CEQA pursuant to Section 15272 of the State CEQA Guidelines, which states that \u201cCEQA does not apply to activities or approvals necessary to the bidding for, hosting or staffing of, and funding or carrying out of Olympic Games under the authority of the International Olympic Committee, except for the construction of facilities necessary for such Olympic Games\u201d. If awarded the Olympic Games, the construction of the temporary stadium on the beach would be subject to further review to determine the level of environmental clearance necessary.", "Next Steps", "The selection of the host city will be made by the IOC on September 13, 2017. If Los Angeles is successful, the next step would be the negotiation of the Venue Use Agreement, which would be brought to the City Council for approval. As part of the negotiations, which would confirm the dates and rental terms, quantify the other costs for the use of the beach and the 1550 lot, and all other legal issues, the details of the plan and its challenges would be addressed. A citywide review by departments and other stakeholders would cover all aspects of the plan and consider the questions and concerns that have been raised by the boards and commissions. This planning effort would be similar to the process used to stage the successful LA Marathon over the past six years.", "At the time Council would review the Venue Use Agreement, staff would also bring any changes to the Community Events Ordinance that would be needed to permit the Games on the beach, similar to the temporary changes that were approved for Glow. A coastal permit would also be required and that would be the responsibility of OCOG to secure.", "Although there are many complexities involved, staff has confidence that there would be adequate time to develop solutions and craft a workable and sustainable plan. While the impact of closing the 1550 lot for five weeks in the middle of summer and limiting its public use for several months is very significant, the proposed location for the stadium takes advantage of one of the widest sections of Santa Monica State Beach and is situated on a portion of the beach that is rarely used by visitors. The close proximity to the Expo line is another plus for the location.", "Many improvements are planned for the area around the Pier and beach and are expected to be completed well in advance of the 2024 Games. The replacement of the Pier bridge is expected to be under construction by 2020 and would provide a much more accessible pedestrian entry to the Pier. Improvements are slated for Ocean Front Walk north of the Pier as well as the expansion of the beach bike trail around the 1550 lot, at the north end of the beach, and between the Pier and Bay Street, and are expected to be completed in 2019. The Deauville site, which is currently an unsightly storage area adjacent to the 1550 lot, will house underground storm water storage tanks and be paved to provide additional parking for the Pier and the beach; the project is anticipated to be open in 2017.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Climate Action Update to Council: 15x15 Climate Action Plan Final Report, Sea Level Rise Analysis and the New Climate Action and Adaptation Plan", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and comment on the 15X15 Climate Action Plan Final Report; and2. Direct staff to complete a feasibility and financial impact analysis for achieving carbon neutrality by 2050 or sooner, and return to Council with recommendations.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica has been a long-time pioneer among cities taking local action to spur global response to the threat of long-term climate change. As a coastal city in an arid climate zone, our city is particularly vulnerable to the potential adverse impacts of severe climate change due to human activity. The example of Santa Monica and other local communities have helped catalyze California\u2019s internationally-significant efforts to mitigate climate change. This worldwide movement of cities and governments helped support the Paris Agreement last year where 195 countries adopted the first-ever universal, legally binding global climate accord.", "On February 26, 2013, Council adopted the 15x15 Climate Action Plan, which was a short-term, action-based plan to reduce greenhouse gas emissions 15% below 1990 levels by 2015. Implementation of the 15x15 Climate Action Plan was completed at the end of FY 2015. Monitoring and evaluation reveals that the City surpassed its greenhouse gas emissions reduction target. Compared to 1990, Santa Monica\u2019s annual emissions are now 20% below baseline.", "On January 26, 2016 Council authorized the hiring of a consultant to develop a new Climate Action and Adaptation Plan (CAAP) to guide continued reductions and mitigation efforts to meet the City\u2019s long term emission reduction goals and to develop adaptation strategies to expected local impacts of climate change. Development of this plan is underway and it is scheduled to be delivered to Council in 2017. A study evaluating the local impacts of sea level rise and increased storm activity is nearing completion and this will provide the basis for many of the local adaptation strategies to be included in the plan.", "In February 2013 Council adopted long range emission reduction targets calling for a 30% reduction by 2030 and 80% by 2050. The December 2015 Paris Agreement that resulted from the United Nations-organized Conference of the Parties (COP21) acknowledges that deeper reductions in global emissions will be required to limit global average temperature increases and recommends that governments work to achieve carbon neutrality. Following the release of this agreement the Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment adopted a motion recommending that City Council adopt a carbon neutrality target for Santa Monica and develop a plan to meet it by 2050 or sooner. Carbon neutrality means that the net greenhouse gas emissions associated with a city are zero. This goal has been adopted by many leading cities around the world, and is considered the new imperative to avoid worsening climate change. The CAAP will include a feasibility and financial impact analysis for achieving carbon neutrality under various timelines, and when the plan is completed staff will return to Council with final recommendations.", "Background", "Council adopted the Sustainable City Plan (SCP) in 1994 to protect natural resources, prevent harm to the natural environment, enhance human health, and improve the social and economic well-being of the community for current and future generations.", "In light of increasing scientific consensus on the threat of global climate change, on October 10, 2006, Council amended the SCP with updated goal areas, targets and indicators, which included reduction in the local generation of Greenhouse Gas Emissions (GHG).  These are a primary source of build-up of carbon in the atmosphere, the impetus for global climate change.", "The GHG targets established were a 15 percent reduction below 1990 levels by 2015 communitywide and a 30 percent reduction below 1990 levels by 2015 for municipal operations. These went considerably beyond the requirements of the landmark AB 32, signed into law by California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger later in 2006.", "On July 6, 2010, Council adopted the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), which calls for the preparation of a Climate Action Plan with periodic monitoring to evaluate progress. On February 26, 2013, Council adopted longer term emission reduction targets calling for a 30% reduction below 1990 levels by 2030 and an 80% reduction by 2050, and adopted the 15x15 Climate Action Plan to ensure the City would meet its previously adopted short term goals of a communitywide15% reduction below baseline levels and a 30% reduction for municipal operations by 2015. On January 26, 2016 Council authorized the hiring of a consultant to develop a new Climate Action and Adaptation Plan (CAAP) to guide continued reductions and mitigation efforts to meet the City\u2019s long term emission reduction goals and to develop adaptation strategies to address expected local impacts of climate change.", "The State Legislature has recently passed legislation committing California to the same 30% reduction by 2030 that Santa Monica adopted three years ago.", "Discussion", "When the 15x15 Climate Action Plan (15x15 CAP) was prepared, staff conducted a greenhouse gas inventory of community sources for the year 2011. The inventory revealed that emissions had dropped 14% below 1990 levels. Staff projected that, based on increased economic activity and population, emissions would increase. In order to achieve the 15% reduction target below 1990, the City would have to reduce approximately 29,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalents or MTCO2e, (equivalents refer to methane and nitrous oxide being measured in units of carbon dioxide \u2018equivalents\u2019).", "Figure 1. Santa Monica\u2019s Greenhouse Gas Emissions", "The 15x15 CAP identified 15 objectives to be completed by the end of fiscal year 2015 (Attachment 1). Each objective includes actions to be implemented by various City divisions, or required action to be taken by residents and businesses. In total, there were 34 actions included in the plan. Completing these objectives and actions would help the City mitigate and reduce the remaining 29,000 MTCO2e and achieve 15% below baseline targets. The 15x15 Climate Action Plan Final Report has been prepared, providing greater analysis on the attainment status, challenges and successes of each action (Attachment 4). This staff report provides a summary of the findings. A summary table of the analysis (Attachment 2) and a summary of highlights and challenges (Attachment 3) are attached to provide additional detail and analysis.", "The 15x15 CAP was monitored through indicators provided by various City divisions. Emission factors for each appropriate action were then applied, generating a value for reduced or avoided emissions. Emission factors are provided by the US EPA, ICLEI\u2019s ClearPath Tool (a nationally recognized tool for local government climate action planning), and other industry-standards. The table below shows the attainment status of the objectives and actions.", "Table 1. 15x15 Climate Action Plan Attainment", "Attainment / Status", "Objectives", "Actions", "Achieved", "7", "19", "Some effort / Some progress achieved", "6", "9", "No effort / No progress", "2", "6", "TOTAL", "15", "34", "Overall, 46% of the 15 objectives were met and 55% of the 34 actions were completed. 17% of the 34 actions were not met or were in progress at the time of this report. Significant emissions reductions came through the following efforts:", "\u00b7 Increasing energy efficiency in residential and commercial buildings through utility incentives, reducing energy use", "\u00b7 Increasing waste diverted through green waste collection and diversion of special waste like textiles and electronics, reducing methane from decomposing waste", "\u00b7 Focusing new development around mass transit, reducing vehicle emissions through increased access and mobility", "\u00b7 Transitioning Big Blue Bus to renewable natural gas sourced from landfill methane", "\u00b7 Implementing energy efficiency projects in municipal operations to save 1.3 MWh since 2013", "The 15x15 CAP was developed and intended to be implemented within existing program budgets and staff resources. However, some of the City-led projects for energy efficiency, renewable energy and electric vehicles were not implemented due to project funds not being identified and extensive lead times for project development. While some small projects were implemented, staff determined that strategic planning for achieving long-term, aggressive goals in energy efficiency, renewable energy and electric vehicles was a priority.", "There were some actions that were completed that were not anticipated in the plan. For example, at the time of plan development, staff did not take into account the impact of utility incentive programs on building energy efficiency. Instead of increasing as previously projected, annual community energy use in the city dropped appreciably since 2013: commercial energy use decreased by over 5 MWh and 1.2M therms; and residential natural gas use by 200,000 therms. Another example includes the Big Blue Bus transitioning from virgin natural gas to renewable natural gas sourced from landfills, an action not previously available at the time of plan development. As future programs, projects and technologies cannot be predicted, the next climate action plan will incorporate a portion of uncertain efficiencies to be gained through market transformation.", "In order to achieve the 2015 target, a total of 29,000 metric tons of CO2e would need to be eliminated. As a result, the monitoring and evaluation tracked verified a total of 35,592 metric tons of carbon emissions that were reduced or avoided through the efforts of the 15x15 CAP and from other regional or statewide efforts.", "To complete the analysis, staff conducted an inventory of greenhouse gas emissions from 2015. The 2015 inventory reveals that emissions have dropped a total of 95,974 MTCO2e since 2011, which is 19.9% below the 1990 baseline, surpassing the City\u2019s 15% target. The additional reductions were a result of increased renewable sources of electricity generation and more fuel-efficient and alternatively-fuelled vehicles. And although the City surpassed its target, staff continues to work on the actions that were in progress or were not yet completed by the end of 2015, which will increase the emission reductions in the coming months.", "Table 2. Santa Monica Greenhouse Gas Emissions Trends", "MTCO2e", "1990", "2000", "2007", "2011", "2015", "Residential", "188,514", "202,331", "196,284", "154,666", "134,139", "Commercial", "329,123", "326,083", "311,762", "213,219", "149,501", "Industrial", "32,215", "25,902", "61,618", "35,261", "50,951", "Vehicle Transportation", "762,242", "752,156", "742,070", "746,230", "715,267", "Aviation", "--", "--", "26,800", "21,912", "26,348", "Waste", "74,546", "63,364", "51,705", "35,001", "34,109", "TOTAL", "1,386,640", "1,369,836", "1,390,239", "1,206,289", "1,110,315", "% below 1990", "--", "1.2%", "-0.3%", "13.0%", "19.9%", "Difference from target (15% below baseline)", "--", "191,192", "211,595", "27,645", "-68,329", "Population", "86,905", "85,084", "90,379", "90,850", "93,220", "Per capita emissions", "16.0", "16.1", "15.4", "13.3", "11.9", "Municipal Operations", "Council also established a 2015 emissions reduction target for municipal operations of 30% below 1990 levels. Since 1990, municipal operations have increased significantly, due to expansion of transit services and new facilities being constructed, like Tongva Park, Parking Structure 6 and Arcadia Water Treatment Plant. After a peak in 2007, emissions have since declined.", "Through implementation of the 15x15 CAP, the City completed a number of energy efficiency projects saving 1.3 megawatt hours since 2013. The 15x15 CAP called for a complete conversion of City-owned streetlights to energy efficient LED bulbs. Due to funding and scheduling delays outside of the City\u2019s control only 10% of the streetlights were converted by the end of 2015. However, before the end of 2016 the City will complete an LED retrofit of over 1,200 streetlights, nearing the goal previously established. Staff have identified additional energy efficiency projects totaling over 2 megawatt hours to complete by 2017.", "The most significant reduction in municipal emissions came from the transition of Big Blue Bus (BBB) to renewable natural gas. The transition from virgin natural gas, from fracked sources, to landfill-sourced renewable methane, has helped to reduce BBB\u2019s transit fleet emissions by over 60%.", "The City continues to procure Renewable Energy Credits (RECs) for 100% of its eligible electricity accounts. Staff track municipal emissions in two scenarios: one accounting for RECs and one not accounting. This allows for staff to better understand both the value of energy efficiency and onsite renewable energy and purchasing RECs. When accounting for RECs, the City achieved a 42% reduction below 1990 levels for municipal greenhouse gas emissions.", "MTCO2e", "1990", "2000", "2007", "2011", "2012", "2015", "Buildings &Facilities", "Electricity", "4,620", "6,200", "5,042", "4,424", "5,354", "4,995", "Natural Gas", "585", "1,444", "1,987", "3,141", "1,266", "982", "Streetlights & Traffic Signals", "2,052", "3,572", "4,298", "1,297", "2,104", "1,589", "Vehicle Fleet", "3,684", "4,001", "4,936", "2,188", "2,124", "1,905", "Water Delivery", "488", "1,839", "1,722", "4,862", "4,433", "4,133", "Big Blue Bus", "12,109", "16,189", "18,069", "15,971", "15,268", "7,436", "TOTAL", "18,918", "27,045", "36,054", "31,883", "30,549", "21,040", "Percent below 1990", "-43%", "-91%", "-69%", "-61%", "-11%", "Renewable Energy Credits", "9,772", "9,340", "5,721", "7,458", "10,142", "TOTAL less RECs", "17,273", "26,714", "26,162", "23,091", "10,898", "Percent below 1990", "9%", "-41%", "-38%", "28%", "42%", "Table 3. Municipal Operations Greenhouse Gas Emissions Trends", "Establishing a Goal of Carbon Neutrality", "It is important to keep in mind that local action alone is insufficient to halt or even slow global climate change. Santa Monica\u2019s efforts are aimed at doing our part and showing the efficacy of local action as a spur to State, Federal and international cooperation to face this existential threat to life on earth as we have known it during modern history.", "Since Council adopted a target of 30% reduction by 2030 and 80% by 2050 (80x50), climate action planning has matured and growing awareness around climate change has spurred more urgency around deep carbon reductions.", "The December 2015 Paris Agreement that resulted from the UN-organized Conference of Parties (COP21) recognizes that in order to limit global average temperature increase, Parties (national governments) should seek to achieve a \u201cbalance between anthropogenic emissions by sources and removals by sinks of greenhouse gases in the second half of this century.\u201d This can be interpreted as advocating for carbon neutrality by 2050. Being carbon neutral means that the net greenhouse gas emissions associated with a city are zero. The Agreement also recognizes that deep reductions in global emissions will be required with an emphasis \u201cthat enhanced pre\u20102020 ambition can lay a solid foundation for enhanced post\u20102020 ambition.\u201d", "Shortly after the release of the Paris Agreement, the Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment adopted the following motion on December 21, 2015: \u201cIn light of the recent COP21, which explicitly includes a carbon neutrality goal, the Task Force on the Environment strongly recommends City Council adopt a carbon neutrality target for Santa Monica and direct staff to develop a plan for meeting that target by 2050 or sooner.\u201d", "Santa Monica is an active member of the Deep Carbon Reductions Working Group and an observer of the Carbon Neutral Cities Alliance within the Urban Sustainability Directors Network. Through research and information sharing with other leading sustainable cities, staff has recognized that a bold and transformative vision of change must be developed in order to achieve drastic reductions in emissions. Cities that had previously adopted 80x50 targets have, in recent years, adopted carbon neutrality goals or other more aggressive goals.", "Other cities have adopted goals to be fossil-fuel free or to achieve 100% renewable energy. A goal of 100% renewables is more specific and more challenging when applied to building energy and vehicle fuels; electricity and natural gas must be sourced from renewables (or natural gas use will be diminished greatly) and all vehicles will be electrified or powered by other low-carbon fuels like hydrogen. A goal of 100% renewables can be a contributing factor toward achieving carbon neutrality. Some cities use this goal because they believe it is easier to understand and is more inspirational than a carbon emissions goal. Below is a table of other cities\u2019 long range carbon and energy goals and target years.", "Table 3. Leading Cities\u2019 Climate Goals", "City", "Emissions Goal", "Target Year", "Copenhagen", "Carbon neutral", "100% renewables", "2025", "2050", "Melbourne", "Carbon neutral", "2020", "Palo Alto", "80% below baseline", "2030", "San Francisco", "80% below baseline", "100% renewables", "2050", "2030", "San Diego", "100% renewables", "2035", "Santa Monica (current)", "80% below baseline", "2050", "Seattle", "Carbon neutral", "2050", "Stockholm", "Fossil-fuel free", "2050", "Vancouver", "Fossil-fuel free", "100% renewables", "2050", "2050", "On February 26, 2016, when Council approved the selection of DNV-GL to prepare the City\u2019s Climate Action & Adaptation Plan (CAAP), staff had required that the consultant compare pathways to an 80x50 goal and a carbon neutrality goal. The CAAP will include feasibility and financial impact analyses of achieving carbon neutrality by 2030, 2040, and 2050 and will present recommendations for Council consideration and approval. Regardless of the final recommendation, it is clear that a dramatic shift in building energy use, energy generation and vehicle fuels will need to occur to meet any aggressive long term emission reduction goal. Below is a conceptual graphic of that shift.", "Figure 2. Pathways to Deep Decarbonization", "Source: Jeffrey Sachs, Columbia University", "The process to develop the CAAP will engage community leaders and specialists in identifying measures that will reduce emissions and support climate adaptation. Staff, with consultants, will also engage the community to identify actions that can be taken by individuals, businesses and local organizations to support the Plan. A goal to achieve carbon neutrality would establish the imperative for deep carbon reductions and would build off of existing efforts to continue reducing and mitigating carbon emissions at the community level and in municipal operations.", "While new goals and measures are being established in the next CAAP, staff are already integrating resource conservation into policy and project development that will serve as the foundation for carbon emissions reductions. Some examples include:", "\u00b7 Prioritizing multimodal mobility, including low carbon options like biking, walking, and transportation by bus and rail", "\u00b7 Evaluating a requirement for solar energy systems and energy efficiency in exceedance of the State energy code to achieve zero net energy in new construction by 2017", "\u00b7 Designing for zero net energy and zero net water in the proposed City Services Building", "\u00b7 Designing a multiuser microgrid for the City Yards redevelopment area and utilizing EcoDistricts as a framework for neighborhood planning and engagement", "\u00b7 Achieving zero waste to landfills by 2030", "Climate Change Adaptation", "While Santa Monica continues to remain a leader among sustainable cities, our efforts alone will not be enough to avoid the momentum of global climate change. Changing climatic trends like drought, increased heat and worsened air quality, are currently being experienced. Future hazards, such as sea level rise, more frequent and larger wildfires and increasing numbers of extreme heat days, are already considered likely to happen despite best case scenarios for global emissions reductions. Adaptation and resilience are considered to be the next forefront of sustainable community planning as a response to climate change impacts.", "California is making important strides in addressing and requiring climate resilience, including Gov. Jerry Brown\u2019s Executive Order B-30-15, which requires state agencies to factor climate change into their planning and investment decisions; AB 1482, which requires the Natural Resource Agency to report on the State\u2019s vulnerabilities to climate change by sector and prepare a \u201cSafeguarding California\u201d implementation plan; SB 246, which requires the Office of Planning and Research to coordinate regional and local efforts with state climate adaptation strategies; and SB 379, which requires all cities and counties to include climate adaptation and resiliency strategies in the safety elements of their general plans upon the next revision beginning January 1, 2017.", "Climate change will soon be a required consideration for long range planning and capital projects. To respond to some of these challenges, Office of Sustainability and the Environment staff have contributed to the development of a new resource entitled \u201cA Greater LA: the Framework for Regional Climate Action and Sustainability.\u201d When completed this document will:", "\u00b7 Provide strategies to mitigate the emission of climate change-causing greenhouse gases", "\u00b7 Assess the impacts of climate change and outline adaptation measures to undertake, and", "\u00b7 Outline a path towards sustainable economic growth for communities throughout Greater L.A.", "The CAAP will incorporate information from this work and from the State adaptation planning efforts, and develop implementation measures for the City\u2019s various departments to embed adaptation planning. These measures may include:", "\u00b7 Ensuring new infrastructure is designed to withstand, adapt or be resilient to changing environmental conditions, such as intense & infrequent precipitation, increased temperatures, or increased wave action or coastal inundation", "\u00b7 Evaluating the resilience of existing facilities and retrofitting for lowered energy consumption and grid-independent operations, with technologies like batteries and fuel cells", "\u00b7 Considering co-benefits of programs, projects or infrastructure that serve to increase awareness, preparedness and resilience to changing environmental conditions", "\u00b7 Establishing a baseline of community resilience, using existing tools such as the Wellbeing Index, and implementing programs to improve on that baseline", "Sea Level Rise", "As noted above, the CAAP will assess the impacts of climate change and identify ways to mitigate, prepare, adapt and be resilient to the challenges posed by these impacts. Such impacts include: drought, increased temperatures, heat waves, changes in precipitation and air quality. One area where extensive analysis is currently being conducted is around sea level rise.", "On August 26, 2014, Council approved the acceptance of grant funds from the California Ocean Protection Council for data collection and analysis for sea level rise (SLR) planning and capacity building. The grant is funding the development of shoreline change models that will assess the coastal impacts of SLR and varying degrees of storms in the LA metropolitan coastal region.The high resolution, dynamic model will incorporate storms, SLR and shoreline change and provide the City of Santa Monica, and other coastal communities in the Greater Los Angeles Metropolitan Region, with detailed information toinform the development of climate preparedness and adaptation planning processes.", "Previously, the modeling activities have followed State guidance for SLR projections, which assumed a high scenario of approximately 6 ft (2 meters). However, scientists recently have found that the accelerated melting of the Greenland ice sheet and that of Antarctica, which is not well understood, has the potential to contribute an additional 6.5 feet of sea level rise by 2100.", "The State of California is in the process of updating its SLR guidance, which will include a higher range scenario. Interim guidance is expected in fall 2016, with final guidance expected in late 2018.", "While the interim State SLR scenarios have not yet been finalized, staff and the consultant team are anticipating the State to recommend abandoning the \u201clow\u201d sea level rise scenarios for 2030, 2050 and 2100. The State will also likely recommend that coastal communities include discussion of the impact of 138 inches (or 3.5 meters) of sea level rise by 2100 in their ongoing adaptation and local coastal planning projects. In anticipation of this change, the consultant team will provide a qualitative analysis of what this \u201cextreme high\u201d projection would mean for Santa Monica and the rest of the LA region.", "Table 4. Proposed Sea Level Rise Analysis Changes", "Year", "Low", "Medium", "High", "Extreme High", "2030", "2 inches", "6 inches", "12 inches", "16 inches \u00b1 4 inches", "2050", "5 inches", "11 inches", "24 inches", "36 inches \u00b1 10 inches", "2100", "17 inches", "37 inches", "66 inches", "138 inches*", "*This representative value of 138 inches (or 3.5 m) was selected from a range of possible values that may be recommended in future State of California guidance, and hence is subject to change.", "Preliminary findings under the existing \u201chigh\u201d scenario from the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) and the consultants have revealed less than significant impacts to the north and south beaches in Santa Monica. However, coastal storms, augmented by SLR and high tides, have the potential to flood the beach parking lots adjacent to the Santa Monica Pier and around Ocean Park Blvd, and overtake the beach bike path. Properties at grade could be impacted by flooding from coastal storms.", "A full analysis of the findings, which includes a vulnerability assessment, will be completed at the end of September 2016. The findings will inform the Local Coastal Program and the CAAP, which will be delivered to Council in 2017.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "While there is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions, leadership in local climate change policy has significant long-term financial implications. For that reason, staff recommends a financial impact analysis be prepared in conjunction with a new Climate Action & Adaptation Plan to be reviewed in the summer of 2017."]}], [{"Title": "Hold a Public Hearing on Report on Water Quality and Public Health Goals", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council hold a public hearing; receive public comments on the City of Santa Monica Report on Water Quality Relative to Public Health Goals; and accept the report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Provisions of the California Health and Safety Code section 116470 require public water systems serving more than 10,000 customers to prepare a report every three years that includes information on the detection of any elements the water at levels above Public Health Goals (PHG\u2019s) or the equivalent Maximum Contaminant Level Goals (MCLG\u2019s). PHGs are adopted by the State Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment and MCLGs are set by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA). A public hearing is required to accept and receive public comments on the report.", "Staff has prepared the attached report (Attachment A) to provide information on the quality of its drinking water supply relative to adopted Public Health Goals and Maximum Contaminant Level Goals.", "Background", "There is strong public interest and concern about the safety of drinking water nationally and here in California. Sophisticated testing can now trace infinitesimal traces of potentially hazardous elements in water sources. The California legislature has established the concept of a Public Health Goal (PHG). PHGs are established by the California Environmental Protection Agency (Cal/EPA) Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment (OEHHA). A PHG is a health risk assessment, not a proposed drinking water standard. It is the level of a contaminant in drinking water, which is considered not to pose a significant risk to health if consumed for a lifetime. This determination is made without regard to cost or treatability. The State Water Resource Control Board (SWRCB)/Division of Drinking Water (DDW), formerly the California Department of Public Health, uses PHGs in the evaluation of health-related drinking water standards, known as Maximum Contaminant Levels (MCLs). The Division of Drinking Water uses Public Health Goals to identify Maximum Contaminant Levels that are to be reviewed for possible revision or when setting new Maximum Contaminant Levels for unregulated chemicals.", "California State Water Code section 116470 requires that large water utilities (more than 10,000 service connections) prepare a special report every three years if their water quality measurements have exceeded any PHGs in the three previous calendar years. The current report covers years 2013, 2014, and 2015. The law also requires that where OEHHA has not adopted a PHG for a contaminant, the water suppliers are to use the Maximum Contaminant Level Goal (MCLG) adopted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency (USEPA). MCLGs are the federal equivalent to PHGs, but are not identical. Only contaminants which have a California primary drinking water standard and for which either a PHG or MCLG has been set are to be addressed in this report.", "Discussion", "In June 2016, the City of Santa Monica sent out its Annual Water Quality Report, which is available online at http://www.smgov.net/departments/publicworks/water.aspx. Along with information regarding important current water issues, the annual report includes information required by the Federal and State Governments to illustrate how the quality of the water at the consumer\u2019s tap compares against established water quality standards. These water quality standards are established by Federal and state regulations as Maximum Contaminant Levels (MCL\u2019s) and Notification Levels (NL\u2019s). MCLs are the highest level of a contaminant allowed in drinking water, and NLs are the concentrations of a contaminant which, if exceeded, trigger treatment or other requirements that public water systems must follow. Consistently, Santa Monica\u2019s water is shown to be in full compliance (below all regulated MCLs and NLs) with all Federal and State regulatory water quality standards. Furthermore, recent reports prepared by the City of Santa Monica address the City\u2019s ongoing efforts to maintain a safe and reliable water supply, including the 2015 Urban Water Management Plan (http://www.smgov.net/uploadedFiles/Departments/Public_Works/Water/2015_UWMP_Final_June_2016.pdf), and the February 2016 information item addressing Santa Monica\u2019s control of lead in drinking water (http://www.smgov.net/uploadedFiles/Departments/Public_Works/Water/Lead_in_Drinking_Water_20160222.pdf).", "The attached report (Attachment A) has been prepared pursuant to the requirements of the State Health and Safety Code. For the period from 2013 to 2015 in Santa Monica, Public Health Goals were exceeded for seven unique elements: Lead, Copper, Arsenic, Uranium, Radionuclides, Bromate, and Chromium VI. Further details about each of these element\u2019s characteristics, health risks, and treatment technologies are presented in the full Public Health Goals Report.  Although these elements exceed Public Health Goals, Santa Monica\u2019s drinking water meets all State and Federal drinking water standards. Substances in the City\u2019s water supply are below the applicable MCLs required by these regulatory agencies and no additional actions are recommended for the treatment of the City\u2019s potable water supply at this time.  As both treatment technology and health risk assessments evolve, standards for these elements may be altered in the future, but Santa Monica continues to meet or exceed the state of the art levels of water purity.", "Copies of the report are available for public review at the City Clerk\u2019s office, Water Resources Division offices, the Main Library, and online at http://www.smgov.net/departments/publicworks/water.aspx. A public notice advising of the availability of the report was published in the Santa Monica Daily Press on August 30, 2016 and September 6, 2016.", "Environmental Analysis", "The City of Santa Monica Report on Water Quality Relative to Public Health Goals is categorically exempt from the California Water Quality Act (CEQA) as a Class 8 exemption (Section 15308 of the CEQA Guidelines), actions by regulatory agencies for the protection of the environment.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Meeting all the new Public Health Goals for all elements is beyond the current limits of financial feasibility for Santa Monica water customers."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one Annual vacancy on the Landmarks Commission for a Term Ending June 30, 2020", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown that the Council Adopt a Resolution Expressing the Council's Support for Efforts within the City and throughout the County to Raise Awareness of Human Trafficking and to Combat this Crime through all Available Means", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown that Council Direct Staff to Explore and Return with Recommendations for a Two-year Pilot Program Offering Extremely Reduced-Cost Big Blue Bus Passes for SMMUSD Students, as Part of our Ongoing GoSaMo Program, in Pursuit of the Council\u2019s Adopted Top-five Priority of Mobility, and with Hopes of Increasing Safety and Reducing Individual Private Vehicular Traffic near Schools", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1535070600": [[{"Title": "Purchase of One Compressed Natural Gas Hydrostatic Drive High Pressure Sewer Jetter and Vacuum Vehicle", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Hydrostatic Drive High Pressure Sewer Jetter and Vacuum Vehicle, pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b), \u201cException to Competitive Bidding\u201d, of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, in an amount not to exceed $457,297.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City Water Resources Division uses a special vehicle to clean and vacuum the sewer system in order to maintain water quality and distribution. This purchase would replace one Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Hydrostatic Drive High Pressure Sewer Jetter and Vacuum Vehicle in the Water Resource Division, used for cleaning and vacuuming of the sewer system and pumping and cleaning key urban runoff water treatment devices, that has reached the end of its useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. Staff recommends purchasing this vehicle from Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. based on the validity of the competitive contract pricing that the National Joint Powers Alliance (NJPA) awarded to Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $457,297.", "Background", "In January 2015, three bids were received for the purchase of a Hydrostatic Drive High Pressure Sewer Jetter Vacuum Vehicle for the Water Resources Division. In May 2015, per Attachment A, Council approved the recommendation from staff to reject all bids as non-responsive and rebid due to the fact that none of the vendors met the bid specifications. All three bidders took exceptions to the vehicle as it was specified, which resulted in a lower usable debris storage tank capacity and a less powerful positive displacement (air) blower.", "The National Joint Powers Alliance (NJPA) is a Minnesota-based municipal government contracting agency. It works with government agencies to develop specifications, and conducts competitive bids. As a member, the City is able to participate in NJPA contracts.CNG Hydrostatic Drive High Pressure Sewer Jetter Vacuum Vehicle Contract #022014-AMI awarded to Vac-Con, Inc., for which MME is the dealer for our region.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The existing vehicle has a cost-effective useful life span of 10 years, was purchased in 2002, and is 14 years old. The vehicle would be used to perform routine cleaning of the sanitary sewer system, including the jetting and clearing of blockages in the sewer system, responding to sanitary sewer overflows, and to vacuum and capture raw sewage that may make its way to surface streets, the storm drain system, and the Santa Monica Bay. This vehicle would also be used on a daily basis (five times per week plus stand-by) to pump and clean key urban runoff water treatment devices connected to the storm drain system throughout the City that remove and capture trash, thus preventing pollution from entering the Bay. This is a critical vehicle which is utilized in emergency response situations that require cleaning and vacuuming water and debris in the public-right-of-way during rain events that may cause flooding. This vehicle also provides emergency support for the Fire Department, for excavation in case of flooding, and in case of cave-in and/or earthquake, when required.", "Example of CNG Sewer Jetter Vacuum Vehicle", "Vendor Selection", "Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, Exception to Competitive Bidding, allows the City to utilize a competitive bidding process that has already been completed by Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, to purchase the same supplies or equipment that the other entity has already purchased under an existing bid. Staff recommends utilizing this process in this case in order to obtain the most competitive pricing, expedite the vehicle purchase, and ensure that vehicle specifications match those that have already been specifically developed for, and utilized by, wastewater management agencies.", "The National Joint Powers Alliance (NJPA) is a Minnesota-based municipal national contracting agency. As a National Joint Power, their laws enable members (like the City of Santa Monica) to legally purchase through their awarded contracts. NJPA is also one of nine Minnesota Service cooperatives. They offer purchasing solutions that are leveraged nationally so that members such as the City can benefit from a one off purchase, like the Vactor Sewer Jetter truck. Many local government agencies take advantage of the pricing offered under NJPA for these reasons. Using NJPA\u2019s bid allows the City to obtain the most competitive price as a result of discounts afforded by vendors that have established contract pricing while expediting the purchase.", "Staff determined that the CNG Hydrostatic Drive High Pressure Sewer Jetter Vacuum Vehicle is available through the NJPA Vehicle Contract; contract number 022014-AMI, awarded to Vac-Con, Inc. on April 1, 2014, for which Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. (MME) is the dealer for the  region. The contract is valid through March 18, 2018. Fleet Management obtained copies of the original bidding documentation for the NJPA award and reviewed them with the Finance Department. The documentation was compared to purchasing documentation for an equivalent vehicle bid by staff in January 2015 to confirm that pricing was below market pricing. The validity of the competitive contract pricing that NJPA awarded to MME was verified.", "In addition to verifying contract pricing per NJPA award, staff also compared NJPA pricing to the original bids received in January 2015. The lowest bidder from the original bids received in January 2015 did not meet specifications for three reasons, 1) they provided a smaller fuel tank capacity than specified at 60 DGE instead of 75 DGE, 2) they provided a smaller debris tank, and 3) they provided a less powerful positive displacement (air) blower than specified. The second lowest bidder was Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. at $492,213 (Attachment B) including the exception which resulted in a lower usable debris storage tank capacity and a less powerful positive displacement (air) blower. The pricing provided in the NJPA contract for this purchase with no exceptions is $34,916 less than the bid submitted in January 2015 for the same vehicle with the exceptions listed above. This substantiates the validity that NJPA\u2019s pricing is highly competitive.", "In addition, staff obtained comparative pricing from the only other vendor selected by NJPA, Vactor Manufacturing, for which Haaker Equipment Company is the dealer for the region. Although its pricing is lower, $439,068, staff recommends MME as the best bidder for the following reasons:", "1) MME provides an auxiliary CNG engine. The auxiliary engine improves performance by operating the equipment separately from the chassis engine when staff are performing both jetting and vacuuming duties. The cost of this engine is approximately $20,000 and is included in MME\u2019s bid pricing.", "2) MME provides a larger debris tank by 200 gallons", "3) MME provides a more powerful PD blower.", "4) MME provides a hydraulic hose reel outrigger, which stabilizes the hose reel and allows for the ability to clean offset manholes in the public right of way.", "5) MME provides a quicker delivery time.", "6) MME provides a boom that rotates 270 degrees.", "7) The unit that would be replaced by this purchase is equivalent to the unit that was specified and would be purchased from MME. All accessories would be interchangeable with the new unit which would save $8,000 to $10,000 in up-fitting costs.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $457,297. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "Affordable Housing Production Program Fee Resolutions", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt a Resolution increasing the Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee for new market-rate apartments and condominiums by 3.6 percent; and,2.  Adopt a Resolution increasing the Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost by 3.6 percent.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The proposed adjustments to the Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee and Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost reflect changes in land and construction costs. OnJune 13, 2006 (Attachment C), the City Council approved the methodology for ascertaining changes in the costs and thereby calculating the adjustment. The attached resolutions have been prepared in accordance with the approved methodology. TheAffordable Housing Unit Base Fee and the Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost would be 3.6 percent higher than the existing amounts and would become effective November 1, 2016, if approved.", "Background", "The Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP), Chapter 9.64 of the City\u2019s Municipal Code, implements Proposition R, which establishes that not less than 30 percent of all newly constructed multi-family housing in Santa Monica must be affordable to low- and moderate-income households for at least 55 years. The AHPP was adopted by the City Council on July 21, 1998 (Attachment D) and has been periodically amended, as necessary. The AHPP requires developers of new market-rate, multi-family housing to contribute to affordable housing goals by designating a portion of a development\u2019s total residences as affordable housing, constructing affordable housing off site, designating land for affordable housing development, or paying the Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee (fee).  Fees are used to preserve and produce affordable housing through housing trust fund loans to nonprofit affordable housing organizations. The annual amount of fees received in the last five years has ranged from $451,000 to $1,248,000.", "The fee is updated annually based on changes in land and construction costs. When a developer chooses to designate a portion of a project\u2019s total residences as affordable housing, the number of affordable residences that must be provided is based on the number of market-rate units in the development. Often, the calculation of required affordable residences results in a fraction. In that instance, when the fraction is 0.75 or more, the number is rounded-up to a whole number. However, any fraction less than 0.75 can be satisfied by payment of a fee. The amount of the fee is based on the Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost, which is also adjusted annually based on changes in land and construction costs. For example, if a developer is required to provide 4.7 units of affordable housing within a development, the developer would be required to designate four affordable units and pay 0.7 times the Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost to satisfy the requirement associated with the fraction.", "Discussion", "Annual Fee Adjustments", "Section 9.64.070 of the City\u2019s AHPP provides that the Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee and the Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost shall be adjusted annually by Council resolution based on changes in construction and land costs. The fee adjustment methodology is detailed in Section 2 of the AHPP Administrative Guidelines (Attachment E) and reflects the methodology approved by Council in 2006. The fees are adjusted based on two factors: 1) changes in construction costs as measured by the Engineering News Records Construction Cost Index, and 2) changes in land costs measured by using the proxy of change in median condominium sales prices. The previous annual adjustment, adopted by Council on August 25, 2015 (Attachment F), increased the fees by 4.9 percent ($1.46 per square foot for apartments and $1.71 per square foot for condominiums).", "The table below summarizes this year\u2019s proposed adjustment to the fees, which would be increased by 3.6 percent based on this year\u2019s changes in land and construction costs.", "Fee Description", "2015 Amount", "2016 Amount", "% Change", "Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee - Apartments (per square foot)", "$31.25", "$32.38", "+3.6%", "Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee - Condominiums (per square foot)", "$36.51", "$37.82", "+3.6%", "Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost", "$327,927", "$339,732", "+3.6%", "The proposed Resolutions, Attachments A and B, would adjust the fees accordingly, effective November 1, 2016. Details of the calculations prepared by HR&A Advisors, Inc. (\u201cHR&A\u201d) for the Affordable Housing Unit Base Fee and the Affordable Housing Unit Development Cost are provided in Attachments G and Attachment H. The revenue implications are minimal and depend on development activity in any given year.", "On August 12, 2016, the City published notice in the Santa Monica Daily Press of Council consideration and the availability of the HR&A analyses. The City republished the notice on August 18, 2016. Copies of the analyses have been available in the City Clerk's Office for public review since August 12, 2016.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The proposed rate change in the Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP) fee would increase annual revenues by an estimated $40,000 to $50,000 depending on development activity levels. Revenues will be deposited at account 04264.404400 and budget is included in the FY 2016-17 adopted budget."]}, {"Title": "North Beach Trail Improvement Award of Design Agreement", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #SP2448 to KPFF Consulting Engineers, Inc., a California-based company, for design services for the North Beach Trail Improvement Project; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with KPFF Consulting Engineers, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $853,122 (including a 10% contingency).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The North Beach Trail Improvement Project would mitigate conflicts between fast moving cyclists and slower pedestrians and non-bicyclists, resulting in increased safety, capacity and enjoyment of the Santa Monica Beach Trail from Bay Street to Ocean Front Walk to the Santa Monica Pier and then to the northern city limit. Staff recommends KPFF Consulting Engineers, Inc. to provide design services in an amount not to exceed $853,122 (including a 10% contingency). Staff will return to Council to present the design and for approval to award a construction contract.", "Background", "The beach bike path in Santa Monica is a section of the Marvin K. Braude Beach Trail and the greater Pacific Coast Bicycle Route running along the Pacific coast from Canada to Mexico. In Santa Monica, the generally 14-foot-wide Beach Trail runs along Santa Monica State Beach from the city\u2019s northern periphery at Pacific Palisades to the southern boundary at Venice. At its midpoint, the Beach Trail runs under the Santa Monica Pier (Pier) and along the busy beachside edge of the 1550 Pacific Coast Highway (PCH) parking lot located north of the Pier.", "Popular among recreational bicyclists, traffic on the Beach Trail is heavy and users frequently experience congestion leading to conflict between fast moving cyclists and slower pedestrians and non-bicyclists. South of the Pier, areas of conflict have been mitigated, safety significantly enhanced and user enjoyment improved by innovative projects, such as the Beach Improvement Group (BIG) Project, completed in 1999, which widened the bike path between the Pier and Bay Street from 14 to 20 feet and reconfigured and renovated Ocean Front Walk. An earlier project in the 1980s constructed a clearly defined pedestrian path separated from the bike path between Bay Street and Venice. Public art components are fully integrated into the design of these projects and become useful amenities for users, further enhancing enjoyment of the Beach Trail in the south beach area. Upgraded signage, markings and striping were added to the entire Beach Trail in 2012.", "Adjacent to and north of the Pier, amenities are deficient and areas are prone to congestion and potential for conflicts between pedestrians and cyclists. There are inadequate crossing points for visitors parking in the 1550 lot to cross the single bike path as they head to and from the beach and the Pier.", "Nearby, pedestrian-only Ocean Front Walk offers few useful improvements for walkway users, is lacking adequate visual buffers from adjacent construction and is frequented by cyclists and other fast moving modes of transportation. Further north from the termination point of Ocean Front Walk at California Avenue and to the northern City limit, walkers, joggers and other non-bicycle users share the single path.", "Recently completed and future recreation opportunities in the north beach vicinity are", "expected to attract both new and existing users.", "Discussion", "The objective of the North Beach Trail Improvement Project is to increase safety, capacity and enjoyment of the Santa Monica Beach Trail and Ocean Front Walk from just south of the Pier to the City\u2019s northern boundary, utilizing aesthetic and innovative means suitable to the coastal environment and sensitive to neighboring conditions and existing views. The Project would include approximately 1.75 miles of trail widening and the addition of a clearly defined separation between pedestrians and cyclists to reduce conflicts on the single shared path from California Avenue to the northern city limits and between Bay Street and the Pier. The Project would also address cyclist and non-cyclist circulation conflicts and congestion adjacent to the Pier and at the 1550 Pier parking lot area by directing pedestrians to clearly defined crossing areas. At pedestrian-only Ocean Front Walk, improvements would add user-friendly amenities including seat walls, upgraded paving and LED lighting to provide appropriate and energy efficient illumination levels. Construction is anticipated to begin in FY 2018-19.", "Consultant Selection", "On May 3, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) #SP2448 for urban design services, including landscape architecture, transportation planning, and engineering design for the North Beach Trail Improvement Project. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 86 vendors downloaded the RFP. On June 6, 2016, 7 firms responded:", "AHBE Landscape Architects", "Gwynne Pugh Urban Studio", "Hirsch & Associates, Inc.", "KPFF Consulting Engineers", "Mia Lehrer + Associates", "Pacific Coast Land Design, Inc.", "Stantec Consulting services, Inc.", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Community and Cultural Services, Planning and Community Development, and Public Works. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: composition and experience of the project team, references, work plans, and proposed fees. To assess project team qualifications, three firms were short-listed and interviewed. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends KPFF Consulting Engineers, Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide design services for the North Beach Trail Improvement Project based on the firm\u2019s competitive cost and assembled team, clear understanding of the project, track record of projects of similar size and scope for the Cities of Santa Monica, Los Angeles, San Diego, Huntington Beach, Newport Beach, San Clemente, and Malibu, previous experience with community outreach and government agencies, fee schedule, hourly rates and references.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to KPFF Consulting Engineers, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $853,122. Funds of $666,429 are available in the FY2016-17 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget in account C119072.589000. Award of contract requires additional FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget appropriation of $186,693 to account C119072.589000. This appropriation will be offset by a reduction of $186,693 in the FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program budget plan to account C119072.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "Construction funding in the amount of $6,862,803 is included in the CIP budget plan for FY 2018-19 based on a preliminary cost estimate. The construction cost estimate will be finalized during the design phase and the budget will be put forward for Council approval as part of the FY 2018-20 Biennial CIP budget."]}, {"Title": "Cancellation of Regular City Council Meeting Scheduled for October 11, 2016", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council vote to cancel the regular meeting scheduled for October 11, 2016, due to a lack of quorum."}, {"Title": "Memorandum of Understanding with the Los Angeles County Flood Control District for Operation and Maintenance of Trash Excluders", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the Los Angeles County Flood Control District (LACFCD) for operation and maintenance of trash excluders installed on or within LACFCD owned catch basins.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In order to reduce debris discharged into the Santa Monica Bay and to meet the marine debris total maximum daily load (TMDL) requirements as set forth by the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board (RWQCB), the City plans to install screens (trash excluders) on drains owned by the City. The City is also responsible for trash excluder installation on catch basins within City limits that are owned by the Los Angeles County Flood Control District (LACFCD) in order to prevent debris and pollution originating in the City from entering into the storm drain system and being discharged into the Santa Monica Bay.  Maintenance of the trash excluders on LACFCD catch basins is also required, and staff recommends completing maintenance in-house as the most cost effective option to ensure full compliance with water quality standards. Staff recommends that Council authorize staff to negotiate and enter into a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the LACFCD to outline operation and maintenance responsibilities for the trash excluders installed on LACFCD catch basins within City boundaries.", "Background", "Storm water runoff in urban areas, especially from street and surrounding hardscape surfaces, ultimately enters catch basins and is considered a significant source of pollution because of trash and other debris it transports to the storm drain outfalls at the Santa Monica Bay. On November 4, 2010, the Regional Board adopted Resolution No. R10-010, amending the Water Quality Control Plan for the Los Angeles Region by establishing a Total Maximum Daily Load for debris (Trash TMDL) in near shore and offshore Santa Monica Bay. This water quality standard requires 100% reduction of trash discharge into Santa Monica Bay by 2020.", "The City\u2019s compliance strategy for this water quality standard includes the installation of trash excluder devices such as connector pipe screens (CPS) and/or automatic retractable screens (ARS) at catch basins in specific areas of the City (pictured in Attachments B and C). A CPS is installed inside the catch basin at the outlet pipe, allowing debris to enter the catch basin, but preventing it from escaping into the outlet pipe and discharging into the Santa Monica Bay. An ARS is a screen that is installed at the curb face inlet and precludes debris from entering the catch basin structure. The debris would subsequently be swept up by existing street cleaning operations. These trash excluder devices are certified as full capture devices by the RWQCB and are being installed as part of the Storm Drain Catch Basin Connector Pipe Screens Project.", "Discussion", "As part of the Storm Drain Catch Basin Connector Pipe Screens Project and in an effort to meet the 2018 deadline to achieve the Trash TMDL\u2019s 60% trash reduction requirement, the City is installing CPS and ARS units at 745 catch basins in the Kenter Canyon, Pico-4th and Pico-Caltrans sub-watersheds. These 745 catch basins currently do not have trash excluder devices installed.  The LAFCD owns 314 of these 745 catch basins. The City is responsible for trash excluder installation on these LACFCD facilities in order to prevent debris and pollution originating in the City from entering into the storm drain system and being discharged into the Santa Monica Bay.  After the project is complete, the City will be responsible for maintaining all 745 catch basins, including the 314 owned by LACFCD.", "LACFCD Permitting", "In any instance where LACFCD facilities are modified by an agency other than Los Angeles County, including catch basins, a flood permit is required. Part of the flood permit requirement is execution of a MOU between the LACFCD and the City regarding operation and maintenance of the trash excluders installed on LACFCD catch basins. Maintenance is required to be completed on a regular basis in strict accordance with regulations.", "Staff compared in-house maintenance costs to County maintenance costs, recommends conducting maintenance on the LACFCD catch basins in-house as the most cost effective option to ensure full compliance with water quality standards. The cost for overall maintenance of LACFCD catch basins by City forces would be approximately $140 per catch basin per year, or $44,000 total per year. This consists of city staff time, debris disposal and inspection time by County staff. County costs for the same service would be $375 per catch basin per year, or $118,000 per year. The first cleaning would occur between October 2017 and April 2018 and would be funded out of the Clean Beaches and Ocean Park Tax Fund.", "LACFCD would pay the City of Santa Monica about $16-17 per catch basin as reimbursement for the pre-retrofit catch basin maintenance costs. This amount represents the annual amount the LACFCD would otherwise have had to incur for removing trash and debris from the catch basins had the City not installed trash excluders in their catch basins.", "Next Steps", "Once an MOU is executed and a permit is obtained by LACFCD, the contractor would mobilize and install trash excluders on City and LACFCD owned catch basins. The project is scheduled to run through December 2016.", "Maintenance responsibility is anticipated to begin in January 2017. Along with routine City services such as trash pickup and street sweeping near or around these facilities, additional tasks would include repairing, maintaining, operating and inspecting trash excluder devices installed on or within LACFCD catch basins. LACFCD catch basins would be cleaned a minimum of once per year.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Maintenance of the LACFCD catch basins is anticipated to begin in FY 2017-18 and is estimated to cost $44,000 per year, to be funded from the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Fund. Approximately $5,500 per year will be reimbursed by the LACFCD. Budget authority for maintenance costs will be requested during the FY 2017-19 biennial budget process."]}, {"Title": "Fourth Modification to Agreement 9370 (CCS) with West Coast Arborists, Inc. for Comprehensive Urban Forest Maintenance Program Services", "Department": "Public Works, Public Landscape", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement #9370 (CCS) with West Coast Arborists, Inc., a California-based company, for comprehensive urban forest maintenance program services in the amount of $1,999,988 for FY2016-17, with four additional one-year renewal options in the cumulative amount of $8,479,109. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $18,466,023 over a 10-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica currently contracts with West Coast Arborists, Inc. to perform comprehensive urban forest maintenance program services, which includes tree inventory and database management, trimming, planting, watering, and removal. In July 2016, a third modification to extend the term of the agreement by one year through June 30, 2017 was approved by the City Manager, but the dollar amount of the contract remained unchanged. To ensure uninterrupted urban forest maintenance services in FY2016-17 and beyond, a fourth modification is necessary to increase the contract amount to a not to exceed amount of $1,999,988 in FY 2016-17, with four additional one-year renewal options in the cumulative amount of $8,479,109, for a total of $10,479,097 over the five-year period. If staff chooses to exercise each of the one-year options, this would result in a ten-year amended agreement with a not to exceed amount of $18,466,023 including prior year contracted amounts since 2011. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "Background", "The City\u2019s urban forest has over 33,000 public trees which span across 250 species, with the Mexican Fan Palm (Washingtonia robusta) and the Indian Laurel Fig (Ficus microcarpa nitida) as the two most common species (together approximately 20% of the public tree population). The perpetuation and enhancement of the City\u2019s urban forest is guided by the Urban Forest Master Plan.", "On May 10, 2011 (Attachment A), following issuance of a Request for Proposals (RFP), the City Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year contract with five additional one-year renewal options with West Coast Arborists, Inc. in the amount of $6,286,926 for five years for comprehensive urban forest maintenance program services.", "On August 23, 2011 (Attachment B), the City Council authorized the first modification to amend agreement 9370 (CCS) with West Coast Arborists, Inc. and increase the contract by $1.7M to include Capital Improvement Program funding for urban forest renewal. The modification increased the contract total to $7,986,926 over five years.", "On December 30, 2013, staff executed a second modification to only the scope of work of the agreement to enhance the accountability of West Coast Arborists, Inc., thus Council authority was not required.", "On January 13, 2015 (Attachment C), Council approved staff\u2019s recommendation to continue contracting out this service due to the workforce flexibility, specialized/technical expertise, space requirements, capital/equipment requirements and risk. Criteria are found in the Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-needed Staff for Non-professional Services, which is included with the aforementioned staff report that allows staff to exercise the renewal options.", "In July 2016, the City Manager approved a third modification to exercise a one year term renewal for agreement 9370 (CCS) for time with West Coast Arborists, Inc., to extend the term of the contract by one year through June 30, 2017. The dollar amount of the contract was unchanged.", "Discussion", "The aforementioned Urban Forest Master Plan is supported by and reinforces City policies outlined in the elements of Santa Monica\u2019s General Plan and other planning documents. For example, the City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) addresses the need to protect and systematically expand the forest through tree planting along streets and in parks and other public spaces. The Open Space Element and Parks and Recreation Master Plan also contain policies that support the long-term health and expansion of the urban forest. The work that West Coast Arborists, Inc. performs includes removing dead trees and those that pose a public safety risk and planting replacement trees, as well as planting new trees in new locations. Work also includes scheduled care of newly planted trees, and tree pruning and watering, which improve the longevity and growth of the urban forest.", "Contractor Selection", "In response to a notice of Request for Proposals (RFP) for a comprehensive urban forest maintenance program issued by the City on February 14th, 2011, one bid from West Coast Arborists, Inc. was received and publicly opened and read on March 14, 2011. Two \u201cno bid\u201d forms were received from other prospective bidders due to the inability to meet certain requirements and insufficient resources. Staff evaluated the bid submitted by West Coast Arborists, Inc. and determined that it met the requirements of the City and a five-year agreement with five one-year renewal options was then approved by Council.", "Since the contract scope was revised in 2013 to enhance West Coast Arborists\u2019 accountability, it has performed satisfactory field and administrative work and answered staff inquiries in a timely manner. Council approved contracted staff for this service as part of the January 13, 2015 (Attachment C) Contract and As-Needed and Staffing Review. The service has not changed substantially since that analysis. As FY2015-16, the last year of the five-year agreement came to a close, staff extended the agreement for one additional year and requests that Council approve a fourth modification to enable West Coast Arborists, Inc. to continue providing the aforementioned essential urban forest maintenance services. However, staff plans to conduct a Request for Information (RFI) during this fiscal year to learn more about urban forest maintenance companies and the services they provide to gain a better understanding of the industry and help inform decision-making regarding future renewal options. The City may or may not choose to exercise each of the one-year renewal options and the current agreement includes a 30-day termination clause providing the City with flexibility to respond to market changes.", "The table below depicts the approved FY2016-17 tree maintenance and FY2016-18 CIP budgets and the current CIP budget plan through FY2020-21. The budget for the remaining renewal options includes an estimated 3% CPI increase for tree maintenance and contingency.", "Fiscal Year", "Tree Maintenance", "Contingency", "CIP Urban Forest Renewal", "Total", "FY2016-17", "$1,239,990", "$309,998", "$450,000", "$1,999,988", "FY2017-18", "$1,277,190", "$319,298", "$450,000", "$2,046,488", "FY2018-19", "$1,315,505", "$328,877", "$450,000", "$2,094,382", "FY2019-20", "$1,354,971", "$338,743", "$450,000", "$2,143,714", "FY2020-21", "$1,395,620", "$348,905", "$450,000", "$2,194,525", "Total", "$6,583,276", "$1,645,821", "$2,250,000", "$10,479,097", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to West Coast Arborists, Inc. is $10,479,097, for an amended cumulative agreement total not to exceed $18,466,023. Funds of $1,999,988 are available in the FY2016-17 budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number  Amount", "014983.555010  $1,239,990", "014983.555010  $309,998 (contingency if needed)", "C010955.589000  $450,000", "TOTAL   $1,999,988", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Adoption of Side Letter to the Memorandum of Understanding for Public Attorney's Union", "Department": "Human Resources Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the side letter agreement, amending the Public Attorneys Union (PAU) Memorandum of Understanding (MOU).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Public Attorney\u2019s Union (PAU) and the City have met and conferred over changes regarding eligibility criteria for performance bonuses as outlined in the MOU. Adoption and approval of the side letter agreement are being made to remedy retirement calculation issues that have arisen since the extension of the MOU. Recommendations presented in this report do not require additional appropriations at this time.", "Background", "On June 14, 2016, the City Council adopted and approved an extension of the PAU MOU for FY 2016-2017. Since the adoption of the extended MOU, bargaining unit members have encountered issues with the way in which certain compensation has been considered for retirement purposes. PAU bargaining unit members are eligible for a performance bonus in conjunction with specific criteria regarding exemplary job performance. The performance bonus has been a longstanding operational tool that the City Attorney can exercise at her discretion to reward outstanding performers. The existing language in the MOU states that only those in the classification of Deputy City Attorney III, and have reached the maximum base salary for at least one year, are eligible for the performance bonus. Additionally, those employees must also have exemplary performance documented in their performance evaluations. The City Attorney also considers the quality, volume, difficulty and uniqueness of the employee\u2019s work; hours worked; when considering giving performance bonuses, which range from 1 to 5% of base salary. It should be noted that the performance bonuses were decreased from 10% to 5% during the FY 2012-2015 MOU and that change is reflected in the side letter agreement as well.", "Discussion", "During the preceding months, questions from CalPERS have arisen regarding the performance bonuses. Specifically, the requirement of Deputy City Attorney III\u2019s to be at Step 5 to qualify for a performance bonus. This requirement created issues with retirement compensation reporting, although these annual bonuses have been in existence for many years without question from CalPERS. The City and the PAU met and conferred over the subject and agreed to allow members within the classification of Deputy City Attorney III to be eligible for the performance bonuses without the requirement of having to reach the maximum base salary (Step 5), effective July 1, 2016. This change potentially impacts four individuals, who will now qualify for a performance bonus. Because there are several Deputy City Attorneys at Step 5 who have recently retired, adding these additional individuals will not require any budget adjustments at this time. In revising the language to reflect this change, the City hopes to bring resolution to any administrative retirement issues on a prospective basis.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future."]}], [{"Title": "Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District Renewal", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Accept petitions submitted by hotels within Santa Monica to renew the Tourism Marketing District; 2) Certify that there are sufficient petitions from more than 50 percent of the lodging businesses to be assessed; and 3) Adopt a Resolution of Intention to extend the term of the Tourism Marketing District.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Tourism is a mainstay sector of the Santa Monica economy and the Transient Occupancy Tax (TOT) has long been a significant General Fund revenue stream that supports basic City services and functions. In FY 2015-16, the TOT generated approximately $51 million of revenue to the City. Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT), formerly known as the Santa Monica Convention and Visitors Bureau, has promoted travel and tourism to Santa Monica since 1982 in support of the City\u2019s goals. Significant funding for SMTT\u2019s marketing efforts is provided through assessments generated from the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) which was established in 2012 and ends in 2017.  SMTT seeks renewal of the Tourism Marketing District as recommended in the SMTMD Management District Plan (Attachment A) in order to continue to fund enhanced marketing and sales promotion efforts that provide benefits to the Santa Monica hospitality sector and the City. The proposed renewal term would continue the SMTMD for an additional nine and one-half years.", "Background", "The goal of the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) is to continue to develop Santa Monica as a brand, promote the City as a tourism destination, and increase overnight lodging stays in Santa Monica through marketing and tourism promotion efforts. In 2012, Council approved the establishment of the SMTMD to support Santa Monica Travel and Tourism\u2019s (SMTT) mission to increase visitor expenditures, tourism revenues, and local employment opportunities. The current SMTMD has a five-year term, that began on January 1, 2013 and ends on December31, 2017.", "In order to begin the process of renewing the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District, Santa Monica hotel owners who represent more than 50 percent of the proposed assessments must submit a written petition in support of the renewal to the City along with the Management District Plan. SMTT issued petitions to begin the process and has submitted favorable petitions representing 70 percent of the assessments to be levied within the proposed district (Attachment B).", "To facilitate the extension of the SMTMD, Council must adopt the attached Resolution of Intention (Attachment C). If the Council approves a Resolution of Intention, a Notice of Public Hearing would be posted for 45 days and mailed to all Santa Monica lodging-business owners that would be subject to the special assessment. The affected business owners would have an opportunity in the 45-day period prior to the final hearing to protest the renewal of the district. The protest must be in writing, and presented to the City Clerk on or before the public hearing date.", "A public meeting would be held on October 25, 2016, and a final hearing on November1, 2016. If there is a majority written protest, the SMTMD would not be renewed. If there is no majority written protest, the Council may adopt a resolution renewing the SMTMD at the public hearing.", "Discussion", "Since its inception, SMTMD funds have been invested to enhance business development programs to broaden international target markets of the United Kingdom, Australia, Brazil, France, Germany and domestic markets in California and nationally in North America. The additional investment in public relations media has also expanded international awareness and recognition of Santa Monica as a tourism destination. Over the last ten years, transient occupancy taxes (TOT) collected by the City have increased at a compound average annual growth rate of 7.8 percent (Attachment D). The strong growth rate of TOT revenue can be correlated with the success of SMTT\u2019s tourism marketing efforts and the associated funding provided by the SMTMD.", "SMTT proposes to renew the SMTMD for a nine and one-half year term to continue enhanced international marketing efforts. The proposed term for the SMTMD is designed to align SMTMD\u2019s calendar-year operating period with the fiscal-year operating period of SMTT. The main components of the recommended SMTMD extension, as outlined in the SMTMD Management District Plan (Attachment A), are summarized as follows:", "Location:  The proposed SMTMD renewal includes all lodging businesses located within the boundaries of the City of Santa Monica with an average daily room rate of $100 and above. Lodging businesses with an average rate less than $100 would not be included in the district or assessed. To date, the boundary includes 32 qualifying lodging businesses (Attachment E).", "Services:  Marketing and sales promotions efforts aim to increase tourism and to market Santa Monica lodging businesses as tourist, meeting, and event destinations.", "Budget:  The SMTMD annual operating budget is estimated to average approximately $4,450,000 annually during its nine and one-half year operation. SMTMD assessment funds are intended to supplement, not supplant existing funding for tourism marketing.", "Cost:  The assessment is a fixed rate, per occupied room, per night. Based on the benefit received, assessments would not be collected on stays of more than 30 consecutive days, nor on stays which are pursuant to contracts or written agreements which were executed prior to January1,2013, regardless of the date of the stay. The amount charged per occupied room, per night, is based on the businesses\u2019 average daily rate from the previous year. Lodging businesses with an average daily rate less than $100 would not be included in the district or assessed. The proposed SMTMD assessment rates are:", "Average Daily Rate", "Assessment Per Room Night", "$100 to $200", "$3.25", "$200 to $300", "$4.25", "Over $300", "$5.25", "The assessment rates may be subject to an annual increase of no more than $0.25 per category per year.", "The amount of the assessment, if directly passed on to hotel guests, would be disclosed in advance and separately stated from the amount of lodging fee charged and any other applicable taxes, and each guest would receive a receipt for payment from the business. The assessment would be described as the \u201cTourism Marketing District Assessment\u201d or \u201cSMTMD Assessment\u201d on the guest\u2019s documentation.", "Renewal:  SMTMD renewal requires submittal of petitions from lodging businesses representing more than 50 percent of the total annual assessment followed by a Council hearing and an opportunity for a written protest. Theassessed lodging-business owners would receive notice of the public hearing by mail. If there is a majority written protest, the SMTMD could not be renewed.", "Duration:  The proposed extension of the SMTMD would have a nine-and-one-half-year term beginning January 1, 2018 and ending June 30, 2027. Once per year beginning on the anniversary date of the renewal of the district, there would be a 30-day period in which business owners paying more than 50 percent of the assessment may protest and request disestablishment of the district.", "Collection: The City would continue to be responsible for collecting the assessment on a monthly basis (including any delinquencies, penalties, and interest) from each lodging business located in the boundaries of the SMTMD. TheCity would forward the assessments on a monthly basis (less an administrative fee charged once per year) to the SMTT.", "Governance: The SMTT would continue to serve as the Owners\u2019 Association for the SMTMD with a standing advisory committee, known as the \u201cSMTMD hotel committee,\u201d which would be responsible for making recommendations to the SMTT Board regarding SMTMD funds and programs. The SMTMD hotel committee would have between four and nine members, of which at least four would be representatives of assessed lodging businesses. The SMTMD hotel committee would continue to be responsible for making recommendations to the SMTT board regarding SMTMD funds and programs.", "SMTT would continue to prepare and present an annual report to the Council pursuant to Streets and Highways Code section 36650. The annual report would include a summary of any proposed changes in the boundaries of the improvement district or in any benefit zones or classification of businesses within the district; a description of the improvements and activities to be provided for that year; and an estimate of the cost of providing the improvements and activities for that year.", "Commission Action", "The FY 2018-2027 SMTMD Management District Plan was presented to the SMTT Board of Directors at its May 11, 2016 meeting and approved on July 19, 2016.", "Next Steps", "If Council adopts the Resolution of Intention, a public meeting would be scheduled for October 25, 2016, and a final hearing and Resolution of Formation would be scheduled for November 1, 2016. If the SMTMD term is extended, collection of assessments would begin January 1, 2018.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Resolution Regarding Local Control and Closure of the Santa Monica Airport; Policy  for Eliminating Private Provision of Aeronautical Services and Establishing Exclusive Public Proprietary Fixed Based Operations With City Provision of Aeronautical Services Required By Law; Consideration of Other Lawful Means of Curtailing Adverse Airport Impacts, Including, Among Others: Applying to the FAA for  Runway Alterations; Enforcing Local, State & Federal Laws Relating to Airport Operations; Transitioning From Leases to a Permit System for Certain Airport Uses; Eliminating Lead Fuel; and Enhancing Airport Security", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt a Resolution declaring that it shall be the policy of the City to close the Santa Monica airport to aviation uses, as soon as legally permitted, with the goal of on or before July 1, 2018, and directing the City Manager to implement all necessary administrative measures accordingly; andAdopt a Policy for Establishing Exclusive Public Proprietary Fixed Based Operations (FBO) Services with City Proprietor Services and directing the City Manager to implement all steps necessary or advisable to implement that policy.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The passage of Measure Local Control (Measure LC) in November 2014 and the subsequent expiration of the City\u2019s 30 year agreement with the FAA to continue to operate the Airport as well as the disputed expiration of the 20 year Grant Assurances in 2015 have set the stage for the City of Santa Monica to definitively re-exert local control over 227 acres of land owned by the City for more than a century. During that time, it was the site for the making of aviation history and performed a vital function in peace and war. In recent years, however, an airport originally established for biplanes has become an ever-more- active jetport for personal and corporate jet traffic. The adverse impacts of noise, pollution and safety hazards of Airport operation have long been documented. At the unanimous direction of the City Council, the staff recommends adopting a Resolution and policy to move forward decisively to exert and test our local authority by officially asserting the City\u2019s intention to close the Airport as soon as legally permitted with the goal of doing so by June 30, 2018 or sooner if possible.", "Acknowledging the many legal challenges regarding that authority now pending, the City should continue to exercise its legitimate authority to enforce its recently adopted leasing policy; replace the existing FBOs with exclusive City operations; consider removal of the Western Parcel from aviation use; and take other such steps for an orderly transition as are appropriately within its legal jurisdiction.", "Finally, the Council expressed a commitment to initiate the lengthy and complex process of planning and environmental review for transition to a complete park campus containing uses consistent with the terms of Measure LC. The recommended resolution authorizes the commencement of that future planning to establish and fund an array of natural, recreational and cultural resources and amenities to serve the residents and neighbors of the City of Santa Monica for generations to come.", "On July 26, 2016, the City Council agreed to consider a resolution expressing the City Council\u2019s intention to close the Santa Monica Airport to aviation use, as soon as that is legally permitted with a goal of June 30, 2018 and earlier if possible, and, authorizing the City Manager to initiate all administrative measures necessary to implement the resolution.", "The land currently occupied by the Airport consists of 227 acres of multiple parcels, much of which has been under exclusive City ownership since 1926 when Santa Monica voters approved a park bond ballot measure. Beginning in the late 1950s, with the advent of jet aircraft, the relationships among Douglas Aircraft, the City of Santa Monica, and the residents soured and became adversarial.", "In 1981, the City Council declared its intention to close the Airport when legally possible. After a series of negotiations, FAA and the City reached a 30 year comprehensive settlement that expired in 2015. Despite the settlement, the adverse impacts of airport operations continue, and in some respects accelerated, due to the significant increase in jet aircraft operations, continued use of leaded fuel, and the fear and actuality of accidents.", "In June 2014, Santa Monica voters were presented with two opposing Airport ballot measures. Measure D was supported by aviation interest and Measure Local Control (Measure LC) was backed by community residents; Measure LC received 60% of the vote and Measure D was defeated when it earned only 40% of the vote. Measure LC reads:", "Subject only to limitations imposed by law, the City Council shall have full authority, without voter approval, to regulate use of the Santa Monica Airport, manage Airport leaseholds, condition leases, and permanently close all or part of the Airport to aviation use.", "If all or part of the Airport land is permanently closed to aviation use, no new development of that land shall be allowed until the voters have approved limits on the uses and development that may occur on the land. However, this section shall not prohibit the City Council from approving the following on Airport land that has been permanently closed to aviation use: the development of parks, public open spaces, and public recreational facilities; and the maintenance and replacement of existing cultural, arts and education uses.", "There are multiple reasons to transition the land currently occupied by the Airport into uses consistent with Measure LC: closing the Airport would stop adverse impacts of Airport operations; effectuate Measure LC; and greatly improve the quality of life. It would be a major transformative event.", "The City is involved in two legal proceedings that have material effects on when the City can close the airport. First, the federal lawsuit regarding the effect of the Instrument of Transfer (IOT) is hugely determinative. The case is scheduled for trial August 2017. The second case is a Part 16 administrative proceeding. This case involves the date when Federal grant obligations expire, thus freeing Santa Monica from the need to comply with key federal regulations regarding the Airport. On August 15, 2016, as expected, the FAA upheld its previous determination that the City is obligated until 2023. The City should appeal the FAA determination to the federal courts.", "If the resolution and policy are adopted the City Manager intends to implement a series of actions that may include all of the measures below but is not necessarily limited to these actions:", "1. Commencing the park planning process, including conducting an environmental analysis as required by the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) and the National Environmental Protection Act (NEPA).", "2. Investigating whether certain fractional jet operators are operating as scheduled airlines.", "3. Submitting an application to FAA which would alter the Airport runway by removing the 1949 Quit Claim Parcel, also known as the \u201cWestern Parcel\u201d from aviation use.", "4. Ceasing forbearance of lax enforcement of the Santa Monica Airport noise ordinance and apply enforcement as written.", "5. Transitioning aircraft hangar uses from lease agreements to permits.", "6. Creating a City of Santa Monica Fixed Based Operation and eliminate the current providers.", "7. Eliminating lead fuel.", "8. Enhancing airport security.", "BACKGROUND", "Few issues have as long, contentious or significant a history as the struggles over the future of the Santa Monica Airport. \u201cExerting Local Control\u201d over the City-owned land occupied by the Santa Monica Airport is one of the City Council\u2019s top five Strategic Goals.", "On July 26, 2016, at the request of Mayor Tony Vazquez and Mayor Pro Tem Ted Winterer, the City Council agreed to consider a resolution (1) expressing the City Council\u2019s intention to close the Santa Monica Airport to aviation use, as soon as that is legally permitted with a goal of June 30, 2018 and earlier if possible, and, upon compliance with applicable legal processes, to transition the land currently occupied by the Airport to uses consistent with Measure LC (Local Control), and (2) authorizing the City Manager to initiate all administrative measures necessary to implement the resolution, including commencement of planning and environmental review processes required by the California Environmental Quality Act and the State Planning Act. The motion passed by unanimous consent.", "The subject resolution is a clear acknowledgement by the City Council to implement Measure LC and it intends to close the Airport as quickly as legally permitted and by lawful means.", "Evolution of the City and Airport Relationship", "According to Cloverfield.org, as early as 1922 the land currently occupied by the Airport was used as a landing field. In 1926 Santa Monica voters approved a park bond ballot measure to purchase the land currently occupied by the airport. Below is an excerpt of the 1926 ordinance.", "The property has been under city ownership from that time to present, having undergone expansion during and after World War II. Since its establishment over 90 years ago, the Airport has played an important part in the evolution of Santa Monica. For instance, the Douglas Aircraft factory at the Airport produced more than 6,000 DC-3 and other fighter/bomber aircraft to help the United States win World War II.", "Beginning in the late 1950s, with the advent of jet aircraft, the relationships among Douglas Aircraft, the City of Santa Monica, and the residents soured and became adversarial. The City (responding to residents\u2019 protests) refused to extend the SMO runway even at the cost of losing local jobs to avoid \u201clocking in\u201d noise from the DC-8 jetliners that Douglas proposed to build in 1958. In 1962 a public hearing was held at the Santa Monica Civic Auditorium to discuss the impacts of airport operations on residents. In 1967, a large group of residents sued the City, claiming jet operations had damaged their property values and their quality of life. Five years later, the City adopted an ordinance designed to reduce aircraft noise and ban jet aircraft.", "In 1981, the City Council adopted Resolution 6296 declaring its intention to close the Airport when legally possible. After a series of negotiations, FAA and the City reached a comprehensive settlement in 1984. \u201cThe 1984 Agreement\u201d recognized the City\u2019s authority to mitigate aircraft noise, impose curfew limits, ban helicopter training, limit the number of aircraft tie-downs, and remove certain land on the south side of the airport from aviation use. In return, the City agreed to: 1) operate the airport until June 30, 2015 and 2) permit fixed base operators (FBOs) to serve passengers, service and maintain aircraft, and sell avgas and jet fuel.", "Fractional aircraft is a common term for fractional ownership of aircraft where multiple owners share the costs of purchasing, leasing and operating the aircraft. Commercial programs for large aircraft include LuxJet Group, NetJets, Flexjet, Flight Options, PlaneSense, Executive AirShare, AirSprint and Autumn Air. Fractional jet operations transformed business jet operations nationally and ushered in the escalating jet operations at SMO that continues today. The bar chart below clearly shows the trend in the growth of jet aircraft at the expense of piston aircraft.", "By 1999, increased jet traffic caused Los Angeles City residents to sue the City of Santa Monica based on adverse health impacts and nuisance caused by the Airport. By 2008, the City Council passed an ordinance banning (larger and faster) Category C and D aircraft from using SMO due to their adverse environmental impacts and increased safety hazards resulting from faster landing speeds coupled with the short (4,970 foot) SMO runway length. The FAA enjoined enforcement of this ordinance and later prevailed in Federal Court.", "A common theme in this long-running issue centers on the environmental impacts of jet operations, particularly the loud noise of jets that residents nearby the Airport find intolerable. According to the City noise violation database from May 1, 2013 to April, 30 2016 \u2013 jet operations account for 92 % of all the (95 decibel) SMO noise violations. For context, a 95 decibel jet noise seems as loud as a jackhammer at 50 feet. The Santa Monica Municipal Code imposes a 75 decibel maximum five-minute noise exposure limit for the community.", "As shown below, total operations have decreased significantly since the 1999 peak.", "However, jet operations continue to increase at SMO, thus exacerbating and increasing noise pollution and the potential for a significant large scale accident. Because jets are typically much larger and carry far more fuel (a Gulfstream IV weighs as much as 75,000 pounds and carries 15 tons of jet fuel), jets pose far greater risks to residents than do propeller aircraft, should an accident occur.", "Aircraft accidents, noise, and air pollution are not the only risks that the Airport poses to nearby residents. For nearly 25 years, California has banned lead as an additive for automobile fuel because of its toxic effects on humans, particularly children. Leaded auto gas was banned because of the highly adverse environmental impacts it has on people and the environment. Since 2008 the EPA found there is no safe lead particulate exposure level (especially for infants) and it recommended limiting the use of lead in aviation fuel because the lead particles from avgas comprise more than 50% of the total US lead emissions.", "Unlike jet aircraft, piston aircraft utilize leaded fuel.  In 2009, the EPA studied SMO lead emissions (totaling 800 pounds in 2002) and estimated the lead particulates had been roughly halved due to the decrease in piston aircraft traffic by 2009. At the Airport, two FBO vendors combine to sell approximately 260,000 gallons of leaded fuel each year. Each gallon of avgas fuel contains about two grams of lead. Thus, SMO generates 260,000 x 2 = 520,000 grams, or about 1,160 pounds of lead particles. If SMO were to close, more than half a ton of lead particles that impact this region would cease to be generated.", "The Office of Environmental Health Assessment, (OEHA) which is a department within the California Environmental Protection Agency (CalEPA), produces a pollution burden map. According to OEHA, the census tract in which the airport lies, ranks in the 79th percentile of most pollution burden census tracts in all of California. The OEHA pollution burden index consists of various pollutants, including diesel, PM2.5 and toxic releases. In the case of diesel, PM2.5 and toxic releases, the census tract that houses the Airport has the highest reading for diesel, PM2.5 and toxic releases in all Santa Monica.", "In summary, all the aforementioned trends and impacts of noise, pollution, and dangers have a wide-reaching adverse impact on a large area around SMO today. Over 1,800 residents as far as three miles away from the runway (Santa Monica, West Los Angeles, Venice, Mar Vista and Marina del Rey) articulated these negative impacts in personal letters to Congressional Representatives Ted Lieu and Karen Bass. These personal testimonials were presented to the FAA on July 8, 2015 in Washington, D.C.  The map below indicates where a portion of the residents are located.", "A Geospatial Analysis of the Distribution of Westside ResidentsNegatively Impacted by the Santa Monica Airport", "There are over 130,000 residents within two miles of Santa Monica Airport. Red markers indicate a partial sample of documented complaints by residents that were presented to the FAA by Congressional Representatives.", "Adoption of Measure Local Control (Measure LC)", "In June 2014, Santa Monica voters were presented with two opposing Airport ballot measures. Measure D was sponsored and supported by the National Business Aircraft Association, (NBAA), the Aircraft Operators and Pilots Association (AOPA), and the Santa Monica Airport Association (SMAA) \u2013 entities presently suing the City to keep SMO open for business. Measure D, funded by almost $1,000,000 from the NBAA and other Washington DC special interests, can only be described as a pro-aviation measure designed to change the City Charter and thereby ensure the continuance of airport operations at SMO. Measure D, which had no local community support or endorsements, lost 40 percent to 60 percent.", "Measure LC was supported by virtually all local Santa Monica groups, neighborhood associations, and organizations. Measure LC passed 60 percent to 40 percent; it clearly presents an electoral mandate to the City. Measure LC reads as follows:", "Subject only to limitations imposed by law, the City Council shall have full authority, without voter approval, to regulate use of the Santa Monica Airport, manage Airport leaseholds, condition leases, and permanently close all or part of the Airport to aviation use.", "If all or part of the Airport land is permanently closed to aviation use, no new development of that land shall be allowed until the voters have approved limits on the uses and development that may occur on the land. However, this section shall not prohibit the City Council from approving the following on Airport land that has been permanently closed to aviation use: the development of parks, public open spaces, and public recreational facilities; and the maintenance and replacement of existing cultural, arts and education uses.", "While residents did not vote to close the Airport, they clearly intended that City Council limit/reduce airport operations and specified that if the Airport closes, the land currently occupied by the Airport must be used for the development of parks, public open spaces, and public recreational facilities; and the maintenance and replacement of existing cultural, arts and education uses, unless there is a vote of the people to the contrary. The voter turnout in the Sunset Park and Ocean Park neighborhood precincts (those residents most impacted by SMO operations) approached 75 percent with LC approval rates of over 80 percent.", "Post Measure LC Actions Taken by the City", "Since Measure LC passage, the City has taken various steps to regain local control over the property now occupied by the Airport. On March 22, 2016, the City adopted a new leasing policy. Only uses that are compatible with surrounding neighbors are permitted per this policy, unless the use is required by law. Second, the City has continued its legal battles, both in the federal courts and through ongoing FAA administrative proceedings. Third, the City did not extend the lease of the largest Airport master tenant, Gunnell Properties. The City is in the process of bringing Gunnell\u2019s former sub-tenants into compliance with the Council\u2019s adopted Leasing Policy. Fourth, City staff has begun the process of eliminating the remaining master tenants while maintaining an orderly transition. Fifth, the City and Justice Aviation reached an agreement, and Justice Aviation voluntarily vacated. Sixth, consistent with Measure LC, the City Council approved hiring a park planning consulting firm in order to expand Airport Park from 8 acres to 20 acres. In a related action, the City removed all aircraft from the southeast parcel to clear the way for the park expansion. Last, the City required the Airport Fund to repay the General Fund $1.2M in FY 15-16 in order to reduce the Airport\u2019s debt obligation to the City.", "DISCUSSION", "Closing the Santa Monica Airport Would Be Transformative", "The Santa Monica Airport, located in a highly urbanized and densely populated region, occupies 227 acres consisting of multiple separate parcels. While many transient aircraft transit SMO, only 310 aircraft are based at the Airport. Thus, the benefit of dedicating a vast track of valuable land for the tiny number of aviation users comes at the expense of precluding an increased quality of life for tens of thousands of residents (and visitors) who would otherwise enjoy greatly improved park, recreational, cultural, and community amenities. It should be noted that in Los Angeles County there are 3.3 acres of park for every 1,000 residents. Santa Monica falls fall below the County average at only 1.4 acres for every 1,000 residents. If the parcels of land currently dedicated to aviation are converted to park space, the City of Santa Monica would reach parity with Los Angeles County. Moreover, closing the Airport represents perhaps the greatest and last opportunity to create a \u201cgreat park\u201d in Santa Monica, or perhaps the entire West Los Angeles area, analogous to Central Park in New York, Golden Gate Park in San Francisco, or Millennium Park in Chicago. Transforming this precious property into uses consistent with Measure LC may well become the greatest transformative event of this century for the City of Santa Monica, equal to or surpassing the pier or extending the Expo Rail line to the beach.", "In March of this year, the City Council adopted a leasing policy. The leasing policy authorizes the City Manager to enter into lease agreements at the Airport, provided the term of the agreements does not exceed June 30, 2018. The Council selected June 30, 2018 as the longest lease term because by said date, or perhaps sooner, the courts are expected to resolve the legal matters in favor of the City thus allowing the City to close the Airport.", "Should the City Council elect to pass this resolution and adopt the policy, it can cite the reasons below:", "1. Closing the Airport Would Eliminate Adverse Impacts of Airport Operations. Santa Monica and indeed, all of Southern California has become increasingly urban. The Santa Monica population exceeds 11,000 persons per square mile \u2013greater than surrounding Los Angeles communities while our park acreage trails that of Los Angeles. Land uses that were once prominent such as drive-in theaters have closed due to economic pressures, and land-uses such as land-fills have been relocated to more appropriate locations in order to stop their adverse impacts on large highly urbanized communities.", "While an airfield may have been an allowed use, and perhaps even innovative in 1926 at the time of the bond measure, as the City has evolved the harmful environmental impacts of SMO operations have increased to the point where the Santa Monica Airport is no longer a community benefit. From December 1928 to August 1939 there was an average of only 70 flights per year, hence the airfield was not incompatible with the semi-rural nature of the city at that time.", "In addition to removing the threat of a catastrophic jet aircraft accident, closing the Santa Monica Airport would halt ongoing adverse environmental impacts of airport operations, e.g.: 1) noise pollution, 2) fine particulate air pollution, and 3) lead particle pollution. Closing the Santa Monica Airport may be the single most important, immediate, and locally achievable environmental protection measure available to the City Council.", "2. Transitioning the Airport to Be Consistent with Measure LC Would Greatly Improve the Quality of Life. In 2014, Santa Monica residents approved Measure Local Control. Per Measure LC, only \u201cparks, public open spaces, and public recreational facilities; and the maintenance and replacement of existing cultural, arts and education uses are permitted on the land currently occupied by the Airport without a vote of Santa Monica residents.\u201d The transition of property currently used for aircraft operations at the Airport to uses permitted under Measure LC would dramatically improve the surrounding conditions for Santa Monica and West Los Angeles residents by replacing highly dangerous environmental threats with desirable surroundings that will greatly enhance residents\u2019 quality of life.", "3. Closing SMO Is A Matter of Local Control and Property Rights. The City owns the land now occupied by the Santa Monica Airport. Property owners, including cities, have legal right to exercise their property rights within the constraints imposed by the authorized land use regulator. The Federal Government is not a local land use regulator, thus, FAA does not have jurisdiction over land use decisions in Santa Monica. Using its municipal powers, including its property rights and land use authority in 1926, the City created an airfield and park and in 1941 leased the land to the Federal Government during a time of national emergency. Now after 90 years of transformative change, if the City Council determines that the negative environmental impacts of airport operations outweigh the benefits that SMO provides, the City has the sole authority, as the property owner and as the land use regulator, to make that decision, not the FAA.", "4. Legal Liability. As owner/operator of the Airport, the City is legally responsible and potentially liable for injuries resulting from Airport operations. In contrast, the federal government has no liability because it is immunized by the Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity. Thus, according to the FAA, the City has all the responsibility and potential liability for Airport operations and impacts, but none of the authority to control them. This places the City in a position that is both untenably risky and grossly unfair.", "The Current Legal Environment", "The City is involved in two legal proceedings that have material effects on when the City can close the airport. First, the federal lawsuit regarding the effect of the Instrument of Transfer (IOT) is hugely determinative. The IOT provided the mechanism by which the Federal Government (a) surrendered the land it leased from the City and, (b) transferred the buildings and improvements on the leased land to the City after using it during World War II. The attached documents from the National Archives Offices in Riverside, California demonstrate that the Federal Government agreed to surrender the 168 acres of runway land and transfer the buildings and improvements to the City.", "The FAA claims the 1948 Instrument of Transfer requires the City to operate the airport in perpetuity; the City rejects this FAA claim. The federal trial will be next August. Earlier this year, the City won a preliminary victory in this case when the 9th District Circuit Court of Appeals determined the facts of the case are so intertwined that the Court could not separate the statute of limitations from the merits of the case and thus a trial was warranted. The Court of Appeals returned the case to District Court and ordered the case be tried on its merits.", "The second case is a Part 16 administrative proceeding. This case involves the date when Federal grant obligations expire, thus freeing Santa Monica from the need to comply with key federal regulations regarding the Airport. The City argues that these obligations expired in 2014 but the FAA claims the obligations remain valid until 2023. On August 15, 2016, as expected, the Associate Director for Airports, upheld the previous FAA determination. The City should appeal the FAA determination to the federal courts.", "Post Airport Closure Resolution Actions of the City Manager", "The subject resolution states: \u201cA resolution of the City Council of the City of Santa Monica making findings regarding the adverse environmental, health and safety effects of the Santa Monica airport; declaring the policy of the City to close the Santa Monica airport to aviation uses as soon as legally permitted, and directing the City Manager to implement all lawful administrative measures consistent with these findings and declarations\u201d. Therefore, the City Manager intends to implement all measures listed below, or other measures should he determine that said measures would be consistent with the findings and declaration:", "1. Commence the park planning process, including conducting an environmental analysis as required by the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) and the National Environmental Protection Act (NEPA). Transitioning the land currently occupied by the Airport into a \u201cgreat park\u201d may require the City to comply with certain planning and environmental laws and that will take considerable time and energy. Hence, in order to coordinate the construction of a great park with the closure of the airport, the time to commence the planning and environmental analysis is now.", "2. Investigate whether certain fractional jet operators are impermissibly operating as scheduled airlines. It should be noted that both FAA and the City of Santa Monica prohibit scheduled airline operations out of SMO.", "3. Submit an application to FAA which would alter the Airport runway by removing the 1949 Quit Claim Parcel, also known as the \u201cWestern Parcel\u201d from aviation use. As noted above, the Western Parcel is not subject to the IOT; the only tenuous hold the FAA may have on the Western Parcel for aviation use is the 1994 Grant Assurance. The City will appeal the recent grant assurance determination by the FAA to the federal courts. Thus, it makes sense to file the application to close the Western Parcel to aviation as part of the City\u2019s appeal of the grant assurance.", "4. Cease forbearance of lax enforcement of the Santa Monica Airport noise ordinance and apply enforcement as written. The City\u2019s enforcement practice of its noise ordinance pre-dates the advent of fractional ownership and jets on demand services. Hence, enforcement should be adjusted to reflect the current state of airport operations.", "5. Transition aircraft hangar uses from lease agreements to permits. There is a great uncertainty regarding whether FAA has legal rights to impose control over City land in order to accommodate aviation uses. Until those legal questions are resolved, the City seeks to avoid binding real estate commitments that would preclude the City from swiftly ending aviation uses as soon as legally permitted. A permit system is a reasonable accommodation until the City prevails in court and expeditiously closes the Airport per the subject City Council Resolution. The proposed permit system provides an important step forward toward greater local control over the property now occupied by aviation users.", "6. Create a City of Santa Monica Fixed Based Operation. If the City is required to operate the airport and if FBO services are required, the City would have greater local control by establishing a municipal FBO. FAA regulations permit cities to operate an FBO provided the operation is done with city employees and resources. Hence, it is legally permitted and there are examples of city run FBOs, including the City of Naples, Florida. As part of our due diligence, staff will examine issues related to: fuel farm operations, employee recruitment, training and retention, equipment, costs and revenue, and liability. The two private FBO providers will be eliminated when City staff are ready to assume the duties.", "7. Elimination of lead fuel. Despite the known dangers of leaded fuel and a viable alternative, FAA has yet to phase it out. Therefore, because there is a viable alternative that could service an estimated 65 percent of the propeller aircraft fleet based in SMO, the sale of leaded fuel should be phased out completely as soon as legally possible. In place of leaded fuel, staff would recommend the sale of unleaded fuel and would request that the City Council authorize the City Manager to enter into contract negotiations for the provision of said fuel.", "8. Enhanced Security. In accordance with previous direction of the City Council, staff is in the process of selecting a highly qualified airport security firm. Staff expects to recommend the contract in September or October 2016", "Resolution\u2019s Impact on the City Council\u2019s Airport Strategic Goal", "On August 23, 2015, the City Council adopted five strategic goals. One goal was to regain local control of the land occupied by the Santa Monica Airport. If the City Council adopts this resolution, staff will revise the Airport strategic goal to reflect this resolution, develop performance measures that correspond to this resolution, and present those performance measures first to the Airport Commission and then to the City Council.", "Alternatives to an Airport Closure Resolution", "The Council may elect to not approve the proposed resolution and maintain the status quo. However, as explained in this staff report, the status quo is inconsistent with Measure LC, produces adverse environmental impacts, creates the possibility of hazards, and does not improve the overall quality of life. Hence, if the optimal public policy goal is to eliminate noise and air pollution from all aircraft and to maximize park, open space, cultural and education facilities, the City Council should adopt the proposed resolution.", "Fiscal Impacts", "Adoption of the resolution does not have a direct fiscal impact. The fiscal impact of creating a city FBO service and hiring consulting services in connection to the planning process and environmental analysis will be determined when more information is available and proposals have been submitted."]}], [{"Title": "Recommendation to accept Lu Plauzoles' resignation from the Urban Forest Task Force and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Recommendation to accept Leslie Lambert's resignation from the Landmarks Commission and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez and Councilmember O\u2019Connor for Council to Adopt a Resolution of the City Council in Support of the Los Angeles Bid to Host the 2022 Gay Games", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez and Mayor Pro Tempore Winterer that the Council direct staff to add the attached labor peace standard, modeled on the LAX food service standard, to the leasing policies for City-owned properties at the Promenade and the Pier, as was done for the SMO leasing policy", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1533861000": [[{"Title": "Commendation: Santa Monica Little League 2016 Minors Division Champions", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "City Manager's Report: Update on Programming and Services at Virginia Avenue Park", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "California Energy Commission Resolution to the City of Santa Monica for Greater Energy Efficiency", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Annual Water Main Replacement Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2383 to Colich & Sons L.P., a California-based company, for the Annual Water Main Replacement and Pavement Rehabilitation Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Colich & Sons L.P., in an amount not to exceed $1,720,904 (including a 15% contingency); 3. Award RFQ # 1982 to Berg and Associates Inc., a California-based company, for construction management and inspection services for the Annual Water Main Replacement and Pavement Rehabilitation Project;4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Professional Services Agreement with Berg and Associates Inc., a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $176,461 (including a 10% contingency); 5. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Annual Water Main Replacement and Pavement Rehabilitation Project would replace approximately 2,230 feet of water main distribution pipelines on Ocean Avenue, Seaside Terrace and Olympic Place South to ensure an adequate and reliable supply of water to customers and also repave Ocean Avenue from Moomat Ahiko Way to Pico Boulevard. This project is based on a long term replacement and maintenance plan for water mains based on age, condition and capacity demands. In June 2016, the City solicited bids for construction services. Staff recommends Colich & Sons L.P. as the best bidder for the Annual Water Main Replacement and Pavement Rehabilitation Project for an amount not to exceed $1,720,904 (including a 15% contingency). Additionally, in September 2015, the City issued Request for Qualifications for construction management and inspection services for upcoming construction projects throughout the city. Staff recommends Berg and Associates to provide construction management and inspection services for this project in an amount not to exceed $176,461 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On November 24, 2015 (Attachment A), the City Council awarded a Professional Services Agreement to California Watershed Engineering (CWE) to provide the engineering design services, develop construction documents and provide engineering support during the construction phase for the Annual Water Main Replacement project. The City operates and maintains a 205 mile network of water distribution mains with pipeline sizes ranging from 4 to 36 inches. The City\u2019s water system serves over 86,000 residential and business customers providing 12 million gallons of water per day. In order to achieve the City's ongoing commitment to supply safe and clean water to all its residents and businesses, and preserve the water quality and efficiency going forward, the Water Resources Division developed a business case evaluation study in 2011 to identify and prioritize replacement of the aged cast iron water mains. The study focused on the oldest cast iron pipe installations built prior to the1970s. The study provided cost and probabilities of potential water main breaks while making recommendations to replace and upgrade the aged water mains throughout the city. Staff utilizes the study recommendations in selecting and prioritizing the segments of the water mains to be replaced.", "Discussion", "Staff reviewed maintenance records to identify the most problematic areas where unexpected low water pressure occurs.  Low pressure in the old cast iron pipes is typically caused by rust build up restricting water flow, which affects the water quality as well.  Based on this information, a list of priority water distribution system improvements was created to implement the replacement and upgrade of water mains, which also consists of replacing the water valves, house connections, and the water meters. This project would replace a total of 2,230 linear feet of water main, 14 water meters, 23 water valves, and 3 fire hydrants at the locations listed below.", "\u00b7  Ocean Avenue - from north of Moomat Ahiko way to Vicente Terrace", "\u00b7 Seaside Terrace- from Ocean Avenue to Ocean Front Walk", "\u00b7 Olympic Place South- West of Ocean Avenue", "This water main replacement project is designed to eliminate the existing water pipes with a history of main breaks from the distribution system, enhance the water pressure and water quality. This project is anticipated to start in late 2016 or early 2017. The duration of this project is estimated at 4-6 months dependent on weather conditions. The pavement on Ocean Avenue from Moomat Ahiko Way to Pico Boulevard was originally scheduled for rehabilitation in FY 2014-15, but the work was deferred to accommodate the planned water main replacement on Ocean Avenue.  Upon completion of the water main replacement, Ocean Avenue would be repaved as part of this project. Staff anticipated that combining these two projects would return more competitive bids and reduce inconveniences to the public. The pavement rehabilitation would consist of grinding and overlaying existing asphalt pavement and placing new striping.", "Contractor Selection - Construction", "On June 14, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the Annual Water Main Replacement and Pavement Rehabilitation Project in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 33 vendors downloaded the bid. Eight bids were received and publicly opened on June 30, 2016. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Base Bid", "GRFCO, Inc.", "$1,479,059.50", "Colich & Sons L.P.", "$1,496,438.00", "Sully-Miller", "$1,550,000.00", "Vido Samarzich Inc.", "$1,653,384.00", "Blois Construction Inc.", "$1,805,870.50", "Lonerock Inc.", "$1,878,808.50", "MNR Construction", "$1,904,401.60", "Ramona Inc.", "$1,966,945.00", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including (i) character, integrity, reputation, judgment, training, experience and efficiency of the bidder, (ii) bidder\u2019s ability, capacity and skill to perform the project, (iii) capability to perform the work promptly, within the time specified and without delay or interference, (iv) sufficiency of financial resources, and (v) price.", "GRFCO Inc.\u2019s bid was the lowest in price; however, it did not contain the requisite construction experience, have a complete subcontractor form, fully disclose other business names, or fully disclose the claims and litigation history of the bidder, its officers and related entities as required by the bid. The Center for Contract Compliance provided public records documentation of GRFCO, Inc., its officers and related businesses that revealed lawsuits brought by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement against GRFCO, Inc., debarment by the City of San Diego, CAL/OSHA citations and lawsuits for nonpayment of prevailing wage, that were not disclosed in GRFCO, Inc.\u2019s bid.", "Based on review of bids submitted, and the documents provided by Center for Contract Compliance, staff deems GRFCO, Inc.\u2019s bid as deficient and nonresponsive, and recommends Colich & Sons L.P as the best bidder based on the criteria set forth in SMMC Section 2.24.072.", "GRFCO submitted a protest letter in response to the bid award recommendation (Attachment B). The City Engineer issued a response outlining several items in the GRFCO bid that were determined to be deficient and non-responsive and denied the protest (Attachment C).", "Staff contacted references provided by Colich & Sons L.P., for similar projects in the Cities of Walnut, which were completed in 2016, and additional projects for the cities of Pasadena, Santa Fe Spring, Buena Park and Chino Basin Desalter Agency which were completed in 2014-2015. All reference agencies reported that work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractor\u2019s State License Board that Colich & Sons L.P. license is current, active, and in good standing.", "Consultant Selection - Construction Management", "On September 22, 2015, the City issued Request for Qualifications (RFQ) for construction management and inspection services for upcoming construction projects.  The RFQ was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 124 vendors downloaded the RFQ. 25 firms responded. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department.", "Evaluation was based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC Section 2.24.973, with specific review of the following: technical competence, staffing capability, project approach, past performance, dispute resolution, quality control, cost control, management services, customer service, and the ability to meet required time frames. The top four firms (Arcadis, Berg and Associates Inc., Hill International and MNS Engineers Inc.) were invited to participate in interviews with staff from the Public Works Department in June 2016. Arcadis declined to participate in the interview process due to lack of resources at this time.", "Based on the selection criteria set forth in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Berg & associates Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide construction management and inspection services based on its qualifications and its directly related experience providing similar services for municipal agencies.", "Services provided by Berg & Associates Inc. would include construction management, continuous inspection of the contractor\u2019s work, verification and management of field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigation of impacts as a result of the construction activities, attendance of contractor\u2019s safety meetings, attendance of periodic progress meetings, recordkeeping of all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work performed during construction, and public outreach.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach during construction of this project would be provided by the City\u2019s construction management consultant as part of the construction management effort. Public outreach would include notifications distributed to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope of the project, potential impacts including night work, and schedule with periodic updates and weekly updates on the City\u2019s \u201cKnow Before You Go\u201d (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily Press. For work requiring temporary closures or detours on major roads, highly visible electronic changeable message signs would be placed at strategic locations one-week prior to the planned work to notify the travelling public. Updates regarding the project would be provided on the City\u2019s website and various social media channels.", "Properties impacted by the project will receive two construction notices. The first general notice would be mailed to properties adjacent to the proposed work two weeks prior to the start of construction. A second two-day notice would be subsequently hand-delivered to each adjacent property with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts, and contact information. The notices would be prepared by Public Works staff and distributed by the contractor. A project specific outreach campaign, including one-on-one coordination with impacted businesses and hotels, would commence prior to start of construction and continue throughout the project.", "California Coastal Commission De Minimis Waiver", "On May 18, 2016, the California Coastal Commission issued a Notice of Permit", "Waiver Effectiveness regarding Coastal Development Permit (CDP) Waiver 5-16-0245-W, allowing for development of the project as previously described. The waiver was reported to the Coastal Commission on May 13, 2016 and became effective on that date.", "Construction Schedule", "Construction work is tentatively scheduled to begin in October 2016 or January 2017, pending material availability. Construction duration is for a period of approximately six months. An after-hours construction permit would be obtained by the contractor allowing certain components of the work along Ocean Avenue to be done between the hours of 8 p.m. and 8 a.m., excluding weekends.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Colich and Sons L.P. is for an amount not to exceed $1,720,904 (including a 15% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Account Name", "Amount", "C250136.589000", "Water Main Replacement", "$1,441,456", "M250152.589000", "Annual St Resurf/Sidewalk", "$ 279,448", "Total", "$1,720,904", "The Professional Services Agreement to be awarded to Berg and Associates Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $ 176,461 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Account Name", "Amount", "C250136.589000", "Water Main Replacement", "$155,909", "M250152.589000", "Annual St Resurf/Sidewalk", "$ 20,552", "Total", "$176,461"]}, {"Title": "On-Bill Financed Light Emitting Diode (LED) Street Light Conversion Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to enter into an On-Bill Financing agreement with Southern California Edison (SCE) and to execute all necessary documents to accept the On-Bill Financing loan and rebates;2. Award Bid #SP2372 to Siemens Industry, Inc., a Delaware-based company, for the replacement of existing High Pressure Sodium (HPS) street light luminaires with Light Emitting Diode (LED) street light luminaires;3.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Siemens Industry, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $589,206 (including a 15% contingency); and4.  Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The On-Bill Financed LED Street Light Conversion Project would replace 1,271 existing traditional high pressure sodium (HPS) street light luminaires ranging in energy use from 50W to 400W with equivalent Light Emitting Diode (LED) street light luminaires in various streets throughout the City.  Conversion of the City\u2019s street light luminaires to LEDs is supportive of the City Council\u2019s ongoing priorities of enhancing public safety, protecting the environment, and maintaining the fiscal responsibility and is a direct measure in the 15x15 Climate Action Plan adopted by City Council in February 2013 (Attachment A). Replacement of existing HPS lighting fixtures with LED lighting would provide an energy efficient system that would reduce the energy consumption in the converted streetlights by 40% and also require less maintenance costs.", "In June 2016, the City solicited bids for the replacement of existing HPS street light luminaires with LED street light luminaires.  After reviewing the seven bids received, staff recommends Siemens Industries, Inc. as the lowest and best bidder for a not to exceed amount of $589,206.  The project would be funded by On-Bill Financing via a Southern California Edison Company no cost, 0% interest loan program for energy efficiency projects.  The monthly loan payment amount would equal the monthly savings on the Southern California Edison portion of the electric bill. With energy savings generated from the project, the City would recover the cost for the lighting conversion over approximately nine years.", "Background", "The City owns and maintains approximately 5,860 street lights throughout the City. In 2011, the City converted 576 of its 5,860 streetlights to modern LED fixtures using the Energy Efficiency and Conservation Block Grant (EECBG) funds from the Department of Energy as part of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.  A portion of the EECBG funds allocated to the City were designated to replace existing High Intensity Discharge (HID) lighting fixtures with energy efficient LED lighting.", "On May 24, 2016 (Attachment B), City Council awarded a contract for the replacement of 43 HPS street lights luminaires with LED luminaires and installation of 52 new pedestrian street light poles with LED luminaires using Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) funds as part of the Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) plan.", "Discussion", "LED fixtures are an energy\u2010efficient, environmentally friendly alternative to traditional street lighting. LEDs used in streetlight applications can emit a broad\u2010spectrum, white light that produces good visual clarity, and depth of field. LEDs can provide excellent color rendering, precise optical control, long lamp life, and have minimal recycling requirements when compared to traditional sources. These benefits combine to yield energy and cost savings opportunities for the City of Santa Monica. Furthermore, unlike HPS lamps and ballasts, LED luminaires do not contain any heavy metals like lead and mercury. This makes storage, disposal and recycling easier and reduces greenhouse gas emissions.", "In October 2015, staff pursued project funding from Southern California Edison\u2019s On-bill Financing and Energy Rebate program and submitted 12 applications to Southern California Edison for rebates and on-bill financing in order to manage the numerous accounts, meters and streetlights. Southern California Edison\u2019s On-bill financing (OBF) is a 0% interest loan that allows the City to make energy efficiency improvements and repay the cost over time through a charge on the City\u2019s monthly utility bill.  In November 2015, the City received approval from SCE for all 12 applications for rebates and on-bill financing.", "Staff recommends entering into an On-Bill Financing agreement with Southern California Edison in an estimated amount of $589,206 ($432,027 loan proceeds and $157,179 energy incentive rebates) in FY 2016-17 to fund the LED Street Light Conversion Project. When the proposed conversion project is completed, SCE would conduct a final inspection and issue a rebate check and a loan proceeds check which, together, would reimburse the City for the cost of construction. SCE would then add a monthly loan repayment charge to the utility accounts impacted. The monthly payment is calculated to be equal to the energy cost savings generated by the project allowing the City to continue paying the same amount to SCE with no budget changes needed. Once the loan is repaid, the energy cost savings revert to the General Fund. The loan would be for a term of approximately nine years, and monthly loan payments would be made on the electric bill of the facility receiving the efficiency upgrade. This project is estimated to save over 924,000 kWh annually which would translate to approximately $47,616 savings per year.", "The cities of Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose and many others throughout the country have already taken significant strides towards system\u2010wide conversion to LED streetlights. LEDs reduce maintenance costs and yield significant energy cost savings.", "The conversion of the City\u2019s street lights to LED consists of converting 1,271 street lights from HPS to LEDs.", "Public Outreach and Project Timeline", "Construction management and public outreach for this project would be provided by City staff. Construction management would include inspecting the contractor\u2019s work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending contractor\u2019s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction. Public outreach would include notifications distributed to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope of the project, potential impacts and schedule with additional periodic updates. Construction is anticipated to start in early October 2016 and be completed in mid-January 2017.", "Contractor Selection", "On June 14, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to replace 1,271 existing traditional high pressure sodium (HPS) street lights luminaires with equivalent Light Emitting Diode (LED) street light luminaires in various streets throughout the City in accordance with City specifications.  The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 44 vendors downloaded the bid. 7 bids were received and publicly opened on June 30, 2016. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder      Base Bid", "Siemens Industry, Inc.   $512,353.00", "Select Electric, Inc.    $540,617.00", "International Line Builders, Inc.  $698,555.00", "Comet Electric    $726,210.00", "Belco Elecnor Group   $757,106.00", "Dynalectric     $790,860.00", "Servitek Solutions, Inc.   $817,305.21", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, capacity to perform the work, experience on similar projects, availability of material, equipment and qualified staff, understanding of the project requirements, ability to meet the desired time frames, and performance of similar projects. Based on these criteria, Siemens Industry, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder. Staff contacted references provided by Siemens Industry, Inc. for similar projects in the cities of Sacramento, Davis, and San Mateo, which were completed in 2015-16, and additional projects for the cities of Huntington Beach, Livingston, and Manteca, which were completed in 2014. All reference agencies reported that the work was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with Contractor's State Licenses Board that Siemens Industry, Inc. licenses is current, active, and in good standing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Siemens Industry, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $589,206. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital improvement Program budget in account C019118.589000 On-Bill LED Streetlight Project.", "Entering into an On-Bill Financing agreement with Southern California Edison to fund the LED Street Light Conversion Project is estimated to result in one-time revenues totaling $589,206 ($432,027 loan revenue and $157,179 energy incentive rebate) in FY 2016-17. Revenue budget adjustments will be included in the FY 2016-17 Midyear Budget for Council approval.", "The loan amount of $432,027 will be repaid over approximately nine years in monthly installments of $3,968. Funds are available in the Public Works Department. Future", "year funding is contingent upon Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "250 Santa Monica Pier Change of Concept", "Department": "Pier Management, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease modification with Romana Pier LLC., to change the concept and trade name of its operation at 250 Santa Monica Pier.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Romana Pier LLC., a City-tenant on the Santa Monica Pier, operates Ristorante Al Mare. The tenant requests a change of concept from Italian to Mexican cuisine. The tenant also requests the trade name be changed from \u201cRistorante Al Mare\u201d to \u201cCantina Taquiria\u201d as part of its rebranding. Council approval for the new cuisine and trade name is necessary because the original concept specified in the 2010 lease between the City and Romana Pier LLC., states the menu shall consist of Italian fare and the trade name shall be \u201cRistorante Al Mare.\u201d The lease allows for changes to the menu and trade name with Landlord\u2019s approval - not to be unreasonably withheld. Following Council approval of the requested changes a modification of the lease would be prepared by the City Attorney and executed by the City Manager and Romana Pier LLC.", "Background", "On January 6, 2010 the City as Landlord, entered into a Lease agreement with Romana Pier LLC., as Tenant, for the operation of a full service Italian restaurant with alcohol service and ancillary entertainment located at 250 Santa Monica Pier. The space is situated within the Billiards Building on the landmarked Santa Monica Pier and had previously been home to several nightclubs, the Arcadia and prior to that, the Ashgrove. The existing space was entirely remodeled by Romana Pier LLC., and as part of that remodel, the Tenant created the Pier\u2019s first rooftop outdoor dining patio to offer visitors outstanding vantage points from which to view the pier, beach and coastline.", "Discussion", "After several years of operating as an Italian restaurant, Romana Pier LLC., requests a change of concept to Mexican cuisine in order to better serve the needs and expectations of visitors to the Pier. Romana Pier LLC., also requests the trade name be changed from \u201cRistorante Al Mare\u201d to \u201cCantina Taquiria\u201d as part of the recasting of the restaurant. A \u2018taquiria\u2019 is a Mexican restaurant specializing in tacos.", "Romana Pier LLC., proposes to maintain a sit-down restaurant, with alcohol service at the first level, second level, and roof top patio, as well incorporate a counter service/fast casual element on part of the ground floor level. The proposed menu would feature tacos, enchiladas, and fajitas along with new interpretations of Mexican fare such as a quesadilla burger. The proposed trade name \u201cCantina Taqueria\u201d would be a one-of-a-kind name that promotes the Council-approved Pier Guideline\u2019s goals to have establishments on the Pier that are unique and not found elsewhere.", "Council approval for the new cuisine and trade name is necessary because these changes are considered to be a major modification from the original concept specified in the 2010 lease which states the menu shall consist of Italian fare and the trade name shall be \u201cRistorante Al Mare.\u201d The lease allows for changes to the menu and trade name only with Landlord\u2019s approval - not to be unreasonably withheld.", "The Tenant will continue to maintain the quality and standards in a manner consistent with the lease and with the Pier Leasing Guidelines. All other terms and conditions of the lease would remain in full force and effect. If the menu and trade name are approved, the Tenant intends to initiate a remodel of the interior space and exterior fa\u00e7ade which would be subject to the Landmarks Commission and Planning Commission as well as other regulatory approvals.", "Transfer of Shares", "In February of 2016, Tenant informed the City of its intent to bring in a new investor member, Planet Hollywood Restaurant Group, LLC. The original investors consisted of Brentwood Pier, LLC with 70% majority membership interest and two individual investors with 15% interest each. The Tenant provided documentation to support that the new investor member has adequate business experience in operating similar types of establishments, satisfactory credit and reputation to meet the transfer provisions of the lease. The Tenant also represented that the addition of the new investor would allow the restaurant to benefit from improved access to resources in all areas, including operations, capital and employee training. The transfer of 50% membership interest to Planet Hollywood Restaurant Group, LLC was administratively approved, and the current investors are Brentwood Pier, LLC and Planet Hollywood Group, LLC, each with 50% membership interest.", "Following Council approval of the requested changes a modification of the lease would be prepared by the City Attorney and executed by the City Manager and Romana Pier LLC. The process to implement the physical improvements to the space may take several more months following Council\u2019s approval as Landlord for the menu and name change. The Tenant\u2019s interior and exterior remodel maybe subject to regulatory approvals such as a Certificate of Appropriateness from the Landmarks Commission and a modification of a Conditional Use Permit by the Planning Commission.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Contract for Airport Building Roof Replacement", "Department": "Public Works, Facilities Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFQ#51509-OR to Best Contracting Services, Inc., a California-based company, for providing roof replacement services at the Santa Monica Airport;Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Best Contracting Services, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $515,680 (including a 10% contingency); andAuthorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete the additional work within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The building, located at 2772-2800 Donald Douglas Loop North at the Santa Monica Airport, is in need of a roof replacement. The existing roof is approximately 30 years old and has required various repairs throughout the past year due to leakage, deteriorated sealants and roof coating. In March 2016, the City solicited quotes for roof replacement services at the Santa Monica Airport. After reviewing the two quotes received, staff recommends Best Contracting Services, Inc. as the best vendor for a total amount not to exceed $515,680 (including a 10% contingency).", "Discussion", "The City contracts out roof replacements and leak repairs at various City facilities. Such services include tearing down aged or damaged roof systems, disposing of roofing materials, installing new roof systems and associated materials, repairing water leaks, and replacing broken gutters and downspouts.", "The 2772-2800 Donald Douglas Loop North building, located at the Santa Monica Airport, is a three-story building occupied by business tenants who utilize the space as offices. Tenants include Atlantic Aviation, Volkswagen Group of America, and the City is currently under negotiations to lease the remaining vacant space to Snapchat.", "In July 2015, staff determined that the building was in need of a roof replacement.  Specifically, the existing roof is approximately 30 years old and its poor condition consisted of, but was not limited to: water leaks in various locations including the first floor in the southwest corner, the third floor under the expansion joint, the north section of the building office rooms, the storage room, and hallways; deteriorated sealants at the base of the roof penetrations; deteriorated roof coating on the outside corners of the mechanical curbs; holes in the rubber of the expansion joint flashings; and stagnant water around several roof drains due to incorrect roof slopes.", "The total area of the roof being replaced is approximately 10,500 square feet. A roof replacement of this magnitude is expected to take approximately two months to complete; coupled with time needed for the bid process and execution of contract, the roof replacement would have occurred in October to November 2015, which is the beginning of the rainy season.", "Staff decided that it would be best to perform minor repairs to the roof to alleviate the water intrusion issues for the tenants and then return after the rainy season to bid the project and select a contractor to perform this work.", "All tenants would be able to stay in the location throughout the duration of the project. The portion of the work that would generate most noises would be scheduled to occur during the weekends and non-business hours to minimize the impact on tenants. During the re-roofing installation phase of the project, the contractor would determine whether it would be necessary to disconnect several large industrial-sized air conditioning units from the roof using a crane and subsequently reinstall them. The size of the roof area to be torn down and replaced, the usage of a high quality sustainable roofing material, and the labor and equipment associated with the potential disconnection and reinstallation of several large industrial air conditioning units all contributed to the cost of this project.", "Vendor Selection", "On March 24, 2016, the City issued a Request for Quotations (RFQ) to provide building roof replacement at the Santa Monica Airport in accordance with City specifications. The RFQ process was selected based on staff\u2019s estimate of the project to come in under $175,000, thus falling under the informal purchasing guidelines.  Staff\u2019s estimate was based on replacing the roof with an \u201cin kind\u201d or same type of roofing membrane currently used. The RFQ requested pricing for an \u201cin kind\u201d roofing membrane as well as an option for cool roofing membrane, compliant with Title-24 of the Building Energy Efficiency Standards, which requires \u201ccool roof material\u201d when either 50% of the roof area or more than 1,000 square feet, whichever is less, will be replaced. The cool roof membrane is substantially more expensive than \u201cin kind\u201d membrane and also requires HVAC and other associated components to be disconnected and reconnected. The RFQ was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of twenty-six vendors downloaded the RFQ. Two vendors responded, per Attachment A. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by staff from the Public Works Department. Evaluation was based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Best Contracting Services, Inc. was not the lowest priced contractor, but it offered a comprehensive package that addressed in detail the specifications of the job and the usage of quality materials. Specifically, Best Contracting Services, Inc. proposed furnishing all labor, materials, tear down, and disposal of existing roof materials plus using a brand name green roofing product known as GAF that comes with a 20-year warranty for materials and labor. Staff recommends utilizing quality roofing materials in order to optimize the performance and longevity of the roof. In the long run, this would be more cost efficient, since GAF decreases the frequency of future roof repair jobs and associated costs. Based on these criteria, staff recommends Best Contracting Services, Inc. as the best qualified contractor to provide roof replacement services at the Santa Monica Airport.Financial Impacts and Budget ActionsThe contract to be awarded to Best Contracting Services. Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $515,680 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to account M339088.589000 Airport Building/Facility Refurbishment."]}, {"Title": "Environmental Consulting Services Agreement for the Airport Park Expansion Project", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Request for Proposals (RFP# 11062015) to AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc., a California -based company for environmental consulting services for the Airport Park Expansion Project; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc. for a total amount not to exceed $257,933 (including a 10% contingency).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "An Environmental Impact Report (EIR) is required in order to approve and construct the proposed Airport Park Expansion Project, expansion of sport fields into 12 acres of non-aviation land adjacent to the existing Airport Park, and is currently in the Feasibility phase of the design.  Staff is requesting authorization to negotiate and execute an agreement with AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc. to provide environmental consulting services for the Airport Park Expansion Project for a total not to exceed amount of $257,933 (including a 10% contingency) to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA).", "Background", "On March 25, 2014 (Attachment A), a City Council Hearing was held on the future of the Santa Monica Airport leasing, planning, environmental and legal work that would enable the City to determine the future use of its land now occupied by the Airport, including possible closure of all or part of the Airport, among other things. Council gave staff various directions, including direction on leasing policy, but did not make any decisions about the Airport's future. The Council did direct staff to work on contingency plans for the Airport's future, continue its efforts to establish the City's right to control use of the land, and take other actions to enable the City to determine the future use of the land, including possible closure of all or part of the Airport.", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment B), a City Council Hearing was held regarding future operations and land use at the Santa Monica Airport. Council gave direction to City staff to begin design and development of the recreational uses on two parcels (12 acres) of non-aviation land at the southeastern portion of the airport, with the goal of developing the site for recreational use within three years, if possible.", "On January 26, 2016 (Attachment C), Council approved an agreement with Rios Clementi Hale Studies to provide feasibility study and design services for the Airport Park Expansion Project in an amount not to exceed $211,200.", "Discussion", "The City of Santa Monica is developing 12 acres of public park space on non-aviation land located at the southeasterly portion and within the boundary of the Santa Monica Airport. The project site is comprised of two separate parcels. The east parcel is presently occupied by open tie-down areas for small aircraft, which have been relocated elsewhere at the Santa Monica Airport. The west parcel is occupied by a small office structure, several small metal storage hangars as well as automobile parking and staging area for the Barker Hanger. The Airport Park Expansion Project would require removal of the existing uses on the eastern and western parcels and development of public park space. Proposed park space uses include play fields of varying sizes for soccer, lacrosse, rugby and football, universally accessible playground and/or exercise equipment, and accessory uses/facilities including restrooms and small storage and staffed maintenance building.", "Feasibility and design work for the Airport Park Expansion Project is currently underway by the City\u2019s selected design consultant, Rios Clementi Hale Studios. In addition, a community workshop was held on June 18, 2016 to gather public input on the Airport Park Expansion Project. Three concepts were presented at the workshop describing variations on the number and locations of playing fields, the location of a community garden, restrooms, playgrounds, and parking. The attendants were invited to give their opinions about these topics and to provide input on amenities to occur between the playing fields and along a new organizing circulation \u201cpromenade.\u201d An online survey followed the workshop, as well as presentations to both Recreation and Parks and Airport Commissions.", "The Airport Park Expansion Project will require an environmental clearance process to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA).", "Consultant Selection", "On October 27, 2015, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ #102715) for environmental consulting services in accordance with City specifications. The RFQ was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The RFQ sought qualifications from environmental consulting firms to prepare environmental documents pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) and/or National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA). One hundred twenty-three vendors downloaded the RFQ. Twenty-four responses were received and evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including past experience in urban infill development projects, adequacy of the response, records of past performance, and demonstrated thoroughness in work approach. The City selected eleven qualified firms to be placed on a pre-qualified list based on these criteria.", "On March 29, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to prepare an Environmental Impact Report (EIR) for the Airport Park Expansion Project. Three of the City\u2019s pre-qualified firms for environmental consulting services received the RFP and all firms responded to the RFP with proposals.", "Vendor", "CAJA Environmental Services, LLC", "AMEC Environmental & Infrastructure, Inc.", "IFC", "City staff reviewed all proposals and interviewed the three firms. Evaluation of the submitted materials was based on the following selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, including:", "\u00b7 Training, credentials and prior experience in preparing EIR\u2019s for the City of Santa Monica", "\u00b7 Competence and knowledge of CEQA/NEPA regulations", "\u00b7 Understanding and experience in airport-related projects, project goals and approach", "\u00b7 Understanding of the federal aviation regulations and requirements", "\u00b7 Ability of the team to successfully complete the full scope of work on time and within budget", "\u00b7 Evidence of a productive team structure and sufficient resources (i.e., financial, staff, etc.)", "\u00b7 The firm\u2019s character and reputation in preparing high quality EIR\u2019s in similar municipalities", "\u00b7 A budget that reflects a fair, reasonable, and competitive price", "\u00b7 Understanding of the specific scope of work of the Airport Park Expansion Project", "AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc. is not the lowest bidder, but the firm best demonstrated knowledge of the City and CEQA, has a strong record of preparing legally defensible environmental documentation in the City and other jurisdictions, prepared the most comprehensive scope of work and showcased a flexible approach for the work required. The firm has had recent experience in preparing complicated EIR documentation in the City of Santa Monica, and has demonstrated a strong understanding of the City\u2019s regulatory structure and neighborhood concerns. Furthermore, AMEC has extensive experience in working with the Federal Aviation Administration on other airport-related projects. Based on these criteria, AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder. It is anticipated that the CEQA process can be completed within approximately one year.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to AMEC Environment & Infrastructure, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $257,933. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget in account P019120.589000 Feasibility Study/Airport Park."]}, {"Title": "Adoption of Resolution Establishing New Position Classifications and Salary Rates for Fiscal Year 2016-2017", "Department": "Human Resources Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution establishing new position classifications and adopting salary rates for those listed positions (Attachment A).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Municipal Code sets forth the process for establishing new position classifications and setting the salary rates for position classifications. Adoption and approval of the salary resolution and position changes are being made to be in compliance with the requirements for a living wage and to modify classifications that were not able to be changed during the recent Budget adoption due to time constraints. Recommendations presented in this report do not require additional appropriations at this time.", "Background", "In accordance with the Living Wage Ordinance, the wages of those City staff that are subject to the ordinance are to be adjusted annually based on the Consumer Price Index (CPI) from January to January for Los Angeles-Riverside-Orange County, CA Urban Wage Earners. These salaries will increase by 3.266%. Consistent with the new minimum wage ordinance, salaries for positions currently at minimum wage would be modified to $10.50 per hour. The position classification modifications that are necessary were not included in the recent budget adoption due to the need for further analysis of the appropriate titles and salaries before being recommended for adoption.", "Discussion", "The attached resolution (Attachment A) sets forth the salary rates for new position classifications and adjusts the salary rates of existing position classifications. Five positions that require modification had not been completely analyzed for appropriate titles and classifications at the time of budget adoption. Four of the remaining classifications are being modeled after the new minimum wage ordinance and the remaining nine classifications are being increased to comply with the City\u2019s Living Wage Ordinance.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Purchase and Install Near-Zero Emissions Engines and In-Frame Overhaul Services", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4247 to Cummins Pacific Corporation, a California-based company, for the installation of new near-zero emission engines on existing Big Blue Bus motor coaches, and for the overhaul of existing CNG engines on BBB motor coaches and on Fire Department apparatus; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Cummins Pacific Corporation, in an amount not to exceed $1,314,475 (including a 10% contingency) for one year, with four additional one-year option years with a 3% annual increase, for a total amount not to exceed $7,029,055 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica is a nationally recognized leader for its sustainability policies and actions, and Big Blue Bus has consistently contributed to this through its use of alternative fuels and phasing out diesel-fueled motor coaches. The City of Santa Monica\u2019s 15 X 15 Climate Action Plan identified 15 measures to reduce emissions by 15percent by 2015, of which measure 13 included a goal to convert the Big Blue Bus fleet to 100 percent natural gas. This goal was achieved in 2013. In addition, Big Blue Bus\u2019 conversion to 100 percent alternative fueled vehicles met the City\u2019s Sustainable City Plan goal of 80% of the city fleet vehicles using alternative fuels seven years in advance of the 2020 target year.", "The City\u2019s commitment to sustainability is a key part of BBB\u2019s operational decision\u2011making matrix. Over the years, Big Blue Bus has maintained a fleet of buses that represents the latest in bus technology and the cleanest fuel sources. As part of this commitment, BBB reached a significant milestonein 2015with 100 percent of its buses powered by renewable natural gas (RNG). RNG consists of non-fracked methane harvested from organic waste in landfills and is considered the cleanest transportation fuel available.In its long-term plan, Big Blue Bus is committed to move toward a zero emissions standard for its bus fleet. In the near-term, BBB continues to identify ways to further reduce greenhouse gas emissions along a pathway to a zero emissions standard. Big Blue Bus proposes to significantly reduce greenhouse gas emissions by implementing best practices technologies on motor coaches that are near the middle of their useful lifecycle and on older coaches that are near the end of their useful lifecycle to improve fleet performance and service reliability for customers.", "New innovations in natural gas engine technology, combined with the timing of vehicles reaching the mid to end of their useful lifecycle, have presented Big Blue Bus with the opportunity to immediately reduce its emissions of harmful pollutants by replacing its engines with cleaner burning near-zero 0.02 Nitrogen Oxides (NOx) natural gas engines. In addition to replacing engines on motor coaches near the middle of their useful lifecycle, BBB has the option to conduct an in-chassis overhaul of natural gas engines on coaches near the end of their useful lifecycle in an effort to maintain these vehicles in a state of good repair.", "Staff recommends the award of Bid #4247 with Cummins Pacific Corporation for the purchase and installation of ISL G Near-Zero 0.02 NOx emission engines on 60 of BBB\u2019s current operating motor coaches and for the engine in-chassis overhaul of 50 existing BBB engines and Fire Department\u2019s apparatus engines, as needed, in the amount of $1,314,475 for a one-year period, with four additional one-year renewal options, for an amount not to exceed $7,029,055 over a five-year period with the anticipated completion of approximately 22 buses per fiscal year.", "Background", "BBB currently operates 200 natural gas-powered transit coaches, of which 60 are near the middle of their useful lifecycle and 50 are approaching the end of their useful lifecycle. The Federal Transit Administration sets the useful lifecycle of a motor coach at 12 years of age or 500,000 miles. The current fleet engines are Cummins ISL G natural gas engines using 100 percent domestically produced, Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas (RNG) further reducing emissions of harmful pollutants than when using fuel harvested from non-renewable sources. These natural gas engines operate at 50% below the EPA guidelines for greenhouse gas emissions. However, a new generation of near-zero 0.02 NOx natural gas engine reduces emissions to 90% below EPA guidelines. The near-zero engine is a direct replacement engine and the only engine that further reduces NOx emissions by 90% over the existing engines that have reached their useful lifecycle.", "Over the 12-year useful lifecycle of a transit coach, natural gas engines experience normal wear and tear that may require engine replacement, cylinder head and/or cylinder repair, and an assortment of other engine parts to be rebuilt or replaced. Engine in-chassis overhauls are necessary around the middle of the useful lifecycle of a motor coach, six years of age or 250,000 miles, to prevent buses from failing in route, which would result in costly repairs. In-chassis overhaul of engines involves rebuilding of existing engines that are approaching the mid-lifecycle. An overhaul restores the engine to a state similar to that of a new engine. By overhauling engines as they approach mid-lifecycle, BBB is better able to control its maintenance costs, and keep buses operational. A scheduled engine overhaul allows for the work to be done in a scheduled and timely manner and on an as-needed basis throughout the year as opposed to doing so when the vehicle is unexpectedly inoperable or pulled off the road for unanticipated repairs.", "The award of Bid #4247 to Cummins Pacific Corporation (Cummins) would enable the City to further decrease its emission of harmful pollutants by installing the Near-Zero 0.02 NOx engines in a portion of its bus fleet. The California Air Resources Board\u2019s (CARB) optional Near Zero NOx Emissions standards of 0.02 g/bhp-hr for heavy-duty urban transit bus applications calls for exhaust emissions to be 90% lower than the current NOx limit of 0.2 g/bhp-hr. The ISL G Near-Zero 0.02 NOx engine, first released in 2016, meets CARB\u2019s guidelines eight years in advance of the 2023 California near-zero NOx schedule. With the new near-zero emission engines installed on 60 buses in the current fleet, BBB estimates that its emissions of NOx will be reduced by 51.10%, annually. This translates into a total NOx reduction of 18,395 lbs per year.", "The award would also allow for the continued use of Cummins\u2019 services for in-frame overhauls on our existing fleet and Fire Apparatus. Cummins Pacific has provided this service since 2009 with exceptional service meeting all City specifications.", "Discussion", "The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and the California Air Resources Board (ARB) have both rated the new Cummins ISL G Near-Zero emission natural gas engine at 0.02 g/bhp-hr (grams per brake horse power hour) of NOx. NOx emissions are harmful pollutants that significantly contribute to smog. ARB has recognized that, even with all the on-road heavy-duty vehicles operating at the previous 2010 NOx emission limit of 0.20 g/bhp-hr, further significant reductions will need to be made in order to meet upcoming National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) requirements for particulate matter and ozone. With NOx emissions of 0.02 g/bhp-hr, the near-zero natural gas engine is set to meet 2023 proposed guidelines.", "This new natural gas engine technology, combined with Big Blue Bus' use of Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas, would provide a much greater reduction in the emission of greenhouse gases. With the new near-zero emission engines installed on sixty buses in the current fleet, BBB estimates that its emissions of NOx will be reduced by 51.10%, annually. This translates into a total NOx reduction of 18,395 lbs per year. The stated NOx emissions of 0.02 g/bhp-hr is a significant improvement over the current 0.13 g/bhp-hr achieved by BBB\u2019s current fleet. The use of near-zero emission engines on the bus fleet represents an opportunity to significantly reduce the City's emission of harmful pollutants.", "Staff recommends that the new near-zero emission engine be installed on 60 buses in the fleet, and that the engines on 50 buses approaching the middle of their useful lifecycle, as well as engines in Fire apparatus, be overhauled.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On April 19, 2016, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver near-zero emission engines and provide in-chassis overhaul services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Seventeen vendors were notified; all vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and one bid opened publicly on May 11, 2016 per Attachment A.", "The other two bidders submitted a \u201cno-bid\u201d response. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work.", "City Procurement staff conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid. Other qualified local dealers were contacted to submit a bid response. By posting a Request for Proposal to Planet Bids the bid was opened up for competition.However, Cummins Pacific Corporation was the only bidder to provide a complete bid response for both the in-frame overhaul service, as well as, the installation of the new ISL G Near-Zero emission engines.", "Cummins Pacific Corporation is the regional distributor in California and Hawaii for Cummins Inc., the manufacturer of Cummins engines and replacement parts and Cummins Westport Inc. the research and development wing of Cummins natural gas engines. The distributorship enables Cummins Pacific to have direct access to Cummins Westport Inc. engineering for engine software updates and troubleshooting and repair assistance.", "In addition to the Cummins distributor, the region also has 19 Cummins authorized dealers that have the capacity to provide the services. Three of the authorized dealers are subscribers to the City\u2019s online bidding website, Planet Bids and downloaded the bid. Of the three one submitted a no-bid and two did not submit a bid.", "Based on capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, pricing, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work, Cummins Pacific Corporation is recommended as the best bidder.", "Staff decided on one procurement package to achieve better pricing. Breaking up the contract into two separate bids, parts and labor, would take away the bidders ability to utilize the principles of Economy of Scale to compete and could result in a higher project amount.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Cummins Pacific Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $7,029,055 over a five-year period. Funds of $1,314,475 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Capital Improvement Program and the Fire Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "C410106.589000 Bus Components", "$1,259,475", "01312.569290 Fire Truck Maintenance Reimbursement", "$55,000", "TOTAL", "$1,314,475", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Acceptance of Second Amendment to Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) 2014 Agreement", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": "Police Chief Jacqueline Seabrooks", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second amendment to the 2014 UASI grant in the amount of $433,909 for a total amount of $3,739,959.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica Police and Fire Departments have received funding as a part of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant. Funds were utilized to purchase equipment and training that supports regional homeland security goals.", "Last fiscal year the Fire Department responded to over fifteen thousand calls for service. The Department maintains two specialized apparatus regional assets, an Urban Search and Rescue vehicle and a Hazardous Materials response vehicle. These specialty apparatus are used to respond to and mitigate emergency response incidents involving complex urban search and technical rescue techniques and Chemical, Biological, Radiological/Nuclear, and Explosive (CBRNE) detection, response, and decontamination capabilities. Both specialty apparatus require an extensive equipment inventory stipulated by the California Office of Emergency Services (OES).The Department utilizes UASI grant funds to supply both vehicles\u2019 specialty equipment which needs replacement due to aging, no longer being serviceable, or to meet new program requirements...", "Background", "On February 24, 2015, Council accepted a grant award in the amount of $308,507 from the 2014 UASI to purchase equipment and training that supports regional homeland security goals.", "On March 1, 2016, Council approved a first modification to the 2014 UASI to implement a new interoperable public safety trunked radio system for a new total grant amount of $3,306,050.", "CalOES has since approved the reallocation of $433,909 to fund additional equipment for the Urban Search and Rescue team and emergency response apparatus for the Santa Monica Fire Department. These changes increased the grant award to a new total of $3,739,959.", "The UASI program focuses on enhancing regional preparedness in major metropolitan areas. The UASI program directly supports the national priority of expanding regional collaboration within the national preparedness guidelines and is intended to assist participating jurisdictions in developing integrated regional systems for prevention, protection, response, and recovery from natural or man-made disasters.", "The UASI grant program was created to support large \u201ccore\u201d cities and those other cities with contiguous borders to the core city. The UASI grant program is 100% federally funded from the Department of Homeland Security to the State of California. The City of Los Angeles acts as the core city for the UASI grant and allots funds to the City of Santa Monica. These funds have purchased necessary equipment, supplies, and training in direct support of overall regional goals to promote effective information gathering, sharing, and response to threats and/or acts of terrorism.", "Discussion", "Under the 2014 UASI Grant, $308,507 was awarded from the City of Los Angeles to the City of Santa Monica Fire and Police Departments as a part of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s UASI grant program. Council accepted the UASI 2014 grant funds on February 24, 2015. Funds were allocated to purchase equipment and training that supports regional homeland security goals; specifically, additional automated license plate readers for the Police Department, hazardous materials (HazMat) training and equipment, and urban search and rescue (USAR) training and equipment for the Fire Department.", "On March 1, 2016, Council approved a modification to the 2014 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) to implement a new interoperable public safety trunked radio system and negotiate and execute a first modification in the amount of $2,997,543 to the 2014 UASI Grant Subrecipient Agreement with the City of Los Angeles for a new total amount of $3,306,050. The interoperable radio system project is underway and on schedule. The project will be completed this fiscal year.", "In April 2016, CalOES approved an additional allocation of $433,909 to fund purchases of additional emergency response equipment for the Urban Search and Rescue team and emergency response apparatus; this change increased the 2014 UASI grant to a new total of $3,739,959. The majority of the equipment is to outfit the new Urban Search and Rescue vehicle planned to be in service in 2017. The USAR equipment includes edraulic cutters, spreaders, and rams heavy rescue equipment for freeing victims from entrapments, search and rescue thermal imaging cameras, power hand tools for rescue situations, low or high angle rope rescue equipment and hardware used for bluff rescue or confined space entrapments, and equipment used in extraction of victims from confined spaces. Equipment for the HazMat apparatus includes: chemical field testing and sampling kits, personal radiation detectors, camera kit, and self-contained breathing apparatus to be used in hazardous material or toxic environment. Additional equipment purchased includes personal protective equipment: body armor for first responders, hazardous material response suits, and turnout gear. Purchase of this equipment followed all procurement requirements and has been completed.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. However, in order to match grant expenditures and revenues, acceptance of the additional $433,909 award from the 2014 Urban Area Security Initiative grant program requires changes to the FY 2015-16 budget that will be presented to Council for approval as part of the FY 2015-16 Year-End Report."]}], [{"Title": "Appeal of the Planning Commission's decision to approve Development Review Permit and Variance (15ENT0138) to allow the construction of a new three-story, 32 feet in height, 14,490 square-foot addition to the former United States Post Office building as part of an adaptive reuse project converting the existing Landmark building to creative office space.  A parking variance is also requested to reduce the required number of on-site parking spaces to be provided from 48 spaces to 25 spaces.", "Department": "ARB/Landmarks (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "06. Administrative Proceedings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council deny the appeal and uphold the decision of the Planning Commission to approve a Development Review Permit and Parking Variance (15ENT-0138) in association with the adaptive reuse and floor area expansion of the former US Post Office building, located at 1248 5th Street, as creative office space based on the findings and subject to the conditions described as an attachment to this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The appellant, Jennifer Kennedy, filed an appeal of the decision of the Planning Commission to approve a Development Review Permit to adaptively reuse and expand the former U.S. Post Office building, a designated City Landmark, with the construction of 14,490 square feet of new creative office space within a 32 feet tall, three-story building addition at the rear of the Landmark building. The Planning Commission also approved a variance to allow a reduction in the amount of parking to be provided in conjunction with the proposed new construction from 48 spaces to 25. The variance is also contested by the appellant.", "Pursuant to the City\u2019s Downtown Interim Ordinance (IZO) No. 2490 (CCS), which established interim procedures and regulations for Downtown pending completion of the Downtown Community Plan, this project is being reviewed for compliance with the 1988 zoning ordinance. The site is located in the C3-C zoning district.", "This report describes the proposed project scope and provides relevant background information, including a description of the Planning Commission\u2019s action and analyzes the issues of appeal raised by the appellant. The report concludes with a recommendation from staff to uphold the Development Review Permit and Parking Variance approvals based upon the findings and subject to the conditions adopted by the Planning Commission on April 20, 2016.", "Background", "Existing Conditions and Setting", "Erected in 1938, the one\u2010story post office building with basement and mezzanine is located at the northwest corner of 5th Street and Arizona Avenue, within the Downtown district. The massing and detailing of the Santa Monica Post Office are indicative of the PWA (Public Works Administration) Moderne style. The subject site is bordered by 5th Street to the east, Arizona Avenue to the south, 4th Court to the west, and the Delphi Academy playground to the north. Adjacent uses include a two-story retail building and a two-story church complex to the west across 4th Court, a City-owned surface public parking lot to the south across Arizona Avenue, a church complex and a six-story mixed use building to the east across 5th Street, and a playground and multi-use commercial building to the north directly adjacent to the subject site.", "Actions Taken to Ensure Preservation", "In August 2013, Council approved a preservation covenant for the former Post Office building, in order to protect its historic significance. The preservation covenant requires City review and approval of any construction, alteration, or rehabilitation on the property that would affect the historic features of the property which include, among others, the mass and plan of the main fa\u00e7ade, the poured concrete siding, the wood frame windows, the ornate grooves in exterior walls, pilasters, columns, exterior motifs and the ornamental metal fence. Specified interior features include the original hanging light fixtures, marble wainscoting, horizontal wood walls and ceilings, metal staircase rails, and tall tables. The Covenant further provides that to the extent the Landmarks Ordinance applies, any alterations require review and approval under the Landmarks Ordinance. By taking this action, the United States Postal Service was able to proceed with the sale of the property to a private party, with the preservation covenant attached as a rider to the grant deed. The property sold to a private party in December 2013 and the Landmarks Commission proactively filed a Landmark Designation application for the building in January 2014.", "In March 2014, the Landmarks Commission designated the former Post Office building and the parcel on which it is situated as a Landmark and Landmark parcel. In doing so, the protection of any exterior historic feature included in the designation would be required pursuant to the Landmarks Ordinance, specifically through the issuance of a Certificate of Appropriateness for any proposed alteration or addition to the property. However, because the interior was not generally open to the public at the time of the designation, the designation does not include any interior portions or elements of the building. Accordingly, as a City Landmark, the Landmarks Commission has no jurisdiction over the interior, and as a result, the protection of any of these identified interior features, as specified in the historic covenant, can only be accomplished through Council approval. Under the Landmarks Ordinance and the Preservation covenant, the Landmarks Commission only regulates those features specifically identified in the Landmark designation.", "Project Description", "Skydance Productions, a movie/television production company, is proposing to adaptively reuse the former Post Office building and convert it to creative office space. In order to accommodate the spatial needs of this creative office use, the scope of work includes a remodeling of the existing interior floor plans and plate heights, and the construction of a new building addition. The existing building in its current state is 33,968 square feet in area and consists of a 17,516 square foot first floor and 2,645 square foot mezzanine set above a 13,807 square foot basement. At completion of the project, the first floor reduces in size to 16,146 square feet; the mezzanine level becomes an 8,508 square foot second floor, and an 8,148 square foot third floor is added. The basement is increased in size to 16,516 square feet. Overall, the proposed Floor Area Ratio, which excludes any basement area in its calculation, is 0.88, well below the maximum of 2.5 established in the C3-C zone. As a designated City Landmark, the project would require sensitivity and consideration of the building\u2019s historic character-defining features which includes its exterior elevations as well as the interior lobby space. Pursuant to the requirements of the Preservation Covenant and because the property is designated City Landmark, the project requires consistency with the Secretary of the Interior\u2019s Standards for Rehabilitation.", "Figure 1: Project Rendering (Arizona Avenue elevation)", "On-site parking for 25 vehicles would be provided. Within a gated surface parking lot, 24 vehicles would be accommodated with one additional space located in an isolated location adjacent to the loading area. 21 of these spaces are standard size; two are compact; and two are ADA compliant. Two of the spaces are designated as \u201cRideshare\u201d. The parking lot is located within the north side yard. Access to the parking area is via Fourth Court, along the western (rear) elevation. In addition to automobile parking, in accordance with SMMC 9.04.10.08.050 the applicant is required to provide a minimum of four bicycle parking spaces on-site. The applicant has exceeded this minimum requirement and has provided a total of 24 bicycle parking spaces, located adjacent to the parking lot on the north side of the site. To complement this alternative transportation mode, the applicant is proposing on-site showers for employee use.", "Figure 2: Site Plan", "Planning Commission Action", "On March 16, 2016 and on April 20, 2016, public hearings were held by the Planning Commission to consider the associated Development Review Permit and Parking Variance for the project. Testimony from the public was received and almost all offered support for the project, citing the benefits of expanding the creative arts industry in Downtown. During deliberation, the majority of Commissioners:", "\u00b7 expressed strong support for the project, citing its potential as a representative example of adaptive reuse;", "\u00b7 stressed the importance of this Landmark building for maintaining the historic character of Downtown;", "\u00b7 appreciated the sensitive design, scale and massing of the building addition relative to the existing symmetry of the Landmark Post Office building; and", "\u00b7 noted its consistency within the surrounding neighborhood context.", "The Commission also noted that the addition will be visually understated and almost completely obscured from the view shed of the typical pedestrian along 5th Street. The Commission took formal action on the Development Review Permit and the Parking Variance on April 20, 2016. The Planning Commission initially voted 3-3, resulting in a technical denial of the project. However, at the same meeting, after voting 6-0 to reconsider the initial vote on the project, the Planning Commission held a second vote on the project where the project was approved 4-2 with amendments to Condition #60 in the Planning Commission\u2019s Statement of Official Action (Attachment B). Condition #60 originally required the applicant to provide a copy of a written agreement to the City for 23 off-site parking spaces. The Planning Commission\u2019s amendments to Condition #60 included that 23 off-site parking spaces be deed-restricted for guaranteed exclusive use by the Applicant for the term of any parking lease agreement, which need not be offered from the same property owner. In addition, the copies of the deed restriction must be provided annually with the reporting on the project\u2019s required Transportation Demand Management program. The Commission also included that the off-site parking shall be located on a site that is demonstrated to be underutilized for parking, conveniently accessible to the project through non-motorized forms of transportation, and located outside the Downtown core area. These conditions were intended to require that the applicant have commitments to 23 off-site parking spaces and that the parking location does not add to Downtown traffic congestion. The appellant is a member of the dissenting vote.", "As part of its approval, the Commission identified the following specific concerns relative to the design, colors, and materials of the new construction that should be considered by the Landmarks Commission during the Certificate of Appropriateness review for overall design quality and historic compatibility:", "\u00b7 The proposed cladding on the new addition does not appear to relate in its materiality to historic PWA Moderne buildings of the era;", "\u00b7 The amount of ornamentation on the new construction should be limited relative to the historic building, noting that post offices in Southern California of the PWA Moderne era were specifically designed with limited ornamentation.", "\u00b7 The horizontal orientation of the new construction appears to clash with the verticality of the historic building;", "\u00b7 The relationship of the fenestration between the historic building and the new construction needs to be more apparent and compatible;", "\u00b7 Given drought conditions, the utility of including a water feature within the project\u2019s landscape design for the site is not apparent, or necessary. If a water feature is ultimately proposed, its design should not include any type of runnel;", "\u00b7 The amount of glazing proposed may warrant consideration for the installation of solar control for windows, particularly on the south and west elevations; and", "\u00b7 The overall design and purpose of the interpretative area on the southeast corner of the site should be reviewed for relationship to the historical, cultural, and architectural importance of the Post Office. The interpretative area should not include any bicycle parking.", "Discussion", "A Development Review Permit (DRP) is intended to allow the construction of certain projects, subject to Planning Commission review and approval, for which the design, siting, and use could result in an adverse impact on the surrounding area. In addition to the required DRP findings provided in the City Council\u2019s Draft Statement of Official Action (Attachment A), the following issues should be considered by the Council in its de novo review of the proposed project:", "\u00b7 Whether the location, size, massing, and placement of the proposed structure on the site is appropriate and compatible with the surrounding neighborhood;", "\u00b7 Whether the location of the proposed uses within the project are appropriate and compatible with the surrounding neighborhood;", "\u00b7 Whether the proposed siting and design should be permitted by weighing the public need for the benefit to be derived from the proposed site plan use against the impact which it may cause; and", "\u00b7 Whether the project is generally consistent with the Municipal Code and General Plan.", "The DRP review is necessitated as a result of a 14,490 square-foot, three-story addition being proposed at the rear of the Landmark building. The addition would replace an existing, non-historic loading dock and canopy at the rear of the existing building and would be centered on the building in response to its historic symmetrical form. It would be setback approximately 40 feet from the front elevation of the building (along 5th Street) and 24 feet from each of the side edges of the existing building. The proposed addition would wrap the rear corner of the historic building and fully extend to the ground level in the vicinity of 4th Court, the rear alley. An internal reconfiguration of floor plates and plate height levels would enable the new addition and third floor roofline to only extend approximately five feet above the existing roofline of the historic building. The rooftop mechanical equipment screens would be equally recessed to avoid competing with the Landmark features and maintain a low profile along the street.", "Although this addition is contemporary in its design approach and materiality, it subtly expresses its historic compatibility by replicating the rhythm of the prominent vertical pilasters on the historic fa\u00e7ade onto the rear addition where bays of equal size are created. In addition, the design incorporates a distinct break between the historic building and the new construction, giving an overall impression that the addition is separate and distinct from the historic building. Staff believes that the applicant has designed a project that has an appropriate mass and scale that is respectful of its surroundings.", "The historic building is currently sited on the property with a 26-foot setback from 5th Street and a 30-foot side setback from Arizona Avenue. Although not subject to any mandatory setback requirements, these open spaces were improved over time with concrete landscape planters. These planters, coupled with a large concrete monument ground sign, are bulky in design and hamper visibility to the Landmark building. As none of these features are considered to be historic or character-defining, these features would be removed and the spaces would be redesigned to include new landscaping, site amenities (tables and seating), and water features for general use and enjoyment by on-site employees.", "Prior to the Planning Commission\u2019s review of the DRP and Variance, on December 14, 2015, after much discussion and debate, the Landmarks Commission approved a Certificate of Appropriateness for the construction of a five-foot in height security fence on the perimeter of the property. The Landmarks Commission\u2019s approval was based on the visually permeable design and low height of the fence which would allow the historic building to remain integrated into the public realm of Downtown, while still providing the desired security sought by the building\u2019s owner.  No appeal of this approval was filed within the required timeframe for appeal.", "When reviewing a DR Permit, the Planning Commission is asked to consider \u201cthe physical location, size, massing and placement of proposed structures on the site\". Because fences do not have mass, the Planning Commission does not, as a matter of long-standing practice, review the location or appropriateness of a fence while reviewing a DR Permit. Fences are considered part of project landscaping and, therefore, within the purview of the design review body.  The Landmarks Commission serves as the design review body for this property because the former Post Office is a designated City Landmark, and the property on which the former Post Office is located has been designated as a Landmark Parcel. Therefore, in light of the Landmarks Commission\u2019s approval of the Certificate of Appropriateness for the fence, and because the fence was not deemed to be within the purview of the Planning Commission scope of review of the DR permit, the approval of the fence is not subject to appeal before Council.", "The fence is consistent with the 1988 Zoning Ordinance, which allows for a fence on the property in the location and at the height that was approved by the Landmarks Commission. In addition, in recognition of the building\u2019s historic service to the public as a community gathering space, the applicant is proposing a 200 square foot \u201ccommemorative corner\u201d. The intent is to develop imagery that honors the building\u2019s past as a Post Office.", "As a designated City Landmark and pursuant to the Preservation Covenant, all work performed must be consistent to the Secretary of the Interior\u2019s Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties. The project design has been informed by archival documentation and the applicant has retained a Preservation Architect to oversee the treatment of the historic exterior and the protected original interior lobby. All exterior work requires a Certificate of Appropriateness in accordance with the Landmarks Ordinance and all interior alterations require City Council approval in accordance with the Preservation Covenant. Staff believes that the project is consistent with the Secretary of the Interior\u2019s Standards (\u201cStandards\u201d) specific to \u201crehabilitation\u201d. Originally a US Post Office, the building would be repurposed into a creative office. All work would affect the rear elevation and roof area, which are not character defining features of the property. This new use would not impact any of the historic and distinctive materials, features, spaces, and spatial relationships in accordance with the Standards. The proposed addition is contemporary in its design approach and utilization of materials. Although compatible with the historic building with its subtle references, including the strong horizontal lines of the existing poured in place concrete and the size/rhythm of the historic bays on the 5th Street elevation, there would not be any sense of false historicism.", "Parking Variance", "When the building was originally constructed as a US Post Office in 1938, the use was not subject to a mandatory parking requirement because it was Federal property and the City did not have authority to impose zoning requirements. However, over time as customer and employee need increased, non-required parking was incrementally added to the site. At the time the building was sold and purchased by the applicant in 2013, there were 43 spaces onsite. Pursuant to the City\u2019s Downtown Interim Ordinance (IZO) No. 2490 (CCS), which established interim procedures and regulations for Downtown pending completion of the Downtown Community Plan, this project is being reviewed for compliance with the 1988 zoning ordinance. The site is located in the C3-C zoning district. The City\u2019s parking requirement standards (SMMC Section 9.04.10.08.030 (d)) specify that existing buildings are not subject to the provision of any new parking except when they are expanded, and at such time, only the new building floor area is considered for determining a minimum parking requirement. As a result, the project\u2019s net amount of 14,490 square feet of new floor area would necessitate a total of 48 parking spaces. Since the redesigned site would only accommodate 25 parking spaces, pursuant to SMMC 9.04.20.10.030(b), the applicant is seeking a Variance for a reduction of 23 parking spaces.", "A parking variance is intended to provide a mechanism for relief from the strict application of the parking requirements as a result of the subject property\u2019s unique and special conditions. In its de novo review of the request, the Council must be able to expressly determine that all 11 of the required variance findings could be met, which include the following findings that are fully detailed in the Draft Statement of Official Action (Attachment A):", "\u00b7 There are special circumstances or exceptional characteristics applicable to the property that do not apply to other properties in the vicinity under an identical zoning classification.", "\u00b7 The granting of such variance would not be detrimental nor injurious to the property or improvements in the general vicinity.", "\u00b7 The strict application of the provisions of this Ordinance would result in practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships, not including economic difficulties or economic hardships.", "Staff believes that as a project that includes the retention of a designated City Landmark, there are special circumstances and unique hardships that constrain the project site and impact the ability to accommodate required parking for the proposed addition. The property is zoned C3C (Downtown Commercial Overlay) and occupies a prominent corner in Downtown. The property is improved with a 1938 PWA building that has been designated as a City Landmark and the property has been designated as a Landmark Parcel. Beloved by the community for its distinct PWA Moderne style and elements along its street facing elevations and built-to-last \u201cpoured in place\u201d concrete, the building and its siting offers little opportunity for expansion, and the accommodation of any additional surface or subterranean parking. Consistency with the Secretary of the Interior\u2019s Standards amplifies the challenges as it limits the extent of any expansion plans both horizontally and vertically. Moreover, the Preservation Covenant protects the interior lobby and its high volume ceiling plate height, which further restricts the establishment of additional floor area within the existing envelope of the building that could then allow for new parking at the rear.", "In addition, the granting of a variance would not be in conflict with the general purposes of the General Plan or Zoning Ordinance. As a designated Landmark, the City has adopted policies throughout its various regulatory land use documents that encourage or incentivize flexibility indicating the importance of preserving historic resources and encouraging adaptive reuse. The City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element of the General Plan (Policy HP1.5) encourages efforts to \u201csupport rehabilitation and restoration of historic resources through flexible zoning policies and modifications to development standards . . . such as . . . reduced parking requirements\u2026\u201d. This Element further recognizes the import to \u201cdevelop measures in the Santa Monica Zoning Ordinance to address appropriate additions to, and adaptive reuse of historic buildings.\u201d", "The proposed parking variance would not be detrimental or injurious to improvements in the general vicinity with consideration given to the fact that the property was in use as the City\u2019s main post office for nearly 75 years. When it was operated as a US Post Office, the property had no customer parking. Per the traffic analysis in the Mitigated Negative Declaration adopted for the project, the new use is expected to generate 2,242 less daily vehicle trips than the post office use. In addition, SMMC Section 9.04.20.10.050 specifies that requests for the reduction of the automobile parking space requirements must be accompanied by a Transportation Demand Management (TDM) plan that incorporates measures to reduce parking demand. Council\u2019s review should determine if the TDM plan that has been proposed would adequately address the proposed parking shortfall.", "In its review of the project, the Planning Commission expressed support for the overall TDM plan as it includes a robust program of measures that are intended to expand transportation choices by providing employee incentives to reduce single occupancy vehicle trips to the project site, thus reducing the overall parking demand. Further, any future employer would be subject to the TDM ordinance (SMMC Chapter 9.53), which establishes an AVR goal of 2.2 in the Downtown for employers with more than 30 employees. Staff has worked extensively with the applicant to develop a TDM plan that is tailored to the project operations and will address any parking shortfall. The TDM program is required to begin reporting compliance one year after Certificate of Occupancy for the building and annually thereafter. The following are highlights of the required TDM program:", "\u00b7 An \u201cEmployer Transportation Coordinator\u201d to oversee implementation of the TDM Plan within the company and a commitment to fund and provide continued education to the identified employer;", "\u00b7 A monthly employee transportation allowance of at least 15% more than the monthly cost of leased parking provided to employees and not less than $230/month. A daily option is also provided as an alternative;", "\u00b7 24 short-term bike parking spaces (above the municipal code requirement of four) and the provision of lockers/showers on-site in support of the alternative transportation mode;", "\u00b7 Minimum of 12 secure bicycle parking spaces;", "\u00b7 6 free on-site shared bicycles intended only for employee use during the work day;", "\u00b7 On-site bicycle valet during all hours automobile valet is offered;", "\u00b7 Provide employees with access to a carshare service for business and personal use during the work day; and", "\u00b7 One EV/hybrid company car for business-related use for employees who have left their cars at home.", "Separate from the TDM program requirements is a recommended condition that requires 23 off-site parking spaces to be secured through written lease agreement with another property owner and deed restriction for exclusive use by the applicant during business hours. As detailed in Condition #60 of the Draft Statement of Official Action (Attachment A), the location of the off-site parking should be convenient to the project site but not in the Downtown core area.", "Appeal Summary", "The appellant filed a timely appeal on May 4, 2016. In the appeal statement, the appellant expresses concern and an opinion that the proposed project:", "\u00b7 Conflicts with the vision, compatibility and pedestrian orientation goals of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) of the General Plan for the Downtown neighborhood;", "\u00b7 Conflicts with key preservation issues and directives in the LUCE;", "\u00b7 Conflicts with the vision and pedestrian orientation goals of the Draft Downtown Community Plan;", "\u00b7 Includes a Transportation Demand Management (TDM) Program as part of the project\u2019s conditions of approval that raises questions; and", "\u00b7 Requires a Conditional Use Permit to allow ground floor office use in the C3-C zone.", "Appeal Analysis", "In contrast to the appellant\u2019s statement, staff believes that the proposed project would be a successful example of adaptive reuse in the City\u2019s Downtown and would further the goals, policies, and development parameters specified in the Land Use and Circulation Element of the General Plan (LUCE) and the Draft Downtown Community Plan (DCP).", "Consistency with the LUCE", "The LUCE firmly establishes the importance of preserving the City\u2019s important historic Downtown buildings and their role in creating a vibrant and progressive district. The LUCE has identified adaptive reuse as a means of accommodating new growth and development and encourages new creative uses that may capitalize on the flexibility and incentives that preservation offers.", "The LUCE further establishes a vision for Downtown that is culturally rich, diverse and attractive. The adaptive reuse of this beloved building would assure that it would remain an important part of the ever-evolving downtown, and a reflection of the area\u2019s history. The proposal furthers Downtown Goal D7 to \u201cCreate a balanced mix of uses in the Downtown.\u201d Furthermore, the project is a cutting edge example of adaptive reuse and furthers the overarching Historic Preservation goal of preserving and protecting historic resources (Goal HP1) and integrating historic preservation practices into sustainable development decisions (Goal HP3) and adheres to the policy (D7.5) of encouraging adaptive reuse of historic resources. The site design proposes a gathering space at the street corner which will feature an interpretative element that reflects on the building\u2019s history as a post office. This supports the LUCE goal of enhancing the quality and character of the streetscape and urban pattern in the Downtown (Goal D9) and the Transportation goal (T3) of providing streets that are pleasant for all users. The proposed Parking Variance is consistent with Historic Preservation Policies which encourages rehabilitation and restoration of historic resources through flexible zoning practices including reduced parking requirements.", "Consistency with the Draft Downtown Community Plan", "Although not required, the proposed project is consistent in its current form with the goals and policies preliminarily identified in the Draft Downtown Community Plan (DCP). The Draft DCP presents a balanced urban design and preservation strategy that strongly encourages adaptive reuse that reinforces the existing and unique character of Downtown. The proposed historic interpretative element adds variety to the streetscape and adheres to the goal of creating a balanced and diverse system of high quality open spaces in Downtown.", "Concerning the proposed parking variance, the Draft DCP establishes standards and regulations that would reduce the parking requirement for the proposed project. Currently, the project is subject to a parking ratio of one space per 300 square feet of floor area. Hypothetically, if the project was subject to the parking standards recommended in the Draft Downtown Community Plan, which requires one parking space per 500 square feet of floor area, the project would have a parking requirement of 29 spaces total and the extent of the parking shortfall would be significantly reduced from 23 spaces down to four spaces. The DCP takes on an even more progressive stance when considering adaptive reuse as it suggests not requiring any additional parking if a project scope includes the appropriate preservation or restoration of a designated historic resource. The newly adopted Zoning Ordinance already contains similar incentives for the adaptive reuse of designated historic resources.", "TDM Plan", "The recommended TDM plan is outlined in Condition #58 of the Draft Statement of Official Action (Attachment A) and identifies strategies for expanding transportation choice for employees by incentivizing employees to reduce single-occupancy vehicle trips to the project site thereby lessening the demand for parking to be provided in support of the Parking Variance request. The applicant\u2019s TDM Plan exceeds the mandatory requirements specified in 1988 Zoning Ordinance Section 9.16.120 for a development project that is anticipated to generate more than ten p.m. peak period automobile trips. The applicant anticipates a maximum of 54 employees after build-out of the project. Any future employers in the project will be required to comply with the new TDM ordinance (SMMC Chapter 9.53).", "No Additional Land Use Entitlements are Required.", "The appellant contends that the project requires a Conditional Use Permit to allow creative office on the first floor. However, as specified in the Downtown IZO, this project is being reviewed for compliance with the land use regulations described in the 1988 Zoning Ordinance, and staff accordingly has determined that the subject project, as presented, is not required to obtain a additional Conditional Use Permit. On June 30, 2014, the zoning conformance review for Business License #210156 was completed for Skye Collection LLC to operate a Creative Office use. The business was described on the application as follows:", "\u201cCreative office use. We coordinate the design and manufacturing of clothing. Our office will include a clothing design studio as well as personnel that coordinate the manufacturing of such clothing and handle general administrative tasks including accounting, marketing, public relations and human resources. Clothing manufacturing will not take place on-site.\u201d", "Since a new creative office use (movie/television production) is proposed in a building where an existing creative office use (clothing design) is already permitted, it was determined that no additional land use entitlement (i.e. CUP) is required.", "When the business license zoning conformance review was completed by staff, specific functions of the clothing design component of the creative office use were restricted from occurring within certain portions of the building in compliance with pedestrian orientation requirements.", "Conclusion", "Staff recommends that the City Council deny the appeal and uphold the decision of the Planning Commission to approve a Development Review Permit and Parking Variance (15ENT-0138) in association with the adaptive reuse and floor area expansion of the former US Post Office building, located at 1248 5th Street, as creative office space based on the findings and subject to the conditions described as an attachment to this report.", "Environmental Status", "An Initial Study/Mitigated Negative Declaration was prepared pursuant to Sections 15063(c) and 15070 of the California Environmental Quality Act Guidelines and the City of Santa Monica CEQA Guidelines to assess the potential environmental effects of the proposed project and was adopted on April 20, 2016 by Resolution 16-003 (Planning Commission Series). Five environmental factors (Cultural Resources, Geology and Soils, Hazards and Hazardous Materials, Noise and Construction-related Traffic had potential issues that required mitigation to result in \u201cLess than Significant\u201d impacts. In total, 23 mitigation measures have been developed that will be incorporated into the project\u2019s conditions of approval; 18 of these measures address the impacts on Cultural Resources including, but not limited to:", "\u2022 Preparation of a Historic American Buildings Survey (HABS) report;", "\u2022 Preparation of a Protection Plan and Materials Conservation report;", "\u2022 Demolition and Construction monitoring by a qualified architectural historian;", "\u2022 Salvage and reuse of historic materials, when appropriate; and", "\u2022 Inclusion of commemorative signage, interpretive educational program or public art.", "The remaining mitigation measures address mainly construction-related issues within the other four environmental factors that required attention.", "The Planning Commission adopted Resolution #16-003 (PCS) adopting a Mitigated Negative Declaration (MND) and Mitigation Monitoring and Reporting Program for the project on April 20, 2016. The appellant did not appeal the Planning Commission\u2019s CEQA determination for the project and therefore, the MND is not part of the Council\u2019s review.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action required as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Ordinance Setting the FY 2016-17 Tax Rate for the 2012 Library General Obligation Refunding Bonds", "Department": "Finance Department, Revenue Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached ordinance setting the FY 2016-17 tax rate for the 2012 Library general obligation bonds.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City pays debt service on voter-approved general obligation bonds. Currently, Santa Monica has one such outstanding general obligation bond issue: the 2012 Library General Obligation Refunding Bonds. Each year, the City Council sets a tax rate that is added to property tax rates to generate funds to pay bond debt service.  Tax rates change annually based on the scheduled debt service payment as well as changes in overall City-wide assessed property values.  Staff recommends that Council adopt the attached ordinance setting the FY 2016-17 rate at $.003904 per $100 of assessed valuation.", "Discussion", "Staff annually calculates the recommended property tax rates based on changes in City-wide assessed valuation and the amount of the scheduled debt service payment for the year.  Staff calculated the total FY 2016-17 property tax rates for the 2012 refunding bonds to be $.003904 per $100 of assessed valuation, a difference of $.000795 per $100 of assessed valuation from the prior year. This change reflects the estimated FY 2016-17 assessed valuation increase, revenues collected in the prior year in excess of initial estimates, and a decrease in the scheduled debt service obligation from the prior year.", "Attachment A provides further detail on the calculations.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The tax revenue generated from the Library Bonds tax rate should be sufficient to cover FY 2016-17 debt service payments of $1,382,650. Associated revenues (account number 01274.404660) and expenditures (account number 01274.555300) are included in the FY 2016-17 Adopted Budget."]}], [{"Title": "Lobbyist Registration Program Regulations and Establishment of Registration Fees", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize implementation of the lobbyist regulations as promulgated by the City Clerk in accordance with Chapter 4.85 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code; and2. Adopt the attached resolution establishing the fees for lobbyist registration, amendments and renewal.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Council directed staff to prepare an ordinance requiring lobbyists to register with the City. On March 22, 2016, the City Council adopted Ordinance No. 2511 (CCS) regulating lobbying. Regulation of lobbying activities will help ensure government transparency and foster public confidence in government. The City Clerk has developed regulations for implementation of the Lobbyist Registration program. Additionally, a resolution establishing the Lobbyist\u2019s annual registration fee pursuant, to cover costs of administering the program, is presented for Council consideration. The costs associated with implementing the program will be covered by the fees for registration.", "Background", "At its meeting of December 16, 2014, at the request of then Mayor Pro Tem Vasquez and Councilmember Himmelrich, the Council directed staff to prepare an ordinance requiring lobbyists to register with the City in an effort to promote transparency. After hearings on July 14, 2015, and October 27, 2015, on March 22, 2016, the Council adopted Ordinance No. 2511 (CCS). The ordinance regulates lobbying activity in the City of Santa Monica and will become effective on September 19, 2016.", "The ordinance establishes a lobbyist annual registration fee, to be set by City Council resolution and periodically adjusted, in an amount sufficient to cover the costs of administering lobbying registration. Additionally, the City Clerk is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the program.", "Discussion", "As defined in Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 4.85.010, a lobbyist is an individual who receives economic consideration as the employee, representative or contractor of a person or entity other than the City of Santa Monica for communicating with any official or employee of the City for the purpose of influencing a legislative or administrative action. For purposes of the lobbying registration program, a lobbyist does not include City contractors and those seeking City contracts through bids and proposals. The Code requires a lobbyist to annually register with the City Clerk, no later than ten days after qualifying.", "Registration Requirements", "Lobbyist registration includes providing the following information to the City:", "\u00b7 name", "\u00b7 business and mailing address", "\u00b7 email address", "\u00b7 phone number", "\u00b7 names of owners of the business", "\u00b7 description of the business", "\u00b7 name, address and phone number of each client", "\u00b7 nature of client\u2019s business", "\u00b7 description of governmental decision sought by the lobbyist on the client\u2019s behalf", "\u00b7 name of persons employed or retained by the lobbyist to engage in lobbying activities", "\u00b7 date, amount, description of any payment made to, or on behalf of any City official or member of an official\u2019s family", "Within ten days of changes in the above information, the lobbyist must file an amendment to the registration.", "The City Attorney and City Clerk are responsible for enforcing the lobbyist registration. Violations result in a misdemeanor, potential civil action and administrative enforcement as outlined in Section 4.85.050 of the Municipal Code.", "The City Clerk has developed regulations for implementation of the Lobbyist Registration Program with a focus on continuity, consistency, maintenance and transparency. The registration form, instructions and design of the lobbyist page on the website have also been created.", "Initial Lobbyist Registration Period", "All individuals who qualify as Lobbyists under Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 4.85 prior to October 31, 2016, shall register during the Initial Lobbyist Registration Period from September 19 through October 31, 2016. After this time, all Lobbyists are required to register within ten (10) business days after qualifying as a Lobbyist.", "Registration Fee", "Pursuant to Section 4.85.030 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, the Lobbyist\u2019s annual registration fee is to be established by City Council resolution to cover the costs of administering the program. The fee being recommended is based on an amount that does not exceed actual costs of processing the registration form, reviewing the application, data entry, uploading documents to website, written confirmation/notification to lobbyist and providing program information. The proposed fees are $40 for initial registration and $25 for amendments and annual renewal. These fees will be included in the Citywide Cost of Services Study and updated for Fiscal Year 2017-18.", "Public Outreach", "Next steps will include creating a campaign to notify potential lobbyists of the regulations, fees, and filing deadlines. Currently, the City Clerk\u2019s Office has a list of those who have expressed an interest in becoming a lobbyist, and will work with other Departments to create a complete list for notification.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Lobbyist registration fees collected will be deposited to revenue account 01211.410370 (Lobbyist Registration Fees). Based on revenues received during the initial phase of the program, staff will make necessary revenue budget changes as part of the FY 2016/17 Midyear Update. The fees will also be reviewed during the FY 2016-17 Citywide Cost of Services Study and revised as necessary as part of the Master Fee Update that will be presented with the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget."]}], [{"Title": "Request from Santa Monica Rent Control Board  to Conduct a Study to Determine Which Factors, if any, Contribute to an Owner's Decision to Withdraw Controlled Units from the Rental Market", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "10. Board and Commission Reports", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and comment on the Santa Monica Rent Control Board's request to study factors contributing to owners deciding to withdraw controlled units from the rental market, and direct staff to proceed with conducting such a study; 2. Allocate $80,000 of Council discretionary funds to conduct the study recommended by the Rent Control Board; and3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Rent Control Board has observed a marked increase in rental units being withdrawn from the housing market under the Ellis Act. Twenty nine units were withdrawn in 2013, 85 units were affected in 2014, and 153 units were withdrawn in 2015. Given that Council has identified inclusion and diversity as a top strategic goal, including preserving affordable housing, City staff joins the Rent Control Board to request Council authorize staff to initiate a study into what factors are contributing to this increase in units being removed from the market under the Ellis Act and how the City might develop new public policies to protect affordable housing in the community.", "Discussion", "Given the relatively marked increase in rental units being withdrawn from the Santa Monica rental market, the Rent Control Board passed a resolution requesting Council direct appropriate staff to research and analyze which factors, if any, make Ellis withdrawals more likely (Attachment A). Such factors might include land values, rates of appreciation, zoning, neighborhood, building size, changes in ownership, the ratio of market to long-term rentals, and any other factors that staff might deem relevant. The Rent Control Board is committed to provide any information in its possession that will facilitate this research and analysis.", "It is the consensus of the Rent Control Board that a public purpose would be served by better understanding, based on firm data, what factors lead some landlords to withdraw property from the rental market. The Board believes that if contributing factors can be identified, city policies might be amended to respond to those factors, thereby reducing the loss of controlled housing.", "City staff support the need for addressing the loss of affordable rental units and request Council authorize up to $80,000 in Council discretionary funds to conduct this study. Council discussed making an allocation for this study during budget adoption at the June 14 Council meeting. Staff will evaluate the best approach and perform the necessary procurement steps to identify the most qualified consultant or firm to conduct this study.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "A study to determine which factors, if any contribute to an owner\u2019s decision to withdraw controlled units from the rental marked is anticipated to cost $80,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 City Council budget. If additional funding is needed, staff will return to Council."]}], [{"Title": "Annual Appointments to Boards and Commissions", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Commission on the Status of Women for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Architectural Review Board for a term ending on 06/30/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Designation of voting delegate and alternate(s) for the League of California Cities Annual Conference and Business Meeting, to be held October 5 through October 7, 2016, in Long Beach, California.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown that the City Council authorize the City Manager and staff, working with the Santa Monica Sister Cities Association, to begin negotiations with the City of Galway, Ireland, for educational, cultural, and other exchanges under our Sister City program", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown that the City Council authorize use of his own Council travel funds to attend the Railvolution conference, October 9 through 12 in San Francisco.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez, Mayor Pro Tem Winterer, and Councilmember McKeown that Council support Metro\u2019s Los Angeles County Traffic Improvement Plan, and adopt a resolution recommending voter approval in the November 8, 2016, election of a half-cent sales tax to fund transportation improvements in Los Angeles County, including accelerated rail system expansion to build on Santa Monica\u2019s Expo connectivity, other traffic relief, increased local return for Santa Monica mobility projects, and additional benefits.\u201d", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1533857400": [], "1532651400": [[{"Title": "Commendation: Santa Monica Little League 2016 Majors Division Champions", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "City Manager's Report: Breeze Bike Share", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Professional Service Agreement to Provide Operation, Maintenance, and Monitoring Services for the Landfill Gas Extraction System at the City Yards", "Department": "Public Works, Facilities Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 81 to ES Engineering Services, a California-based company, to operate, maintain, and monitor the landfill gas extraction system currently operating at the City's Municipal Yard;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with ES Engineering Services, in an amount not to exceed $131,926 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal option(s) for a total amount not to exceed $671,623 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Since 1998, the City has been operating a landfill gas extraction and treatment system to collect and treat landfill gases generated from the former landfill located under portions of the City\u2019s Municipal Yard (City Yards) and Gandara Park. Landfill gas monitoring is performed to determine if the control system is adequately preventing potentially hazardous gases from permeating through the landfill cover. The current contract with ICF International (#9359 CCS) is due to expire on August 26, 2016. In June 2016, the City conducted a competitive selection process for the operation, maintenance, and monitoring services for the landfill gas extraction system at the City Yards. After reviewing the four bids submitted, staff recommends ES Engineering Services as the best firm to provide these services in an amount not to exceed $671,623 over a five-year period.", "Background", "Portions of the City Yards (2500 Michigan Avenue) and Gandara Park (1819 Stewart Street) lie over an inactive landfill. In response to the potential hazard of elevated concentration of toxic air contaminants, generated by the decomposition of the materials in the landfill, the City has installed and operated a landfill gas extraction system to collect and treat the landfill gases since July 1998. The main purpose of landfill gas collection is to control subsurface migration and surface emission of landfill gas in compliance with the federal and state regulations set to protect the public and environment. The composition of landfill gas could pose such hazardous effects as combustion, asphyxiation, carcinogens, smog formation, groundwater contamination and vegetation damage.", "A total of fifty-one gas monitoring probes have been installed throughout the landfill to monitor subsurface landfill gas concentrations which indicate whether high levels of landfill gas are escaping from the landfill surface or whether the landfill gas collection and control system is effectively working to minimize emissions. Field measurement for landfill gas composition is commonly done using a GEM2000, a portable electronic instrument, which measures the percentage of methane, carbon dioxide, oxygen and nitrogen present.When required, or necessary for verification, field samples are sent to analytical laboratories for testing using various Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) methods.", "The system is permitted by the South Coast Air Quality Management District and the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services. Permit and operational conditions for the extraction system require periodic monitoring and adjustment to maintain maximum gas extraction, treatment effectiveness, and regulatory compliance. In addition, the City is required to submit monitoring reports to both agencies on a quarterly basis.", "Due to the complexity and specialized nature of the engineered system, it is necessary that these services be provided by a consultant experienced in landfill gas projects. Although the system must remain in constant operation, several factors restrict the City's ability to develop a comprehensive and cost effective scope of services for a period beyond five years. Landfill gas conditions are dynamic and vary over time as the extraction system effectively mitigates different sections of the site. Additionally, the City Yards Modernization Plan may result in significant infrastructure changes that could require a reconfiguration of the existing extraction and treatment systems.", "Discussion", "Through multiple competitive selection processes, the City has been using ICF International (formerly ICF Consulting Services) to provide operation, maintenance, and monitoring services for the landfill gas extraction system at the City Yards since 2002. On April 26, 2011, Council authorized a contract with ICF, per Attachment A. The current agreement, contract #9359 (CCS), was executed on August 25, 2011 and is set to expire on August 26, 2016.", "Consultant Selection", "On March 26, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide operation, maintenance, and monitoring services for the landfill gas extraction system at the City Yards in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 45 vendors downloaded the RFP. Four firms (Biogas Engineering, ES Engineering Services, ICF International, SCS Field Services) responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by staff from the Public Works Department.", "Evaluation was based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, including previous experience, quality of product, and ability to deliver and comply with all City criteria. ES Engineering is being recommended as the best qualified firm.  The firm had the most qualified and experienced project manager who ranked significantly higher in technical competency and references than the other proposers. The firm has been managing similar landfill gas control projects for various municipalities, including the City of Newport Beach and the Garden Grove Sanitary District, and clients expressed satisfaction over the company\u2019s professionalism and expertise.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to ES Engineering Services is for an amount not to exceed $671,623 over a five-year period. Funds of $109,938 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Work Department. The agreement will be charged to", "account 014523.555010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid for Refuse Bin Repair", "Department": "Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4244 to Weldworx, Inc., a California-based company, for refuse bin repair (welding services);2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Weldworx, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $60,000 for one year, with 4-additional 1-year renewal option(s), on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $300,000 over a 5-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City contracts out refuse bin repair for the metal and plastic bins used by the Resource Recovery & Recycling Division collection program. The one-stop repair service includes welding, painting, lid assembly, parts replacement, etc. In May 2016, the City solicited bids for such services. After reviewing the one bid received, staff recommends Weldworx, Inc. to provide refuse bin repair for a total not to exceed amount of $300,000 over the five-year period. This recommended action is consistent with Council-approved Policy for hiring contracted staff for non-professional services due to specialized/technical expertise, workforce flexibility.", "Background", "The City container replacement program provides for the ongoing replacement of the more than 4,000 bins used throughout the City on a daily basis. The lifespan of these containers ranges from 5 to 8 years depending on the composition of the bin (metal or plastic) and the material disposed (refuse, organics or recycling).", "In an effort to address rising costs for new containers and to utilize existing containers as long as possible, staff procured the services of an outside welder/fabricator to repair the existing bins and prolong replacement in 2003. Minor repairs such as replacing the wheel assembly, lids or locking bars can extend the life of a bin by approximately 3 \u2013 5 years.", "In FY 2011-12 staff began tracking the purchases of containers by material and size. These records show that the annual purchase of metal bins decrease from 155 to 80 and plastic bins from 285 to 237 in a 4 year period, resulting in an annual savings of approximately $96,800.", "On December 10, 2013 Council awarded Bid #4104 to Weldworx, Inc. for refuse bin repair services (Attachment B). Since 2003, over 6,000 bins have been repaired extending their useful life.", "Discussion", "The City requires welding services to repair refuse and recycling bins to extend the life of the container. In the majority of the cases, the bins are still usable as they near the end of their life expectancy.", "Repair services include replacing the wheel assembly, lids or locking bar; repairing the pull handles, fork channels, and leach bars; and straightening and aligning the side panels. The contractor is required to have his or her own tools and equipment and be able to travel to businesses in the city to weld a chain and lock to the metal bins at locations where locks are constantly being lost or misplaced.", "Method of Service", "On January 13, 2015, Council adopted a Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-needed Staff for Non-professional Services (Attachment C). This policy includes criteria under which contracting for a public service is appropriate. Staff has reviewed the service needs, and recommends continuing to provide refuse bin repair services through a contractor due to the following criteria:", "\u00b7 Specialized/Technical Expertise: Service requires technical or specialized expertise that City staff could not or does not provide, and is outside of core services mission of the department.", "\u00b7 Workforce Flexibility: Service is seasonal, unpredictable, or on-call basis. The use of contract services provides the City with an opportunity to redefine or adjust service levels as necessary to address demand.", "Vendor Selection", "In May 2016, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to provide refuse bin repair services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Sixteen vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on May 20, 2016, per Attachment A. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, quality of service, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; there were no responses.", "Staff conducted additional outreach and looked at pay rates for welders in the Los Angeles area to ensure that pricing proposed by Weldworx is competitive in the current marketplace. Weldworx, Inc. is the City\u2019s current vendor; its prices remain unchanged since 2010 and the services provided are excellent. Based on these criteria, Weldworx, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder.", "Alternatives", "If the City were to provide refuse bin repair using in-house staff, staff estimates a cost difference of $31,387 including $20,000 one-time for equipment and $71,387 ongoing for staffing and safety equipment. To bring the service in-house a 0.5 FTE Welder Fabricator position would be needed along with start-up equipment such as light and heavy gauge welding machine, metal sheet forming equipment, air compressor, grinder, various cutting tools, and flame cutting torches. Based on the demand for skilled construction personal in the region the City would be hard pressed to find an individual able and willing to meet specifications for a part time position. In addition, by contracting out these services the City ensures that they only pay for completed units ensuring maximum productivity.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Weldworx, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $300,000. Funds of $60,000 are included in the FY 2016-17 Budget in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to account 27441.544260. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Memoranda of Understanding with Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District and Santa Monica Pier Corporation for CityTV's Video Production and Airing of School Board Meetings and the Twilight Concert Series", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Office of Communications", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to enter into a one-year Memorandum of Understanding with Santa Monica Pier Corporation (SMPC) with an option to renew for two additional one-year periods, for the Office of Communications, CityTV, to produce, air, and archive the Twilight Concert Series and authorize a reduction of the Council-approved CityTV Production Services rates, resulting in a flat rate payment to the City of $7,500 annually plus craft services for CityTV crew; 2. Authorize the City Manager to enter into a one-year Memorandum of Understanding with Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) with an option to renew for two additional one-year periods, for the Office of Communications, CityTV, to produce, air, and archive the School Board Meetings, and authorize a one-year waiver of the Council-approved CityTV Production Services rates.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff requests Council authorization for the City Manager to enter into separate Memoranda of Understanding (MOU) with Santa Monica Pier Corporation (SMPC) and Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) for CityTV to produce, air, and archive video content for the Twilight Concert Series and the School Board Meetings, respectively. Prior to adoption of the FY 2016-17 budget, there had not been a formal fee schedule for CityTV video production services. Thus, in prior years, services were provided for a portion of the cost or at no charge. In June, Council adopted a fee schedule for CityTV services.", "Staff requests authorization for a reduction from the CityTV adopted fee schedule for filming the Twilight Concert Series. This fee reduction is supported by SMPC. Staff is also requesting a one-year fee waiver for filming the School Board Meetings. This fee waiver is important to implement as the meeting coverage provides original content for airing on CityTV, serves to keep the community informed, and allows time for SMMUSD to budget accordingly. The new fee schedule with a one-year fee waiver has been discussed with SMMUSD. These MOUs are necessary to outline a clear understanding of responsibilities and expectations and to address the fees associated with CityTV services.", "The SMPC presents the Twilight Concert Series each July through early September at the Santa Monica Pier, which provides the community with a much loved cultural tradition. CityTV has a long history of filming the concerts and airing them on channel 16, and in summer 2015 increased coverage from five or six concerts to all ten. SMPC contributed toward the cost of filming the additional concerts in the amount of $7,500, plus craft services for CityTV crew. Staff would like to formalize this relationship and payment amount through execution of a MOU.", "SMMUSD holds approximately 15 School Board Meetings at the District Board Room in Santa Monica which are filmed by CityTV. The remaining meetings are held in Malibu with the footage provided to CityTV for airing and archiving. Historically, CityTV video production services for School Board Meetings was provided at no charge. Staff recommends that this arrangement continue until FY 2017-18 to allow SMMUSD to budget for payment of CityTV services.", "Background", "Over the years CityTV has produced and aired a variety of video content in partnership with different organizations and individuals. Past productions have included the following shows, events and meetings: Connie Martinson Talks Books, Cheap Eats, Forever Yoga, Metro Motion, the Little League Championship Games, the Twilight Concert Series and the School Board Meetings.", "Council approved the attached fee schedule for CityTV video production services as part of the FY 2016-17 budget adoption on June 14, 2016. Previously there had not been an adopted fee schedule and production rates were negotiated by staff for each production. Staff recognizes the need to formalize arrangements for video production services and therefore is seeking authorization to enter into MOUs with SMPC and SMMUSD, and to implement fee reductions or waivers for these partnerships.", "Santa Monica CityTV has a long history with both the SMPC and SMMUSD to produce and air the annual Twilight Concert Series and School Board Meetings in an effort to keep the community entertained and informed. CityTV has filmed the Twilight Concert Series for approximately 20 years and has aired the concerts on CityTV for residents to view. These airings tend to be some of the most popular content aired on the City\u2019s channel 16.", "The School Board Meetings are usually held at the District Board Room at 1651 16th Street. CityTV generally records15 meetings per year. School Board Meetings held at the Malibu City Hall are recorded by the City of Malibu and provided to CityTV for airing on channel 16. Action was taken at the December 9, 1997 Council meeting to authorize CityTV to televise the School Board Meetings at the District Board Room on a delayed basis through June 1998. Although no further action by Council can be found, CityTV has continued to film and air the School Board Meetings without reimbursement of costs. Airing School Board Meetings provides the public the ability to remain informed about the opportunities and issues facing the District.", "Discussion", "Staff seeks to formalize the relationship with SMPC and SMMUSD for CityTV video production of the Twilight Concert Series and the School Board Meetings by entering into MOUs that outline expectations, responsibilities, and costs associated with the work performed by CityTV. Due to the community benefit derived from the relationships the City has with SMPC and SMMUSD for filming of the Twilight Concert Series and the School Board Meetings, staff recommends fee reductions or temporary waivers for these partnerships.", "Video production of the Twilight Concert Series involves use of the CityTV production truck, City staff and/or City contractors. Prior to the summer 2015 season, CityTV produced and aired five to six concerts per summer at no cost to the SMPC. This relationship benefited both parties in that SMPC negotiated artist clearances and offered original content for CityTV to air, while CityTV provided SMPC with footage to provide to artists and to make highlight reels. Last fiscal year, due to the concert\u2019s popularity, the City and SMPC agreed to have all ten summer 2015 concerts filmed and aired on CityTV with SMPC paying $7,500 toward production costs and providing craft services for the CityTV crew.", "SMPC is interested in the City continuing coverage of the Twilight Concert Series and notes that the concerts promote wellbeing through community connectedness. In addition, airing the concerts on CityTV provides access to these very popular cultural events for residents who are unable to attend the concerts in person. SMPC also indicated that if the cost for CityTV to film the concerts increases beyond their annual budget allocation of $7,500 plus craft services, they will have to forego or greatly reduce the number of concerts filmed as they have no way to monetize the footage. Based on the newly adopted fee schedule, the total cost would be $3,167 per concert ($31,670 annually), $24,170 more than SMPC paid the City for filming ten concerts during FY 2015-16. The cost breakdown is shown below:", "Twilight Concert Services - Services", "Cost", "Breakdown (FY 2016-17 Rate Schedule)", "Director", "$ 598.90", "1 @ $59.89/hour, 10 hours", "Production Engineers", "$ 534.60", "2 @ $26.73/hour, 10 hours", "Audio Operator", "$ 201.30", "1 @ $20.13/hour, 10 hours", "Camera Operators", "$ 714.80", "4 @ $17.87/hour, 10 hours", "Production Assistants", "$ 714.80", "4 @ $17.87/hour, 10 hours", "Editor", "$ 201.30", "1 @ $20.13/hour, 10 hours", "Motion Graphics Designer", "$ 201.30", "1 @ $20/13/hour, 10 hours", "TOTAL", "$ 3,167.00", "Per Concert", "$31,670.00", "10 Concerts", "Includes a waiver of the administrative fee and equipment rental fee.", "Due to the community benefit provided by CityTV\u2019s coverage of the Twilight Concert Series, staff recommends SMPC receive a fee reduction for CityTV video production services and implement a flat rate payment to the City in the amount of $7,500 annually plus CityTV crew craft services. In the event coverage of the remaining staffing costs become prohibitive to the Office of Communications, staff will return to Council for further direction.", "Taping the SMMUSD School Board Meetings requires utilization of the City\u2019s production truck with a crew of nine staff per meeting at a benefited cost of approximately $2,205.70, depending upon the length of the meeting. Production costs have risen over the years and with the adoption of a new fee schedule, a MOU addressing costs, as well as clarity regarding special meetings, is needed. The current costs for filming the School Board Meetings are outlined below:", "School Board Meeting - Services", "Cost", "Breakdown (FY 2016-17 Rate Schedule)", "Director", "$ 598.90", "1 @ $59.89/hour, 10 hours", "Production Engineers", "$ 534.60", "2 @ $26.73/hour, 10 hours", "Camera Operators", "$ 714.80", "4 @ $17.87/hour, 10 hours", "Production Assistants", "$ 357.40", "2 @ $17.87/hour, 10 hours", "TOTAL", "$ 2,205.70", "Per Meeting", "$33,085.50", "15 Meetings", "Includes a waiver of the administrative fee and equipment rental fee.", "The District is embarking on the process of purchasing camera and production equipment for its board room which when obtained, would reduce the cost associated with CityTV filming the School Board Meetings by approximately $982 per meeting ($14,731 annually). This new equipment would eliminate the need for camera operators and require only one production engineer, thereby reducing the cost of CityTV filming each meeting to approximately $1,223.60 ($18,354 annually). A purchase and installation date of the new equipment has not yet been determined.", "Due to the long standing history of CityTV providing coverage of the School Board Meetings and the need for SMMUSD to have time to plan accordingly, staff recommends that the City continue coverage of the School Board Meetings during FY 2016-17 at no charge and plan for implementation of the CityTV fee schedule beginning FY 2017-18. The CityTV fee schedule includes a waiver of the administrative fee and equipment rental fees for schools and non-profit organizations. Therefore, the fees charged to SMMUSD would be based only on the benefitted salary of direct service staff.", "Alternatives", "Without authorization for the City Manager to execute MOUs for video production services provided by CityTV for SMPC and SMMUSD, work will continue to be performed on an informal basis as determined through staff and client discussions, maintaining a higher risk of misunderstanding or miscommunication.", "Council may choose to waive all or none of the approved fees for CityTV\u2019s video production services for the Twilight Concert Series, or may choose to charge a flat rate of more or less than the $7,500 that was paid by SMPC during FY 2015-16 for ten concerts. Based upon the final cost, SMPC will determine how many of the concerts will be filmed and aired by CityTV.", "Council may choose not to waive fees for SMMUSD during FY 2016-17 and instead charge the adopted fees or a reduced fee for CityTV\u2019s video production services for the SMMUSD School Board Meetings held at the District\u2019s Board Room.", "Beginning FY 2017-18 Council may choose not to implement the adopted CityTV fee schedule and instead continue to offer CityTV services at no charge or at a reduced rate. Based upon the final cost, SMMUSD will determine how many of the School Board Meetings will be filmed and aired by CityTV each fiscal year.", "Next Steps", "The Office of Communications is in the process of outlining new CityTV programming for the channels and will return to Council in the coming months to request blanket authorization for the City Manager to enter into MOUs for all CityTV video production services.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The expenses associated with entering into MOUs with SMPC and SMMUSD are included in the FY 2016-17 budget in the City Manager's Department. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval. The expenses associated with filming the Twilight Concert Series and school board meetings are budgeted in account numbers 012072.511000 and012072.511500."]}, {"Title": "License Agreement with Film Independent for use of a portion of the 1550 Beach Parking Lot for the Independent Spirit Awards and Revision to the 1550 Lot Cultural/Entertainment Event Policy Guidelines", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a license agreement with Film Independent to use a portion of the 1550 lot for the Independent Spirit Awards from February 15 to March 1, 2017.2. Approve a revision to the 1550 PCH Lot Cultural/Entertainment Event Policy Guidelines to allow for soliciting multi-year event proposals.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with the 1550 PCH Parking Lot Cultural/Entertainment Event Policy (1550 Lot Event Policy), staff recommends holding the Independent Spirit Awards (ISA) in the 1550 lot on February 25, 2017. Last year marked ISA's relocation to the 1550 lot after 20 years in the 2030 Ocean Avenue beach lot following the implementation of changes to the Community Events Guidelines that closed the south beach lots as event venues. The proposed rental fee to the Beach Fund for the portion of the 1550 lot for this period is $93,795 and is included in the FY 2016-17 revenue projections for the Beach Fund. Based on the success of the ISA in the 1550 lot and the minimal impacts to the Pier and surrounding neighborhood, it is expected that the ISA will apply to return on an annual basis. Staff recommends that 1550 Lot Event Policy guidelines be revised to allow for the solicitation of multi-year event proposals for up to a period of three years.", "Background", "Council first approved a policy to allow commercial events in the 1550 PCH parking lot (1550 lot) on September 14, 2004 (see attachment A). The policy has been modified over time to provide greater flexibility in the review process and evaluation criteria, and to incorporate concerns of the Santa Monica Pier Corporation (SMPC). The policy has been used primarily to bring performances and exhibitions, such as Cirque du Soleil and Ashes and Snow, which take up a large footprint or occupy the lot for a longer time than is allowed under the Community Events Ordinance.", "The Independent Spirit Awards (ISA) had been held in the 2030 Ocean Avenue beach lot for the past 20 years until it was relocated to the 1550 lot for the 2016 award show. This is a one day awards show that is held in a large tent and requires about two weeks to set up and strike. The move to the 1550 lot was necessary when changes were made to the Community Events Site Guidelines to close the south beach lots as event venues.", "Council approved a license agreement with Film Independent to stage the 2016 ISA on a portion of the 1550 lot on August 25, 2015 (see Attachment B). The event was held on February 27, 2016 and ISA occupied the site from February 18 to March 2, 2016. Since this was a new venue, Film Independent staff worked closely with City departments to ensure a smooth and successful run. Overall, the event was very successful and had minimal impacts on the Pier and beach neighborhood.", "Discussion", "Vendor Selection", "On September 3, 2015, staff issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for the FY 2016-17 Event Season for entertainment or cultural events that extend beyond the three day maximum permitted under the City\u2019s Community Event Ordinance or large-scale single day events that exceed the allowable space in the beach lot. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding website in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Four hundred and ninety-two vendors were notified, fifty-two vendors downloaded the RFP. Two firms responded.", "Proposals were received from Film Independent for the 2017 ISA and from Firefly Field. The Firefly Field proposal was incomplete and did not include a site plan of the proposed event, which was to include circus acts. Further discussions with the Firefly Field proposal team revealed that this was a new venture and that neither the funding nor the event itself had been fully developed and the proposal was subsequently withdrawn. Based on the success of the 2016 ISA and follow up discussions with the SMPC and Pier lessees, staff is recommending that ISA return for 2017.", "Film Independent Proposal for 2017", "Highlights of the Film Independent proposal are as follows:", "\u00b7 Independent Spirit Awards would take place on Saturday, February 25, 2017", "\u00b7 The Occupation Period would run from February 15 to March 1, 2017", "\u00b7 ISA would occupy approximately 142,000 square feet of the lot, using 526 of the 1,173 spaces in the 1550 lot. The rental for the site is $93,795 for the two week period.", "\u00b7 ISA would work with the SMPC and Pier tenants to build on marketing efforts that began last year and continue to provide meals to ISA staff during the two week period,", "\u00b7 ISA would continue to work with local hotels to host sponsors, nominees, and talent; ISA booked 350 rooms in 2016.", "\u00b7 ISA would address the suggested improvements listed below that were raised during the de-briefing session with City departments and representatives of the Pier and Pier tenants", "2016 ISA Debrief Meeting Suggestions", "Following the ISA, staff met with representatives from the many departments and divisions involved in monitoring large scale events, including Police, Fire, Transportation, Parking, as well as representatives from the Pier and Pier tenants to review the event and provide suggestions for future improvements. Overall, the event was judged to be successful, with few issues and minimal impacts to the Pier tenants. ISA worked with Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT) and the SMPC to develop a \u201cStaycation\u201d for two Santa Monica residents that included tickets to ISA, a two night stay at the Wyndham Santa Monica Pier, and gift certificates to three Pier businesses. ISA also included a postcard in all the attendee\u2019s gift bags that included information about the businesses on the Pier. The major concern expressed by the SMPC and Pier tenants was the need for better planning and communication to manage employee parking on the day of the event. Other observations and suggestions include the following:", "\u00b7 No public safety problems; plan for extra Police deployment in the future.", "\u00b7 Create a buffer to keep pedestrians away from the bike path during the red carpet viewing.", "\u00b7 Review the shuttle route and reduce the number of shuttles from offsite lots; traffic safety officers were effective in keeping the shuttles moving through heavy traffic between the Civic Auditorium and the 1550 lot.", "\u00b7 Shift placement of tent to preserve parking along the north edge of the 1550 lot.", "\u00b7 Add more barricades and affix them in place.", "\u00b7 Continue to work with Pier on promotions and partnerships such as providing meals for the crew, hosting a viewing party on the Pier, offering the Pier tenants promotional tie-ins.", "\u00b7 Add bike valet.", "\u00b7 Improve pedestrian circulation within the 1550 lot to the entrance to the tent.", "Proposed Revision to the 1550 Beach Parking Lot Cultural/Entertainment Event Policy Guidelines", "The 1550 Lot Event Policy currently provides for the issuance of an RFP for the upcoming event season (Labor Day through Memorial Day) on an annual basis. This allows for proposals to be viewed at once to foster a competitive bidding process. The guidelines also provide for proposals to be submitted and reviewed on a rolling basis if they are submitted at least six months prior to the start date. With the exception of the 2014 event season, when two proposals were received, this process has generated either one or no proposals since the RFP process was introduced in 2011. While many event producers have expressed interest in the 1550 lot, the high cost of building the event infrastructure and extensive requirements for producing large scale events have resulted in very few feasible proposals.", "Given the likelihood that ISA will apply to return to the 1550 lot on an annual basis for the near future, staff recommends that the guidelines be revised to provide for consideration of proposals for up to three years. This would allow staff and the producer of an event that occurs on an annual basis to negotiate a license agreement for a three year term. This would provide predictability for City staff, the event producer, and Pier businesses and neighbors, who are most directly impacted by large events, as well as streamline the event planning process.", "Conditions at the Pier and the beach have changed since the 1550 Lot Event Policy was initiated to enliven the beachfront and attract visitors during the slower times of the year. As year-round activity has increased, there is no longer an \u201coff season;\u201d sunny weekends in January and February may be as busy as summer weekend days. The preferred time period for larger events is January through March. Under the proposed revision, if an event proposal meets the criteria and is approved for a three-year term, this time period would be removed from the Event Season for the three year period, however, proposals for the rest of the Event Season would still be considered through the rolling review process.", "Public Outreach", "Staff attended the June 20, 2016 SMPC meeting to review the 2016 ISA event and discuss the 2017 ISA proposal and suggested improvements. Staff also presented the proposed revision to the 1550 Event Policy guidelines to allow for multi-year proposals. The SMPC voted unanimously to welcome ISA back in 2017 and to support the multi-year proposal as a means to ensure predictability and to provide the opportunity to refine practices and procedures. The SMPC also reiterated its support for continuing cross marketing and cross promotions and keeping the loading in and out on a weekday to minimize disruption to operations", "Environmental Analysis", "The license Agreement with Film Independent for use of a portion of the 1550 lot is categorically exempt from environmental review pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) Guidelines, Section 15304(e), as these actions constitute minor temporary use of land having negligible effects on the environment.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Award of Bid for Security Services at the Annenberg Community Beach House", "Department": "Cultural Affairs (CCS)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Award Bid #4243 to DHS Private Security, Inc., a California-based company for security services at the Annenberg Community Beach House;2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with DHS Private Security, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $165,575 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options with a 3% annual increase, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $879,060 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Annenberg Community Beach House (Beach House) has contracted with a security firm since April 2009, adhering to the conditions of approval adopted by the City Council in May 2006, which require the City to provide on-site personnel year-round, including nighttime security staffing. Staff recommends the award of a bid to DHS Private Security, Inc. for security services at the Annenberg Community Beach House. The estimated expenditure for August 2016 through July 2017 is $165,575. The total estimated expenditure with the optional four one-year renewal options is $879,060.", "Background", "The Beach House sits on a five-acre parcel of Santa Monica State Beach. This property, originally developed by William Randolph Hearst for actress Marion Davies in the 1920s, has played an important role in Southern California life. After being known as the Marion Davies Estate, it became an ocean-front luxury hotel, then as a private beach club. The site opened as a public beach facility known as the Annenberg Community Beach House on April 25, 2009. The Beach House combines elements of the historic Marion Davies Estate with new amenities to create a truly unique community destination that is open to all. The vision of creating a vibrant public space was supported by extensive input from a range of City departments, concessionaires and contractors, the Recreation Parks Commission and community members. Funding for Beach House operations, as approved by the City Council in June 2008, points to the City\u2019s commitment to community-responsive programming, quality visitor services and a high level of maintenance and security.", "The Beach House is operated in adherence to requirements specified in the following governing documents:", "\u00b7 Statement of Official Action (Attachment A) \u2013 approved by City Council on May 25, 2006", "\u00b7 Settlement Agreement (Attachment B) \u2013 dated September 13, 2006", "\u00b7 Operations Plan (Attachment C) \u2013 dated February 20, 2009", "In accordance with the above-mentioned governing documents, the City is required to provide year-round on-site personnel including nighttime security staffing. Since opening its doors to the public in April 2009, the Beach House has worked with contractors to provide security staffing for evenings, holidays when the site is closed to the public, and other permitted functions as determined by staff.", "On January 19, 2010 (Attachment D), Council awarded Bid# 2988 to Alltech Protective Services for security guard services from January 2010 through June 2013.", "On July 23, 2013 (Attachments E & F), Council awarded Bid# 4070 to Eagle Security Services, Inc. for security guard services from August 2013 through June 2016.", "On August 26, 2014, the City Council directed staff to study the potential of contracted services being performed by in-house staff. Staff identified a total of 43 contracted services with a total annual cost of approximately $24 million, which includes security services for the Beach House, Big Blue Bus and the Library. Staff looked at a number of criteria such as workforce flexibility, specialized/technical expertise, space requirements, capital/equipment requirements, risk, proprietary control and length of time services are needed. Based on the level of training, certification and expertise, and the advantages of mitigating the City\u2019s exposure to levels of risk and liability, staff did not recommend bringing security services in-house.", "Discussion", "Due to the size and accessibility of the Beach House, contracted security personnel provide the level of security required in the governing documents for conditions of approval for the operations of the site. Security personnel patrol the grounds from dusk to dawn 365 days a year, to ensure the safety of employees and visitors, and that facilities and infrastructure are secure and protected from trespassing and vandalism.", "In addition to observing and reporting, duties for security personnel at the Beach House include:", "\u00b7 Providing regular roaming patrols at nighttime, checking in at electronic stations throughout the site", "\u00b7 Securing vehicle entrances to the Beach House parking lots and external doors", "\u00b7 Staffing property at night and holidays to monitor access, maintaining a high visibility presence, and taking appropriate measures to prevent trespassing, damage, or theft of Beach House property", "\u00b7 Assisting City of Santa Monica personnel, fire and law enforcement as necessary by providing perimeter access control, traffic direction or by acting as site liaison", "\u00b7 Enforcing rules and providing support to Beach House staff when hired for private events that may involve alcohol, are youth-focused, or attended by high-visibility individuals.", "Vendor Selection", "On May 3, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and provide security guard services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Four hundred eighteen vendors were notified, fifty-seven vendors downloaded the bid. Twelve bids were received and publicly opened on May 20, 2016 per Attachment G.", "Of the twelve bid responses received, one was rejected for vendor's failure to attend the mandatory job walk conducted on May 12, 2016. The eleven remaining bid responses were evaluated based on overall pricing provided. The three vendors with the lowest overall pricing per Attachment H were invited for interviews by a panel comprised of Community & Cultural Services Department and Finance Department staff.", "DHS Private Security, Inc., Eagle Security Services, Inc. and Alltech Industries, Inc. were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including overall price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of service, references, understanding of the scope of service, and compliance with City scope of work and specifications.  DHS Private Security, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder. This vendor offered the most alignment with the current Beach House scope of work and quality of service desired inclusive of: cost; combined experience in providing site security and private event security working with organizations such as Wiseman Residential and the American Liver Foundation; knowledge, experience and training of its management and field personnel; real-time response and reporting through use of technology; and hands-on responsive management.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to DHS Private Security, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $879,060. Funds of $165,575 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Community & Cultural Services Department. The agreement will be charged to account 11523.555010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Adding Chapter 7.70 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code Relating to the Regulation of Telecommunication Facilities on Public Property and in the Public Right of Way and Amending and Repealing Certain Provisions of Chapter 7.06 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code Relating to Telecommunication Facilities", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on July 12, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance adding Chapter 7.70 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code relating to the regulation of telecommunication facilities on public property and in the public right of way, and amending and repealing certain provisions of Chapter 7.06 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code relating to telecommunication facilities.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Proposed City Council Sponsored Measure to Amend Article XXII of the City Charter (the Oaks Initiative)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City approve the attached Resolution and its Exhibit 1 that would place on the November 2016 General Election ballot a City Council sponsored initiative measure amending City Charter Article XXII, known popularly as the Oaks Initiative.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meetings of June 28, 2016 and July 12, 2016, the City Council considered proposed language for amendments to the Oaks Initiative to be presented to the voters at the November 2016 general election. After hearing from the public and deliberating at some length, on July 12th, the Council reviewed and directed the preparation of final changes of the proposed measure. Exhibit 1 to the attached Resolution contains all changes requested by Council. A Resolution placing the proposed Charter amendment on the ballot is presented for final Council approval.", "Background", "As noted in prior staff reports, for several months efforts have been under way to address the limitations currently in Article XXII so as to strengthen and to better effectuate the purpose of the Oaks Initiative in Santa Monica. During this period, various suggested amendments have been discussed and considered. The law firm of Hueston Hennigan, the City Council, the City Attorney\u2019s Office and members of the public have all made suggestions. Council has considered the matter on four previous occasions. Council gave final direction and approval of proposed amendment language at its July 12th meeting.", "Discussion", "All proposed amendments, whether requested and approved at the July 12th Council meeting or at earlier meetings, appear in Exhibit 1 to the attached Resolution. The language changes discussed and made at the July 12th meeting appear in section 2206(a) and 2206(b).", "If adopted by the voters, the proposed measure would: expand the Oaks Initiative to make its prohibition applicable to both public officials and recipients of public benefits who confer personal or campaign advantages on public officials; facilitate enforcement by eliminating current ambiguity in the term \u201cpublic official\u201d; delineate enforcement responsibilities and procedures; specify that the Oaks prohibitions are intended to apply outside of the City; make express that remedies are cumulative; extend civil remedies to any violator; and exempt from the reach of the Oaks Initiative uncompensated volunteers serving local nonprofits that receive City grants.", "Staff recommends that Council adopt the attached Resolution placing the proposed measure, which would amend City Charter Article XXII, on the November 2016 ballot.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no financial impacts and no budget actions associated with the approval of this language. If the voters adopt the proposed amendments, there might be increased administrative costs associated with implementation. At this time, those costs are unknown but staff anticipates that they will not be substantial, particularly relative to the importance of the measure."]}], [{"Title": "Revenue and Advisory Measures for the November 2016 Ballot and Repeal Resolution Number 10977 (CCS)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: Adopt the attached resolution placing measures on the November 8, 2016 ballot (Attachment B) that would:repeal Resolution Number 10977(CCS), which was adopted July 12, 2016allow voters to express their preference that if a transaction and use tax increase is adopted, funds should be used to support public school programs and affordable housing;increase the transaction and use tax by one-half percent to a total of one percent;authorize certain members of the Council to submit arguments and rebuttals concerning the measure; and e. direct the City Attorney to prepare an impartial analysis of the measure.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting of July 12, 2016, the City Council adopted an ordinance increasing the current transfer and use tax by one-half percent. The increase, once effective, would bring the tax to a total of one percent. At that meeting, the City Council also adopted Resolution No. 10977(CCS), which placed the ordinance on the November 2016 ballot for approval by the voters. The ordinance would only take effect if approved by the voters. Unfortunately, Resolution No. 10977 (CCS) contained inadvertent errors that staff only recently discovered. Resolution 10977 (CCS) failed to include, as part of the ballot question presented to the voters, the revenue amount anticipated to be raised annually by the tax, and it also failed to include the duration of the tax. The attached resolution corrects these oversights. The new resolution repeals Resolution No. 10977 (CCS), adopted on July 12, 2016. As noted in the attached resolution, the proposed tax is anticipated to raise approximately $16 Million annually. The tax measure is without a sunset date. It will remain in effect until repealed or otherwise modified by the voters. As with Resolution No. 10977 (CCS), the attached resolution also contains an advisory question that asks the voters for their preference on how the increased revenue is to be allocated.", "Background", "As noted in the June 28th and July 12th, 2016, staff reports, each attached to this staff report, Santa Monica has a long history of supporting public schools and in supporting affordable housing. Last summer, the Council reaffirmed its commitment to: maintaining an inclusive and diverse community and learn + thrive. The proposed tax ordinance and the attached resolution further these goals. As the Council and community are well aware, despite Santa Monica\u2019s efforts to advance affordable housing programs and to provide adequate funding for public education, state-initiated changes to redevelopment law have eliminated most of the funding the City has used to preserve and to produce affordable housing. Public school funding remains unreliable and it has been hampered by a school financing structure that makes school districts ultimately reliant on the health of the State of California\u2019sbudgets.", "The proposed tax measure seeks to provide a stable and local source of funding. The revenue raised will go to the City's General Fund. The Council could use it to support schools and affordable housing, as well as any other public service funded by the General Fund, such as police, fire and library services.", "Discussion", "As noted above, the Council considered the proposed tax measure at its June 28th and July 12th, 2016, meetings. On July 12th, the Council voted to adopt the attached ordinance, which would increase the transfer and use tax by an additional one-half percent, bringing it to a total of one percent. The Council also adopted Resolution No. 10977 (CCS), placing the tax measure on the November 2016 ballot. The tax measure would only take effect if approved by the voters.", "Following the Council's July 12th meeting, staff discovered that Resolution No. 10977 (CCS) contained errors. It fails to state in its ballot question the amount of revenue that the tax would raise annually. It also fails to state the duration of the tax. Each is required by a recently enacted state law. The attached resolution corrects these oversights. It also repeals Resolution No. 10977 (CCS).", "According to the City's Finance Department's estimates, the proposed tax is anticipated to raise approximately $16 Million annually. This amount was discussed in the July 12, 2016, staff report. As with the current voter approved transfer and use tax, the proposed tax measure is without a sunset date. It too will remain in effect until ended by the voters.", "The advisory question remains the same as was adopted on July 12th.", "PROPOSITION \u201c \u201c: ADVISORY VOTE ONLY: If a local transactions and use tax is enacted in Santa Monica, should half its revenue be used to improve and maintain local public schools, including attracting and retaining high-quality teachers, expanding access to pre-schools, assisting at-risk students, and improving school technology, arts, music, math, and science instruction; and half to help preserve and ensure housing in Santa Monica that is affordable, protect residents from displacement by rising housing costs, and reduce homelessness?", "The new ballot question is as follows:", "PROPOSITION \u201c \u201c: To maintain and improve Santa Monica community services including support for preservation of affordable housing, reducing homelessness, school repair and improvement, education of Santa Monica children and students, and other general fund services, shall an ordinance be adopted to increase by one-half percent Santa Monica's transactions and use tax, subject to independent annual audits, all funds used locally, no money going to Sacramento, raising approximately $16 million annually, until ended by the voters?", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The cost of placing the measures on the ballot will be covered by the FY 2016-17 election budget. If voters approve the transaction and use tax measure, General Fund revenues are expected to increase by approximately $16 million per year. Actualrevenues in any year are affected by the general state of the economy and other factors related to purchasing of goods. Voter approval of the advisory measure would create significant new revenues to bolster the School District\u2019s educational programs and to restore the City\u2019s affordable housing programs."]}], [{"Title": "Public Hearing and Approval of the Stormwater Parcel Reports, and Stormwater Management User Fees and Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Taxes for Fiscal Year 2016-17", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and approve the proposed 2016 Stormwater Parcel Reports pursuant to the California Health and Safety Code, and Stormwater Management User Fees (unchanged) and Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Taxes (adjusted for inflation) for Fiscal Year 2016-17.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Each year, the City of Santa Monica produces two stormwater parcel fee reports listing each property in the City and the amount of the stormwater fees to be paid by each property owner. This information must be submitted by August 10 to the County of Los Angeles Tax Assessor for these fees to be incorporated into the county parcel tax bill. Adoption of the bill enables the City to receive its stormwater fees in the coming fiscal year. These fees support the City\u2019s Watershed Management Program.", "The Stormwater Management User Fee, and the Clean Beaches and Oceans Parcel Tax (Measure V) generate approximately $4 million annually. These funds are critical to the City\u2019s ongoing watershed management program, enable the City to comply with federal and state water quality regulations, and support the City\u2019s Watershed Management Plan and the Sustainable City Plan.", "The proposed 2016-17 Stormwater Management User Fee is $36 per Parcel Billing Unit (PBU). The proposed 2016-17 Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax is $99.29 per Basic Tax (BT).", "Background", "Stormwater Management User Fee", "On July 25, 1995 Council adopted an ordinance establishing the Stormwater Management User Fee to support stormwater management activities. The Los Angeles County Tax Auditor-Controller\u2019s Office is responsible for the collection of the annual fee, which is then forwarded to the City.", "The stormwater management program consists of:", "\u00b7 Periodic upgrades to the storm drain system,", "\u00b7 Enforcement of local, State and Federal stormwater regulations, such as the City's Urban Runoff Pollution Prevention Ordinance (SMMC 7.10) and the Los Angeles County National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit,", "\u00b7 Implementation of the Santa Monica Bay Restoration Plan,", "\u00b7 Installation of Best Management Practices, which are structures aimed at reducing the volume and pollutant load of urban runoff flowing into Santa Monica Bay, and", "\u00b7 Operation and maintenance of the City\u2019s storm drain system and Best Management Practices.", "Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax", "In November 2006, the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax was approved by Santa Monica voters for the purpose of implementing the City\u2019s Watershed Management Plan (Plan). The goals of the Plan are to reduce urban runoff pollution; reduce urban flooding; increase water use and conservation; increase recreational opportunities and open space; and increase wildlife and marine habitat. Revenues generated by this parcel tax can be used for operations and maintenance costs related to storm drainage systems, multipurpose capital improvement projects that improve the quality of urban runoff, and paying for any indebtedness incurred for these watershed protection purposes. Watershed management and pollution prevention activities of the Plan assist the City in complying with the Clean Water Act\u2019s National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit requirements, and new regulations promulgated by the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board relating to Total Maximum Daily Loads.", "Discussion", "The Stormwater Parcel Reports list all privately-owned parcels with their associated fees. The City must submit these reports to the Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller\u2019s Office by August 10, 2016, for inclusion on the 2016-17 tax rolls. However, a public hearing and Council approval are required prior to submittal. Notification regarding a public hearing was published in the Santa Monica Daily Press on", "July 2, 9, and 16, 2016. The 2016-17 Parcel Reports are also available for public review at the City Clerk\u2019s Office, Main Library and satellite libraries, and at the Office of Sustainability and the Environment website, specifically the Urban Runoff page.", "The Stormwater Parcel Reports are based on the current parcel database available for calculating the number of Parcel Billing Units (PBU), used for the Stormwater Management User Fee, and the Basic Tax (BT), used for the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax. PBUs and BTs are calculated based on land use, runoff factor, and parcel size, which are directly proportional to the amount of runoff generated by a given parcel.", "The proposed 2016-17 Stormwater Management User Fee is $36 per PBU, which is the same rate since the original 1995 rate was instituted; the Stormwater Management User Fee is fixed. This rate has no annual Consumer Price Index (CPI) adjustment.", "The proposed 2016-17 Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax is $99.29 per BT, which is $3.14 higher from the previous year ($96.15 per BT 2015) because the CPI increased 3.27% for the period February 2015 \u2013 January 2016. A CPI annual rate adjustment is included in section 7.64.040(e) of the voter approved Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Act.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Staff anticipates that the proposed Stormwater Parcel Fees would generate annual revenues of nearly $1.2 million; the proposed Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Taxes would generate annual revenues of nearly $3.1 million. Revenues are included in the FY 2016-17 Adopted Budget at accounts 34661.405500 (Stormwater) and06661.405490 (Clean Beaches)."]}], [{"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez and Mayor Pro Tem Winterer that Council support the designation of Kizugawa, Japan, as a friendship city as recommended by the Santa Monica Sister City Association.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Tony Vazquez and Mayor Pro Tem Ted Winterer, that the City Council place an item on the August 23, 2016, City Council agenda, regarding consideration of a resolution (1) expressing the City Council\u2019s intention to close the Santa Monica Airport to aviation use, as soon as that is legally permitted with a goal of June 30, 2018 and earlier if possible, and, upon compliance with applicable legal processes, to transition the land currently occupied by the Airport to uses consistent with Measure LC (Local Control), and (2) authorizing the City Manager to initiate all administrative measures necessary to implement the resolution, including commencement of planning and environmental review processes required by the California Environmental Quality Act and the State Planning Act.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1531441800": [[{"Title": "City Manager's Report:  Youth Tech Program", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "Proclamation declaring July 2016 as Park and Recreation Month", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Reject Bids for the Purchase of One Compressed Natural Gas Two Yard Dump Truck and Two Compressed Natural Gas Four Yard Dump Trucks", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Reject all bids for Bid #4240 for the purchase and delivery of One Compressed Natural Gas Two Yard Dump Truck and Three Compressed Natural Gas Four Yard Dump Trucks; 2. Direct staff to reissue a bid in order to obtain the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of One Compressed Natural Gas Two Yard Dump Truck and Three Compressed Natural Gas Four Yard Dump Trucks.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for maintaining and improving the City\u2019s parks, landscapes, urban forest, streets, and right-of-ways. This purchase would replace four existing compressed natural gas (CNG) dump trucks that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful lives through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The four existing vehicles are utilized by the Park Maintenance section, Urban Forest section, and the Street Maintenance section of the Public Works Department to transport bulk materials such as decomposed granite, mulch, topsoil, concrete, and asphalt to and from worksites throughout the City. In March 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of one CNG two yard dump truck and three CNG four yard dump trucks. After reviewing all submittals received, staff recommends rejecting all bids in order to obtain competitive pricing and encourage additional vendor participation.", "Discussion", "In March 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the purchase and delivery of one CNG two yard dump truck and three CNG four yard dump trucks, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 24 vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016, per Attachment A. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; two \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms were received. The first vendor that submitted a \u201cNo Bid\u201d form stated they could not furnish goods or services as specified because they only provide vehicles for leasing. The second vendor stated they could not bid on the portion of the bid with specifications requesting a Ford Super Duty, or equal, because the ordering window for 2016 closed and 2017 pricing was not available.", "Staff conducted additional outreach and determined that the order window for the 2016 CNG Ford Super Duty closed during the time the bid was open and 2017 pricing was not available. Since 2017 pricing is now available, staff recommends going back out to bid to obtain competitive pricing.", "One of the two vendors who submitted a bid only submitted their pricing pages and excluded the pages referencing the specifications, therefore their bid is non-compliant. The second vendor submitted bids for the first two specifications included in this bid and submitted a \u201cNo Bid\u201d for the third based on Ford order closure dates and pricing.", "Staff are unable to determine if the first vendor meets specifications because they did not include the specification portion of their bid; therefore staff has determined the bid to be non-compliant. The second vendor took exception to the location of the CNG tanks stating they could not be mounted underneath the vehicle and would have to be mounted behind the cab. The second vendor also took exception to the type of brakes requested and stated they would not provide power hydraulic, as specified, and would have to provide air brakes instead. Staff does not find the exceptions taken by the second vendor to be acceptable and in the best interest of the City.", "Staff recommends rejecting all bids received, and directing staff to issue a new bid for vehicles that meet the city\u2019s specifications, offers competitive pricing, and encourages additional vendor participation.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Award Design and Construction Contract for City Services Building Well", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #77 to BC2 Environmental, a California-based company, for the City Services Building Project exploratory boring and water supply drilling project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with BC2 Environmental, in an amount not to exceed $269,037(including a 10%contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within agreement authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica is seeking a California licensed well drilling contractor to install a boring that would serve the dual purpose of assessing the City\u2019s groundwater resources and supporting the innovative City Services Building project, which has as a design goal of meeting the Living Building Challenge requirements of net zero water and energy for the project. Specifically, the contractor would drill a boring approximately 650 feet deep in order to evaluate the presence of fresh groundwater. If fresh groundwater is discovered, a portion of the boring would convert to a shallow water supply well at a location on the northwest side of City Hall. This well would be utilized as a secondary source of water for the City Services Building Project. In April 2016, the City solicited bids for such services. After reviewing the five bids received, staff recommends awarding the contract to BC2 in an amount not to exceed $269,037.", "Background", "A primary objective of this project is to drill and obtain hydrogeologic data from a deep exploratory boring which would be used to assess the quantity and quality of the City\u2019s groundwater resources in this portion of the Coastal sub basin. A secondary objective of the project, if fresh groundwater is present, is to construct a shallow, small-diameter potable-supply water well to support the proposed City Services Building project (CSB). Once tested and permitted, groundwater from the well would be treated and utilized as a supplemental onsite water source for the CSB. The design of the potable well would be based on the hydrogeologic data obtained from the exploratory boring.", "The proposed deep exploratory boring would be drilled using standard water well drilling methods to collect samples, evaluate the subsurface geology, and obtain geophysical logging data from the borehole. A critical piece of data the City would collect is whether fresh groundwater water exists in the subsurface at this location, and if so, the depth to the subsurface interface between fresh groundwater water and saline groundwater. A direct benefit of this data is that it would support the City\u2019s strategic planning for long-term water self-sufficiency.", "The exploratory boring, and any subsequent potable supply well, would be co-located in the same borehole on the west side of City Hall (see Figure A). This location was selected in consultation with the CSB team (Architecture Services, Office of Sustainability and the Environment, and Water Resources), and the State Water Quality Control Board, Division of Drinking Water. For the purpose of permitting, the potable supply well, if constructed, would be designated Santa Monica City Hall Well No. 1 (SMCH Well No. 1).", "If determined to be feasible, the new well would be constructed in compliance with local codes and regulations and in accordance with the following documents: State of California Water Well Standards, Bulletin No. 74-81, dated December 1981, and its Draft Supplement Bulletin No. 74-90 dated June 1991; Sections 13800 through 13806 of the California Water Code, and; American Water Works Association (AWWA) Standard for Water Wells (AWWA A100-06). A geological consultant previously retained by the City (Richard Slade & Associates) would be on site to supervise the drilling and water well construction activities.", "Discussion", "The proposed CSB is planned to be an award winning self-sustaining facility that would employ innovative design and technical applications to achieve net zero energy and water. Net zero water would be primarily achieved through the harvesting and treatment of rainwater on site and the use of composting toilets almost eliminating water use for flushing. When precipitation is scarce, the project would rely on a supplemental water source provided by a shallow onsite groundwater well. The fresh groundwater would be treated onsite to potable standards acceptable to the State Water Resources Control Board Division of Drinking Water prior to use. The recommendation in this report would result in, among other things, the collection of necessary and valuable hydrogeologic data in support of the City\u2019s sustainable water planning and, if feasible, construction of the necessary shallow supply well for the CSB project.", "Vendor Selection", "On April 14, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and provide drilling and well construction work in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 32 vendors downloaded the bid. Five bids were received and publicly opened on May 19, 2016. Bid results are as follows (not including a 10% contingency):", "Bidders", "Base Bid", "BC2 Environmental", "$ 244,579", "ABC Liovin Drilling", "$ 273,084", "Cascade Drilling", "$ 274,710", "Yellow Jacket Drilling", "$ 291,422", "Hydro Resources West, Inc.", "$ 305,500", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff contacted references that were provided by BC2 Environmental for similar projects in La Puente, CA and Santa Barbara, CA.  Reference agencies reported that the work was produced in a timely and cost-efficient manner where quality was maintained throughout. Staff also verified that BC2 Environmental's contractor license is active and in good standing. Based on these criteria, BC2 Environmental, the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Timeline", "Work is scheduled to begin in the third quarter of 2016, and drilling operations would take approximately two to four weeks to complete. During this time the staff vehicles that normally park on the northwest side of City Hall would be temporarily directed to other parking locations. The schedule of work would be finalized and coordinated in consultation with the various offices which occupy City Hall. A work notice fact sheet would be distributed in advance of the planned work.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to BC2 Environmental is for an amount not to exceed $269,037.  Funds are available in the FY 2016-2017 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "C019045.589000", "Olympic Subbasin Remediation", "$244,037", "C014083.589000", "City Services Building", "$25,000", "Total", "$269,037"]}, {"Title": "Award Contractual Service Agreement for Pump Maintenance, Repair, and Purchase", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4251 to PumpMan, Incorporated, a California-based company, for pump maintenance, repair services, and the purchase of replacement equipment;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with PumpMan Incorporated, in an amount not to exceed $1,750,000 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City contracts for pump maintenance services, repair services, wet well cleaning, and the purchase of replacement equipment for wastewater, non-potable water, and chemical feed pumps at Wastewater treatment facilities. In April 2016, the City solicited bids for such services. After reviewing the one bid received, staff recommends awarding a contractual services agreement to PumpMan, Incorporated for a total not to exceed the amount of $1,750,000 for a five-year period.", "The recommended action is consistent with the Council-approved Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-Needed Staff for Non-Professional Services and meets the criteria of specialized/technical expertise, risk and capital/equipment requirements.", "Background", "The City owns and maintains various wastewater pumping plants that include the Moss Avenue Sanitary Sewer Pumping Station (MAPS), Pico-Kenter Urban Runoff Diversion/Pumping Station, Pier Diversion/Pumping Station, Montana Urban Runoff Diversion, Wilshire Urban Runoff Diversion/Pumping Station, and the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF). The MAPS and SMURRF facilities operate around the clock, while the diversion stations are shut down during storm events. All facilities are shut down for routine pump maintenance, system troubleshooting and repair, and for replacement of pump parts only as needed.", "Discussion", "The City of Santa Monica owns and maintains the Moss Avenue Wastewater Pump Station (MAPS) which is part of the City of Los Angeles Amalgamated Sanitary Sewer System. MAPS is a critical component of the City's sanitary sewer system and is located at 1625 Appian Way, near the Pier. MAPS includes a 50-foot deep wet well, which is a holding tank for the gravity-fed sewage system. As sewage enters the wet well and the water level rises, pumps move the sewage out, while solid material accumulates in the bottom of the wet well. MAPS typically pumps approximately three to five million gallons of sewage per day up 60 feet of elevation, where the sewage then flows by gravity to the City of Los Angeles Hyperion Treatment Plant. Special emphasis on regularly scheduled maintenance is placed on critical components of the operation, including all pump systems components and cleaning out the wet well. As part of the Los Angeles Amalgamated Sewer System agreement, Santa Monica\u2019s cost to operate and maintain the facility is fully reimbursed by the amalgamated system contract agencies.", "There are four low flow diversion (LFD) facilities in the City. These LFD facilities divert dry weather runoff and low flow storm events from the storm drain into the sanitary sewer system. The diversion stops the flow of polluted urban runoff from reaching the Santa Monica Bay. LFD facilities contain submersible pumps that move the runoff through the system.", "The Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF) treats dry weather runoff water. It is located next to the MAPS facility. A maximum of 500,000 gallons per day of runoff can be treated for use in landscape irrigation and dual-plumbed systems. Pumps are used to move the water through the distribution system. The City splits the operating and maintenance costs for this facility with the City of Los Angeles.", "Council approved contracted staff for this service as part of the January 13, 2015 Contract and As-Needed Staffing Review (Attachment B). There is currently one Wastewater Treatment Plant Operator who operates, maintains, and performs small repairs of both the MAPS and SMURRF facilities. City staff contacts the contracted vendor to perform preventive maintenance, emergency repairs, major repairs, pump replacement, and wet well cleaning as needed. The contractual service criteria met back in 2015 were specialized/technical expertise, capital/equipment requirements, and risk. The service requirements have not changed substantially since that analysis.", "Vendor Selection", "In April 2016, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver/provide water and sewage pump contractor maintenance services and repairs in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions.  Twenty-two vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on May 6, 2016 per Attachment A. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work.", "Water Resources Division staff conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid. Of the five responses received, one vendor maintains and repairs freshwater pumps only, one vendor is a small subcontractor of the incumbent vendor, one vendor relies on City staff and equipment to assist with the work, one vendor felt the work was out of its scope of services, and the last vendor could service wastewater pumps, but not the electrical portions of pumps that are included in the City's system.", "PumpMan is able to provide all of the necessary pump services and repairs and also has the required qualifications. In business since 1977, PumpMan serves a number of surrounding municipal customers, including Los Angeles, Culver City, Beverly Hills, Long Beach, Manhattan Beach, and Redondo Beach. Staff did additional outreach and verified that proposed rates are consistent with other municipalities. The city has the discretion to cancel the services within 30 days, if the market changes or if the city finds an alternative way to receive these services, while still taking advantage of the price benefit associated with bidding for a longer time period. In addition, PumpMan has satisfactorily performed service and repair of City of Santa Monica Wastewater Division pumps for the past twelve years, and has a history of positive interaction with the Wastewater Division. Staff verified with the Contractors State License Board that the D-21 Machinery and Pumps Contractor license for PumpMan (#536459) is current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, PumpMan, Incorporated is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to PumpMan, Incorporated is for an amount not to exceed $1,750,000.  Funds of $350,000 are available in the FY 2016/17 budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts.  Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "31661.566450", "Sewage Pump Maintenance", "$225,000", "31661.566631", "SMURRF Plant Maintenance", "$125,000", "Total", "$350,000"]}, {"Title": "Award Contractual Services Agreements for Water/Wastewater Facilities and Equipment Painting Services", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4252 to Pearl Painting, a California-based company, as primary vendor for painting services for Water/Wastewater facilities; and secondary vendor for painting services for fire hydrants and Water/Wastewater equipment such as vault covers; and U.S. National Corp., a California-based company, as primary vendor for painting services for fire hydrants and Water/Wastewater equipment; and secondary vendor for painting services for Water/Wastewater facilities.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Pearl Painting, in an amount not to exceed $480,000 over a five-year period on the same terms and conditions, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with U.S. National Corp., in an amount not to exceed $367,000 over a five-year period including 10% annual increases, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City contracts for painting services in order to properly maintain its water treatment and wastewater processing facilities, reservoirs, booster pumps and emergency generator stations along with approximately 1,400 fire hydrants and assorted equipment located throughout Santa Monica including air vents, piping and water meter vault covers. In April 2016, the City solicited bids for such services. After reviewing the six bids received, staff recommends a split bid award: Pearl Painting would provide facility painting services on an hourly rate basis for a total not to exceed amount of $480,000 over a five-year period; and U.S. National Corp. would provide painting services for fire hydrants and vault covers on a fixed-price basis for a total not to exceed amount of $367,000 over a five-year period. Each contractor would serve as a back-up to the other for their respective services.", "Due to the amount of painting and travel time required to paint facilities and equipment located throughout Santa Monica and two sites in West Los Angeles (Arcadia Water Plant and Charnock Well Field), contractor services are required to supplement the efforts of the City's Paint Shop. Therefore, the recommended actions are consistent with the Council-approved Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-Needed Staff for Non-Professional Services and meet the criteria for space requirements and capital/equipment requirements.", "Discussion", "The City owns and maintains water and wastewater equipment located throughout Santa Monica including piping, air vents, meter vault lids and approximately 1,400 fire hydrants. In addition, the City maintains water and wastewater treatment facilities located in Santa Monica and West Los Angeles including the Arcadia Water Treatment Plant (1228 S. Bundy Drive), Charnock Well Field (11375 Westminster Avenue), Moss Avenue Pumping Station (1621 Appian Way), Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF, 1625 Appian Way), various reservoirs, booster pumps and emergency generator stations. Structures are painted every ten years and fire hydrants every two years or on an as-needed basis depending on observed conditions to prevent corrosion and deterioration, and preserve the aesthetics of the City's infrastructure. Painting services are also required for new equipment installations.", "A portion of painting costs for wastewater treatment facilities would be covered by the City of Los Angeles per existing maintenance agreements including 100% reimbursement for work completed at the Moss Avenue Pumping Station and 50% reimbursement for the SMURRF.", "Method of Service", "On January 13, 2015, Council adopted a Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-Needed Staff for Non-Professional Services (Attachment B). This policy includes criteria under which contracting for a public service is appropriate. Staff has reviewed the service needs, and recommends providing painting services through contractors due to the following criteria:", "1. Capital / Equipment Requirements - paint truck(s) would be required along with purchase of associated equipment such as sprayers, ladders, and safety gear. Paint storage and parking would also need to be identified or created at Water/Wastewater locations. The current City Yards location, where Water/Wastewater operations are housed, is already at capacity. It would be problematic to add additional parking and additional space for equipment at this location.", "2. Risk - some painting would occur in confined spaces and subterranean locations as well as painting piping and tanks in elevated locations, painting mechanical equipment and painting in the vicinity of water treatment chemicals.", "Vendor Selection", "On May 4, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide painting services for Water/Wastewater facilities and equipment in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 38 vendors downloaded the bid. Six bids were received and publicly opened on May 16, 2016 per Attachment A.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications.", "Pearl Painting offered the lowest hourly rates and has provided Water/Wastewater painting services satisfactorily over the past three years. U.S. National Corp. offered the lowest \"per-piece\" pricing for fire hydrant painting and the second lowest pricing on vault cover painting. Despite annual 10% price increases, U.S. National Corp.'s per-piece pricing would remain the lowest of the six bidders each year over the proposed five-year agreement period. By splitting the bid award, the City would achieve the best pricing on painting services whether quoted on an hourly rate or per-piece basis; and achieve an estimated $72,468 savings over a five-year period versus awarding this bid to a single contractor. Each contractor would also be able to serve as the back-up to the other in case of availability or response time issues. U.S. National Corp is a larger painting company able to deploy up to eight painters and three trucks to Santa Monica / West Los Angeles if needed; while Pearl Painting is a sole proprietorship based locally in Santa Monica.", "Staff verified that the Painting and Decorating (C33) contractor\u2019s licenses for both vendors are current, active, and in good standing. Staff also checked references with the Inland Empire Utilities Agency and Coachella Valley Unified School District and found both contractors had satisfactorily performed similar painting work in a timely and cost-efficient manner where quality was maintained throughout.", "Based on these criteria, Pearl Painting is recommended as the best bidder to perform painting services on Water/Wastewater facilities and other work quoted on an hourly rate basis; and U.S. National Corp. is recommended as the best bidder to perform painting services on fire hydrants and vault covers on a fixed per-piece pricing basis.", "Alternatives", "If the City were to provide painting services using in-house staff, staff estimates a cost difference of $80,798 for Year 1, including $53,000 one-time for paint truck and start-up equipment and $177,798 ongoing for staffing and equipment ($230,798 total Year 1 cost).  To bring the service in-house 2 FTE Painter would be needed along with start-up equipment such as paint truck, sprayers, ladders, and safety gear.  The proposed not to exceed amount for contractors Pearl Painting and U.S. National Corp. is $150,000.  Over the five-year agreement, in-house costs are estimated at $1,035,446 versus contractor costs estimated not to exceed $847,000, a difference of $188,446. With prevailing wage now applicable to City maintenance agreements greater than $15,000 established after April 2015 per changes to the California Labor Code, the cost gap between contractor services and in-house staff has narrowed significantly for painting services.  The City's previous Water/Wastewater painting contractor rate was $28 per hour for fiscal years 2013/14 to 2015/16 under Santa Monica Living Wage requirements compared to current bids of $42.20 per hour for Pearl Painting and $75 per hour for U.S. National Corp. at prevailing wage rates.", "The City's Facilities Maintenance Paint Shop is staffed with two full-time painters who are responsible for painting the City's inventory of approximately 170 structures. Over the past three years, Facilities painters have devoted an average of 275 hours per year to painting Water/Wastewater sites to supplement the efforts of contractor services. However, requesting additional painting services for fire hydrants, vault covers and Water/Wastewater facilities including extensive piping would put an undue burden on staff and lead to significant delays for other City Departments requesting Facilities painting services.", "Should the City opt to hire additional painters for the purpose of painting water and wastewater facilities and equipment, the agreements with Pearl Painting and U.S. National Corp. could be reduced in value and/or term.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Pearl Painting is for an amount not to exceed $480,000. Funds of $90,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement to be awarded to U.S. National Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $367,000. Funds of $60,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "Account Number", "Pearl Painting", "Amount", "U.S. National Corp.", "Amount", "Total", "25671.555010", "$10,000", "$50,000", "$60,000", "25672.555010", "$25,000", "$0", "$25,000", "25673.555010", "$25,000", "$0", "$25,000", "31661.555010", "$10,000", "$10,000", "$20,000", "31661.566450", "$10,000", "$0", "$10,000", "31661.566631", "$10,000", "$0", "$10,000", "TOTAL", "$90,000", "$60,000", "$150,000"]}, {"Title": "Santa Monica Pier Corporation FY 2016/17 Budget and Work Plan", "Department": "Pier Management, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the Santa Monica Pier Corporation Board\u2019s FY 2016/17 Budget and Work Plan.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff is presenting to Council for approval the proposed Santa Monica Pier Corporation (SMPC) Budget and Work Plan for FY 2016/17. The Work Plan summarizes the activities, projects and programs SMPC intends to carry out during the Fiscal Year. The organization\u2019s FY 2016/17 total revenues are projected to be $2,177,217, which include City funding of $713,217, and total expenditures are projected to be $2,147,500 (Attachment A).", "Background", "The Santa Monica Pier Restoration Corporation (PRC) was originally formed in 1983 for the purpose of assisting the City in restoring a Pier devastated by winter storms. In 2012, the SMPC was reconstituted, renamed and refocused on event production, marketing, sponsorships, and community engagement. In addition, Council tasked the SMPC to assist the City with the development and revision of Pier policies and guidelines for Council approval.", "The Pier enters its 107th year as the City\u2019s most visible and visited destination. To underscore this achievement, the Santa Monica Pier was nominated as one of USA Today\u2019s 2016 Best Boardwalks in the United States, and was also recently recognized as one of the top 10 most Instagrammed locations in the world.", "The Services Agreement between the City and SMPC approved by Council on July 14, 2015 requires the preparation of an annual budget and work plan. In accordance with the Services Agreement, SMPC is submitting its FY 2016/17 budget and work plan for Council review and approval.", "Discussion", "Santa Monica Pier Corporation is a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization that is under contract with the City to oversee event management and production, marketing, and sponsorships, as well as to assist the City with seeking public input on the formulation of policies and guidelines concerning the Pier. Guidelines for the Pier include leasing, sponsorship and marketing standards. In anticipation of the arrival of Expo light rail, the completion of Colorado Esplanade, as well as the upcoming replacement of the existing Pier Bridge, SMPC has also completed a series of public workshops that resulted in the preparation of a Pier Use and Access Study with recommendations on how to support the Pier\u2019s continued vibrancy and vitality as well promote improved fiscal and environmental sustainability. This study and SMPC\u2019s recommendations will be presented to Council at a future date.", "The Pier Access and Use Study and recommendations will also be presented to Council in the future.", "FY 2016-17 Budget", "SMPC projects total revenues for FY 2016-17 in the amount of $2,177,217 and expenditures in the amount of $2,147,500 (Attachment A). Budgeted revenues include City\u2019s grant funding of $713,217 which includes $200,000 to support the SMPC\u2019s production of the Twilight Concert Series now in its 32nd season. Non-City funded revenue sources account for an additional $1,464,000 in anticipated revenue generated from the SMPC\u2019s management and coordination of event deck rentals, film permits, carousel rentals, corporate promotions, and arts and lifestyle programing.", "Expenditures related to the management of carousel and pier deck rentals, and the establishment and operation of the visitor center are projected to be $246,500. Costs related to staff salaries including benefits and insurance will be $798,000. Expenditures related to programming including the Twilight Concert Series, other annually recurring events and new programming opportunities are projected to be $1,103,000.", "The SMPC presents a balanced budget for FY 2016/17 with a projected surplus of $29,717 which will be earmarked for public community events.", "FY 2016-17 Work Plan", "The stated goal of the FY 2016-17 Work Plan is \u201cto elevate the visitor experience of the Pier for all audiences.\u201d The SMPC\u2019s strategy to accomplish this goal is presented in the attached work plan for FY 2016/17 (Attachment B). The work plan focuses on the following four areas:", "1. Develop a Pier Access & Use Study implementation plan,", "2. Evaluate the impacts of the Expo Line on Pier traffic and safety,", "3. Ensure the Pier\u2019s interests are communicated in the Local Coastal Plan update,", "4. Sustain core programing.", "Commission Action", "The Pier Corporation Board of Directors approved the FY 2016/17 Budget and Work Plan on April 25, 2016.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Funds in the amount of $713,217 for the Santa Monica Pier Corporation are available in the FY 2016/17 Budget in the Public Works Department at account 30454.577300. Approval of the work plan and budget for FY 2016/17 has no additional budget or financial impact on the City.", "Prepared by: Elana Buegoff, Sr. Development Analyst", "Attachment A. Santa Monica Pier Corp FY 2016/17 Budget", "Attachment B. Santa Monica Pier Corp FY 2016/17 Work Plan"]}, {"Title": "Award Purchase Order for Parking Permit Materials & Related Services", "Department": "Parking Operations (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 75 to Rydin Decal, an Illinois-based company, for parking permit materials and related services;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Rydin Decal for parking permit materials and related services in the amount not to exceed $80,000 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options to extend on the same terms and conditions, for a total amount not to exceed $400,000 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City currently issues approximately 70,000 parking permits annually for its various parking permit programs with the use of vinyl decals and plastic hangtags. The City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) in March 2016 to explore the possibility of using more environmentally-friendly parking permits that can meet enforcement and permit processing requirements and objectives while achieving greater cost savings. Staff determined that options for more environmentally-friendly permits were limited since the permits needed to weather environmental extremes and curb abuse and counterfeiting. Alternative methods of being more environmentally friendly with parking permits include not mixing permit materials in the administration of parking permits and ensuring that materials used in parking permits are recyclable. Staff recommends Rydin Decal as the best qualified vendor to furnish and provide parking permit materials and related services in the amount not to exceed $80,000 for FY2016-17, with four additional one-year renewal options to extend on the same terms and conditions, for a total amount not to exceed $400,000 over a five year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Background", "The majority of the City\u2019s residential areas have preferential parking restrictions that are currently administered and enforced through the use of parking permits. The City issues over 55,000 permits a year for the preferential parking program with the assistance of a permit processing vendor, Xerox State & Local Solutions. In addition, the City issues over 15,000 beach and specialty parking permits per year for parking privileges at the beach lots and other areas throughout the city with most of the transactions taking place over the counter at the City\u2019s Parking Operations Division.", "The City relies on Xerox for the materials required to produce preferential parking permits, which is allowed under its current agreement, while City staff procures the materials required to produce beach and specialty permits every year. The City spent about $110,000 on parking permit materials in FY 2015-16.", "Discussion", "The current procurement process for parking permit materials involves having a City vendor obtain the products on the City\u2019s behalf for a portion of the materials needed, and this process needs to be repeated every year. If there are any program changes during a permit year that affect the materials used, additional bids are necessary in order to implement the changes. Since staff already conducts informal bids for beach and other specialty parking permits, the City can benefit from a greater quantity discount by procuring the permit materials for all permits directly. The terms and conditions to be established with the recommended vendor will also provide the City with greater flexibility should there be program changes to be implemented during a permit year. The RFP process allows staff to streamline the procurement process for parking permit materials while achieving greater cost savings and compliance with the City\u2019s purchasing policy.", "The City spent about $110,000 in FY 2015-16 to procure parking permit materials. Staff estimates the cost to purchase parking permits in FY 2016-17 will not exceed $80,000. This amount includes additional expenses such as warehousing and design services, and results in a net ongoing cost savings of approximately $30,000 per year. All costs associated with the procurement of parking permit materials are recovered through the parking permit fees.", "Parking Permit Materials", "Currently, the City uses a combination of vinyl parking decals that are affixed to the vehicle\u2019s bumper and plastic hangtags for its parking permit programs. To maintain the integrity of the City's parking permit programs, parking permits must contain security features to curb abuse and counterfeiting. In addition, parking permits must be durable to withstand environmental extremes and repetitive use for at least one year since the majority of the permits the City issues are annual permits. The Police Department requires the parking permits to be of certain dimensions to achieve efficient and effective enforcement. With these constraints in mind, the City issued a RFP to explore the possibility of having permits that could be more environmentally friendly, such as non-plastic options or using recycled materials, while still maintaining the City\u2019s enforcement and permit processing objectives.", "The current system requires affixing a vinyl decal on a plastic hangtag, which makes the permits unrecyclable due to the mixing of these materials. Additionally, sourcing recycled materials that can withstand environmental extremes and repetitive use is cost prohibitive. Due to these considerations, sustainability was not the primary factor in the final selection. Staff will still purchase supplies from recyclable materials that meet enforcement and permit-processing requirements and objectives. Staff will also make every effort to not mix materials in the administration of parking permits whenever feasible.  Currently, Parking Operations and the Police Department are working together to draft an RFP that would provide greater sustainable and efficient options for permit fulfillment and citation processing services, including exploring virtual permits that would not require the use of any printed materials.", "Vendor Selection", "On March 22, 2016, the City published a RFP to furnish and provide parking permit materials and related services for the preferential and beach parking permit programs in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) provisions as well as with the International Parking Institute and Parking Today through their web sites, both well-known in the parking industry. Thirty-three prospective vendors downloaded the RFP and two vendors responded: 1) Rydin Decal and 2) Weldon, Williams & Lick (WWL). Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Planning & Community Development, the Finance Department, the Police Department, and the Office of Sustainability and the Environment.", "Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, technical competence, ability to meet work plan and timelines, quality control, cost, stability, references, and breadth of service. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Rydin Decal as the best qualified vendor to provide parking permit materials and related services. Rydin Decal demonstrated a clearer understanding of the RFP objectives. It provided a better pricing structure, a lower percentage increase with annual renewals, lower pricing overall, and clearer terms and conditions for the purchase order. Both Rydin Decal and WWL have produced parking permits for the City in the past with Rydin Decal providing more satisfactory products. In addition, Rydin Decal is the vendor for the State of New York Department of Motor Vehicles, City of Miami Beach, State of Ohio, and City of West Hollywood. Staff contacted the reference agencies and those who responded reported to have received satisfactory products and services from Rydin Decal.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Rydin Decal is for an amount not to exceed $400,000. Funds of $80,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Planning & Community Development Department. The purchase order will be charged to the following accounts:", "01417.544111 Printed Forms -General Fund", "$60,000", "01417.544112 Printed Forms -Beach", "$20,000", "TOTAL", "$80,000", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) FY 2016-17 Budget and Work Plan", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) Budget and Operational Work Plan for FY 2016-17;2. Waive Certain Planning and Public Works Permit Fees Related to DTSM\u2019s Delivery of Contracted Services.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends Council approval of the proposed Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) Budget and Operational Work Plan for FY 2016-17. The Operational Work Plan summarizes the activities, projects, and programs that DTSM intends to carry out during the Fiscal Year. The organization\u2019s FY 2016-17 revenues and expenditures are budgeted in the amount of $7,961,810 (Attachment A). In addition, DTSM is seeking the waiver of certain permit fees related to the contractual work that they perform on behalf of theCity.", "Background", "Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) is a 501c (3) non-profit organization that is under contract with the City to manage services and operations in Downtown Santa Monica and to promote economic stability, growth, and community life.", "DTSM, Inc. manages the Downtown Santa Monica Property-Based Assessment District (Downtown PBAD) established by Council on July 24, 2008, and the Lincoln Boulevard Property-Based Assessment District (Lincoln PBAD) and Colorado Avenue Overlay Zone (Colorado Overlay) both established by Council on July 14, 2015. The Colorado Overlay was initiated by property owners on Colorado Avenue to provide additional cleaning and ambassador services along Colorado Avenue in conjunction with the opening of downtown\u2019s Expo light rail station and the completion of the Colorado Esplanade. Lincoln Boulevard property owners initiated the establishment of a new assessment district on Lincoln Boulevard between the 10 Freeway and WilshireBoulevard in order to receive enhanced cleaning, ambassador, and marketing services similar to what is currently provided in the Downtown PBAD.", "The Services Agreement between the City and DTSM, approved by Council on January13, 2009, requires the preparation and approval of an annual budget and workplan. Inaccordance with the Services Agreement, DTSM is submitting its FY2016-17 budget and work plan for Council review and approval.", "Discussion", "Budget FY 2016-17", "DTSM presents a balanced budget for FY 2016-17 with anticipated revenues and expenditures in the amount of $7,961,810 (Attachment A).", "Revenues from assessments collected by the City on behalf of DTSM are projected to be $6,440,801, reflecting a four percent increase to the Downtown PBAD assessment and a one percent increase to the Colorado Overlay assessment. Additional revenues from special events, advertising, filming, ice rink proceeds, and other sources are budgeted at $1,110,189.  Revenue related to ICE (seasonal ice rink) is projected to increase by 19.6 percent or $164,489 from the previous season. The estimated increase is related to operational savings from DTSM directly overseeing the financial management of ICE. In addition, DTSM has revised its approach to budgeting the estimated revenue related to the parking structure advertising program by budgeting total estimated revenue of $400,000 and the City\u2019s portion of revenue to be distributed as an expense ($320,000). As a result, DTSM estimates net revenue of $80,000, which is $10,000 greater than in the previous year. Overall projected revenues reflect a ninepercent increase from DTSM\u2019s FY 2015-16 budget.", "Budgeted expenditures include personnel costs of $1,301,408 (an increase of 2.1 percent from the previous year), Ambassador Program costs of $1,711,375 (an increase of 2.2 percent from the previous year), and district maintenance costs of $1,685,811 (an increase of 1.7 percent from the previous year). Expenditures for Marketing and Promotions are budgeted at $1,322,150, an increase of 31.2 percent above the previous year. The increase reflects a $320,000 remittance of the City\u2019s portion of revenue from the parking structure advertising program, as well as budgeting of gross expenses related to the parking structure advertising program and ICE. ICE is expected to cost $853,468 (a 29.3 percent increase above the previous year). DTSM\u2019s total expenses for FY 2016-17 are projected to increase by 7.8 percent above the previous year\u2019s approved budget.", "Operational Work Plan 2016-17", "The proposed Operational Work Plan describes DTSM\u2019s strategies and responsibilities for FY 2016-17 (Attachment B). The work plan focuses on the following areas:", "1. Visitor Experience Development - Position Downtown as a unique, exciting, and broadly accessible experience-based place, retaining substantial demand and high value.", "2. Character & Cultural Development - Protect and build upon the reputation of Downtown Santa Monica as an authentically diverse, culturally significant, and forward-thinking urban district.", "3. Community Advocacy - Research and monitor the state of Downtown and proactively advocate on issues of importance to the City and Downtown stakeholders.", "4. Economic Development - Partner with the City and Downtown stakeholders to maintain a balanced, diverse economic environment and promote the prosperity of the community as a whole.", "5. Organizational Management - Maintain a strong, efficient, effective organization capable of making solid internal decisions, as well as formulating external advocacy in the best interest of Downtown Santa Monica.", "Maintenance Activities and Extension of Annual Maintenance Agreement", "Under the existing Services Agreement and Maintenance Agreement, DTSM is required to provide the downtown business assessment district with specified custodial, maintenance, and special event services which may require certain Public Works and Planning Division permits, such as Use of Public Property and After Hours permits. Because DTSM\u2019s work provides public benefits on public property and is mandated by its contractual agreement with the City, DTSM requests, and staff supports waiving certain Public Works and Planning permit fees. DTSM would continue to be required to obtain all necessary permits and follow all procedures, such as public noticing. Feesassociated with use of parking spaces would not be waived. If authorized, the DTSM permit fee waiver would be effective immediately and staff would add the waiver to the Citywide user fee resolution that would return Council for consideration in June of 2017.", "The annual Operational Work Plan also establishes the responsibilities, maintenance levels, and performance schedules the City and DTSM must provide to each district. The division of maintenance activities must be reaffirmed through an annual Maintenance Services Agreement extension, provided the corresponding year\u2019s Operational Work Plan is approved by Council and the cost to the parties remain cost\u2011neutral. The maintenance responsibilities are outlined in the attached OperationalWork Plan for FY 2016-17 and are cost-neutral between the parties. Therefore, if Council approves the FY 2016-17 Work Plan, the City Manager would be authorized to extend the term of the Maintenance Agreement by one year.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Accept Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (ABC) Grant", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the acceptance of grant funds in the amount of $56,540 from the California Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control (ABC) for the Minor Decoy Program, Shoulder-Tap Program, and IMPACT (Informed Merchants Preventing Alcohol-Related Crime Tendencies) inspections;2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant;3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) has been awarded a California Department of Alcohol Beverage Control (ABC) grant in the amount of $56,540. Funds must be used by the end of the grant period, June 30, 2017. No local match is required.", "The purpose of this grant is to assist the Police Department in conducting operations to reduce the instances in which licensed alcohol establishments illegally sell alcohol and/or furnish alcohol to minors or adults who furnish alcohol to minors, as well as providing education to merchants through inspections. All enforcement operations would be conducted on an overtime basis which would be funded by the grant.", "Background", "The ABC-Office of Traffic Safety Grant Program, previously called the ABC Multi-Program Mini Grant, provides funding to support three programs; the Minor Decoy Program, Shoulder-Tap Program, and IMPACT (Informed Merchants Preventing Alcohol-Related Crime Tendencies) inspections. Funding for the project comes from the Office of Traffic Safety through the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration. The City has been a recipient of funding from this ABC grant program previously in 2011, 2014 and 2015. The 2016 grant program would provide funding for overtime costs associated with education and enforcement operations. The funds must be spent by June 30, 2017.", "Discussion", "One of the Police Department\u2019s priorities is to address quality of life issues which include the illegal purchasing and distribution of alcohol to minors. With 340 ABC active licensees, Santa Monica has one of the highest ratios of alcohol establishments-to-population in the State.", "The goal of the Minor Decoy Program is to reduce the number of licensees who sell alcohol to minors. The Minor Decoy Program uses supervised individuals, who are under the age of 20, to attempt to purchase alcohol at licensed premises. Any sale of alcohol to a minor decoy subjects the seller/employee and the licensee to criminal and administrative sanctions. The Minor Decoy Program has proven to be a significant and effective tool in promoting responsible practices in the sale of alcoholic beverages by licensees, reducing substance abuse, and enhancing community welfare by limiting underage access to alcohol. Following each operation, the Police Department issues a press release sharing the results of the operation. This strategy serves as a deterrent by notifying the community that enforcement is happening and encouraging ABC licensed establishments to follow the laws.", "The Shoulder Tap Program targets adults who furnish alcohol to minors. \u201cShoulder Tapping\u201d refers to the practices used by minors to obtain alcohol from adult strangers near off-sale retail outlets. Data collected from prior Shoulder Tap Programs reflected one-third of the adults arrested for purchasing alcohol for minors were on parole, probation, or had outstanding warrants or extensive criminal histories. Similarly to the Minor Decoy Program, the Shoulder Tap Program uses supervised individuals, who are under the age of 20, to attempt to have an adult purchase alcohol for them at ABC licensed establishments.", "IMPACT Inspections focus on licensee education. Officers randomly select licensed outlets to conduct business-friendly compliance inspections. The officers look for loitering, litter, graffiti, posted sign violations, lack of food service in restaurants, illegal weapons, or other violations. The licensee must then correct any identified problem areas. Follow up visits are conducted to ensure the licensee has corrected the problem.", "This grant focuses on education and enforcement. The funds would allow the Santa Monica Police Department to expand its present efforts in identifying and targeting problematic ABC licensed establishments. The grant would fund ten overtime minor decoy operations, five shoulder tap operations, five trap door operations, and 40 IMPACT inspections. In addition, Santa Monica would host a LEAD (Licensee Education on Alcohol and Drugs) class, and conduct three roll call training sessions for all sworn personnel.", "During the 2015 grant period, staff used the grant monies to fund 11 enforcement operations targeting the illegal distribution and purchasing of alcohol by and to minors. During the course of the operations, minor decoys visited 10 ABC licensed establishments and contacted over 122 people via \u201cShoulder Tapping\u201d, resulting in two citations, and entered 20 establishments to purchase alcohol, resulting in no violations. In addition, investigations inspected a total of 51 establishments with \u201con-sale\u201d and \u201coff-sale\u201d ABC licenses, resulting in 15 violations and 3 re-inspections. Staff conducted one LEAD class providing merchant education.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of $56,540 grant from the California Alcoholic Beverage Control requires the following FY16-17 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget account 20306.406043 in the amount of $56,540.", "2. Appropriate the following expenditure to reflect receipt of California Alcoholic Beverage Control\u2019s ABC-OTS grant: $2,000 at account 20306.555291 and $54,540 at account 20306.511490 89010W."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Revisions to the City-wide Records Retention Schedule and Records", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution approving the revisions to the City-wide Records Retention Schedule (\u201cSchedule\u201d).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City-wide Records and Information Management Program was first established by Council in December 1997 (Attachment C) and Records Retention Schedules were established for documents in each Department. Departmental revisions to the schedule are an annual and on-going part of the maintenance and implementation of the program. The last revision was approved by Council on June 9, 2015 (Attachment D). Adoption of the proposed resolution updates the schedules as shown in Attachment A.", "Discussion", "The revised Retention schedule is a result of each department reviewing its records during the past year.  As new forms are created or become obsolete, department policies and names change, and/or laws change, staff updates the retention schedule. The updated schedule is presented annually to Council for review and approval. This past year, many record series titles were added and deleted from the schedule, retention periods were revised and a number of divisions\u2019 names have changed. The 2015 version of the Retention Schedule (Attachment B) shows the items that were deleted and retention periods that changed with strikethroughs.  The 2016 Retention Schedule (Attachment A), reflects all changes and highlights new records that were added.  The revised schedule was reviewed by division managers and department directors and approved by the City Attorney and the City Clerk.  Records destruction is also a part of the program which requires written authorization from the department director, the City Attorney, and the City Clerk. When there is a possibility of litigation or an audit, related documents will not be destroyed and are kept for one year after the lawsuit/audit is settled or until deemed appropriate for destruction by the City Attorney.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Election Code Section 9212 Report Analyzing the Impacts of the Land Use Voter Empowerment Initiative", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council consider a staff analysis under Elections Code Section 9212 on the impacts of the Land Use Voter Empowerment (LUVE) Initiative.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On June 14, 2016, City Council directed City staff to prepare an analysis of the effects of the Land Use Voter Empowerment (LUVE) Initiative pursuant to Section 9212 of the California Elections Code (Attachment A). The primary impact of the proposed Land Use Voter Empowerment Initiative (LUVE) is to introduce a new entitlement permit type and process (the Major Development Review Permit), to require voter approval for most development projects that exceed Tier 1 standards as described in the City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), and to require voter approval for changes to the City\u2019s planning documents.", "The LUCE established a growth management strategy centered on preserving neighborhood character by diverting development pressure to areas in close proximity to high-frequency transit and requiring that projects provide community benefits through a tier system. By its own terms, the proposed LUVE initiative seeks to give voters \u201cthe final word\u201d on both a wide range of potential development projects as well as changes to the City\u2019s key planning documents. While the Initiative language contains a list of exemptions for certain types of housing projects and projects located on sites similar to the City\u2019s Housing Element Suitable Sites Inventory, the Initiative would require voter approval for most projects currently pending City review.", "Since virtually all new development over two stories in the City would be subject to voter approval, it is possible that there would be dozens of projects appearing on election ballots at both regularly scheduled and special elections. It is also possible that property owners will decide to either not redevelop their properties or propose projects that meet Tier 1 standards (typically 32-36\u2019 tall) in order to avoid the voter approval process. In either case, the initiative\u2019s untested new provisions could undermine, \u201cthe community\u2019s vision for Santa Monica\u2019s future\u201d outlined in the Land Use and Circulation Element of the General Plan, \u201cto maintain our City\u2019s character, protect our neighborhoods, manage our transportation systems, and encourage additional housing in a sustainable manner that ensures a high quality of life for all Santa Monicans now and in the future.\u201d", "Specifically, LUVE does the following:", "\u00b7 Creates a new Major Development Review Permit that requires Council approval for any projects that exceed Tier 1 limits with the exception of single-family dwellings and 100% affordable housing projects of 50 units or less", "\u00b7 Requires voter approval of Major Development Review Permits, Development Agreements, and major amendments to Planning Policy Documents (e.g. General Plan, Specific Plan, Zoning Ordinance and others) before they become effective with exceptions for:", "o 100% affordable housing projects", "o 100% moderate income projects", "o Senior housing projects", "o Projects consistent with a certified Local Coastal Program", "o Projects proposed on a list of sites until the certification of the next Housing Element or 2021, whichever is earlier", "This report identifies potential outcomes of the Initiative, but it does not draw conclusions about the ultimate impact. The amount and type of development that will be proposed and ultimately approved in Santa Monica over the next several years will be dependent on several factors including economic cycles and regional market forces. Therefore, a traditional fiscal impact analysis of the initiative is not provided in this report due to the speculative nature of economic cycles and myriad of factors that affect land use decisions. Instead, the City contracted with Keyser Marston Associates to provide a review of the effects of growth management initiatives similar to LUVE (Part IV of this report).", "This report presents a factual analysis of the specific provisions in the initiative and how they mirror or differ from existing laws, both local and statewide. The direct effects of the initiative are summarized below and described in more detail in the body of this report:", "\u00b7 LUVE does not exempt from voter approval buildings reconstructed because of damage (whether in an earthquake or some other event) if the building exceeds Tier 1 limits. There are an estimated 1,700 existing structures that exceed Tier 1 limits of which 1,300 are residential uses. The recovery from the 1994 Northridge earthquake was helped largely in part by the City moving swiftly to remove permitting barriers for reconstruction. In the event of a major earthquake, LUVE\u2019s voter approval requirement would complicate the ability of property owners to reconstruct buildings that exceeded Tier 1 limits, many of which are existing occupied housing.", "\u00b7 The review process for new projects in the Zoning Ordinance generally establishes that a higher level of discretionary review is required as projects increase in size. However, by exempting the sites listed in Table A from voter approval, LUVE is incongruent with the principles of the Zoning Ordinance because the result is that a 5-story project on a site in Table A would be exempt from voter approval while a smaller 3-story project that exceeds Tier 1 limits would require voter approval. For example, a 3-story, 6-unit condo project in the R3 multi-unit residential zone would require voter approval while a 5-story, 100-unit apartment project on Lincoln Boulevard would not require voter approval.", "\u00b7 If LUVE were adopted, the effective date of Major Development Review permits could be significantly delayed due to the need to accommodating timing for elections. Given that the effective date of Development Review permits is currently 14 days after Planning Commission action, the need to wait for voter approval could significantly delay the approval and construction of a project.", "\u00b7 There are eleven Tier 2 housing projects pending review representing 693 units. All but two of the projects (representing 123 units) would require voter approval if LUVE was adopted.", "\u00b7 City projects are not exempt from voter approval, which may impact the City\u2019s ability to provide services to the community. For example, the recently approved Fire Station #1 is 40 feet tall. If LUVE were adopted and applied to Downtown, the fire station would have required voter approval.", "By its own words, the initiative states that its purpose is to allow the residents of Santa Monica to have a say as to what \u201ccommunity benefits\u201d would justify the impacts of taller and larger buildings. The initiative also states that it is not intended to prevent the City from meeting its regional fair share of housing needs nor prevent the approval and construction of affordable or senior housing projects. However, there are provisions in the initiative that may result in unintended consequences that are potentially inconsistent with its stated purpose:", "\u00b7 LUVE requires a Major Development Review Permit for projects that exceed Tier 1 limits. However, there are two areas of the City where the tier system was not established by the LUCE: the Downtown Core land use designation and the Civic Center Specific Plan. As a result, projects in the Civic Center Specific Plan area would not be subject to a Major DR. Similarly, the Downtown Community Plan (DCP) process is ongoing for the Downtown Core land use designation. If the DCP was not approved by voters, the 1984 LUCE, Bayside District Specific Plan, and 1988 Zoning Ordinance would continue to apply in Downtown. Voter approval would only be required for projects if a development agreement was proposed.", "\u00b7 LUVE creates a new incentive for 100% moderate income projects that does not currently exist in the Zoning Ordinance because the initiative proposes that 100% moderate income projects are exempt from voter approval. In the interest of seeking deeper affordability in housing projects, the community benefit requirements for Tier 2 projects intentionally do not allow moderate income units to be used to satisfy the affordable housing obligation. Similarly, the Zoning Ordinance definition of \u201c100% affordable housing project\u201d does not include moderate income households.", "\u00b7 LUVE requires voter approval of major amendments to Planning policy documents which include major documents such as the General Plan but also include others such as the Pico Neighborhood Plan or Neighborhood Conservation Overlay Districts. These kinds of focused, neighborhood-based policy documents are aimed at preserving character and could expand to also address socioeconomic issues. However, LUVE does not exempt these neighborhood-level planning efforts from voter approval, which could delay the implementation of neighborhood protection measures.", "\u00b7 LUVE may present impediments to housing that will be difficult to overcome and in a worst case scenario, could impact certification of the next Housing Element. LUVE exempts from voter approval projects on sites listed in Section 9.69.020(D), Table A. These sites are based on the suitable sites inventory of the Housing Element with the exception of 3 sites. The voter approval exemption would last until 2021 or until the adoption of a new Housing Element. Due to the uncertainties presented by voter approval, it is unlikely that the California Housing and Community Development Department would accept the same list of suitable sites. As a result, the suitable sites inventory of the next Housing Element would likely need to include more parcels, possibly adding sites in residential neighborhoods, which would be inconsistent with the LUCE growth management strategy.", "As with any law, particularly one written without the benefit of public hearings and review, there are questions about how the law will be implemented and the impact it might have on the City\u2019s existing entitlement process. Therefore this report identifies areas where there are ambiguities or uncertainty in meaning and potential implementation that could result in confusion in the development review process.", "\u00b7 Tier 2 projects are required to provide community benefits pursuant to Chapter 9.23 of the Zoning Ordinance. In approving a Major Development Review Permit, LUVE includes a required finding, as stated in Section 9.51.060(E), that a project must provide \u201cat minimum\u201d the community benefits required by Chapter 9.23. Because any new exactions on projects are required to be supported by nexus studies and other reports, it is not clear how the finding in Section 9.51.060(E) could be made.", "\u00b7 Design review for a project by the Architectural Review Board (ARB) occurs after the land use entitlements are approved by the Planning Commission or City Council. Similarly, because the City\u2019s Local Coastal Program is partially certified, projects in the coastal zone would still require California Coastal Commission (CCC) approval, even if approved by voters. The initiative is silent as to whether ARB and CCC review occurs before or after voter approval. If a project requires a Major Development Review Permit and obtains voter approval, it is not clear whether new voter approval would be required if ARB or CCC review modified a project, the initiative does not state whether new voter approval would be required leading a potentially confusing and elongated review process.", "\u00b7 The initiative proposes new Zoning Ordinance definitions of \u201c120% income household\u201d and \u201c100% moderate income housing project\u201d. The definition of 100% moderate income project is intended to deed-restrict unit affordable to 120% income households. Unfortunately, the proposed definition of 120% income household refers to a United States Housing and Urban Development (HUD) index that does not exist for 120% income households. Income eligibility limits are published by the California Department of Housing and Community Development (HCD) and not HUD. As a result, it is not clear how affordable rent would be calculated for 120% income households seeking to qualify for units in a 100% moderate income project.", "The Planning analysis in this report is supplemented by a legal analysis from the City Attorney addressing two specific questions raised by Council (Part III of this report). As a result, this report does not address the constitutionality of the initiative. However, the Planning analysis does provide an assessment of the initiative\u2019s consistency with State law.", "\u00b7 Government Code Section 65589.5 requires that local jurisdictions approve housing projects that meet objective general plan and zoning standards. Since the LUVE initiative allows voters to disapprove a qualified housing development without any stated reason, State law would prevail because State law is intended to supersede local planning approvals that undercut housing.", "Discussion", "On June 14, 2016, City Council directed City staff to prepare an analysis of the effects of the Land Use Voter Empowerment (LUVE) Initiative pursuant to Section 9212 of the California Elections Code (Attachment A). Specifically, the Council requested study of the following issues:", "1. Study all factors listed in Section 9212 as broadly as possible:", "9212. (a) During the circulation of the petition, or before taking either action described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9214, or Section 9215, the legislative body may refer the proposed initiative measure to any city agency or agencies for a report on any or all of the following:", "(1) Its fiscal impact.", "(2) Its effect on the internal consistency of the city's general and specific plans, including the housing element, the consistency between planning and zoning, and the limitations on city actions under Section 65008 of the Government Code and Chapters 4.2 (commencing with Section 65913) and 4.3 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.", "(3) Its effect on the use of land, the impact on the availability and location of housing, and the ability of the city to meet its regional housing needs.", "(4) Its impact on funding for infrastructure of all types, including, but not limited to, transportation, schools, parks, and open space. The report may also discuss whether the measure would be likely to result in increased infrastructure costs or savings, including the costs of infrastructure maintenance, to current residents and businesses.", "(5) Its impact on the community's ability to attract and retain business and employment.", "(6) Its impact on the uses of vacant parcels of land.", "(7) Its impact on agricultural lands, open space, traffic congestion, existing business districts, and developed areas designated for revitalization.", "(8) Any other matters the legislative body requests to be in the report.", "(b) The report shall be presented to the legislative body within the time prescribed by the legislative body, but no later than 30 days after the elections official certifies to the legislative body the sufficiency of the petition.", "2. What happens in the event of an earthquake, particularly with regards to occupied housing?", "3. Clarifications on the development review process including:", "a. Whether projects will need to obtain a DR and Major DR in certain situations.", "b. Process for public projects", "c. Process for neighborhood plans", "4. Analysis of voter approval exemptions in the initiative including the following kinds of projects:", "a. 100% moderate income projects", "b. Senior housing \u2013 does this kind of housing include any affordability requirement?", "c. Projects on the 77 sites listed in the initiative", "i. What could be built on these sites?", "ii. Comparison to existing zoning", "iii. Could projects reach FAR limits without going through Tier 3 process?", "iv. Could the Hines project be constructed without voter approval?", "5. Case study example of 500 Broadway and how that would have been impacted by the initiative", "6. Effect of measure on gentrification/displacement of neighborhoods", "7. Measures close to being passed at State level that affect local control. Specifically the Council requested analysis of whether State law would override LUVE.", "8. How the measure compares/contrast to the City of Malibu Prop R initiative. Specifically, the Council requested analysis of when a project is considered a legislative action.", "9. Effect of measure on commercial/residential property values.", "10. Literature review on the effects of these growth control measures on other cities.", "In order to respond to the Council\u2019s requests, this report is organized as follows:", "I. Description of Initiative", "A. LUCE Amendments", "B. Zoning Ordinance Amendments", "C. Amendments to Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions", "D. Effective Date and Sunset Date of LUVE", "II. Planning Analysis", "A. Effects of Initiative on Internal Consistency of General and Specific Plans", "B. Consistency with Housing Element", "C. Consistency with Local Coastal Program", "D. Consistency with Zoning Ordinance", "E. Effects of Initiative on Development Review Process", "F. Comparative Cast Study of Review Process for Two Projects", "G. Consistency with Government Code Section 65008, 65913, 65915", "H. Consistency with State Housing Accountability Act", "I. Impacts on Housing Production", "J. Impacts on Use of Vacant Land", "K. Impacts on Traffic Congestion", "L. Literature Review of Scholarly Studies on Gentrification and Displacement", "III. Legal Analysis", "A. LUVE Initiatives Conflicting Provisions with Governor\u2019s By-Right Housing Bill", "B. Applicability of Malibu Measure R Litigation to the LUVE Initiative", "IV. Review of Effects of Growth Management Initiatives Similar to LUVE", "A. Summaries of Growth Management Initiatives", "B. Growth Control Initiatives\u2019 Impact on Development Activity", "C. Potential Impact of the LUVE Initiative on Development", "D. Relationship Between Growth Control Measures and Changes in Property Values and Housing Costs", "E. Potential Impact of the LUVE Initiative on Property Values and Housing Costs", "F. Election Code Section 9212 Reports Prepared in Other Cities", "G. References", "I. DESCRIPTION OF INITIATIVE", "The proposed Land Use Voter Empowerment (\u201cLUVE\u201d) Initiative amends portions of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), the Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of SMMC Article 9), and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6 of SMMC Article 9). In the Notice of Intent to Circulate Petition, the proponents of the LUVE Initiative indicate in the Findings and Purpose the desire to protect the beauty of the open skies and ocean breezes for a low-rise city for future generations. The Findings and Purpose also state the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) permitted the construction of taller and larger buildings with a three-tiered approach to development in exchange for community benefits for increased height above Tier 1. As a result, the LUVE seeks to allow voters to decide if the community benefits exchanged for increased height will outweigh the impacts that major development projects would have on quality of life. The full text of the initiative is provided in Attachment B.", "A. LUCE Amendments", "The LUVE proposes text and policy amendments to the LUCE that would add a new discretionary review process (described in more detail below as a Major Development Permit) and require voter approval for specified development seeking additional height above the 32-foot base height.", "B. Zoning Ordinance Amendments", "A Development Review Permit (DR) is a discretionary permit that requires Planning Commission review with decisions appealable to the City Council. A DR is intended to allow the construction of certain projects for which the design, siting, and use could result in an adverse impact on the surrounding area. The existing DR process is established in SMMC Section 9.40.020. A Development Review Permit is required for any projects that exceed the following:", "\u00b7 Tier 1 maximum limits", "\u00b7 Residential districts: 10,000 square feet", "\u00b7 Neighborhood Commercial and Oceanfront Districts: 7,500 square feet", "\u00b7 Nonresidential Districts: Commercial projects exceeding 15,000 square feet and Residential projects exceeding 30,000 square feet (if no more than 15% commercial floor area)", "\u00b7 Pico Neighborhood Plan Area: 7,500 square feet", "To implement the proposed amendments to the LUCE, the LUVE proposes text amendments to the Zoning Ordinance to remove projects that exceed Tier 1 limits from the DR process. All other DR thresholds that are based on the floor area of a project would remain the same. The LUVE creates a new permit type, the Major Development Review Permit (Major DR), which is required for all projects that exceed Tier 1 zoning limits with the following exceptions:", "\u00b7 Single unit dwellings", "\u00b7 100% Affordable Housing Projects of 50 units or less", "\u00b7 Projects that satisfy requirements for Tier 1 including On Site Affordable Housing in compliance with the Affordable Housing Production Program; and", "\u00b7 Projects that exceed Tier 1 baseline standards only due to height or density bonuses granted for the provision of affordable housing pursuant to state law requirements", "The Major DR process would establish that City Council is the land use decision-making authority with the Planning Commission providing recommendations only. Additionally, the new Major DR would not be effective until voter approval.", "Major Development Review Permit Findings", "The required findings for a DR and Major DR application are not the same, with the exception of 9.51.060(D), which requires a finding that the project will not have unacceptable adverse impacts on health and safety. The Major DR findings are much more generalized than the DR findings and do not include requirements for assessment of physical location, size, massing, setbacks, pedestrian orientation, placement of proposed structures, and that the project is compatible and relates harmoniously to the surrounding sites and neighborhoods. The Major DR requires that the project be demonstrated to be consistent with the General Plan and the purpose of the Zoning Ordinance to promote the growth of the City in an orderly manner. The project must also demonstrate that it is compatible with uses authorized in the district. The findings require consistency with authorized uses and not existing uses. As a result, a project would be compared to authorized uses, which could be a wider range of uses than the existing context.", "Issues Raised", "The finding stated in Section 9.51.060(E) requires that a project meet, at a minimum, the benefits identified in Chapter 9.23 and that the provision of such benefits outweigh any negative impacts to the environment due to the increased height or density that results from the construction of a project that exceeds Tier 1 baseline limits. In stating that a project must provide the community benefits required by Chapter 9.23 \u201cat minimum,\u201d it is not clear how to make the required finding. The community benefits established in Chapter 9.23 are based upon nexus studies, as required by the state Mitigation Fee Act. Therefore, any new exactions that have not been previously studied, would need to be supported by studies and findings required by the Mitigation Fee Act before they could be imposed. Community benefits for development agreements do not have the same constraints because they are not subject to the Mitigation Fee Act.  Thus it is likely that without studies that show a legally defensible nexus between proposed projects and their impacts that certain community benefits (including contributions for historic preservation) that have been incorporated into many earlier development agreements could not be imposed on future developers.", "Major DR Required Conditions", "Section 9.51.070 of the initiative requires conditions to be placed on a Major DR project that the use and development of the property conform with a site plan, architectural drawings, or statements submitted in support of the application.", "Issues Raised", "This requirement does not account for the changes that may occur with a project in design review or if in the coastal zone, during consideration of a project by the California Coastal Commission. In the existing process for DRs, Architectural Review Board (ARB) review occurs after approval by the Planning Commission. It is not unusual through the ARB review process that the ARB shapes the design of the project such that the project\u2019s massing or building footprint may change, although the fundamentally approved development standards remain the same. These recommendations by the ARB typically have resulted in better-designed projects with improved relationships to the surrounding context and how buildings form the street edge and engage pedestrians at the ground floor. LUVE does not describe a procedure for ARB review. Thus, it is not clear whether ARB review occurs before or after voter approval. If ARB review occurs after voter approval and there are design changes to the project, is not clear as to whether new voter approval would be required.", "Voter Approval Required for Major Development Review Permit", "Major DRs would need approval by a majority of Santa Monica voters in a general or special election with the following exemptions from voter approval:", "\u00b7 100% Affordable Housing projects \u2013 Pursuant to SMMC Section 9.52.020.0050, this is defined as housing projects with a minimum of 25 percent of the units deed restricted or restricted by an agreement approved by the City for occupancy by 60% Income Households or less and the remainder for the housing units are deed restricted or restricted by an agreement by the City for occupancy by 80% Income Households or less. Such projects may include nonresidential uses not to exceed 33% of the project\u2019s total floor area.", "\u00b7 100% Moderate Income Housing Projects", "\u00b7 100% Senior Housing", "\u00b7 Projects located within the boundaries of a certified Local Coastal Program", "\u00b7 Projects on the \u201cTable A\u201d list of sites, which are exempt until 2021 or the certification of the next Housing Elements. There are 77 total sites on the list.", "The initiative also proposes new definitions of \u201c120% income household\u201d and \u201c100% Moderate Income Housing Project\u201d. These definitions are not consistent with the definitions in the AHPP and must be evaluated independently for purposes of determining the exemption from voter approvals. Council requested an assessment of the exemptions proposed in the initiative, which is provided in this report.", "The initiative also states that Major Amendments to Planning Policy Documents would require voter approval. Planning Policy Documents include the LUCE (including LUCE Land Use Designation Map), any Specific Plan with the exception of Santa Monica Airport if a plan provides exclusively for parks and open space, any neighborhood area plan, the zoning ordinance, and the official districting map of the City. Major amendments would include increases in the maximum allowable number of residential units that may be constructed on any parcel or group of parcel, changes zone type for a parcel from Parks and Open Space, Institutional/Public Lands, or Civic Center to a different zone type; Changes a parcel or parcels from any residential land use to allow any non-residential use; increases the maximum allowable commercial or retail square footage for a parcel or group of parcels; adopts a new specific plan or neighborhood area plan or similar planning document; or repeals any of the Planning Policy Documents.", "C. Amendments to Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions", "Development Agreement Recording", "The initiative proposes text amendments to SMMC Article 9, Division 6 Chapter 9.60 (Development Agreements) by requiring that all Development Agreements are not effective until approval by a simple majority vote of Santa Monica voters. Section 9.60.160 proposes a text amendment that requires that the DA is recorded with the County Recorder within 10 days of the effective date. This is not a significant change from existing recording procedures.", "D. Effective Date and Sunset Date of LUVE", "Effective Date of LUVE", "The initiative would become effective in accordance with California Elections Code Section 9217, which states that, \u201cif a majority of the voters voting on a proposed ordinance vote in its favor, the ordinance shall become a valid and binding ordinance of the city. The ordinance shall be considered as adopted upon the date that the vote is declared by the legislative body, and shall go into effect 10 days after that date\u2026\u201d", "Sunset Date", "LUVE will remain in force until 20 years from its Effective Date.", "II. PLANNING ANALYSIS", "A. Effects of Initiative on Internal Consistency of General and Specific Plans", "Consistency with Land Use and Circulation Element", "The Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) was adopted in 2010 and with the exception of the Downtown Core land use designation, established a new Tier system based on building height and density that established a performance-measure approach to development review that ensured community benefits would be gained from applicants that requested greater height over an established base. The Zoning Ordinance Update was adopted in 2015 and established a regulatory system for community benefits.", "Since LUCE adoption, the City has conducted several long-range planning efforts to establish a foundation for complete neighborhoods, including the adopted Bergamot Area Plan, continuing efforts for the Draft Downtown Community Plan and Draft Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan, and the upcoming Pico Neighborhood Plan. A key tenet of the LUCE is the integration of land use type, location, and amount with transportation improvements. Desired outcomes include increased transportation choice through the thoughtful placement of new development and the benefits that may result combined with the implementation of circulation improvements that increase the amount of convenient options for people to move around.", "The LUCE\u2019s overall strategy was to preserve neighborhood character by diverting development pressure on residential neighborhoods through incentives for new development to locate in close proximity to the Expo line and commercial boulevards served by high-frequency transit. An equally important goal was to ensure that new development provided its fair share of community benefits. As a result, the LUCE established a three-tiered system for projects to provide community benefits based on increments of building height and FAR. The tier system consisted of a Tier 1 baseline, a Tier 2 step that would provide community benefits through a regulatory program, and a Tier 3 step that would require a Development Agreement and negotiated community benefits, with specified exceptions for 100% affordable housing projects. Note that in the subsequent adoption of the Zoning Ordinance implementing the LUCE, designated Landmarks can also achieve Tier 3 building heights without a Development Agreement. LUCE Tiers 1 and 2 were implemented in a new Zoning Ordinance, which became effective July 2015. Concurrent with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance, the Council also amended the LUCE to eliminate all of the LUCE Activity Centers, except for the Memorial Park Activity Center, and eliminates Tier 3 within the Mixed Use Boulevard (MUB) and Mixed Use Boulevard Low (MUBL) land use designations with some exceptions (see Figure 1).", "Figure 1: Map of Areas Where Tier 3 is Still Available in LUCE", "LUVE proposes text changes to the LUCE to add that any project over Tier 1 requires a Major DR and that Major DRs are subject to voter approval. The amendments to the LUCE change the process for Tier 2 projects by requiring approval from City Council instead of Planning Commission. The LUCE requires a Development Agreement for any Tier 3 project with the intent of being able to negotiate for community benefits that achieve the five priority community benefit categories identified in the LUCE.", "The amendments proposed in the LUVE initiative do not create internal inconsistency with the LUCE since the LUCE anticipated discretionary review of Tier 2 and Tier 3 projects. The LUCE also required community benefits for projects over Tier 1 which LUVE also requires. The requirements of LUVE do not alter LUCE development or land use parameters (i.e. LUCE Chapter 2.1). The initiative proposes that the Major DR review process be substantially the same as the existing DR process with the exception that voter approval is required after the conclusion of the City\u2019s review process. As a result, while there may be philosophical differences in the potential outcome of a development review system requiring voter approval, the LUVE does not specifically alter the goals and policies of the LUCE. However, the possibility of requiring voter approval for Major DRs does raise questions about the extent to which the goals and objectives of the LUCE can be attained.", "Consistency with Specific Plans", "The LUVE does not amend any provisions of the following Specific Plans or Area Plans that are currently in effect:", "\u00b7 Civic Center Specific Plan", "\u00b7 Bayside District Specific Plan", "\u00b7 Hospital Area Specific Plan", "\u00b7 Bergamot Area Plan", "In addition, the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan (MPNP) is in progress. While some of the Plans may establish development standards such as height and FAR, the review processes and procedures are largely governed by the Zoning Ordinance. The Downtown Community Plan (DCP) is also in progress and will establish new zoning standards for Downtown. Under the requirements of the LUVE, both the MPNP and DCP would require voter approval before becoming effective.", "B. Consistency with Housing Element", "The certified Housing Element is based on a Regional Housing Needs Assessment (RHNA) that is a number assigned by the California Department of Housing and Community Development (HCD) representing the city\u2019s regional obligation to produce housing. However, the RHNA is not representative of the city\u2019s actual obligation, which is identified in the Quantified Objective that specifies the amount, unit type, and affordability level of housing.", "The 2013-2021 Housing Element incorporates the housing goals from the LUCE, which generally seek to produce more housing in transit accessible locations. Santa Monica was allocated 1,674 units in the 2013-2021 Regional Housing Needs Assessment (RHNA) with a Quantified Objective for new construction of 1,371 units. Table 1 illustrates the total, achieved, and remaining quantified objective for new construction by income category with information from completed, under construction, and recently approved housing projects. Only projects that received a Certificate of Occupancy after January 1, 2014 are eligible to be counted towards achieving the Quantified Objective.", "Table 1: 2013-2021 Housing Element Remaining Quantified Objectives for New Construction", "30% AMI", "50% AMI", "80% AMI", "Moderate", "Above Moderate", "Total Quantified Objective", "83", "214", "263", "111", "700", "Achieved Quantified Objective", "33", "118", "100", "17", "413", "Remaining Quantified Objective", "50", "96", "163", "94", "287", "Housing Projects Under Construction", "1318 2nd St", "--", "5", "5", "--", "43", "2930 Colorado Ave", "3", "35", "--", "--", "318", "1621 Franklin St", "--", "--", "1", "--", "3", "1171 Franklin St", "--", "--", "--", "1", "5", "1211 9th St", "--", "--", "--", "1", "4", "1433 18th St", "--", "--", "--", "1", "5", "1750 10th St", "--", "--", "1", "--", "6", "1803 16th St", "--", "--", "--", "--", "10", "1807 17th St", "--", "--", "1", "--", "5", "1919 4th St", "--", "--", "--", "--", "3", "1433 14th St", "--", "--", "--", "--", "19", "Recently Approved Housing Projects", "1112 Pico Blvd DA", "--", "4", "--", "--", "28", "1560 Lincoln Blvd DA", "--", "10", "10", "--", "80", "1415 5th StDA", "--", "10", "4", "--", "50", "1601 Lincoln Blvd DA", "--", "14", "4", "1", "71", "3008 Santa Monica Blvd DR", "--", "4", "--", "--", "22", "1211 12th St TM", "--", "--", "--", "--", "13", "500 Broadway DA", "--", "--", "--", "--", "249", "1626 Lincoln Blvd DR", "20", "43", "1", "--", "--", "2512 7th St TM", "--", "--", "--", "--", "3", "Total of Under Construction + Approved as of June 2016", "23", "125", "27", "4", "937", "Section 9.69.020(D) of the initiative exempts a list of properties (Table A) from voter approval until 2021 or until the adoption of a new Housing Element. In order to qualify for the voter approval exemption, projects proposed on the sites identified in Table A must conform to the maximum FAR and minimum percentage of residential floor area (40-80%), which varies by geographic area. By stating a \u201csunset date,\u201d there is an implication that this exemption would not carry over into the future Housing Element, so it is presumed that after this time, the properties on the Table A list would no longer be exempt unless included in a new Housing Element. The Table A list mirrors the Housing Element Suitable Sites Inventory (see Attachment C), except that 3 properties are not included in the exemption:", "Address", "Development Intensity per 1992 LCP Map 15 (Development Intensities)", "1318 2nd St", "45 feet, 2.0 FAR", "1301 4th St", "N/A", "101 Wilshire Blvd", "30 feet, 0.5 FAR", "The 3 properties together represent 576 of the 3702 units on the Suitable Sites Inventory still leaving a sufficient number in terms of eligible properties to meet the Quantified Objective.", "The eligible properties on the suitable sites inventory were identified through an analysis of citywide properties that were most susceptible to redevelopment because the existing improvements were significantly smaller than the maximum allowable floor area ratio (FAR). The suitable sites inventory is information that is required to be presented in the Housing Element to represent that there are sufficient available properties in the city to accommodate the quantified objective. The approach used for the suitable sites inventory focused on four transit-oriented areas in which strong interest to develop housing had already been demonstrated. Selected properties generally had existing structures of at least 40 years old; however, properties with pending project applications included in the sites inventory or small structures in areas shifting from industrial to mixed-use may have had newer existing buildings. Additional criteria for inclusion as a suitable site included existing development at significantly lower intensity than now permitted (less than 50%) and location within walking distance of Expo Line stations and/or a stop along a rapid bus corridor. This approach was consistent with the overall land use and circulation strategy articulated in the LUCE of conserving existing residential neighborhoods and encourage housing development in mixed-use, transit rich districts.", "Typically, one would develop a new suitable sites inventory for the next Housing Element cycle by reviewing the previous inventory and removing properties that were developed in the interim and no longer have potential to feasibly develop housing. One would then look at the zoning and permit requirements for housing. If these had not changed, the property could stay on the list with the same potential number of housing units. Due to the voter approval requirements of LUVE, the inventory would need to be completely revised based not only on the potential number of units, but on an analysis of whether it would be reasonable to assume that the development potential qualifies the property to be considered as a feasible, suitable site.", "In the eventuality that the LUVE were to become City ordinance, and the City were to begin preparation of the next Housing Element, based on a new Regional Housing Needs Assessment (RHNA) process, LUVE\u2019s impact would need to be considered. Due to the uncertainty of voter approval for projects exceeding Tier 1 limits, the scale of the impact would depend on the RHNA number allocated to the Westside Cities, and within that allocation, the number specifically assigned to City of Santa Monica. In the most recent RHNA, the Southern California Association of Governments (SCAG) assigned Santa Monica a higher RHNA obligation, based on SCAG regional policies that, like Santa Monica\u2019s LUCE, encourage housing development near transportation-rich centers. It is likely that HCD would not accept a suitable sites inventory where the majority of the sites would require voter approval because of the potential barrier to housing production. As a result, the suitable sites inventory would need to identify additional sites in the city, which may need to include sites within residential neighborhoods, inconsistent with the LUCE growth management strategy. Should this occur, the LUVE may impose impediments on housing development that may be hard to overcome and, in the worst case scenario, may prevent State certification of the next Housing Element.", "C. Consistency with Local Coastal Program", "Land use in the Coastal Zone is currently governed by a partially certified Local Coastal Program (LCP) because the California Coastal Commission (CCC) approved the City's Land Use Plan (LUP) for the Coastal Zone but has not yet approved an Implementation Plan (IP) for the LUP, both of which are required for LCP certification. The City is currently in the process of updating its LUP with the intent of adopting an Implementation Plan to implement the updated LUP in order to obtain full LCP certification. The California Coastal Act does not preclude a referendum on any local land use measure affecting the coastal zone by a city council after the Coastal Commission has approved a city's LUP. Therefore, nothing in the Coastal Act precludes voter approvals affecting land use in the Coastal Zone; provided, however, that the CCC still retains full jurisdiction to reject a voter-approved project or planning document that is either inconsistent with the City's existing LUP or inconsistent with any future LUP or IP documents once the City obtains certification of its LCP.", "As a practical matter, this means that if the LUVE initiative is adopted before LCP certification, then any voter-approved project or planning document in the Coastal Zone would still be subject to Coastal Commission approval before the project is fully entitled or the planning document is effective. After LCP certification, any voter-approved project would still be subject to coastal development approvals in conformance with the LCP, but those approvals would be administered by the City instead of the CCC, except to the extent that the CCC retains original jurisdiction. Any voter approved amendments to the City's certified LUP or IP would still be subject to CCC approval.", "The exemption from voter approval for Major DRs listed in Section 9.69.020(C) of the initiative only refers to projects that are consistent with the applicable height and density limitations in the certified LCP and any future amendments to the certified LCP. If the City\u2019s LCP remains partially certified, it is assumed that the coastal exemption identified in the initiative would not apply. Figure 2 illustrates the process that a project in the coastal zone would go through. Typically CCC review occurs after the local review process is complete. The initiative does not state whether new voter approval would be required if the CCC modified a project.", "Figure 2: Potential Process for Projects in the Coastal Zone if LCP Remains Partially Certified", "D. Consistency with Zoning Ordinance", "The Zoning Ordinance establishes development standards for Tier 1 projects and a regulatory system to require community benefits for Tier 2 projects. The regulatory system is intended to create certainty for the community and developers by setting clear expectations for community benefits. All Tier 2 projects must conform with Zoning Ordinance requirements. Since the LUCE was adopted, one Tier 2 project (a 26-unit residential project) has been approved. At this time, as shown in Table 2, twelve Tier 2 projects are pending Planning review with ten Development Review Permits that must conform to the zoning ordinance. The other two projects are Development Agreements that need not conform to zoning ordinance standards. All but two of the projects shown in Table 2 would require voter approval if LUVE was adopted.", "Table 2: Summary of Tier 2 projects pending Planning review", "Address", "# Units", "Commercial SF", "Zoning", "Listed on Table A?", "1430 Lincoln DA", "100", "5,910", "MUB", "No", "1802 Santa Monica Blvd DA", "23", "14,980", "GC", "Yes", "2901 Santa Monica Blvd AA", "60", "5,100", "MUBL", "No", "1920 Ocean Front Walk", "23", "1,970", "OF", "No", "1828 Ocean Ave", "83", "2,000", "OF", "No", "1242 20th St*", "--", "110,500*", "HMU", "No", "2903 Lincoln Blvd", "46", "21,266", "GC", "No", "2020 Virginia Ave", "21", "--", "R2", "No", "1613 Lincoln Blvd", "93", "6,600", "MUB", "No", "1637 Lincoln Blvd", "98", "6,500", "MUB", "No", "1641 Lincoln Blvd", "46", "6,000", "MUB", "No", "1650 Lincoln Blvd", "100", "6,569", "MUB", "Yes", "*project is being revised", "Written Request for Hearing If Planning Commission Recommends Denial of Major DR", "The proposed Zoning Ordinance text amendments are related to thresholds for Development Review permit processing and the creation of a new permit, the Major DR. DRs become effective 14 days after Planning Commission action in order to allow for timely filing of an appeal to the City Council. The Major DR process can vary depending on the recommendation of the Planning Commission as shown in Figure 3.", "Figure 3: Possible Major DR Process if Planning Commission Recommends Approval/Denial", "Section 9.51.080 indicates that Major DRs will refer to Chapter 9.37 of the Zoning Ordinance for provisions regarding term of permit, exercise of rights, extension, revocation, and appeal. Although Section 9.51.080 refers to appeal procedures, it is assumed that the City Council\u2019s decision on a Major DR is final and not appealable. Section 9.51.050(A) indicates that in the event that the Planning Commission recommends denial of a Major DR, an interested party may file a written request for hearing to the City Clerk within 14 days. Section 9.51.050(A) does not specify any additional procedures for filing, submittal, fees, or public notice of the written request.", "Delayed Effective Date of Permits", "Another area where changes to development review procedures would affect existing zoning is effective date of permits. Because LUVE requires voter approval for projects requiring Major DRs, with the exception of certain kinds of projects, the amount of time that it would take project entitlement rights to become effective would be delayed due to the need to accommodate timing for elections.", "Overlap of Projects That Are Subject to Major DR and DR Approvals", "Council requested clarification of the process for a project that met thresholds for a DR and a Major DR. The initiative repeals Section 9.40.020(A)(1) of the Zoning Ordinance and requires a Major DR for any project that exceeds Tier 1 maximum limits. However, the remaining portions of Section 9.40.020 that establish thresholds for when a DR is required are not being amended by the initiative. In addition, the findings for a DR and Major DR are not the same. As a result, if a project is proposed that exceeds Tier 1 maximum limits and any of the floor area thresholds established in Section 9.40.020(A)(2)-(5), both a Major DR and DR would be required. Assuming that both approvals would be required for full entitlement, the permit process would be elongated.", "Procedurally, action on the DR would be final with the Planning Commission unless appealed to the City Council. However, only City Council\u2019s action would be final on the Major DR. It is assumed that both the DR and Major DR would need to be effective in order for a project to proceed.", "Reconstruction of Buildings After Damage", "Council requested information as to the LUVE\u2019s effects on reconstruction of damaged buildings, whether in fires or earthquakes. Section 9.27.040 of the Zoning Ordinance sets out the requirements for the restoration of damaged nonconforming structures. The LUVE initiative does not amend this section. The level of required review is based upon the replacement value of the structure:", "Cost of Repair compared to replacement value", "Percentage of exterior walls removed to foundation", "Design Change", "Level of Review", "Less than 50%", "Less than 50%", "Not significant from original", "AA", "Less than 50%", "Less than 50%", "Significant from original", "AA + ARB", "(SFRs exempt)", "50% or more", "50% or more", "--", "AA if below DR threshold + ARB", "50% or more", "50% or more", "--", "DR if above DR threshold + ARB", "Notwithstanding any of the reconstruction requirements of Section 9.27.040, restoration of any City-designated Historic Resource shall require review of the Landmarks Commission.", "Section 9.51.020 of LUVE requires a Major DR for any project that exceeds Tier 1 limits and does not exempt restoration of damaged nonconforming structures from Major DR requirements. As a result, replacement projects for damaged buildings that exceed Tier 1 limits could require Major DRs in addition to any requirements of Section 9.27.040 of the Zoning Ordinance.", "In order to provide some context as to the effects of LUVE in a potential earthquake event, staff reviewed the list of buildings that were green-, yellow-, and red- tagged in the aftermath of the 1994 Northridge earthquake and compared them to existing buildings that exceed Tier 1 height limits citywide to gain an understanding of how reconstruction after a major earthquake might be complicated by voter approval.", "According to the evidence provided in support of the formation of the Earthquake Recovery Redevelopment Project Area (ERRPA) that was adopted by Council on June 21, 1994, the ERRPA included 90% of all red-tagged buildings and 80% of all yellow-tagged buildings in the city. The ERRPA encompasses Cloverfield Blvd and 26th Street to the east, Pico Blvd to the south, Montana Ave to the north, and PCH/Beach Promenade to the west. Approximately 1,300 buildings were damaged within the Project Area with an estimated property damage of approximately $187,991,000 affecting nearly every major commercial corridor in the city. The City\u2019s multi-family residential districts also saw extensive damage with 2,218 rent-controlled structures red- or yellow-tagged. These structures were approximately 87% affordable to lower-income households (up to 80% AMI) and 93% affordable to median income households (up to 100% AMI). These structures represented 5% of the City\u2019s housing stock and required the evacuation of 3,000-4,000 people. Landowners and tenants suffered debilitating losses as a result of the earthquake with the cost of restoration, repair, and reconstruction financially infeasible for many.", "As a result, on April 19, 1994 the City adopted the Earthquake Recovery Act in order to ease the burden of repair and reconstruction by waiving all permit fees, allowing in-kind repair and reconstruction of legal non-conforming structures, expediting permits for earthquake-related work, providing a 15% floor area bonus to incentivize reconstruction of multi-family housing, allowing longer construction hours, and consistent with State law \u2013 making all projects permitted under the Earthquake Recovery Act categorically exempt from environmental review.", "In forming the ERRPA, lessons were learned from the 1990 Loma Prieta earthquake where four years on, 50% of multi-family units lost in the earthquake remained unrepaired or unreplaced. There were also concerns that without financial assistance, the costs of repair would be passed onto tenants resulting in loss of even more affordable housing.", "LUVE would complicate the ability of owners to reconstruct or repair buildings that would meet the threshold requirements for a Major DR. In the event of a major earthquake, it is likely that any yellow- or red-tagged building would have a repair cost that exceeds 50% of its replacement value and therefore, could not be approved through an Administrative Approval process. It is not clear that City Council could bypass the processing requirements of a Major DR and further, it appears that any Major DR would still require voter approval since there is no language in the initiative that indicates an exemption for structures reconstructed under the requirements of Section 9.27.040.", "Figure 4 shows all properties in the city that exceed Tier 1 limits for building height and identifies those that are residential and non-residential. Figure 5 shows properties that were damaged in the 1994 earthquake. A comparison of the two maps provides some sense of properties that could be impacted by LUVE in the event of an earthquake.", "Figure 4: Map of Parcels with Existing Buildings that Exceed Tier 1 Maximum Limits for Building Height", "Figure 5: Map of Northridge Earthquake Damaged Properties", "Analysis of Housing Exemptions from Voter Approval", "Section 9.69.020 of the Initiative specifically exempts the following types of housing, which may be processed through a Major Development Permit or Development Agreement, from a requirement that a majority of Santa Monica voters approve the project in a general or special election:", "\u00b7 100% Affordable Housing Projects and 100% Moderate Income Projects", "\u00b7 100% Senior Citizen housing projects", "100% Affordable Housing Projects", "SMMC Section 9.52.020.0050 defines 100% Affordable Housing Projects as, \u201chousing projects with a minimum of 25 percent of the units deed restricted or restricted by an agreement approved by the City for occupancy by 60% Income Households or less and the remainder of the housing units are deed restricted or restricted by an agreement approved by the City for occupancy by 80% Income Households or less. Such projects may include nonresidential uses not to exceed 33% of the project\u2019s total floor area.\u201d", "The Zoning Ordinance already exempts 100% Affordable Housing Projects of 50 units or less from a DR permit. The Initiative has the same exemption for 100% Affordable Housing Projects of 50 units or less that exceed Tier 1 heights, and would require a Major DR for any 100% Affordable Housing Project with more than 50 units, but not voter approval.", "100% Moderate Income Projects", "SMMC Chapter 9.64 is the City\u2019s Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP), which requires developers of market rate multi-family developments to contribute to affordable housing production and thereby help the City meet its affordable housing need. Units may be provided at varying levels of affordability ranging from 30% Income Households to Moderate Income Households. The AHPP defines \u201cModerate Income Households\u201d as, \u201c\u2026a households whose gross income exceeds the maximum income for an 80% income households and whose gross income does not exceed the lesser of: (i) 120% of the area median income, adjusted for household size, as published and periodically updated by HCD or (ii) twice the income limit for 50% income households, adjusted for household size, as published and periodically updated by HUD.\u201d", "The Zoning Ordinance Chapter 9.52 defines 30%, 50%, and 80% Income Households because those terms are used to define the affordability requirements for Tier 2 housing projects, as specified in Chapter 9.23 of the Zoning Ordinance. The definitions match those established in the AHPP.", "The Initiative proposes an amendment to Chapter 9.52 (Terms and Definitions) of the Zoning Ordinance that would define two new terms:", "\u00b7 100% Moderate Income Housing Project: Housing project with 100% of the units deed restricted or restricted by an agreement approved by the City for occupancy by 120% Income Households or less.", "\u00b7 120% Income Household: A household whose gross income does not exceed 120% of the area median income, adjusted for household size, as published and periodically updated by HUD. 120% Income Households includes 80% Income Households.", "The Zoning Ordinance does not allow for moderate income units in Tier 2 projects because the affordable housing community benefits were intended to achieve deeper affordability. The zoning ordinance actually removes all incentives for 100% moderate income housing projects, consistent with the desire to provide incentives for affordable housing projects that produce units with deeper affordability. This is evident in the definition of 100% Affordable Housing Projects.", "By exempting 100% moderate income projects from voter approval, the initiative provides an incentive for moderate income projects that does not currently exist in the zoning ordinance. However, 100% Moderate Income Housing Project are excluded from Zoning Ordinance Chapter 9.23 (Community Benefits) because it only allows on-site affordable units for 30%, 50% or 80% income households. As a result, if a Developer wanted to propose a 100% Moderate Income project, the only path would be through a Development Agreement.", "Another issue is that the definition of 120% Income Household references an index that does not exist. The Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) only publishes incomes for 30%, 50%, and 80% income households. There is no HUD published income level for 120% households. The AHPP now uses 120% income household figures that are published by the California Department of Housing and Community Development (HCD), not HUD.", "Also of note is that LUVE\u2019s definition of 120% income household includes 80% income households. However, this is inconsistent with the AHPP which explicitly states that moderate income households mean a household whose gross income exceeds the maximum income for an 80% income household. This ensures that lower income households are not subject to the moderate income rent formula under the AHPP.", "Another issue associated with LUVE\u2019s definition of 100% moderate income projects is that because the definition specifically references units affordable to 120% income households, it is not clear how affordable rent would be calculated since LUVE does not provide any rent formulas associated with 120% income households.", "100% Senior Citizen housing projects", "SMMC Section 9.51.020(A)(1)(d)(i) defines Senior Citizen Multiple-Unit Residential as, \u201ca multiple-unit development in which occupancy of individual units is restricted to one or more persons 62 years of age or older, or a person at least 55 years of age who meets the qualifications found in Civil Code Section 51.3.\u201d", "The initiative exempts 100% Senior Citizen housing projects. There is no requirement in the Initiative that the senior housing be affordable. As long as the senior housing meets the definition provided above, it would be exempt from voter approval. The review process would depend on whether the senior housing project exceeded Tier 1 limits and whether the DR thresholds were exceeded.", "E. Effects of Initiative on Development Process", "Within Downtown Core LUCE Land Use Designation and Civic Center Specific Plan area", "The Downtown Core zoning district is undergoing a Specific Plan process, as required by the LUCE and does not yet have these thresholds established. Pending the completion of a Downtown Community Plan, Interim Zoning Ordinance 2490 (the Downtown IZO) establishes a DR threshold of 7,500 square feet and a Development Agreement requirement for any project over 32 feet for the Downtown Core land use designation. Until the DCP is adopted, LUVE would just add a voter approval requirement in order for a Development Agreement in the Downtown Core land use designation to become effective. The Downtown IZO is effective until August 31, 2017. An ordinance would be required to extend the Downtown IZO beyond August 31, 2017. If LUVE passed and the Downtown Community Plan was not approved by August 31, 2017 then voter approval would be required to extend the IZO beyond that date.", "LUVE requires a Major DR for any project exceeding Tier 1 limits that would apply citywide. Since the Downtown Core designation does not yet have any established Tiers, the Major DR requirement in LUVE would apply only if an adopted Downtown Community Plan established Tier 1 maximum limits. If the Downtown Community Plan is not adopted and the Downtown IZO expires, the 1984 land use designations, Bayside District Specific Plan, and 1988 Zoning Ordinance would continue to apply. Since none of these documents have Tiers, a Major DR permit is not applicable in the Downtown Core designation and consequently, no voter approval would be required unless a Development Agreement is proposed. This would also be the case for projects within the Civic Center Specific Plan area because similar to the Downtown Core land use designation, not tiers were established in the LUCE for the Civic Center area.", "\u201cTable A\u201d List Exemptions from Voter Approval", "The list of sites in Table A of the initiative indicate sites where development could occur without voter approval. The table lists sites such as 1681 26th St (i.e. the former Papermate factory property). However, in comparison, a smaller project that is also Tier 2 (36\u2019), such as the 3008 Santa Monica Boulevard project illustrated below, would require voter approval. Because Table A is based on the suitable sites inventory and the inventory was selected to be consistent with the LUCE, exempting these sites from voter approval would provide incentives for development to occur on some sites on commercial boulevards while disincentivizing others. Further, Table A does not include any sites in residential neighborhoods. Therefore, there could be instances where Tier 2 development in the R3 and R4 zones, which could be three and four-story buildings, would be subject to voter approval.", "Public Projects", "City projects are not exempt from the regular City process. Therefore, City projects such as fire stations, parking structures, libraries, or other civic structures that exceed Tier 1 limits would require a Major DR. City projects are not listed in the initiative as exempt from voter approval and therefore, voter approval would be required for City projects requiring Major DRs. Although already approved by the Planning Commission, Fire Station No. 1 is an example of the kind of civic project that would require approval by voters under LUVE because it is 40 feet tall.", "Neighborhood Plans", "The City is the process of implementing the LUCE which includes the preparation of area and specific plans including the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan, Downtown Community Plan, and the Pico Neighborhood Plan. These plans are not focused only on issues of development. For example, the Pico Neighborhood Plan will be reviewing not only zoning protections for the Pico Neighborhood but issues of social justice and economic development. Under the initiative, all neighborhood plan, including the Pico Neighborhood Plan would be subject to voter approval.", "Similarly, the zoning ordinance introduced a new tool to protect neighborhoods called the Neighborhood Conservation Overlay District (NCOD). Because separate ordinances are required to designate each NCOD and LUVE requires voter approval of new planning documents, NCODs would also be subject to voter approval. Plans like the Pico Plan and the NCODs will include significant participation from the residents and neighborhoods most affected by changes. However, the amendments cannot be formally adopted until they are formally approved by a citywide vote that includes voters that potentially may have not participated in the process. Additionally, Chapter 9.47, which details the process for adoption of NCODs, contemplates that applications for projects located within an adopted NCOD are subject to approval by a DR, subject to any exemptions incorporated into the approved NCOD. LUVE does not purport to modify Chapter 9.47. Thus, LUVE would only add a voter approval requirement to the NCOD adoption process. Projects within an adopted NCOD would still be subject to approval by DR.", "F. Comparative Case Study of Review Process for Two Projects", "At the request of Council, the following is a comparison of the review process for two housing projects that were recently approved by the Planning Commission and City Council. One project is located at 3008 Santa Monica Boulevard and the other is located at 500 Broadway.", "500 Broadway", "The 500 Broadway project consists of 249 market rate rental units with approximately 56,000 square feet of ground floor commercial space. The project was unique in that the developer proposed to satisfy the affordable housing obligation through the acquisition and transfer of land to a non-profit housing entity. The developer acquired 1626 Lincoln Blvd as a 100% affordable housing project and will be transferring the land to Community Corporation of Santa Monica, who will be seeking tax credits to finance the project. With the dissolution of redevelopment and the associated funding for affordable housing, more creative methods to produce affordable housing need to be explored. This kind of a partnership is an example of how affordable housing could be produced.", "The developer will be providing gap financing and land acquisition at a cost of approximately $45M. The review process would be identical until determining the effective date. In the existing process, the 500 Broadway DA became effective 30 days after 2nd reading. The certainty provided in the effective date is critical to the developer since the affordable housing project is reliant on financing from 500 Broadway. In the process proposed in LUVE and assuming Tiers are established in the DCP, the 500 Broadway DA would have to wait for voter approval at the next special or general election before it could be effective. In this case, CCSM could still have submitted an application for tax credit financing but due to the uncertainty posed by the voter approval process, it is unknown whether either the 500 Broadway property owner or CCSM would have chosen to move forward with the project in the first place.", "Existing Process /", "LUVE without DCP adoption", "LUVE", "ARB Concept Review", "Yes", "Same", "Planning Commission Float-Up", "Yes", "Same", "City Council Float-Up", "Yes", "Same", "EIR", "Yes", "Same", "Planning Commission Hearing", "Yes", "Same", "City Council Hearing", "Yes", "Same", "Effective Date", "30 days after 2nd reading", "10 days after vote is certified", "3008 Santa Monica Boulevard", "The 3008 Santa Monica Boulevard project consists of 26 residential units, including 4 affordable units, and 3,450 sf of ground-floor retail space. The project proposes a building height of 36 feet (4 stories) and 1.74 FAR and was therefore classified as a Tier 2 project. The project was the first Tier 2 project to be approved under the new regulatory system for community benefits established in the Zoning Ordinance Update. Due to Permit Streamlining Act requirements, the project was approved 83 days from the date it was submitted. The efficient processing of the project was consistent with the zoning ordinance principles to create a predictable community benefits system. The following table compares the development review process under the existing zoning ordinance and as proposed in LUVE (assuming the vote was not put on a ballot until the election).", "Existing Process", "LUVE", "ARB Concept Review", "Same", "Same", "Planning Commission Hearing", "Same", "Same", "City Council Hearing", "N/A", "Required", "Voter Approval", "N/A", "Required", "Effective Date", "14 days after Planning Commission", "10 days after vote is certified", "Total Process Time", "83 days", "Within 90 days + time waiting for next election", "G. Consistency with Government Code Sections 65008, 65913, and 65915", "Elections Code Section 9212 allows analysis of the proposed initiative and its impacts on Government Code 65008 (policies to prevent discrimination in housing), 65913 (policies to encourage the development of new and affordable housing), and 65915 (density bonus law). The following table provides a consistency review:", "Government Code Section", "Regulation Title", "LUVE Initiative", "Consistent?", "Impact", "65008", "Policies to prevent discrimination in housing", "Findings and Purpose", "Yes", "LUVE does not include language", "65913", "Policies to encourage the development of new and affordable housing", "Land Use Voter Empowerment section requiring projects above Tier 1 and changes to Planning Policy Documents to have voter approval", "Yes \u2013 for housing projects exempt from Major DR review or voter approval.", "LUVE exempts Major DR review and voter approvals for certain affordable housing projects. Thus it does not have any impact to the extent of these exemptions.", "65915", "Density bonus law", "Major DRs not required for projects that exceed Tier 1 limits only because of a height bonus granted for providing affordable housing units", "Yes", "LUVE is consistent with density bonus law", "H. Consistency with the State Housing Accountability Act", "The State Housing Accountability Act (Government Code section 65589.5) prohibits a local government agency from disapproving a housing development project that complies with objective general plan or zoning standards and criteria, including design review standards, unless certain findings are made regarding adverse impacts on public health or safety. The LUVE initiative exempts certain housing projects from a Major DR or voter approval. However, to the extent of any conflicts between the LUVE initiative and the State Housing Accountability Act, such as voter disapproval of qualified housing projects, the Housing Accountability Act would prevail because State law is intended to supersede local planning approvals that undercut housing.", "I. Impacts on Housing Production", "The City has a long history of encouraging housing production with goals of maintaining housing affordability, protecting existing renters, and producing additional affordable housing. This \u201chousing first\u201d approach is reflected in the City\u2019s major land use policy documents such as the Land Use and Circulation Element. The LUCE strategy of creating mixed-use, walkable neighborhoods near transit resulted in policies that incentivized development in areas closest to major transit stops. The LUCE anticipated a system of requiring community benefits, including increased affordable housing.", "Impacts on Housing Location and Availability", "The initiative does not include specific language limiting the location and availability of housing since it does not change allowable uses. However, given that Section 9.69.020(D) of the initiative exempts a large list of sites from voter approval, based largely on the suitable sites inventory of the certified 2013-2021 Housing Element, it would be reasonable to assume that the difference in process would incentivize development on these sites.", "The suitable sites inventory of the Housing Element must include sufficient properties to satisfy the RHNA but should not be interpreted as a definitive list locating all properties on which housing might be developed. The Housing Element sites were chosen based on objective criteria including:", "\u00b7 Sufficient lot size", "\u00b7 Potential for housing development based on the area\u2019s maximum permitted floor area ratio", "\u00b7 Properties for which an application that includes housing units is currently pending but not yet approved", "Figure 6: Map of Table A Sites", "Since the LUCE was adopted, 861 units have been entitled with construction occurring now or with building permits anticipated to be issued. While historical development trends are informative, it would be too speculative to forecast future development activity. In order to qualify for the exemption, projects must also conform with maximum FARs and minimum percentage of project floor area for housing, which varies by geographic area. Table 3 compares the maximum FAR stated in Table A to those for Tier 2 projects in the Zoning Ordinance or applicable Plans.", "Table 3: Comparison of maximum FAR between Table A and Tier 2 Zoning Ordinance/Applicable Plans", "DSP Area", "Bergamot - BTV", "Bergamot - MUC", "Memorial Park Area Plan", "Mixed Use Boulevard", "Table A Max FAR", "2.5", "2.5", "2.2", "2.0", "2.0", "Zoning Ordinance/", "Applicable Plan & LUCE Max FAR", "Draft DCP:", "MUB = 2.25", "NV = 3.25", "BC = 3.5", "TA = 3.5", "OT = 2.75", "WT = 2.25", "Tier 2 = 2.0", "Tier 3 = 2.5", "Tier 2 = 1.7", "Tier 3 = 2.0", "Tier 2 = 1.75", "*Note that all listed sites are MUBL zone", "Tier 2 = 2.25", "Attachment D shows the list of sites that would be exempt from voter approval (i.e. Table A from the initiative) including the amount of housing that could be produced in accordance with the limitations set in the initiative. Where Table A has identified sites that already have completed, approved, or pending projects, the potential number of units has been removed. In addition, consistent with the Housing Element suitable sites inventory, some sites identified on the HRI were determined to have reduced potential. Table A will show less housing potential than Appendix A (Suitable Sites Inventory) of the Housing Element due to the removal of 3 sites from the list in addition to pending, approved, and completed projects since the inventory was published.", "J. Impacts on Use of Vacant Land", "There is limited availability of vacant and developable land in the city. The persistent demand for housing and competition for limited available land has kept Santa Monica residential land value high for many years. As a result, the largest share of development interest is occurring in commercial and nontraditional areas where higher densities are permitted and the per-unit housing cost of land can be reduced or recouped through redevelopment. Based on a 2013 existing land use inventory, there are 14 vacant parcels in the city. Of those, there are 8 parcels where projects are either pending or have been recently approved but have not obtained building permits. Of the vacant parcels, 4 cannot exceed Tier 1 limits because the zone in which the parcel is located does not allow Tier 2.", "Figure 7: Map of Vacant Parcels Citywide", "Table 4: List of Vacant Parcels Citywide", "Address", "Entitlements?", "Zone", "Density/FAR", "Max Tier", "1235 5th St", "Pending DA \u2013 housing", "DSP", "--", "None", "2602 6th St", "OP2", "1/2000", "1", "2510 7th Street", "Approved \u2013 housing", "OP2", "1/2000", "1", "1211 12th St", "Approved \u2013 housing", "R3", "1/1250", "2", "1413 14th St", "GC", "1.5", "2", "1415 16th St", "R3", "1/1250", "2", "1407 18th Street", "GC", "1.5", "2", "1419 19th Street", "Pending CUP - office", "GC", "1.5", "2", "802 Ashland Ave", "Approved \u2013 housing", "GC", "2.0", "2", "103 Bay St (1901 Ocean Way)", "Pending DR \u2013 housing", "OF", "2.0", "2", "2337 S Centinela Ave", "MUBL", "1.75", "2", "1613 Lincoln Blvd", "Pending DR \u2013 housing", "MUB", "2.25", "2", "1517 Montana Ave", "NC", "1.5", "1", "3205 Pico Blvd", "Approved \u2013 office", "NC", "1.5", "1", "K. Impacts on Traffic Congestion", "Council requested analysis of the LUVE on traffic congestion. It is informative to understand the framework under which the LUCE was developed. The State and the City have enacted a number of transportation regulations including AB32, SB375, and SB743, recognizing that transportation and traffic impacts result in environmental impacts related to climate change, air quality, noise, and urban sprawl. In the past, the regulations were largely directed at the transportation sector to regulate emissions at the source-level (e.g., vehicle regulations for tailpipe emissions). However, the focus of transportation regulations have shifted to the local planning level, and have evolved to require the coordinated integration of land use and transportation planning as a means to reduce vehicle trips.", "The City\u2019s Travel Demand Forecast Model (TDFM) that analyzes the cumulative effect of net new development includes assumptions regarding placement of new land uses and also the kinds of Travel Demand Management (TDM) programs that could be effective in providing viable alternatives to single-occupant vehicle trips. The TDFM was developed during preparation of the City\u2019s LUCE in 2010, in order to estimate the effectiveness of the LUCE in achieving the goal of No Net New P.M. Automobile Peak Hour trips with a Santa Monica origin or destination, to allow for accountability and monitoring of progress, and to project future transportation conditions in the City. The City\u2019s TDFM contains a number of enhancements that allow it to capture the effects of land use and policy initiatives on transportation and traffic congestion. These include the effects of potential development patterns, urban design factors, multi-modal transportation networks, parking management, and TDM programs. TDM refers to the application of strategies and policies to reduce single occupant automobile travel demand and minimize vehicle trips. TDM strategies may be implemented as requirements for developers and employers, as incentives for employees, as encouragement programs, and could include information about carpooling, carsharing, and vanpooling, requirements for bicycle facilities, and transit passes for employees that do not drive a car to work.", "Key to the model is a more detailed analysis of how development patterns affect trip making and travel. This is assessed using a modeling strategy based on what is collectively known as the 6Ds. This includes an analysis of land use density, diversity of uses within walking distance, design of walkable, bikeable streets, destinations that are more reachable by transit, distance of 0.25 mile that is considered walkable to a destination, and demand management measures that address trip reduction. The 6Ds have been found to be the primary factors affecting trip making characteristics of both existing and new development.", "If applicants make decisions due to the provisions in the initiative that consequently affect any of the 6Ds, there will likely be impacts on travel behavior, which in turn will affect traffic congestion. The LUCE EIR studied a range of possible land use scenarios and the associated impacts on travel behavior. These included a Reduced Height and Development scenario (Alternative 4) and an Existing City Development scenario (Alternative 2). Alternative 2 assumed a limitation of the vast majority of development activities in the City with new construction being limited primarily to vacant lots, reuse of existing buildings, or replacement of existing buildings for required safety upgrades. Alternative 4 assumed a maximum height of 35 feet and lower FAR than the LUCE. The comparative traffic analysis for both Alternative 2 and Alternative 4 determined that while Santa Monica\u2019s environmental conditions would remain the same, continued growth outside of Santa Monica would nevertheless affect future conditions in the City. Traffic would be anticipated to grow worse with increased regional pass-through drivers. Staff anticipates demand for land use change would not diminish with the implementation of the initiative, thus land use change in neighboring Westside communities with less stringent TDM requirements would occur, resulting in more subregional trips that would use Santa Monica\u2019s streets. The FEIR analysis indicated that limiting land use change in Santa Monica would result over time in pressure for more growth in more peripheral locations of the Southern California region (Page 6-37 of LUCE FEIR). The result of less development and growth in Santa Monica and proportionally more growth further from the regional core would be growth that would occur in a less dense and more auto-oriented land-intensive manner. The resulting effects on travel behavior include more reliance on automobiles, longer commute distance, and greater demand for roadway infrastructure. The effect on LUCE performance measures would be increased per capita vehicle trips and increased VMT resulting in increased air pollution and GHG emissions.", "L. Literature Review of Scholarly Studies on Gentrification and Displacement", "Growth and growth controls are some of the most contentious land use issue municipalities may face raising issues of equity, housing, jobs, and the environment. Council requested an evaluation of the initiative\u2019s impact on gentrification and displacement. This section provides a review of scholarly literature on the root causes of gentrification and a presentation of Santa Monica demographics by neighborhood. This section does not speculate as to LUVE\u2019s effects on gentrification and displacement. Gentrification occurs when a neighborhood has attractive qualities but remains relatively low value. When an area becomes desirable, changes occur in the housing market and being to attract households with higher-income tastes. Chris Hamnett\u2019s \u201cThe Blind Men and the Elephant: The Explanation of Gentrification\u201d lays out the combination of conditions for gentrification to occur:", "\u00b7 Attractive locations with nevertheless undervalued properties (housing supply),", "\u00b7 Sufficient populations of demographic groups who have a taste for urban living and have the financial means to outbid current residents (housing demand)", "Studies have indicated that the very elements that made an area attractive in the first place, whether they be long-time businesses or the diversity of a neighborhood, often are the first victims of displacement due to the influx of new tenants and households that can afford to pay more. As a result, current debates regarding gentrification have generally drawn a line between the flows of capital (i.e. reinvestment into neighborhoods) and flows of people (i.e. people drawn into gentrifying area drawn by cultural and aesthetic preferences) (\u201cGentrification, Displacement and the Role of Public Investment: A Literature Review\u201d, UC Berkeley, UCLA).", "Within this framework, it is critical to understand the role that public policy and investment has in affecting the production and supply of housing. The main mechanisms of gentrification include investments made by government in an area in addition to private capital investment that reacts to public policy established for an area. Based on the 2010 Census, Santa Monica\u2019s median household income profile shows that the City is relatively affluent compared to the rest of LA County.", "It is not surprising that the two areas with the lowest median household income in the City (90401 and 90404) also have the highest percent of rent-burdened households compared to the total number of renter-occupied housing units for each zip code.", "A research brief, \u201cHousing Production, Filtering and Displacement: Untangling the Relationships\u201d, published by UC Berkeley\u2019s Institute of Governmental Studies suggests that housing prices increase when demand outpaces supply. The study found that an important factor in reducing displacement pressure is the production of subsidized housing, which was shown to be twice as effective as market rate housing in this regard. If opportunities for housing production are reduced, it would likely affect the ability of housing supply to meet demand. Because Santa Monica has an inclusionary housing ordinance that allows for production of on-site or off-site housing or the payment of an affordable housing fee, curtailing housing production would also result in impacts to affordable housing. Without additional housing supply, the natural relief valve to meter housing prices will likely result in increased housing cost. The literature suggests that the effect of increased housing cost is gentrification, where less-affluent neighborhoods are overtaken by affluent residents, resulting in displacement of existing residents.", "III. LEGAL ANALYSIS", "A. LUVE Initiative Conflicting Provisions With Governor\u2019s By-Right Housing Bill", "The Governor's Proposal generally provides that any proposed development must be approved without discretionary review if it: (i) is new construction of two or more dwelling units; (ii) that is consistent with objective planning standards, objective zoning standards, and objective design review standards; (iii) where 75% of the perimeter of the site adjoins urban uses, (iv) upon which a deed restriction for affordable housing has been recorded. In other words, assuming conditions (i) \u2013 (iv) are satisfied, the applicant of the proposed development has the right to a ministerial approval of the project. The City would have 30 days from applicant submittal to identify inconsistent standards and would have 90 days to complete design review.", "The terms \"objective zoning standards\" and \"objective design review standards\" are defined in the Governor's Proposal as:", "Standards that involve no personal or subjective judgment by the public official; the standards must be uniformly verifiable by reference to an external and uniform benchmark or criterion available and knowable by both the development applicant or proponent and public official prior to submittal. Such standards may be embodied in alternate objective land-use standards adopted by a locality, and may including but are not limited to housing overlay zones, specific plans, inclusionary zoning ordinances, and density bonus ordinances.", "The practical implication of these definitions is that the City would only be allowed to impose prescriptive standards that can be objectively measured and are in place at the time a development application is submitted.", "Similarly, the City\u2019s ability to require historic review by the City's Landmarks Commission as a condition to obtaining a demolition permit for a by-right housing project would also be curtailed, unless the existing site has been designated in the National Register of Historic Places or California Register of Historical Resources. The current draft of the Governor's Proposal does not allow any exceptions for local historic designation or protections for structures of merit that entail subjective preservation standards.", "The Governor's Proposal would likely preempt the provisions in the LUVE initiative that require discretionary approvals of any housing development that meets criteria (i) \u2013 (iv) of the Governor's Proposal. This means that the discretionary processes for DRP and MDRP housing projects would be inapplicable to housing projects that qualify for by-right approval under the Governor's Proposal. Conversely, the DRP and MDRP procedures would remain intact for non-housing projects. The Governor's Proposal does not address approvals through a development agreement. Thus, the development agreement process set forth in the LUVE initiative should not be preempted.", "The LUVE initiative requires the provision of both pre-set and discretionary community benefits as part of the discretionary review process for non-exempt development. The Governor's Proposal will preclude the imposition of these benefits as part of any discretionary review process for housing development that meets criteria (i) \u2013 (iv) of the Governor's Proposal. While it appears that the proposal will preempt the imposition of any conditions (including community benefits) that do not strictly qualify as objective standards, it would still be possible for the City to adopt pre-set community benefits that are otherwise allowable by law, including fees and exactions authorized under the Mitigation Fee Act. As a practical matter, this means that currently designated Tier 2 fees (based upon pre-existing or future nexus fee studies) could be incorporated into the City's zoning code for by-right housing projects.", "B. Applicability of Malibu Measure R Litigation to the LUVE Initiative", "Council requested that this report include an assessment of whether the LUVE may be legally vulnerable for the same reason that a recent Malibu land-use initiative, which required voter approval for certain development projects, was invalidated in court. The Malibu initiative required a voter-approved specific plan for projects that had previously required only administrative approvals. The measure passed, was challenged, and was invalidated based on the rule of law that only legislative acts are subject to the initiative process. See Citizens for Planning Responsibly v. County of San Louis Obispo, 176 Cal. App.4th 357, 367 (2009); Citizens for Jobs and the Economy v. County of Orange, 94 Cal.App.4th 1311, 1332 (2002).", "The LUVE initiative would require a major development review permit (MDRP) for large projects that are now subject to administrative approval through the Development Review Permit process; and an MDRP would, subject to specified exemptions, require voter approval. The requirement of voter approval for an MDRP makes the LUVE initiative legally vulnerable to the same arguments that were made against the Malibu initiative.", "The MDRP would be granted through a classically administrative process, consisting of the application of existing policy and standards to a particular property. However, as a matter of law, administrative actions may not be subjected to voter review through the initiative or referendum processes. Those processes may be used only for legislative purposes. Thus, the voters may enact a law or policy, or invalidate one; but they may not use the electoral process to supplant the government\u2019s administrative authority, including a city council\u2019s administrative authority to issue or deny land use permits. See Wiltshire v. Superior Court of San Diego, 172 Cal. App. 3d 296 (1985). Therefore, the requirement for voter approval of MDRP\u2019s makes the LUVE amendment subject to legal challenge.", "IV. Review of Effects of Growth Management Initiatives Similar to LUVE", "The City of Santa Monica (\u201cCity\u201d) requested that Keyser Marston Associates, Inc. (\u201cKMA\u201d) identify and summarize the terms of five California growth management initiatives that have similar characteristics to the proposed \u201cLand Use Voter Empowerment Initiative\u201d (\u201cLUVE Initiative\u201d). The surveyed initiatives are:", "1. Encinitas \u2013 Proposition A - 2013;", "2. Escondido \u2013 Proposition S - 1998;", "3. Newport Beach \u2013 Measure S - 2000;", "4. Redondo Beach \u2013 Measure DD - 2008; and", "5. Sierra Madre \u2013 Measure V - 2007.", "Each of the surveyed initiatives require voter approval of projects that embody defined characteristics. The KMA summaries provide the following information:", "1. A description of the initiative requirements;", "2. An identification of the number of times prospective development projects and General Plan amendments have been brought to a vote; and", "3. The results of the vote.", "Proposition A was approved by the voters on June 18, 2013. The initiative became effective on July 21, 2013.", "\u2018", "Proposition A requires a vote of the people when publicly or privately initiated \u201cMajor Amendments\u201d are proposed to a \u201cPlanning Policy Document\u201d. Planning Policy Documents are defined as the Land Use Element and Land Use Policy Maps of the General Plan; the Zoning Code and Zoning Map; and Specific Plans or Development Agreements. Major Amendments are defined as:", "1. Increases in the number of dwelling units on a residential lot;", "2. Increases in the number of separate parcels that may be created from an existing parcel;", "3. Changes in identified zone types;", "4. Changes from residential land use to non-residential land use;", "5. Increases in the maximum height of development and how height is measured;", "4. Increases in the maximum allowable commercial or retail square footage on a parcel; and", "5. An action that repeals any Planning Policy Document.", "Proposition A imposes a citywide height limit of two stories or 30 feet for all buildings and structures, except for medical complex development projects and specified buildings with a public high school on a minimum 10-acre site. Proposition A also preserves agricultural lands and open space.", "Proposition A went into effect in July 2013. It is too early to determine what impact the voter-approval requirements will have on future development. However, it should be noted that the major residential developments that have been proposed since Proposition A was enacted have applied for the density bonus allowed by California Government Code Sections 65915 \u2013 65918 (\u201cSection 65915\u201d). The scopes of development for these projects have not triggered the voter approval requirements imposed by Proposition A.", "Proposition S requires a public vote for any General Plan Amendment or the creation of any new Specific Plan Area if it involves an increase in the residential density; a change, alteration or increase in the General Plan\u2019s residential land use categories; and a change of the land use designation of any property from residential to industrial or commercial use. Proposition S essentially asked the voters to affirm the General Plan that was in place as of 1997, and to require voter approval for any significant land use changes.", "After the initiative passed, the City attempted to identify property owners who wished to change their land use designation. Initially, 16 property owners submitted proposals to modify their land use designation. Eight developers subsequently withdrew from the process, and chose to develop under the existing land use designation for their property. The other eight property owners proceeded through the process and received City Council approval. These projects included increasing the number of residential units on four properties from 146 units to 284 units; three properties called for changing residential land to light industrial; and one changed residential to commercial use. All eight ballot measures failed. This had a chilling effect on property owners applying for land use designation changes.", "In May 2012, the City Council approved an update to the General Plan, which was the first comprehensive update since 1990. Proposition S requires that amendments to defined components of the General Plan can only occur after a vote of the people if the proposed changes increase residential density, change the General Plan land use categories, or change certain residential designations to commercial or industrial designations. The General Plan update was placed on the November 2012 ballot (\u201cProposition N\u201d), and it passed with a margin of 53% to 47%.", "Measure S was approved by the voters on November 7, 2000. The Measure became effective on December 15, 2000.", "Measure S is codified in City Charter Section 423. Measure S requires voter approval for any \u201cMajor Amendment\u201d to the General Plan. Major Amendment is defined as any project that requires a General Plan amendment that increases traffic by more than 100 trips during the peak hours in the morning or evening; 100 dwelling units; or 40,000 square feet of commercial area. In addition, Measure S calculations must be applied to the cumulative amount of development, that required an amendment to the General Plan, that has occurred within defined Statistical Areas. This is measured by taking the proposed project plus 80% of the increase associated with projects with amendments that were processed over the previous 10 years. Projects that were subject to voter approval are excluded from the calculations.", "Koll Development proposed an office tower in 2001, and in 2004 a five-star hotel was proposed on the Balboa Peninsula. Both projects required a vote of the people, and both projects were defeated at the ballot box. Subsequently, the Irvine Company withdrew a proposed expansion to Newport Center, and Pacific Life withdrew an office expansion project. No projects that require a vote have been proposed since 2004.", "On July 25, 2006, the City Council adopted a comprehensive update to the General Plan. This update reduced the allowable non-residential development by 449,499 square feet, increased the allowable residential development by 1,166 dwelling units, and reduced peak hour trips by 1,121 in the morning and 958 in the evening. It was determined that this General Plan update was subject to a vote of the people, and it was placed on the ballot as Measure V. A competing measure that was called Measure X (Greenlight II) was placed on the ballot as well. In the election, which was held on November 7, 2006, Measure X failed and Measure V passed by a 54% to 46% margin.", "Measure DD was approved by the voters on November 4, 2008. Measure DD went into effect on December 16, 2008.", "Measure DD is codified in City Charter Section 27. Measure DD requires voter approval for any \u201cMajor Change in Allowable Land Use\u201d to the General Plan, including its Local Coastal Element and the City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance. \u201cSignificant Increase\u201d is defined as any project that requires a General Plan amendment that increases traffic by more than 150 trips during the peak hours in the morning or evening; the density increase generated by the project produces more than 25 dwelling units; or 40,000 square feet of commercial area. In addition, Measure DD calculations must be applied to the cumulative amount of development, that required an amendment to the General Plan, that occurred within the same neighborhood within the preceding eight years. Neighborhood is defined as all properties located either entirely or partially within 1,000 feet of any parcel or lot that is subject to a proposed change in allowable land use.", "In November 2010, the City placed Measure G on the ballot. Measure G was a proposed change to the Redondo Beach Local Coastal Plan (LCP) and the Zoning Ordinance for the Coastal Plan. The amendment called for major changes in existing policies and development standards. The modifications to the LCP and the Zoning Ordinance allowed for 400,000 square feet of development in the Harbor area; 540,000 square feet of development along Catalina Avenue, and the continuation of the AES power plant and the addition of a desalination plant.", "Measure G was approved by the voters in November 2010. In October 2012, the City Council selected a developer to undertake the development of a large-scale mixed-use project at King Harbor. In February 2016, a citizens group commenced a signature drive to place an initiative on the ballot to impose stricter limits on development than were imposed by Measure G.", "Measure V was approved by the voters on April 17, 2007, and went into effect on April 18, 2007. Measure V passed with 51% of the vote (1,796 to 1,703 votes).", "In 2005, the City of Sierra Madre began work on a Specific Plan and design guidelines for the 30-acre downtown core. The City and its planning consultants undertook a campaign that included a large public outreach effort that included an educational series and a design charrette. At the end of this process a downtown vision plan was drafted.", "Opponents contended that the downtown vision plan was meant to attract development that would materially alter the character of the downtown. In turn, they launched a campaign for Measure V, which imposes voter approval requirements for projects in the downtown core that exceed the following limits:", "1. Projects that exceed two stories and/or 30 feet in height; and", "2. Residential development that exceeds 13 units per acre before consideration of the density bonus allowed by Section 65915.", "The opposition to the downtown vision plan was sparked in part by a proposal to build a skilled living facility on a site in the downtown core that had formerly been developed with a skilled nursing facility. After Measure V was passed, the developer worked with the City to create a scope of development that met all the Measure V requirements except that it required a narrow exception to the 13 unit per acre density restriction. In July 2012, the City Council conditionally approved entitlements for the project subject to voter approval. In November 2012, the project was approved by the voters by a 78% to 22% margin. No other projects subject to the limits have been proposed or approved by voters since adoption of the measure in 2007.", "Twenty (20) states allow citizens to pursue growth management issues at the ballot box, but California dominates this process with well over 1,000 land-use ballot measures to date. Given the absence of statewide growth management strategies, these ballot measures are typically promoted at the city and county level. The sheer number of initiatives makes California an excellent setting for the study of the impacts of local initiatives, and in turn, a large number of scholarly studies have been undertaken. Despite this fact, there is a lack of consensus regarding the impact of ballot-box zoning on development activity.", "The prevalent theory is that voter approval requirements imposed in growth management initiatives suppress new development. This concept is based on the following assumptions:", "1. Voters will be inclined to vote against development projects if they have the opportunity; and", "2. The risk and cost associated with a voter approval referendum will have a chilling effect on the willingness of developers to move forward with projects.", "Samuel Staley theorizes that under certain circumstances, public referenda increase the costs of land development and reduce incentives to build in urban areas (Staley, 2001). His study uses a transaction cost approach to evaluate how voter approval requirements impact development activity in cities. Based on an analysis of housing development activity over a 14-year period in 63 Ohio cities, he made the following findings:", "1. There was consistent evidence that imposing voter approval requirements negatively impacted the amount of development irrespective of the potential for voter approval to be received. The theory is that the mere fact that the community wants to have the ability to challenge development at the ballot box creates an unacceptable level of uncertainty.", "2. Staley subsequently undertook a review of the analysis and concluded that there is a limited amount of support for the notion that communities that exhibit higher passage rates may experience less of an impact. The theory is that these communities signal a more consistent and growth friendly environment.", "William Fulton opined that planning and zoning activities that are subject to voter approval can discourage investment and economic development. The theory is that market activity may be constrained by placing property development decisions in the hands of voters. Fulton opines that this is partially due to the fact that the nuances of development projects are difficult to explain clearly to voters, and that election campaigns are often organized around symbols and simplistic messages (Fulton 1993).", "Elizabeth Gerber and Justin Phillips concluded that voter approval requirements do not ultimately stop growth, but they do force developers to interact differently with community interest groups (Gerber and Phillips, 2004). They further opined that this interaction often involves an offer to provide public goods that are perceived to be mitigate some of the negative consequences of growth. However, they caveat this finding with the theory that providing the public goods only works if it results in endorsements from the relevant interest groups. The concept is that interest group endorsements are what generates the needed support, and that developers can only secure the endorsements through the provision of these public goods.", "As discussed previously, measuring the impacts created by voter-approval requirements is a hotly debated issue. However, based on our literature review, and our familiarity with Santa Monica real estate market conditions, it is KMA\u2019s opinion that the implementation of the LUVE Initiative would have a profound impact on the potential for new development. This opinion is based on the following:", "1. Under a standard economic premise, it can be assumed that the value of vacant land would ultimately adjust downward to reflect the reduction in the permitted scope of development. However, Santa Monica is a largely built-out community, and as a result the vast majority of development is occurring on improved properties. These properties will only be recycled if the new development can support the cost associated with purchasing the land and the existing improvements.", "2. Based on a review of sales, the cost for improved properties falls within a range of $350 to $700 per square foot of land area. The large spread in the values is likely due to the varying quality and intensity levels of the existing improvements on the properties.", "3. The purchasers of improved properties are typically proposing to develop mixed-use projects that conform to the Tier 3 standards imposed by the LUCE. To achieve Tier 3 standards, these projects are required to provide a community benefits package that is devised by the Planning Commission and the City Council.", "4. The scope of development that can be achieved under the Tier 1 height limit imposed by the LUVE initiative is approximately half the size of a Tier 3 project. A project of this size cannot feasibly support the acquisition costs for improved properties. This results in the following options:", "a. Some property owners will continue to operate their property in its \u201cas is \u201c condition;", "b. Some improved properties can be adaptively reused on an economically viable basis; and", "c. For properties at the low end of the value range, it is conceivable that a project that utilizes the Section 65915 density bonus, and requests a height increase as one of the concessions the City is required to provide, may be able to develop a financially feasible project under the LUVE Initiative requirements.", "The development process is fraught with several levels of risk, and to mitigate this, developers generally seek out sites for which the entitlement process is well defined and uncertainty is minimized. The imposition of a voter-approval requirement generates the following key impacts:", "1. It increases the inherent risk that a project will not be approved;", "2. It requires the developer to make a substantial investment of capital prior to placing the proposed project in front of the voters; and", "3. It prolongs the development process, which increases the carrying costs incurred by the proposed project.", "As discussed in (Gerber and Phillips, 2004), it is likely that there are development sites in Santa Monica that are so valuable that it may be possible to entice a developer to take the risk associated with pursuing voter approval. However, it is KMA\u2019s opinion that the bulk of activity will focus on existing improved properties that can financially support adaptive reuse, and Section 65915 density bonus projects on properties at the low end of the price range.", "There is considerable debate about whether growth management initiatives make housing less affordable for low and moderate income households. The common assumption is that growth management policies will reduce the supply of housing, which as a consequence will result in increased home prices. While this is a logical premise, housing prices are actually determined based on a wide variety of factors such as land prices, the supply and type of housing, the demand for housing, and the availability of acceptable substitutes (Nelson, Pendall, Dawkins and Knaap, 2002).", "There is general consensus that when the demand for housing is inelastic (no acceptable substitutes are available), the imposition of growth controls results in higher housing costs (Lugar and Temkin, 2000). This is exacerbated when there is inelastic supply, which is common in desirable locations like Santa Monica where housing cannot be easily substituted because the desirable feature is the location, not the house (Nyguyen, 2007).", "The following studies provide useful analyses of the impact of growth control measures on housing costs:", "1. Impacts on home prices and rents:", "a. A study of California growth control measures between 1978 and 1988 concluded that fewer units were built, and higher median rents and home prices were exhibited (Levine, 1999).", "b. An empirical analysis, based on a large data set of San Francisco Bay Area housing units, concluded that home prices were between 17% and 38% higher in communities in which growth controls or moratoria had been imposed (Katz and Rosen, 1987).", "c. Elizabeth Gerber and Justin Phillips opined that developers who are providing a public good in order to attract endorsements for their project may try to pass the costs of these public goods along in the form of higher home prices (Gerber and Phillips, 2004). Of course, this theory requires the demand curve to be completely inelastic.", "2. Impacts on housing for low and moderate income households:", "a. The empirical literature on California growth control measures supports the case that housing supply is a dominant determinate of housing prices. Based on this concept, many studies conclude that growth control measures result in increased home prices, which shut out the poor, and exacerbate income segregation (Quigley and Rosenthal, 2005).", "b. Studies prepared by (Branfman, Cohen & Turbek, 1973; Fischel, 1990; Lilydahl and Singell, 1987) found that growth control encourages bidding wars for starter homes, which constrains entry into the housing market.", "c. A comparison of 84 California cities that adopted at least one growth control ballot measure between 1986 and 1999, to 337 cities that did not adopt any growth control ballot measures, found that cities in which growth controls were adopted by voters experienced a reduction in the growth of the low income population (Nyguyen, 2007).", "d. The adverse effects of growth controls are likely to impose the greatest affordability problems on households with the lowest incomes (Nelson, Pendall, Dawkins and Knaap, 2002).", "New residential development in Santa Monica currently commands some of the highest sales prices and rents found in any Southern California community. It can safely be assumed that the demand for market-rate housing exceeds the supply of housing, and this excess demand condition would be perpetuated by the requirements imposed by the LUVE Initiative. However, it should be noted that even under current conditions it is unlikely that enough units could be constructed to fully accommodate the demand for housing. It is therefore KMA\u2019s opinion that the adoption of the LUVE Initiative would not materially impact the achievable home prices in the community.", "It is KMA\u2019s opinion that the adoption of the LUVE Initiative would result in the development of significantly fewer affordable housing units than are currently being provided. The LUVE Initiative exempts 100% affordable housing projects from the voter approval requirements, but these projects require local public assistance in order to acquire property and to fill the financial gap that cannot be bridged using outside assistance sources such as Low Income Housing Tax Credits.", "With the termination of the Redevelopment Agency in February 2012, the City lost its primary funding source for affordable housing development. There is no longer sufficient funding to implement the types of projects the former Agency was able to assist. Under current conditions it is not reasonable to assume that funding will be available to assist in the development of a large number of affordable housing units.", "The primary source of affordable housing development is currently the City\u2019s Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP). The AHPP requirements are increased by 50% for Tier2 projects under the LUCE, and additional requirements are negotiated on a case-by-case basis for Tier 3 projects. Recognizing that the amount of residential development would be severely curtailed under the LUVE Initiative requirements, it can be concluded that the number of newly constructed affordable housing units would be reduced if the LUVE Initiative is enacted.", "California Election Code Section 9212 provides the City Council with the right to obtain a report that evaluates the impacts that could potentially be generated by an initiative (\u201c9212 Report\u201d). The Code Section was passed by the State Legislature in 1994, and it was amended in 2000 to expand the scope of impacts that could be studied.", "The following chart presents the growth management initiatives that were described previously in this report, and identifies whether or not the jurisdiction prepared a 9212 Report in advance of placing the initiative on the ballot.", "Year", "City", "Type of Initiative", "Report Prepared?", "2013", "Encinitas", "Voter approval required for \u201cMajor Amendment\u201d to a \u201cPlanning Policy Document\u201d", "Yes", "1998", "Escondido", "Voter approval required for General Plan Amendment or New Specific Plan", "No", "2000", "Newport Beach", "Voter approval required for a \u201cMajor Amendment\u201d to the General Plan", "No", "2008", "Redondo Beach", "Voter approval required for \u201cMajor Change in Allowable Land Use\u201d", "No", "2007", "Sierra Madre", "Voter approval required for projects in the downtown core that exceed height and/or residential density limits", "No", "As can be seen in the preceding table, four out of the five cities did not have a 9212 Report prepared in advance of placing the growth management initiative on the ballot. Comparatively, the City of Encinitas engaged a team of attorneys and consultants to prepare a comprehensive 9212 Report. The Encinitas 9212 Report presented analyses of the following topics:", "1. The fiscal impacts created by the implementation of Proposition A, including the effect on infrastructure funding.", "2. Proposition A\u2019s effect on the internal consistency of the General Plan, Specific Plan, Zoning and the Implementation of Specified Statutory Requirements.", "3. The effect that Proposition A would have on the use of vacant and developed land, including:", "a. The availability of housing sites, and the City\u2019s ability to meet its Regional Housing Needs Assessment Goals;", "b. Agricultural land; and", "c. Open space.", "4. The effect that the implementation of Proposition A would have on traffic congestion.", "5. Proposition A\u2019s impact on business retention and attraction.", "6. The impacts created by Proposition A on the following matters identified by the City Council:", "a. The impacts on major use permits;", "b. The impacts on the Local Coastal Program and Coastal Commission Actions;", "c. Impacts on the Section 65915 density bonus;", "d. Impacts on the Housing Element updates mandated by the State;", "e. Impacts on existing Specific Plans; and", "f. Methods for modifying or repealing Proposition A.", "Soon after the passage of Measure S in Escondido, eight development projects were placed on the ballot and each project was rejected by the voters. Similarly, after Proposition S was passed in Newport Beach, three development projects were placed on the ballot, and each failed. There is no record of Section 9212 Reports being prepared for the proposed projects in these cities. Comparatively, in Sierra Madre, an assisted living project was placed on the ballot in 2012, and it was approved by the voters. A 9212 Report was prepared for this project.", "The Cities of Escondido (2012), Newport Beach (2006) and Redondo Beach (2010) placed General Plan amendments on the ballot. These initiatives were City Council sponsored, and they did not request the preparation of Section 9212 Reports. Each of these measure passed.", "In response to the Newport Beach sponsored General Plan amendment, a citizen group placed a competing initiative on the ballot that proposed to impose stricter development controls than were imposed by Proposition S in 2000. The City Council had a 9212 Report prepared to evaluate the initiative terms. The citizen proposed initiative failed.", "KMA surveyed growth management initiatives that were put forth in California between 1999 and 2015, and the results are presented in the following tables. It should be noted that this survey is based on information published by the California Secretary of State every two years. This sample does not include all the growth management initiatives that were voted on between 1999 and 2015.", "The following table identifies cities that prepared a 9212 Report for growth management initiatives:", "Year", "City", "Type of Initiative", "Report Prepared?", "Initiative Approved?", "1999", "Apple Valley", "Readoption of 1991 Land Use Element with changes requiring a vote through 2021", "Yes", "Yes", "1999", "Moorpark", "Preservation of open space and agricultural land", "Yes", "Yes", "1999", "San Ramon", "Voter approval required for General Plan amendments and land use decisions", "Yes", "No", "1999", "Sonoma", "Urban Growth Boundary", "Yes", "Yes", "2000", "Danville", "Urban Growth Boundary", "Yes", "Yes", "2000", "Healdsburg", "Residential unit cap", "Yes", "Yes", "2000", "Tracy", "Urban Growth Boundary amendment", "Yes", "Yes", "2000", "Tracy", "Urban Growth Boundary amendment", "Yes", "No", "2002", "Berkeley", "Building height limits", "Yes", "No", "2002", "Windsor", "Residential building caps", "Yes", "No", "2004", "Pacific Grove", "No construction in \u201cO\u201d zone and limited enlargement in \u201cO\u201d zone", "Yes", "No", "2004", "Roseville", "Voter approval required for General Plan amendments and land use decisions in defined areas", "Yes", "No", "2004", "Stockton", "Urban Growth Boundary", "Yes", "Yes", "2004", "Stockton", "Preservation of open space and agricultural land", "Yes", "Yes", "2005", "Antioch", "Growth control measures", "Yes", "Yes", "2005", "Cupertino", "Density limits", "Yes", "No", "2005", "Cupertino", "Height limits", "Yes", "No", "2005", "Cupertino", "Setback limits", "Yes", "No", "2005", "Palm Springs", "Hillside preservation", "Yes", "No", "2006", "Loma Linda", "Hillside preservation", "Yes", "Yes", "2007", "Arcadia", "Amend General Plan and Zoning Code relating to permitted uses in the CBD", "Yes", "No", "2008", "Buellton", "Urban Growth Boundary", "Yes", "Yes", "2008", "Fillmore", "General Plan Amendment", "Yes", "Yes", "2008", "Grass Valley", "Amendment to Land Use Element of General Plan", "Yes", "No", "2008", "Grass Valley", "Urban Growth Boundary", "Yes", "No", "2008", "Pleasanton", "Hillside preservation and residential unit cap", "Yes", "Yes", "2008", "Rocklin", "General Plan Amendment", "Yes", "Yes", "2008", "San Marcos", "Voter approval required for certain General Plan Amendments", "Yes", "No", "2008", "Santa Monica", "Commercial development in excess of 75,000 square feet per year requires voter approval", "Yes", "No", "2010", "Alameda", "Alameda Point Revitalization", "Yes", "No", "2010", "Brentwood", "Urban Limit Line", "Yes", "No", "2010", "Mission Viejo", "Land use regulation on private and public property", "Yes", "No", "2010", "Rancho Palos Verdes", "Enact Specific Plan and General Plan Amendments regarding Marymount College expansion", "Yes", "No", "2010", "Redlands", "Prohibition of \u201cMega-Retail Development\u201d", "Yes", "No", "2011", "Menifee", "Specific Plan for commercial development of 30 acres", "Yes", "Yes", "2011", "San Juan Capistrano", "General Plan Amendment", "Yes", "Yes", "2012", "Cypress", "Specific Plan modification to allow residential development", "Yes", "Yes", "2012", "Goleta", "Preservation of agricultural land", "Yes", "Yes", "2013", "Sonoma", "Hotel development limitation", "Yes", "No", "2014", "Berkeley", "New requirements for buildings over 60 feet; eliminate historic resource determination for Green Pathway project; new Civic Center Historic District overlay; amend other requirements", "Yes", "No", "2014", "Escondido", "Specific Plan adoption", "Yes", "No", "2014", "Los Gatos", "General Plan and Specific Plan amendments for a 21.6-acre parcel", "Yes", "Yes", "2014", "Menlo Park", "General Plan and Specific Plan amendments related to downtown area", "Yes", "No", "2014", "Pismo Beach", "General Plan amendment to alter development standards within defined areas in the City\u2019s sphere of influence", "Yes", "Yes", "The following table identifies growth management initiatives for which cities did not prepare a 9212 Report:", "Year", "City", "Type of Initiative", "Report Prepared?", "Initiative Approved?", "1999", "Monterey Park", "Voter approval required for changes to General Plan and Zoning Code changes", "No", "Yes", "1999", "Redlands", "Growth management", "No", "Yes", "2000", "Arroyo Grande", "Preservation of open space and agricultural land", "No", "Yes", "2000", "Brea", "Hillside preservation", "No", "Yes", "2000", "Paso Robles", "Preservation of open space and agricultural land", "No", "Yes", "2000", "Santa Paula", "Preservation of open space and agricultural land", "No", "Yes", "2002", "Agoura Hills", "General Plan and zoning limit imposed on gross floor area", "No", "Yes", "2002", "Galt", "Residential growth management", "No", "No", "2002", "Santa Paula", "Urban Growth Boundary amendment", "No", "No", "2002", "Simi Valley", "Preservation of open space and agricultural land", "No", "No", "2003", "Cotati", "Modify commercial limits", "No", "Yes", "2004", "Santa Paula", "Urban Growth Boundary", "No", "Yes", "2005", "Pittsburg", "Urban Growth Boundary", "No", "Yes", "2006", "Santa Paula", "Adjustment to Urban Growth Boundary", "No", "No", "2006", "Santa Paula", "Voter approval required for development projects on more than 81 acres", "No", "Yes", "2008", "Chula Vista", "Voter approval required for General Plan change to increase building height above 84 feet", "No", "Yes", "2009", "Santa Barbara", "Building height limits", "No", "No", "2013", "Apple Valley", "Specific Plan adoption - Walmart", "No", "Yes", "2013", "Palo Alto", "Municipal Code amendment to rezone residential property to an overlay zone", "No", "Yes", "2013", "Redondo Beach", "Power plant rezoning to park, open space and commercial", "No", "No", "2013", "Watsonville", "Urban Line modifications", "No", "No", "2014", "Riverside", "Amend General Plan and Zoning; and repeal Specific Plan that permanently preserved the La Sierra Hills as open space. Allow residential development in the area", "No", "No", "2014", "Union City", "General Plan and Hillside Area Plan amendments to allow development on a 63-acre parcel. Includes relocation of Hillside Area Plan boundary", "No", "No", "The following results are not statistically significant. They are provided for information purposes only:", "1. 9212 Reports were prepared for 44 of the initiatives. This represents 66% of the 67 initiatives that were surveyed.", "2. Approximately 45% of the initiatives that had 9212 Reports were approved by the voters. This increased to 61% for initiatives that did not have 9212 Reports.", "A 9212 Report is meant to provide a useful evaluation of the impacts that could potentially be created by a proposed initiative. For example, a 9212 Report can provide information that is subsequently included in the city attorney\u2019s impartial analysis of the impact on the existing law and the operation of the measure. The 9212 Report may also provide information that is included in the arguments in support or opposition of a proposed measure.", "Acquaye, L., Macedo, J., Phillips, R., White, D. (2007). Exploring the Impacts of Ballot Box Land Use Measures on Affordable Housing. Housing and Society, 34(1), 45-67.", "Branfman, E., Cohen, B., Turbek, D. (1973). Measuring the Invisible Wall: Land Use Controls and the Residential Patterns of the Poor. Yale Law Journal, 82(3), 483-508.", "Fischel;. W.A. (1990). Do Growth Controls Matter? A Review of Empirical Evidence on the Effectiveness and Efficiency of Local Government Land Use Regulations. Cambridge, MA: Lincoln Institute of Land Policy.", "Fulton, W. (1993). Sliced on the Cutting Edge: Growth Management and Growth Control in California. In J.M. Stein (Ed.), Growth Management: The Planning Challenge of the 1990\u2019s. Newbury Park, CA.", "Fulton, W., Nyguyen, M., Williamson, C., Shigley, P., Kancler, E., Dietenhofer, J., Sourial, J. (2002). Growth Management Ballot Measures in California. Ventura, CA: Solimar Research Group.", "Gerber, E., Phillips, J. (2004). Direct Democracy and Land Use Policy: Exchanging Public Goods for Development Rights. Urban Studies, 41(2), 463-479.", "Katz, L., Rosen, K. (1987). The Interjurisdictional Effects of Growth Controls on Housing Prices. Journal of Law and Economics, 30(1), 149-160.", "Levine, N. (1999). The Effects of Local Growth Controls on Regional Housing Production and Population Redistribution in California. Urban Studies, 36(12), 2047-2068.", "Lilydahl, J., Singell, L. (1987). The Effects of Growth Management on the Housing Market: A Review of the Theoretical and Empirical Evidence. Journal of Urban Affairs, 9(1), 63-77.", "Luger, M., Temkin, K. (2000). Red Tape and Housing Costs: How Regulation Affects New Residential Development. New Brunswick, NJ: Center for Urban Policy Research.", "Nelson, A., Pendall, P., Dawkins, C., Knaap, G. (2002). The Link Between Growth Management and Housing Affordability: The Academic Evidence. Washington DC: Brookings Institution.", "Nyguyen, M. (2007). Local Growth Control at the Ballot Box: Real Effect of Symbolic Politics. Chapel Hill, NC: University of North Carolina.", "Quigley, J., Rosenthal, L. (2005). The Effects of Land Use Regulation on the Price of Housing: What Do We Know? What Can We Learn? Cityscape: A journal of Policy Development and Research, 8(1), 69-137.", "Staley, S. (2001). Ballot-Box Zoning, Transaction Costs and Urban Growth. Journal of the American Planning Association, 67(1), 25-37.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no direct financial impacts resulting from Council\u2019s consideration of this report."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Amending Section 2.24.105 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Related to Protest Procedures for City Purchases and Public Works Projects", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on June 28, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Section 2.24.105 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Related to Protest Procedures for City Purchases and Public Works Projects.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of Ordinance Amending the City's Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of Article 9 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code) by Making Minor Clarifications Regarding the Applicability of Active Commercial Design and Active Commercial Use Requirements in Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts (Section 9.11.030 and Table 9.11.030), Requirements for Enclosed Garages in the R-1 Zone (Table 9.07.030), Requirements for Front Setbacks in the OP3 Zone (Table 9.09.030) and Requirements for Maximum First Story Street Wall Height in the OF Zone (Table 9.14.030)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on June 28, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending the City's Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of Article 9 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code) by making minor clarifications regarding the applicability of active commercial design and active commercial use requirements in mixed-use and commercial districts (Section 9.11.030 and Table 9.11.030), requirements for enclosed garages in the R-1 Zone (Table 9.07.030), requirements for front setbacks in the OP3 Zone (Table 9.09.030) and requirements for maximum first story street wall height in the OF Zone.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Introduction for First Reading a new Ordinance adding Chapter 7.70 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code regulating Wireless Telecommunications Facilities in the Right-of-Way and on Public Property and amending Chapter 7.06", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance establishing regulations for design and placement of wireless telecommunications facilities in the right-of-way and on public property by adding a new Chapter 7.70 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code and amending and repealing specific sections of Chapter 7.06 Right-of-Way Management Regulations related to Wireless Communications.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The wireless telecommunications industry is expanding as citizens\u2019 demand more bandwidth for the data they consume. The Federal and State governments are passing laws to facilitate expansion of wireless infrastructure. Santa Monica Municipal Code, Section 7.06 Right-of-Way Management Regulations is outdated based on the ongoing changes to State and Federal legislation of this industry and leaves the City unprepared for the scale of expansion that is on the horizon. A new ordinance is necessary to adjust to the changes.", "Background", "Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 7.06 Right-of-Way Management Regulations were adopted July 13, 2004 in response to the Telecommunications Act of 1996 and included regulations regarding wireless telecommunications facilities. In 2012, the Federal Government passed the Spectrum Act (2012) to make more bandwidth available for cellular or wireless services. Often referred to as section 6409, the Spectrum Act removes some of the requirements created by local governments by instituting a shot clock with a \u201cdeemed granted\u201d remedy for modifications to existing facilities when the modification results in less than a substantial change.", "The Federal Communications Commission held a rule making session in 2014 to clarify section 6409 and define \u201csubstantial change.\u201d FCC Report and order 14-153, which became effective April 8, 2015, defined substantial changes to an existing facility with the summarized criteria:", "1. For installations in the public rights-of-way the height is increased by more than 10% or 10 feet, whichever is greater or it protrudes from the edge of the structure more than six feet.", "2. The modification involves installation of more than the standard number of new equipment cabinets for the technology involved, but not to exceed four cabinets.", "3. The modification involves any excavation or deployment outside the current site.", "4. The modification would defeat the existing concealment elements.", "5. The modification does not comply with conditions associated with the prior approval of construction or modification of the tower or base station unless the non-compliance is due to an increase in height, increase in width, addition of cabinets, or new excavation that does not exceed the corresponding \u201csubstantial change\u201d thresholds identified above.", "Except for requiring compliance with generally applicable building, structural, electrical, and safety codes and other laws codifying objective standards reasonably related to health and safety, cities must approve modifications that do not result in a substantial change. Assembly Bill 57 was passed by Governor Brown October 9, 2015 and became effective January 1, 2016. This bill created a \u201cdeemed granted\u201d remedy for new wireless telecommunications facilities and collocations.", "These new laws result in the City\u2019s inability to deny modifications to existing sites that are less than a substantial change and require that approval be granted within sixty days for a modification, ninety days for a collocation, or one hundred and fifty days for a new site or the approvals are deemed granted.", "Discussion", "Wireless technology, the public\u2019s demand for wireless data, and the laws regulating wireless telecommunications facilities have changed significantly in the last twelve years. The pace of change is increasing. The public\u2019s increasing consumption of data is generating a frenzy among wireless carriers to invest billions of dollars to purchase bandwidth and build the necessary infrastructure in the form of new wireless communications facilities and fiber to meet the data demands.", "The majority of the planned expansion of wireless infrastructure will be built in the public right-of-way. New locations for installations on private property are limited and more difficult to negotiate and permit. The California Public Utilities Commission has determined that wireless carriers are a utility and therefore have all the rights of use of the public right-of-way as any other utility. The public right-of-way also has existing infrastructure in the form of utility poles, traffic signals and street lights that can support wireless infrastructure. The current Right-of-Way Management Regulation is outdated and leaves the City unprepared for the scale of expansion that is on the horizon.", "The proposed ordinance will amend and repeal those sections of Chapter 7.06 Right-of-Way Management Regulations that relate to wireless telecommunications facilities in the right-of-way and add Chapter 7.70 Wireless Telecommunications Facilities in the Right-of-Way. The ordinance balances the community\u2019s need for services, the industry\u2019s need to deploy quickly, and the City\u2019s obligation to maintain public health and safety and protect the aesthetic qualities of our neighborhoods. Specifically, the ordinance expands on the current design guidelines, providing detailed design requirements for different types of wireless installations on different types of infrastructure that exists in the right-of-way. The ordinance adds definitions for concealment elements and camouflage which will protect the City from unreasonable expansion. The definitions for maintenance, modification, and collocation have been added to help streamline permitting for the industry. Finally, the ordinance allows for necessary adaptability, by allowing the Director to publish a permitting policy and guidelines document.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Adopting this ordinance will have no financial impact. The application processing costs for new wireless communications facilities in the right-of-way will be covered by the wireless facilities fee. New wireless communications facilities located on City infrastructure in the right-of-way will generate revenue in the form of license agreements for each installation."]}], [{"Title": "Qualified Initiative petition amending the City's Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) and Zoning Ordinance to require Voter Approval of Certain Development Projects", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council do one of the following:1. Adopt the proposed measure entitled, \u201cAN INITIATIVE PETITION AMENDING THE CITY\u2019S LAND USE AND CIRCULATION ELEMENT (LUCE) AND ZONING ORDINANCE TO REQUIRE VOTER APPROVAL OF CERTAIN DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS THAT WOULD BE SUBJECT TO A NEW PERMIT REQUIREMENT, OF ALL DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENTS, AND OF CERTAIN CHANGES TO THE CITY'S LAND USE AND PLANNING POLICY DOCUMENTS SUBJECT TO SPECIFIED EXEMPTIONS\u201d without alteration; or,2. Adopt a resolution placing the measure on the November 8, 2016, General Municipal Election ballot.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On June 14, 2016, the City Council accepted the qualified initiative petition entitled by the City Attorney as \u201cAn Initiative Measure Amending the City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) and Zoning Ordinance to Require Voter Approval of Certain Development Projects that would be Subject to a New Permit Requirement, of all Development Agreements, and of Certain Changes to the City\u2019s Land Use and Planning Policy Documents Subject to Specified Exemptions.\u201d  A study, requested by the City Council, was presented earlier during this meeting.  As provided for in the California Elections Code, after having received the study the City Council must now either adopt the measure as submitted or adopt a resolution placing the measure on the November 8, 2016, General Election ballot.", "Discussion", "On June 14, 2016, Council accepted the qualified measure and directed staff to return with the results of the study within 30 days. The results of the study were presented to Council during the study session earlier in this meeting. Now that Council has received and considered that information, Council must take action on the proposed measure. Council must do one of the following: 1) adopt the ordinance, without alteration; or 2) adopt a resolution placing the measure on the November 8, 2016, General Election ballot.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. If Council opts for adopting the measure, there will be no election-related costs. Costs related to implementation and enforcement of the measure are unknown at this time. Staff can provide this information at a subsequent meeting. If Council places the measure on the November 8, 2016 ballot, then cost will be covered by the funds budgeted for the municipal election."]}, {"Title": "Revenue and Advisory Measures for the November 2016 Ballot", "Department": "Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": "Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt the attached ordinance enacting an increase in the transactions and use tax to one percent, subject to a vote of the electorate at the November 8, 2016 election (Attachment A); and2. Adopt the attached resolution placing measures on the November 8, 2016 ballot (Attachment B) that would:a. allow voters to express their preference that if a transaction and use tax increase is adopted, funds should be used to support public school programs and affordable housing;b. set the transaction and use tax at one percent;c. authorize certain members of the Council to submit arguments and rebuttals concerning the measure; andd. direct the City Attorney to prepare an impartial analysis of the measure.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Advancing the Council\u2019s strategic goals related to maintaining an inclusive and diverse community and learn + thrive is dependent upon a robust affordable housing program and high-quality public schools. In response, Council directed staff to prepare two ballot measures for consideration on the November 8, 2016 ballot. The first measure would allow voters to express their preference that increased General Fund revenues associated with an increase in the transaction and use tax be used for affordable housing and local public schools. The second measure would supplement General Fund revenues through an increase in the transaction and use tax.", "Background", "Santa Monica\u2019s long history of supporting equity, opportunity, affordability, and inclusivity includes a series of voter-approved initiatives to support affordable housing and public schools. In August 2015, Council reaffirmed its commitment to those values with the selection of two of its five top strategic goals: maintaining an inclusive and diverse community and learn + thrive. Despite strong community support, Santa Monica\u2019s efforts to advance affordable housing programs and public education have been hampered by changes at the state level. State-initiated changes include the elimination of the Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency, which provided most local funding for the preservation and production of affordable housing. Public school funding has been hampered by reduced state funding, as well as a school financing structure that makes school districts ultimately reliant on the health of the State of California\u2019sbudgets.", "Council conducted policy discussions on August 25, 2015 (Attachment C) and January12, 2016 (Attachment D) regarding how to restore funding for local priorities related to affordable housing and local schools. At its June 28, 2016 meeting (Attachment E), Council considered four options for increasing City revenues that could be used to support City priorities related to affordable housing and public education. Council directed staff to draft ballot language for two measures, the first of which would allow voters to express their preferences related to affordable housing and schools, and the second of which would increase the local transaction and use tax (TUT) by \u00bd cent.", "Discussion", "Pursuant to Council direction, two measures are proposed to appear on the November2016 ballot. One measure would allow voters to express their desire that enhanced local revenues associated with an increase in the local transactions and use tax be used to support public schools and affordable housing. Pursuant to feedback from school leaders, the educational uses that could be supported by the measure include improvement and maintenance of local public schools, attraction and retention of high\u2011quality teachers, expanded access to pre-school, technology improvements, and enhanced instruction in arts, music, math, and science. Pursuant to Council direction, the housing uses that could be supported by the measure include preservation of existing housing to protect current residents and maintain long-term affordability, rental assistance to help residents stay in their homes, creating permanent supportive housing for those who are currently unhoused, and protecting residents from displacement by rising housing costs.", "The other measure would allow voters to consider a \u00bd-cent increase in the TUT. The TUT functions like a sales tax, and is collected on the sale of goods that are not otherwise exempt from sales taxes (i.e., food, medicine, etc.) Councilidentified the TUT as the preferred revenue source for a variety ofreasons. First, the TUT provides relatively stable revenues from year to year. Otherrevenue sources considered, such as the documentary transfer tax and a construction tax, are volatile from year to year, making it difficult to implement programs when budgets fluctuate significantly. Second, the TUT is considered a universal tax that everyone pays, including residents, visitors, and businesses. While residents pay the tax, analysis completed at the Los Angeles County level shows that visitors and businesses pay a large share of the tax. With Santa Monica\u2019s many businesses and visitors, it is likely that residents will pay an even smaller share than at the County level. Third, taxes imposed on the sale of goods are typically considered to be regressive taxes that put an undue burden on low-income residents. However, because California law exempts food, medicine, rent, and services, the regressive nature of the tax is muted. In addition, the California exemptions mean that the tax is applied to purchases that are more discretionary in nature, as opposed to essentials such as food and housing. Increasing the TUT by \u00bd cent for general municipal purposes requires approval by over 50 percent of those who vote on the measure.", "Summary of Ballot Measures", "As envisioned, the adjustment to the TUT would be considered a general tax and thereby would require a simple majority (50 percent plus one) for voter approval. Theadvisory measure allowing voters to demonstrate their intentions for the increased revenues would be directly relevant only if the TUT adjustment were to be approved.", "Attachment B is the resolution submitting the measures to the voters of the City of Santa Monica. The titles of the measures are as follows:", "PROPOSITION \u201c \u201c: ADVISORY VOTE ONLY: If a local transaction and use tax is enacted in Santa Monica, should half its revenue be used to improve and maintain local public schools, including attracting and retaining high-quality teachers, expanding access to pre-schools, assisting at-risk students, and improving school technology, arts, music, math, and science instruction; and half to help preserve and ensure housing in Santa Monica that is affordable, protect residents from displacement by rising housing costs, and reduce homelessness?", "PROPOSITION \u201c \u201c: To maintain and improve Santa Monica community services including preservation of affordable housing, reducing homelessness, school repair and improvement, education for Santa Monica children and students, and other general fund services, shall an ordinance be adopted to enact a Santa Monica one-half percent transactions and use tax, subject to independent annual audits, all funds used locally, and no money going to Sacramento?", "In addition, the resolution authorizes the City Council to submit arguments and rebuttals concerning the measure. Council may designate one to five members to submit arguments and rebuttals for the measure. Finally, the resolution directs the City Clerk to transmit a copy of the measure to the City Attorney and directs the City Attorney to prepare an impartial analysis of the effects of the measure on the existing law as well as on the operation of the measure.", "Arguments and rebuttals shall be submitted in accordance with State Elections Code Sections 9280-9287 and Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 1.04.125.TheElections Official will set the deadline for submitting arguments as 14 days from the date the election is called on the measure and the deadline for submitting rebuttals to arguments as 10 days after the deadline for submitting arguments on the measure.", "The advisory measure does not raise taxes; rather, it expresses Santa Monica voters\u2019 preference if the transaction and use tax is increased. The results of the measure would not bind the current or future city councils as to use of the revenues. In 2010, Santa Monica voters approved a half-percent transactions and use tax, as well as an advisory measure expressing a desire that half of the revenues from the transactions and use tax be used to support school programs. Since adoption of the two measures, Council has allocated 50 percent of all revenues to school programs.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The cost of placing the measures on the ballot will be covered by the FY 2016-17 election budget. If voters approve the transaction and use tax measure, General Fund revenues are expected to increase by approximately $16 million per year. Actualrevenues in any year are affected by the general state of the economy and other factors related to purchasing of goods. Voter approval of the advisory measure would create significant new revenues to bolster the School District\u2019s educational programs and to restore the City\u2019s affordable housing programs."]}, {"Title": "Revised Language for Proposed Amendments to Article XXII of the City Charter (the Oaks Initiative)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the revised language for proposed amendments to the Oaks Initiative to be placed on the November 2016 ballot.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting of June 28, the City Council considered proposed language for amendments to the Oaks Initiative to be presented to the voters in the November 2016 general election. After hearing from the public and deliberating at some length, Council directed preparation of additional changes. Attachment A fulfills that direction, and it is presented for final Council approval. The new proposed language consists of a \u201creach back\u201d provision applicable to all types of City contracts, a change in the placement of language relating to \u201cnesting\u201d corporations, and the addition of language limiting remedies to willful and knowing violations.", "Background", "Recent staff reports supply background on the effort to strengthen and better effectuate the Oaks Initiative in Santa Monica through amendments to its text. The law firm of Hueston Hennigan, the City Attorney\u2019s Office and members of the public have all made suggestions. Council has considered the matter on three previous occasions in the last several months and gave final direction at its last meeting.", "Discussion", "The new amendments requested at the last meeting and those previously considered and approved by Council all appear in Attachment A so that Council may take a final look at the complete proposal. Changes made since the last meeting appear in sections 2202(b), 2203(d) (which is new), and 2206(b). These changes include \u201creach back\u201d language applicable to Council members seeking re-election, Planning Commission members running for the City Council, and applicants/bidders for all types of public contracts. As per Council direction, this proposed language is similar to Pasadena\u2019s, but it is broader. Pasadena\u2019s language, which was proposed as a model by the organization Consumer Watchdog, prohibits those seeking to enter into a contractual relationship with the city from making campaign contributions to council candidates and their controlled committees. The proposed language in Attachment A applies the prohibitions to that group and also to Council members seeking re-election, and Planning Commissioners who are running for Council, and their controlled committees.", "Council directed two other changes at its last meeting.  One related to board members of \u201cnesting\u201d corporate boards. The other was to add a requirement to the civil remedies provision that violations must be \u201cwillful and knowing\u201d to trigger civil remedies. Both those changes have been made and appear in Attachment A. The other proposed amendments, previously accepted by Council remain unchanged.", "If adopted by the voters, the measure would: expand the Oaks Initiative to make its prohibition applicable to both public officials and recipients of public benefits who confer personal or campaign advantages on public officials and to include a \u201creach back\u201d provision applicable to all types of public contracts; facilitate enforcement by eliminating any ambiguity in the term \u201cpublic official\u201d, delineating enforcement responsibilities, specifying that the prohibition applies outside of the city, and making express that remedies are cumulative; and promote fairness and the preservation of individual rights by specifying that civil remedies apply only to knowing violations and that uncompensated volunteers serving local nonprofits that receive City grants need not forego their constitutional right to participate in the democratic process through campaign contributions.", "Staff recommends that Council approve all of the proposed changes.", "Alternatives:", "Council could revise the \u201creach back\u201d provision to cover all types of public benefits. However, this approach would cause administrative difficulties as previously discussed, particularly in the case of land use permits and approvals. Therefore, staff recommends adhering to the Pasadena model, which limits the \u201creach back\u201d to all contracts, but expanding the model so that the prohibition applies to both officials and potential contractors.", "Next Steps", "Staff will return with ballot language and the appropriate resolution at Council\u2019s next meeting, which - absent the scheduling of a special meeting - will be Council\u2019s last opportunity to place measures on the November 2016 ballot. Staff will return with updates to the Guidelines later in the year.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no financial impacts and no budget actions associated with the approval of this language. If the voters adopt the proposed amendments, there will be increased administrative costs associated with implementation. At this time, those costs are unknown but staff anticipates that they will not be substantial, particularly relative to the importance of the measure."]}, {"Title": "City Yards Modernization Concept Design Recommendation", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and approve the feasibility analysis, concept design and financial options for the City Yards Modernization project. 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) with design-build contractor HDCC for design services (including schematic design, design development and construction documents) to build the proposed City Yards Modernization Project in accordance to the proposed Zipper Plan and Phasing Package A.3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to Professional Services Agreement No. 10145 in the amount of $468,000 (includes a 10% contingency) with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC), a California-based company, to provide additional conceptual design scope of work related to the Olympic Treatment Plant, Water Resources, Gandara Park and Public Landscape, Phasing Package C.1. This will result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $970,200, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. 4. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within budget authority.5. Authorize the City Manager to register the City Yards as an eco-district with EcoDistricts Protocol. 6. Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 28, 2015, Council authorized staff to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for concept design, cost estimation services, and feasibility analysis for the Santa Monica City Yards Modernization project, long overdue to replace substandard facilities that provide so many important city services. Staff recommends that Council review and approve the concept design, feasibility analysis and financial options and authorize staff to enter into negotiations for a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) for the design phase of the recommended Zipper Plan and Phasing Package A. Staff would return to Council for approval of the GMP for the design phase. CEQA analysis will be commenced early in the design phase, informing the design, and project construction approval will be contingent upon the results.", "Additionally, the proposed Olympic Treatment Plant and Water Resources Campus need to be examined in the context of the City Yard project to ensure a coordinated approach. The Water and Wastewater Funds would fund the Water Administration buildings, components of the modernization project. This new scope of work also includes a phased plan to move the Public Landscape Division currently housed in the old Fisher Lumber building to City Yards and a reworking of Gandara Park to provide a more generous frontage to the neighborhood. The park and Public Landscape scope requires further analysis to provide a funding strategy.", "Background", "City Yards Site Characteristics and Considerations", "The City Yards is a 14.7-acre site owned and operated by the City of Santa Monica and located at 2500 Michigan Avenue, near the intersection of 24th Street and Michigan Avenue. The City took ownership of the site in the late 1940s and constructed a series of three buildings to house City Yards operations occupying the land between Michigan Avenue and the former Santa Monica Rubbish disposal pit. The buildings were designed by Consulting Engineers Parker Zehnder and Associates to accommodate the needs and program requirements of the City at that time and included a small garbage transfer station and gas station, an auto repair and maintenance shop with two vehicle lifts, a broom repair and blacksmith shop. Facilities shops, crew space and administrative space was sized to accommodate the staffing levels at the time. The balance of the site was occupied by the warehouse and open equipment storage bays. This property has been used as a base for a majority of the City\u2019s field maintenance operations, storage facilities, and other industrial uses since then.", "City Yards circa 1954", "These same three buildings from the 1940\u2019s house the majority of the operations in the City Yards today. As program needs changed through the years, uses for the City Yards were adapted as-needed for various City functions, resulting in an expedient but inefficient utilization of space.  Changing populations, growth, updates in technology, and differing service requirements have also resulted in a series of haphazard updates throughout the site. When additional shop, maintenance or office space was needed, the existing warehouse and open equipment storage bays were converted and reconfigured to accommodate these needs. This reconfiguration of the old buildings was the result of a decade\u2019s long process of \u201cmaking do\u201d with a facility the City outgrew many years ago.", "The original City Yard building envelopes and substandard structure remains in place today. These buildings have exceeded their expected service life and can no longer be utilized to support the current City Yards functions safely:", "\u00b7 Facilities Maintenance", "\u00b7 Custodial Services", "\u00b7 Street Maintenance", "\u00b7 Fleet Maintenance", "\u00b7 Traffic Operations", "\u00b7 Resource Recovery and Recycling", "\u00b7 Water and Wastewater Operations", "\u00b7 Household Hazardous Waste", "\u00b7 Fire Department Training Area", "Today, the City Yards operates seven days a week and currently houses significantly more functions and employees than it was designed to accommodate. The scope and breadth of the operating divisions has evolved over time. Functional needs and space requirements are no longer met by the facilities for any of the operations housed at the City Yards. Deficiencies include inadequate maintenance shop space, vehicle hoists, and covered maintenance area for heavy duty vehicles resulting in the need to perform some vehicle maintenance outside the fleet shop space due to lack of maintenance bay capacity, creating site circulation constraints and hazardous conditions. Further deficiencies include employee restroom/locker facilities, parking for fleet, employee, and visitor vehicles, storage, traffic circulation constraints, and inadequate customer service facilities to serve members of the public at the various City Yards offices. In addition, a private recycling facility of rudimentary design utilizes a substantial portion of the site. Santa Monica is a rare municipality that performs so many of these services in-house. The community has come to expect these services, but the high performance standards cannot be met with inadequate facilities.", "History of Council Actions Related to City Yards Master Plan", "On October 8, 1996, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL Interplan, Inc. (RNL) for consulting services to prepare a Master Plan for the City Yards that would address the physical reorganization, renovation and rehabilitation needs of the City Yards. Between 2000 \u2013 2009, Council changed direction in regards to the City operating a transfer facility at the City Yards. Current direction by Council is for the City to operate resource recovery transfer services through a contracted third-party provider.", "On October 24, 2000, Council approved the two proposed City Yards Master Plan alternatives in concept. One concept included the continued operation of a City-designed and constructed transfer station, while the second concept assumed contracted transfer station services with a third-party provider. On November 12, 2002, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL to complete full design and engineering services for a multi-phase construction process for the City Yards Master Plan Project anticipated to begin in 2005 and to be completed in 2010, including the function of the City operating a transfer facility at City Yards. However, subsequent changes in City Yard user needs, impaired functional use of the facilities, and space constraints all necessitated an update to the City Yards Master Plan. On October 13, 2009, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL to update the City Yards Master Plan approved in 2000. The update was substantially completed in July 2010; however, the plan was not presented to Council due to additional scope requirements that required Master Plan modifications, addressed in four subsequent modifications on September 13, 2011, February 14, 2012, September 11, 2012 and June 25, 2013.", "On January 27, 2015, Council approved the updated City Yards Master Plan by RNL in concept and authorized staff to issue a request for bids for a design-build team for the initial concept design, cost estimation services and feasibility analysis and prepare a financing plan for the initial phases at City Yards Modernization Project. On July 28, 2015, Council authorized staff to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC) for concept design, cost estimation services, and feasibility analysis for the City Yards Modernization project (previously called City Yards Stage 1).", "The HDCC agreement represents the first of three phases in the design-build project process which are; 1) feasibility and concept design, 2) project design and 3) construction. The first phase has been completed, and with Council\u2019s authorization, staff will return with a design GMP for Council approval. After the design process, the construction GMP would be presented to Council for approval.", "History of Council Actions Related to Other City Yards Project Components", "On August 12, 2014, Council authorized Black & Veatch to design and install a pilot treatment unit to study the different treatment technologies available to produce California Division of Drinking Water (DDW)-approved drinking water in the Olympic Well Field.A final design report will be presented at a future date to Council. The pilot study is estimated to conclude in summer of 2016 and the final design report would be presented to Council in fall of 2016. The pilot study final design report would include criteria for the design, construction, and operation of the Olympic Treatment Plant. The pilot treatment unit is located at the City Yards due to its close proximity to source water and due to the availability of City-owned land being considered for a full scale treatment plant.", "OnDecember 16, 2014, Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with International Parking Design, Inc. to prepare a parking study for the City Yards. The study reviewed financing options, economics, parking demand, and viability of a shared parking solution on the City Yards site.", "On May 24, 2016, Council authorized a grant award of approximately $1.5M from the California Energy Commission for theSanta Monica Advanced Energy District project proposal. The project will integrate a small, localized energy grid (a microgrid) consisting of onsite renewable energy generation andenergystorage based at the City Yards and Bergamot Arts Station. The project will utilize four strategies to establish a multi-user microgrid. First, the City will own and operate its own microgrid, serving the City Yards facility. Second, the City will work with Worthe Development Group at the City-owned Bergamot Arts Station, to develop appropriate regulations and incentives through the entitlement and development agreement process and establish a unique partnership model. Third, a master plan over this area will be developed to delineate the integration and interconnection between the City, the public, and the utility. And finally, the City will explore the value of its role as a Community Choice Aggregator to incentivize, construct and generate retail power supply.", "Discussion", "Feasibility Analysis - Concept Designs", "The design-build team HDCC working with Miller Hull Partnership conducted a feasibility analysis and created a report for a functional, transparent and sustainable City Yards. (Refer to Attachment A \u2013 Feasibility Analysis Report.)", "Careful considerations were given with regard to the City Yards site issues including existing conditions, transportation and linkages, site adjacencies, climate and micro-climate, soils and topography, walkability, stormwater management and irrigation, landscaping and nearby connections to the community like neighborhood parks, ecology and habitat. In depth analysis of the site included a zoning analysis, landfill study, and the existing site utilities.", "The project design concepts focused on providing an economic and environmentally sustainable site that will be functional, educational, and symbolic of the City\u2019s commitment to environmentally responsible development. Considerations also included how the future City Yards site would house present-day operations and include a Fire Training area and Public Safety Storage Facility. The new character and layout of the divisions would provide healthy and safe work environments for City Yards staff and also provide transparency to the operations, helping educate the public about the vital city services performed daily.", "Project architectural goals included:", "\u00b7 To enhance the quality and experience of Michigan Avenue by creating a more human scale experience.", "\u00b7 To develop a sustainable long term vision for City Yards.", "\u00b7 To improve the functionality of the site.", "\u00b7 To increase green space and open space.", "\u00b7 To make City Yards an asset to the neighborhood by providing services and educational opportunities.", "\u00b7 To increase transparency of the site boundary allowing the public to view some of the critical work being done by City Yards staff.", "The initial task by the design-build team was to evaluate the 2013 City Yards Master Plan for opportunities and challenges and to consider modifications to the plan that might better support the City\u2019s mission for the site, improve the functionality of the site, simplify phasing, and offer cost savings. The following challenges were identified:", "\u00b7 Site circulation and dead ends", "\u00b7 Inefficient parking structure footprint", "\u00b7 Oversized isle widths", "\u00b7 Public interaction placed at the site core (accessibility and safety concerns)", "\u00b7 Many structures to be built over landfill", "\u00b7 Lack of consideration for pedestrian movement", "The design-build team then developed several concepts to improve the challenges identified in the original City Yards Master Plan. Concept designs explored different ways to organize the site, alternative approaches to constructing on-site and not placing building directly above the landfill, and improved design concepts that responds to community needs. Out of the different concepts explored, one concept provided the best solutions to the site challenges in addition to being responsive to the community. This concept, coined the Zipper Plan, focused on increasing transparency into the site from Michigan Avenue and improving connections between City Yards staff and the neighborhood (pictured below). The evolution of the concept is as follows:", "\u00b7 Transparency is achieved by rotating the buildings along Michigan Avenue to be perpendicular to the road, and separating them to create gathering spaces and courtyards between the buildings.", "\u00b7 By re-organizing the buildings, the areas used by the Facilities Maintenance and Street Maintenance divisions would have expanded work spaces outside without putting staff in danger of the high levels of traffic running operations through the site.", "\u00b7 The buildings along Michigan Avenue are pulled back from the property line to establish a wider, pedestrian-friendly corridor.", "\u00b7 Although visible to the sidewalk, the Yards would be fenced. However, staff would have the ability to open their work areas up during open houses to increase neighborhood interaction similar to the art district galleries in the area.", "\u00b7 The parking structure was placed at the juncture with Bergamot Arts Station, maximizing shared parking potential.", "\u00b7 A courtyard/landscaped plaza was placed adjacent to the parking structure and a community room would be utilized by Rosie\u2019s Girls and other potential community partnership programs directly accessible from Michigan.", "\u00b7 Similar to the other concept designs, most of the building structures moved off of the landfill area, minimizing expensive foundation requirements.", "The Zipper Plan incorporated improvements to the challenges found in the 2013 City Yards Master Plan and the concept could be phased without moving staff into temporary facilities, representing significant project cost savings. Based on these findings, this plan is the proposed recommendation to Council to be carried forward to the design phase of the project.", "Zipper Plan", "Feasibility Analysis - Project Phasing Packages A - D", "In order to maintain continuous operations and allow for incremental project funding, the City Yards Modernization was developed for a phased rollout. The Zipper Plan would be broken into four phasing packages (A, B, C, D), with each package broken into incremental steps. The GMP to be negotiated with HDCC for design services would be limited to Phasing Package A. Outlined below is each project phasing package.", "Package A: Phase 1", "\u00b7 Prepare Site", "\u00b7 Build Fleet Maintenance building", "\u00b7 New Fleet Maintenance parking", "\u00b7 New Street Maintenance storage for bulk concrete and asphalt", "Phasing Package A \u2013 Phase 1", "Package A: Phase 2", "\u00b7 Build Administration buildings for Resource, Recovery and Recycling, Fleet Maintenance, Street Maintenance, and Custodial Services", "Phasing Package A \u2013 Phase 2", "Package A: Phase 3", "\u00b7 Build Traffic Operations building", "\u00b7 Build Rosie\u2019s Girls Community Room", "\u00b7 Build Facilities Maintenance shops (partial completion)", "\u00b7 New Resource, Recovery and Recycling parking", "\u00b7 New medium vehicle parking for field operations", "Phasing Package A \u2013 Phase 3 (Phase A complete)", "Package B (future project, unfunded):", "\u00b7 Build Facilities Maintenance shops (full completion)", "\u00b7 Complete vehicle parking", "\u00b7 Build the shared parking structure", "Phasing Package B would retain existing Facilities Maintenance shops to be operated from their existing location on site. City operations and employee vehicles would be surface-parked on site until Phasing Package B is funded and completed.", "Package C:", "\u00b7 Build Water Resources administrative building", "Alternate Phasing Package C.1:", "\u00b7 Build Water Resources Campus on a North-South axis away from Stewart Street", "\u00b7 Integrate Public Landscape program into the City Yards Master Plan", "\u00b7 Build the new Olympic Treatment Plant at City Yards", "\u00b7 Reconfigure Gandara Park (formerly Stewart Park)", "Phasing Package C.1 is a revised concept that would provide pedestrian-friendly routes and street frontage, further insulating City Yards operations to the site core and away from surrounding neighbors. By relocating existing water administration buildings, a northern connection from Stewart Street to the Bergamot Arts Station to the Metro Expo Line opens up for bike and pedestrian pathways. By expanding Gandara Park to the north, an open space connection is formed between Gandara Park and Ishihara Park (formerly Buffer Park; currently under construction). The new Olympic Treatment Plant (funded by settlement funds from Boeing and Gillette) provides an opportunity to redevelop most of the City Yard site including a new Gandara Park and a permanent home for the Public Landscape Division. The Olympic Treatment Plant would be located adjacent to the shared parking structure, which locates the main cisterns off of the landfill area. To the south of Gandara Park, public parking would connect to an emergency exit and entrance into City Yards for Fire and water emergency access only.", "Alternate Phasing Package C.1 concept", "Community Outreach", "In February 2016, Miller Hull Partnership and City staff held a public meeting at Virginia Avenue Park to present the needed improvements for the essential city services based out of the City Yards. The purpose of this initial community outreach meeting was to hear the desires and concerns of the adjacent community which this project impacts. Staff and the consultants described the vision and goals for the project and attendees had an opportunity to discuss their ideas along with their responses to the City\u2019s goals. The design-build team documented public comment received and attempted to visualize and prioritize these comments. The intended outcome was to understand what the community wants (or doesn\u2019t want) in the development of the project. Following are some of the specific comments from the community:", "\u00b7 Provide learning programs for broader groups", "\u00b7 Be conscious of the level of disruption to the neighbors", "\u00b7 Provide opportunities for public art", "\u00b7 Use the City Yards project to enhance Gandara Park and solve some current challenges", "\u00b7 Create a connection to the adjacent neighborhood to northeast and  provide a connection to Bergamot", "\u00b7 Be mindful of overlap between pedestrians / cars / heavy equipment moving in & out of site", "\u00b7 Allow for more visibility into the City Yards \u2013 celebrate the functions there", "\u00b7 Enhance Michigan Street \u2013 Street trees, plant buffer", "\u00b7 Community Room", "\u00b7 Provide more space to Rosie\u2019s Girls", "\u00b7 Pursue net-positive energy", "\u00b7 Produce electricity for the neighborhood", "\u00b7 Focus on opportunities for water re-use", "\u00b7 Achieve greater operational efficiency to conserve resources", "\u00b7 Explore composting opportunities", "\u00b7 Create a connection to Ishihara Park and expand Gandara Park street frontage", "The results of this first public meeting have influenced the concept design options of the City Yards modernization project. As a follow-up, a second public meeting was held in March 2016 to present the preferred concept options developed by the design-build team. These specific concept design options were presented so the community could further evaluate these options and then the design-build team could make adjustments based on the participants input.", "Site Constraints of the Former Landfill", "A portion of the City Yards site is located within the former landfill known as the City of Santa Monica Landfill No. 2. This landfill operated as a municipal solid waste and incinerator ash landfill from the late 1940\u2019s until 1970 and was located within an abandoned clay pit at the former Simons Brick Company Plant No. 4. Approximately 6.7 acres of the landfill site lies within the City Yards with another 3.9 acres within Gandara Park. The landfill site contains zones of fill materials ranging in depth between five feet and 58 feet. This area is not compacted and therefore not structurally suited for buildings and site improvements. Over the years, the settling and shifting of the fill material compromised the structural integrity of some of the buildings on the City Yards site including pavement shifting and buckling. This issue is inherent, long term, and has influenced decisions made by the design-build team led by Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC) working with Miller Hull Partnership.", "The geotechnical engineering consultant reviewed the feasibility of various mitigation solutions for the landfill and determined that buildings and other ancillary structures located on the fill areas will require pile foundations to avoid future issues related to land settlement. Pile depths are anticipated to require an additional 70% length beyond the bottom of the landfill where they occur. The resulting pile depth could be up to 98.6 feet in length and a maximum pile spacing is anticipated to be 30\u2019-0\u201d on center below buildings or stabilized paved areas. Due to the cost of such construction, a pile grid to stabilize the whole landfill site, including parking areas and drive isles, was determined to not be financially feasible. Piles will be limited to the structures on fill and a limited apron around the building.", "New Water Treatment Plant", "The City supplies water to residents and businesses. The water is supplied from both local and imported sources. The Olympic Sub Basin (referred to as the Olympic Well Field) is the City\u2018s second largest potential drinking water resource. City Yards is located within the boundary of this basin. The City won two settlements from Boeing Co. (former McDonald Douglas) and Procter & Gamble Co. (former Gillette) for the widespread contamination of Perchloroethylene (PCE) and Trichloroethylene (TCE) that is present in the Olympic Well Field. The settlement agreements resulted in the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region (LARWQCB) issuing Modified Cleanup and Abatement Orders for the remediation of the soil and groundwater contamination.", "As part of the settlements, the City agreed to build and operate a new water treatment plant to treat the contaminated groundwater drawn from the Olympic Well Field and to produce public drinking water consistent with all appropriate regulatory standards and requirements. The completion of the new Olympic Treatment Plant supports the City\u2019s water self-sufficiency by 2020 goal adopted by Council on October 28, 2014. The City will be able to use its own local groundwater to produce drinking water and reduce, potentially eliminating, and the city\u2019s dependency on imported drinking water which is approximately 30% of all water used in the City.", "The Olympic Treatment Plant is planned to be located within the City Yards, adjacent to the existing Water Resources Division\u2019s Yard, due to its close proximity to the Olympic Well Field source water and because City-owned land is the most appropriate site to construct -a facility of this scale. Included in Phasing Package C.1 are the coordination plans, project phasing and cost estimates to reconfigure the Water Division site within City Yards for the new water treatment plant. The actual costs for the Olympic Treatment Plant are to be borne by the settlement funds and are separate from the City Yards Modernization Project, requiring independent Council approval. Staff will return to Council with a design-build contract for approval for the Olympic Treatment Plant in spring 2017.", "In order to advance the planning, phasing and environmental studies of the Olympic Treatment Plant and to insure coordination with the City Yards Modernization project reducing neighborhood impacts while enhancing community benefits, staff recommends the incorporation of the conceptual design of the water treatment plant and the Water Resources administrative offices. The coordination of phasing and schematic plans is crucial for maintaining uninterrupted operations of the existing City Yard services. Furthermore, this will result in a single, organized environmental document with minimized construction impacts and would allow major improvements to Gandara Park.", "Package D:", "\u00b7 Replace the existing Fire Training Tower", "\u00b7 Build the Fire Training Yard", "\u00b7 Build a new Public Safety Storage Facility", "Phasing Package D is not contingent on the completion of Phasing Package B or C, and could be commenced once funding is identified.", "Feasibility Analysis - Cost Estimates", "Concept Cost Comparison", "At the end of the concept exploration exercise, it was determined that the Zipper Plan best achieved the functional goals of the program and aspirational goals for the site. There was concern that the subdivision of the buildings would increase project cost so City staff requested the design team to provide a comparative analysis on phasing and cost for both 2013 Master Plan and Zipper Plan.", "Project Cost and Funding Strategies", "The feasibility analysis indicates an estimated cost of $114 million to complete Phasing Package A of the proposed Zipper Plan. The FY16-18 CIP biennial budget appropriated $11.7 million in Charnock settlement funds to fully fund the design phase, and $38.3 million in remaining available Charnock settlement funds will partially fund a portion of project construction. The unfunded construction budget of $64 million is proposed to be funded with a lease revenue bond. The General Fund would not bear the full burden of debt service costs for the City Yards. Costs would be allocated to other funds with associated operations at the City Yards, including Resource, Recovery and Recycling and the Vehicle Management Fund. At this time, staff is projecting a $4.0 million annual debt service cost for the General Fund. This cost is included in the General Fund Financial Status Update, beginning in FY 2018-19. City Yards Modernization efforts would also be coordinated with adjacent Water and Wastewater plans, ensuring that those funds would also contribute their share of costs. Staff will explore financing options and feasibility and will return to Council with a recommendation.", "Sustainability Certification", "Envision Sustainable Infrastructure Certification", "In support of the City\u2019s Sustainable City Plan and Green Building Standards, most municipal buildings newly constructed or planned in Santa Monica are green building rated by a third-party. Historically, the LEED rating system applies best to single building construction projects and is less suitable for industrial-type, infrastructure projects. City Yards, however, could collectively be described as a municipal infrastructure campus.", "The design-build team identified the Envision rating system as a better tool than LEED to measure the sustainability goals of the City Yards Modernization Project. They researched and compared the applicability of Envision versus LEED for Building Design + Construction. The team concluded that both rating systems are equally achievable but based on research, the Envision rating system should be pursued because it is better suited to the City Yards project type. Envision Platinum Certification could likely be achieved for City Yards, the highest level of certification for the green infrastructure rating system. (Refer to Attachment B - Envision Certification.)", "The Envision rating system and certification was developed by the Institute for Sustainable Infrastructure with the support of the American Public Works Association, the American Council of Engineering Companies and the American Society of Civil Engineers. Envision facilitates the development and maintenance of sustainable infrastructure and aims to improve the performance and resiliency of physical infrastructure. The rating system uses criteria from six categories for project certification: Quality of Life; Leadership; Resource Allocation; Natural World; Climate; and Risk.", "Achieving Envision certification would demonstrate the City\u2019s commitment to sustainable leadership by being one of the first municipal corporate yards projects in the country certified under the rating system. Staff recommends further study in the next phases of the project prior to establishing Envision targets for this project.", "Eco-District Registration", "The City Yards Modernization Project presents opportune timing for the City and the community to mobilize its collective impact around the City Yards site. Staff recommends registering the City Yards as an eco-district with the EcoDistricts Protocol. In tandem with the green infrastructure rating system Envision, the City Yards stands to be redeveloped sensitively to both the needs of City staff and the surrounding neighborhood. Santa Monica\u2019s industrial eye-sore can be restored as a valued community asset and it can provide more community benefit than initially considered.", "After reviewing the protocol, an eco-district designation would be a good fit for City Yards, especially related to its project goals to be a better neighbor. The EcoDistricts Protocol is a process-based collaboration framework that promotes the neighborhood/district-scale as the ideal size to achieve \u201cdeeper green\u201d sustainable development that cannot normally be achieved within a single green building. Opportunities to implement innovative community programming and to resource share could transcend project site boundaries. Examples include partnering the operations at City Yards and artists at Bergamot to upcycle goods found in the local wastestream as art, to increase the amount of training and services for the public via the shared use Community Room, and to collectively create a sense of place by making a bioregional library or gallery space. The first task at hand is to develop public-private-civic partners. (Refer to Attachment C - EcoDistricts Protocol V. 1.1.)", "The future City Yards will mix commercial and industrial uses. While the technical aspects of the City Yards Project would be managed by the design-build team, in parallel would be the City Yards Eco-District with its own goals and measures to be established. By registering the City Yards as an eco-district at the beginning of the project design, it ca be developed as an asset to the neighborhood. Along with design feedback, emphasis will be placed on defining goals for three overarching imperatives:", "\u00b7 Equity", "\u00b7 Resilience", "\u00b7 Climate Protection", "As well as goals for six priorities:", "\u00b7 Place", "\u00b7 Prosperity", "\u00b7 Health and Wellbeing", "\u00b7 Connectivity", "\u00b7 Living Infrastructure", "\u00b7 Resource Restoration", "An eco-district expands traditional community engagement models with a new, unprecedented approach to collaboration and shared decision-making by establishing collaborative partnerships beyond design and construction through on-going operations.", "Next Steps", "Dependent upon Council approval of the recommended action, staff anticipates the following project timelines:", "\u00b7 Fall 2016 \u2013 Return to Council for authorization of a Guaranteed Maximum Price for design services", "\u00b7 Summer 2016 through Early 2017 \u2013 Schematic design", "\u00b7 Late 2016 through 2017 \u2013 CEQA Analysis", "\u00b7 Early 2017 through Summer 2017 \u2013 Design development", "\u00b7 Summer 2017through Early 2018 \u2013 Complete construction documentation phases", "\u00b7 Return to Council for authorization of a Guaranteed Maximum Price for construction and to issue lease revenue bonds \u2013 Spring 2018", "\u00b7 Start of construction / site preparation \u2013 Spring 2018", "\u00b7 Complete construction \u2013 Spring 2021", "Feasibility Analysis \u2013 Recommendation Next Steps", "The Yards feasibility analysis report resulted in a number of findings such as the proposed Zipper Plan, the proposed Phasing Package A and corresponding cost estimates. Staff recommends that Council review and approve the feasibility analysis and financial options and authorize staff to enter into negotiations for a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) for the design phase of the project for the proposed Zipper Plan and Phasing Package A. Staff would return to Council for approval of the design GMP Fall 2016.", "Second, staff recommends the new project components to be added into the feasibility analysis as a second modification to the Professional Services Agreement No 10145 with HDCC in the amount of $468,000 (includes a 10% contingency) to provide additional scope of work to 1) integrate spacing for the new Olympic Treatment Plant into the proposed yards configuration, 2) reconfigure Gandara Park, 3) integrate Public Landscape division staff and equipment, 4) prepare a phasing plan for the added components, and 5) prepare construction cost estimates for the additional scope and This will result in an amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $970,200.", "Further, staff recommends to pursuit of Envision sustainable infrastructure certification for the City Yards Modernization project and registration as an eco-district with EcoDistricts Protocol.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The second agreement modification to be awarded to Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company is $468,000 (includes a 10% contingency), for an amended agreement total not to exceed $970,200. Funds in the amount of $418,600 are included in the FY2016-17 Capital Improvement Program budget at account number C019068.589000, Olympic Treatment Plant.", "Award of the contract required the following budget actions:", "1. Release the fund balance from reserve account 1.380246 (FY 2014-15 Capital Improvements Project savings) of $49,400;", "2. Appropriate $49,400 to account C014028.589000, City Yards Master Plan Phases 1a through 2b.", "If Council authorizes staff to negotiate a Guaranteed Maximum Price (GMP) for the design phase of the design-build contract with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company, staff would return to Council for approval of the negotiated GMP for design and would recommend budget actions at that time. Funding for the design phase is included in the FY16-17 Capital Improvement Program budget.", "Staff would also return to Council with debt service financing plans for the unfunded portion of construction of Package A after design is complete and construction costs are fully determined. Currently, the unfunded portion of the construction budget for Package A is $64 million and is proposed to be funded with a lease revenue bond. The General Fund would not bear the full burden of debt service costs for the City Yards. Costs would be allocated to other funds with associated operations at the City Yards, including Resource, Recovery and Recycling and the Vehicle Management Fund. At this time, staff is projecting a $4.0 million annual debt service cost for the General Fund. This cost is included in the General Fund Financial Status Update, beginning in FY2018-19. City Yards Modernization efforts would also be coordinated with adjacent Water and Wastewater plans, ensuring that those funds would also contribute their share of costs."]}]], "1530232200": [[{"Title": "City Manager's Report: Santa Monica Institute", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Reject Bids for the Purchase of Two Compressed Natural Gas Irrigation Trucks and One Compressed Natural Gas Service Body Truck", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Reject all bids for Bid #4241 for the purchase and delivery of two Compressed Natural Gas Irrigation Trucks and one Compressed Natural Gas Service Body Truck; 2. Direct staff to reissue a bid in order to obtain the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of two Compressed Natural Gas Irrigation Trucks and one Compressed Natural Gas Service Body Truck.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for maintaining and improving the City\u2019s parks and landscapes. This purchase would replace two existing Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Irrigation Trucks and one existing CNG Special Body Truck that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful lives through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The three vehicles are utilized in the Park Maintenance section of the Public Landscape Division in the Public Works Department. In March 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of two Compressed Natural Gas Irrigation Trucks and one Compressed Natural Gas Service Body Truck. After reviewing all submittals received, staff recommends rejecting all bids in order to obtain competitive pricing and encourage additional vendor participation.", "Discussion", "In March 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the purchase and delivery of two Compressed Natural Gas Irrigation Trucks and one Compressed Natural Gas Service Body Truck, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 13 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016, per Attachment A. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; one \u201cNo Bid\u201d form was received. The vendor that submitted a \u201cNo Bid\u201d form stated they could not furnish goods or services as specified because the 2016 CNG Ford Super Duty ordering window closed and 2017 pricing is not currently available.", "Staff conducted additional outreach and determined that the order window for the 2016 CNG Ford Super Duty closed during the time the bid was open and 2017 pricing was not available. Since that time the 2017 vehicle pricing is available, staff would like to go back out to bid to obtain competitive pricing.", "Staff recommends rejecting all bids received, now that 2017 pricing is available, in order to obtain competitive pricing and encourage additional vendor participation.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid for Fleet Washing Services", "Department": "Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4246 to Qualified Mobile, Inc., a California-based company, for fleet washing services;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Qualified Mobile, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $47,432 (including a $5,000 contingency) for one year, with 4-additional 1-year renewal option(s), on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $237,160 over a 5-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City contracts for fleet washing services of refuse, organics and recycling collection vehicles, as well as street sweeping vehicles used by the Resource Recovery & Recycling Division. In March 2016, the City solicited bids for such services. After reviewing the three bids received, staff recommends Qualified Mobile, Inc. as the best and lowest bidder to provide fleet washing services for a total not to exceed amount of $237,160 over a five-year period. This recommended action is consistent with Council-approved Policy for hiring contracted staff for non-professional services.", "Background", "There are currently 50 heavy duty service vehicles within the Resource Recovery & Recycling Division that require supplemental fleet washing services. Regular cleaning of the vehicles eliminates odor problems as well as grease and material build-up around the mechanical equipment and underbody, which allows the vehicles to run more efficiently.", "Records indicate that contracting for fleet washing services began as early as 1999. The service vehicles at that time were being washed by the contractor only. As a cost saving measure, in 2010 management changed this practice whereby the contractor would be required to wash each vehicle every other week, while the employees assigned to the service vehicle would wash the vehicle on alternate weeks. Eliminating the contracted service entirely was not considered, as staff did not have the expertise and training to perform a thorough cleaning, which included underbody care and working around the mechanical systems.", "In adherence to this practice, on December 10, 2013 Council awarded Bid #4102 to Qualified Mobile, Inc. for supplemental fleet washing services (Attachment B).", "Discussion", "The City requires supplemental fleet washing services for the refuse, organics and recycling collection and street sweeping vehicles. The City\u2019s service trucks empty refuse and food waste containers from both residential and commercial customers all over the City. Food waste and liquids from containers leach through the packaging causing a messy build-up. More often than not, when the containers are dumped garbage will splatter on the top of the trucks and on the outsides of the truck. Flies and birds are very attracted to the sticky liquids and solid material on the trucks, so it is important that trucks are cleaned regularly. Regular cleaning of the vehicles also eliminates odor problems as well as the grease and material build-up around the mechanical equipment and underbody, which allows the vehicles to run more efficiently.", "A vehicle washing station is located in the City Yards which is used by all City Departments. Each wash cycle takes approximately 20 minutes and requires approximately 200 gallons of water and cleaning products to thoroughly wash a service vehicle. All the cleaning products used meet sustainability guidelines and are approved by the Office of Sustainability and the Environment.", "Drivers generally wash vehicles at the end of the shift on a scheduled rotation. Assuming the wash station is operational and not in use, only three vehicles a day can be washed.  At this rate, it would take almost one month to wash each vehicle at least once without the supplemental contracted service. In order to wash each vehicle weekly using in-house staff only, additional personnel would need to be hired, so that the core collection services are not disrupted.", "Method of Service", "On January 13, 2015, Council adopted a Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-needed Staff for Non-professional Services (Attachment C). This policy includes criteria under which contracting for a public service is appropriate.  Staff has reviewed the service needs, and recommends providing fleet washing services through a contractor due to the following criteria:", "\u00b7 Specialized/Technical Expertise: Service requires technical or specialized expertise that City staff could not or does not provide, and is outside of core services mission of the department.", "\u00b7 Performance Review: Ability to quantify and adequately assess contract services provided.", "Vendor Selection", "In March 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide fleet washing services in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 14 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016 per Attachment A. Bid Results are as follows:", "Bidder     Monthly Cost  Annual Cost", "Qualified Mobile, Inc.   $3,536.00   $42,432.00", "Green Global, Inc.    $4,456.64   $53,479.68", "Khong Enterprises, Inc.   $5,800.00   $69,600.00", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, quality of service, and compliance with City specifications. Qualified Mobile, Inc. is the City\u2019s current vendor; its prices remain unchanged since 2013 and the service provided is excellent. Based on these criteria, Qualified Mobile, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Alternatives", "Since all the heavy duty service vehicles are used Monday \u2013 Friday, the only days the vehicles could be washed is on the weekends. Staff analyzed two different scenarios for performing this service in-house which included hiring permanent part-time employees and/or performing the work on an overtime detail. These options were eliminated because all permanent part-time employees are required to work at least 20 hours per week and the analysis only required 10 hours per week. The overtime detail was estimated at $53,553. This cost assumed that an existing portable pressure washer could be used in addition to the wash station. Another determining factor was that the contractor is responsible for detailed cleaning of the entire vehicle including inside the hopper, underbody and canopies while in-house staff washing consists of pressure washing the outside of the vehicle to wash off the grime and debris only.", "Staff recommends that the supplemental services be approved to insure a clean and odor free collection vehicles to service to the resident and businesses of Santa Monica.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Qualified Mobile, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $237,160. Funds of $47,432 are included in the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to account 27441.555010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Agreement Modification No. 5 for Fire Station 3 Seismic Retrofit Design", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fifth modification to agreement #9771 (CCS) in the amount of $36,740 with IDS Group Inc., a California-based company, for bidding assistance and construction administration for the Fire Station 3 Seismic Retrofit project. This would result in a one-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $129,090.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is undertaking a seismic retrofit of Fire Station No. 3 because the existing facility is not in compliance with current earthquake and structural codes as a State Essential Services Building, defined by California Building Standards Codes. Staff recommends that Council approve a fifth modification in an amount $36,740 to professional services agreement #9771 (CCS) with IDS Group, Inc., to complete final design services which include bidding assistance and construction administration for the Fire Station No. 3 project for a total amount not to exceed $129,090. The modification is the result of completing the final phase of the design services, which began in November 2012. The service agreement was executed in phases to cope with the uncertainty in funding.", "Background", "Fire Station No. 3 is a two-story, wood frame and stucco structure built in the early 1970\u2019s prior to current seismic building standards. The fire station is located at 1302 19th Street and services the northern and central areas of the city. The seismic retrofit is necessary to bring the station in compliance with current building codes and the State Essential Services Building requirements.", "In August 2012, the City solicited proposals from qualified consulting firms to provide professional services for the structural evaluation and the design of seismic upgrades for the station in two phases. The first phase is to assess the structural integrity of the existing facility and produce an analysis report. The second phase, based on the result of the report and funding availability, is to hire a firm to engineer the seismic retrofit to bring the facility in compliance with the current building codes.  Per the Request for Proposals (RFP), the project would be awarded to one firm whereby phase one would be completed immediately. Award of phase two would be dependent upon funding availability as the cost of phase two would be determined by the findings in phase one report.", "On November 14, 2012, the City entered into a professional services agreement with IDS Group, Inc. to perform phase one of the project consisting of a structural evaluation of the existing facility in the amount of $28,000. Phase one was completed on May 20, 2013. The study identified numerous irregularities and incomplete/deficient structural elements in the building that would impair performance objectives for an essential facility.  Additionally, the study confirmed that these deficiencies can be corrected though a seismic retrofit of the existing building.", "On July 23, 2013 (Attachment A), Council authorized staff to enter into a modification of  the agreement with IDS Group, Inc. to perform phase two of the Fire Station No. 3 project to provide design and construction administration services with a contract modification total of $64,350 and a total project not to exceed amount of $92,350.", "Discussion", "Consultant Selection", "On August 29, 2012, the City published a Request for Proposal to provide professional services for the structural evaluation and the design of seismic upgrades for Fire Station No. 3 in two phases in accordance with City specifications. The request was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 91 vendors downloaded the bid. 10 proposals were received and publicly opened on September 20, 2012.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, team member qualifications, references, and compliance with City specifications. Staff contacted references provided by IDS Group, Inc. for prior project experience with the, the City of Orange, and the LA County Public Works Department.  All respondents reported that work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. The City of Santa Monica has also worked previously with IDS Group on the Santa Monica Pier stair replacement and the work was completed in a timely and cost efficient manner. Based on these criteria, IDS Group, Inc., the lowest bidder, was recommended as the best bidder.", "Next Steps", "Fire Station No. 3 retrofit design has been approved by Building and Safety Division and is slated for construction in fall 2016. Staff is requesting the additional budget to complete the Final Phase Two recommended services which include bidding assistance to select the contractor and construction administration support during the retrofit. These services were left out of the original contract and subsequent contract modifications because funding availability and project momentum were postponed for an extended period.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to IDS Group, Inc. is $36,740, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $129,090. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019047.589000."]}, {"Title": "Award Construction Contracts for Citywide Sidewalk Repairs", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid# SP2451 to Vido Samarzich, Inc., a California-based company, for implementation of the Citywide Sidewalk Repair project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Vido Samarzich, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $966,680 (including a 10% contingency);3. Award RFQ # SP1982 to CivilSource, a California-based company, for construction management and inspection services for the Citywide Sidewalk Repair project;4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with CivilSource, in an amount not to exceed $241,670 (including a 10% contingency);5. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Citywide Sidewalk Repair project would repair approximately 973 damaged or displaced sidewalk locations south of Wilshire Boulevard (in the central and southern inspection zones) logged by the City\u2019s Street and Fleet Services Division. The project would maintain the City\u2019s efforts to enhance pedestrian mobility, and would also reduce the City\u2019s exposure to future trip and fall claims.", "Staff recommends Vido Samarzich, Inc. for implementation of the Citywide Sidewalk Repair project in an amount not to exceed $966,680 (including a 10% contingency). Staff recommends CivilSource to provide construction management services in an amount not to exceed $241,670 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "The City\u2019s Street & Fleet Services Division has an annual sidewalk inspection cycle for business districts and a 3-year sidewalk inspection cycle which covers the rest of the City All inspected locations are tracked by the Street & Fleet Services Division.", "Discussion", "The proposed project would repair approximately 973 damaged or displaced sidewalk locations south of Wilshire Boulevard to the south, east and west City boundary (in the central and southern inspection zones) logged by the City\u2019s Street and Fleet Services Division. Repairs would include removing and replacing approximately 208 priority 1 (PRI 1) and 613 priority 2 (PRI 2) sidewalk locations, and precision concrete cutting approximately 152 priority 3 (PRI 3) locations (Attachment A). Priority 1 and 2 locations are sidewalk locations that exhibit a differential elevation of more than 3 inches, and between 1 and 3 inches respectively. Priority 3 locations exhibit a differential elevation of less than 1 inch. All PRI 1 locations for central and south zone and PRI 2 locations for south zone have been patched in the interim to mitigate immediate trip and fall hazards.", "Vendor Selection - Contractor", "On May 10, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to implement the Citywide Sidewalk Repair project in accordance with the City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 35 vendors downloaded the bid. Eight bids were received and publicly opened on May 26, 2016. The bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Base Bid", "Vido Samarzich", "$ 878,800", "Victor Concrete", "$ 949,600", "CT&T Concrete Paving", "$ 955,800", "CJ Concrete Construction", "$ 1,045,000", "EBS General Engineering", "$ 1,049,500", "Sully-Miller Contracting", "$ 1,150,000", "Nobest", "$ 1,446,204", "All American Asphalt", "$ 1,521,000", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC2.24.072, including competitive price, quality of work and experience with similar projects.", "Vido Samarzich, Inc. is recommended as the best and lowest bidder for a total amount not to exceed $966,680. This figure includes the $878,800 base bid and a 10% contingency of $87,880. Vido Samarzich provided five references for recently completed projects, and two references for on-going projects. Staff contacted references for seven representative projects from the cities of Inglewood, Manhattan Beach, Pasadena, South Pasadena and Westminster. All references reported that the work performed by Vido Samarzich was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality.", "The Contractors State License Board verified that the Contractor and subcontractors\u2019 licenses are current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, Vido Samarzich, Inc. is recommended as the best and lowest bidder for implementing the Citywide Sidewalk Repair Project, in accordance with City scope of work.", "Vendor Selection - Construction Management", "On September 22, 2015 the City published a Request for Quotation for construction management services for this project on the City\u2019s online bidding website. 124 vendors downloaded the proposal. The City received 25 proposals that were publicly opened on October 14, 2015. Proposals were reviewed and rated by Public Works staff. Selection criteria included technical competence, staffing capacity, project approach & planning, past performance record, experience in resolving contract disputes, quality control/assurance, cost control/reporting and customer service. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, the top four firms (Anderson-Penna, CivilSource, MNS Engineers and Psomas) were invited to submit proposals, but only CivilSource, MNS Engineers and Psomas responded. Anderson-Pena declined due to staffing constraints. Following submittal of their proposals, the three proposers where invited to participate in interviews with staff from Public Works in June 2016.", "CivilSource is recommended as the best proposer to provide construction management and inspection services based on their price, qualifications of staff, competency, extensive knowledge and experience on similar previous projects in the cities of Santa Monica, Culver City, Downey, Lomita and Yorba Linda. Services provided by CivilSource would include construction management and inspection services and wage compliance monitoring.", "Construction Schedule", "Construction is anticipated to begin in July 2016 and be completed by January 2017. To mitigate construction related impacts to neighborhoods, the project includes phasing that requires the contractor to substantially complete sidewalk removal and replacement in each of the 35 phasing areas (corresponding to the inspections areas) before moving on to the next phasing area. However, adjacent phasing areas may be combined for expediency upon approval by the City (Attachment B).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The construction contract to be awarded to Vido Samarzich, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $966,680 (including a 10% contingency). The contract to be awarded to CivilSource for construction management is for an amount not to exceed $241,670 (including a 10% contingency). Funds in the amount of $1,208,350 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget as follows:", "Construction Contract:", "Account No.", "Description", "Contract", "Contingency", "Total", "M010152.589000", "Street Repair/Resurfacing", "$0", "$87,880", "$87,880", "M250152.589000", "Street Repair/Resurfacing", "$ 526,615", "$ 0", "$526,615", "M310152.589000", "Street Repair/Resurfacing", "$ 312,227", "$ 0", "$312,227", "M040152.589000", "Street Repair/Resurfacing", "$ 39,958", "$0", "$39,958", "TOTAL", "$ 878,800", "$ 87,880", "$966,680", "Construction Management Contract:", "Account No.", "Description", "Contract", "Contingency", "Total", "M040152.589000", "Street Repair/Resurfacing", "$ 154,434", "$ 0", "$154,434", "M010152.589000", "Street Repair/Resurfacing", "$ 65,266", "$ 21,970", "$87,236", "TOTAL", "$ 219,700", "$ 21,970", "$241,670"]}, {"Title": "Authorization to Negotiate Contract for Chain Reaction Restoration and Conservation", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Award RFP# SP2338 to Rosa Lowinger and Associates, a California-based company for art conservation services for The Chain Reaction Restoration Project;2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Rosa Lowinger and Associates, in an amount not to exceed $119,172 (including a 10% contingency).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Chain Reaction, installed in 1991, is a public art sculpture project which has been slated for substantial restoration and maintenance work. Community fundraising and public funds have both been appropriated by Council for this restoration project. Staff recommends Rosa Lowinger and Associates to provide art conservation services for The Chain Reaction Restoration Project in an amount not to exceed $119,172 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "Chain Reaction is a sculpture by Paul Conrad, funded by a private donation of $250,000 to the Santa Monica Arts Foundation. It was a gift to the City of Santa Monica and was approved by City Council on October 9, 1990. The completed sculpture was installed in 1991, and based on recent assessments is in need of substantial restoration and maintenance work.", "On March 20, 2012 (Attachment A), Council approved the Arts Commission\u2019s recommendation to remove the Chain Reaction sculpture, and agreed to delay such action until November 15, 2012, to allow the family and members of the community time to fundraise for the necessary repairs. Council further instructed staff to complete the additional testing of the sculpture that could be completed without major damage. Council directed staff to return with recommendations regarding funding, restoration and/or de-acquisition.", "On July 9, 2012, the Landmarks Commission designated Chain Reaction a City Landmark, and on November 12, 2012, the Landmarks Commission added an associated landmark parcel to the designation. Additionally, all restoration work performed on the sculpture will need to meet the Secretary of the Interior Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties.", "On January 22, 2013 (Attachment B), Council revisited the status of Chain Reaction and approved an extension through February 2014 for community fundraising efforts, and authorized the expenditure of up to $20,000 from the City\u2019s Cultural Affairs operating budget to patch and repair the sculpture in the interim. Staff recommended the authorization of a commitment of up to $80,000 to be used for a landscape barrier around the sculpture to inhibit future climbing.", "On February 25, 2014 (Attachment C), Council recognized the community\u2019s fundraising efforts and accepted funds in the amount of $101,290 to support the restoration of Chain Reaction, and authorized the expenditure of $75,000 from the City\u2019s General Fund to complete additional testing as required by the City's Building Official to address remaining areas of concern regarding the structural stability of the sculpture.", "On November 10, 2015 (Attachment D), Council authorized the expenditure of up to $275,000 to complete the restoration and conservation of Chain Reaction sculpture and the design and construction of the landscape barrier, and issue a Request for Bids to execute the restoration plan.", "Initial Assessment and Findings", "In the summer of 2011, the City\u2019s Building Official observed members of the public, including children, climbing and interacting with the sculpture and was prompted to complete a preliminary evaluation of its safety. The City assembled a professional team to assess the structural integrity of the sculpture. Overall the findings were mixed, with some aspects that performed well, some identified areas of concern, and some substantial unknowns, due in part to the inability to access certain areas of Chain Reaction without causing substantial damage to the sculpture.", "The consulting team and the City\u2019s Building Official identified the need for further testing and developed preliminary estimates of both the anticipated costs of such tests as well as the likely cost of repair, which ranged from $227,372 to $423,172. Initial test results of the sculpture showed inconclusive results for the fiberglass shell and some rust and corrosion of the internal steel frame. The welded connections at the top of the piece could not be tested or visually inspected without creating a larger opening. Further testing of the fiberglass and of the steel frame, along with a more complete structural analysis, were recommended.", "Deaccession by the Arts Commission", "While the initial tests were being done, the Santa Monica Arts Commission held a special meeting on February 1, 2012 to hear public testimony and consider the status of Chain Reaction. The Arts Commission voted 10 to 1 in support of the staff recommendation to deaccession and remove the sculpture. The Commission also voted to recommend that such action be delayed by six months to allow the family and community supporters of Chain Reaction a period of time to raise the funds necessary to repair the sculpture.", "Discussion", "Chain Reaction is the City\u2019s first public art piece to obtain City Landmark designation. The sculpture is no longer part of the City\u2019s public art collection since it was deaccessioned by the Arts Commission. To determine the sculpture\u2019s restoration plan, many tests have been performed to assess its structural integrity and general condition.", "In late 2011 and in early 2012, the City completed all testing that could be performed without removal of the dome portion of the sculpture, which at the time was considered necessary to gain visual access to key structural welds at the connection of the dome to the support column. The City\u2019s Building Official received the report from the structural engineer in late summer 2012 and issued a memo detailing his findings on September 6, 2012. The Building Official recommended that in order to ascertain and address any long-term safety concerns associated with the sculpture, the dome would need to be removed, and testing would need to be completed on the portion of the sculpture that could not previously be accessed.", "On February 25, 2014, Council authorized the expenditure of $75,000 to complete the additional testing and to address remaining areas of concern regarding the structural stability of the sculpture. The City asked Twining, Incorporated, the testing company, and Melvyn Green and Associates, the structural engineer that performed earlier work on the sculpture, for an estimate to complete this final testing and structural evaluation, including removal of the dome. Rosa Lowinger and Associates, the art conservator, would also be involved as needed to limit damage to the sculpture to the extent possible. Final testing was completed in May 2015. Melvyn Green and Associates published its report titled, \u201cStructural Investigation and Repair Recommendations\u201d in July 2015 (Attachment E).", "Restoration Plan", "Based on the aggregate findings from testing and evaluation of Chain Reaction, Rosa Lowinger and Associates prepared a proposed Conservation Treatment Plan for restoration of the sculpture (Attachment F). The proposed restoration plan includes, but is not limited to, repairing chains and fiberglass areas removed during testing, repairing or replacing chain connectors, cleaning and recoating chains, removing chains at the top of the sculpture and applying a UV resistant paint.", "The proposed restoration plan received a Certificate of Appropriateness from the Landmarks Commission on August 10, 2015. The plan meets all requirements of the Secretary of the Interior Standards for the Treatment of Historic Properties. The plan was also vetted with Paul Conrad\u2019s family per the Landmark Commission Statement of Official Action.", "Consultant Selection", "On April 7, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide conservation services for the conservation and restoration of Chain Reaction. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 22 vendors downloaded the RFP. The City received 2 proposals that were publicly opened on May 3, 2016. Proposals received were as follows:", "Firm       Amount", "Rosa Lowinger and Associates   $108,338", "Sculpture Conservation Studio   $118,850", "Proposals were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Public Works. Proposals were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, including references, work plans, project team, cost, experience with comparable projects and accuracy in response to the RFP. Rosa Lowinger and Associates was the lowest bidder, and having been involved in the structural testing phase of the project and having authored the Conservation Treatment Plan, Rosa Lowinger and Associates has the best knowledge of Chain Reaction as the project advances and moves into restoration work. Based on these criteria, Rosa Lowinger and Associates is recommended as the lowest and best bidder to provide art conservation services for a cost not to exceed $119,172 (including a 10% contingency).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Rosa Lowinger and Associates is for an amount not to exceed $119,172 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Budget in account C014087.589000."]}, {"Title": "Sole  Source  Approval  for  Elevator  Services  and  Maintenance  at  the  PublicSafety Facility and Main Library", "Department": "Public Works, Facilities Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Mitsubishi Electric US, Inc., a California-based company, for elevator services and maintenance at the Main Library and the Public Safety Facility. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d) and is for a total amount not to exceed $296,600 (including a 20% contingency) for a five-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Since installation, Mitsubishi Electric US., Inc. (Mitsubishi) has been providing routine services, maintenance, and repairs of eight Mitsubishi traction and hydro elevators: four at the Main Library and four at the Public Safety Facility (PSF). The current sole source agreement expires on October 31, 2016. Due to the proprietary nature of the equipment as well as safety, liability, and logistical considerations, staff recommends that Mitsubishi continues to service these elevators under a sole source agreement with a total amount not to exceed amount of $296,600 over five years.", "Background", "Mitsubishi provided the original installation of the elevators for the Main Library (601 Santa Monica Blvd.) in 2006 and the PSF (333 Olympic Dr.) in 2004. Since then, the company has been servicing these elevators for the City.", "In November 8, 2011 (Attachment A), City Council approved a five-year sole source contractual services agreement with Mitsubishi for routine elevator services and maintenance. This agreement is scheduled to expire on October 31, 2016.", "Discussion", "In order to provide uninterrupted elevator services and maintenance to the eight Mitsubishi elevators at the Main Library and Public Safety Facility, staff recommends Mitsubishi to furnish and provide elevator services and maintenance as an exception to the competitive process. A suitable alternate vendor does not exist due to the following factors demonstrating the proprietary nature of Mitsubishi elevator equipment:", "SafetyThe maintenance of Mitsubishi elevators at the Library and the PSF require proper training and expertise to ensure safety, reliability, and product longevity. Only Mitsubishi technicians and engineers are factory-trained and properly equipped to maintain, test, and modify control operations and software for Mitsubishi elevators. Since installation, Mitsubishi has all the maintenance history and records, and its technicians are familiar with the conditions of the equipment. Should there be any malfunction during diagnostic testing, Mitsubishi would be most capable of proper troubleshooting.", "LiabilityProper maintenance techniques and parts replacement employed by Mitsubishi protect the City by minimizing liability exposure from any incidents that could result from improper practices by a third party.", "LogisticsMitsubishi original equipment manufacturer parts are stored locally. Although other elevator maintenance companies may order service parts from Mitsubishi, inventory priority is given to Mitsubishi\u2019s contract service clients. If existing local inventories are low, all other companies must order parts from Mitsubishi\u2019s factory in Japan. One elevator maintenance company that staff contacted indicated that delivery time could take six weeks.", "Furthermore, staff contacted several major elevator maintenance companies regarding elevator services for the sites referenced above. Amtech Elevator Services, KONE Elevators & Escalators, and ThyssenKrupp Elevator America all declined to provide service based on the following reasons: highly proprietary nature of Mitsubishi elevator equipment; lack of access to exclusive Mitsubishi computer, diagnostic, and mechanical equipment to perform necessary diagnostic testing, troubleshooting, service, and repairs; lack of access to original equipment manufacturer parts; inability to provide Mitsubishi factory trained and certified technicians; or inability to provide service in the Los Angeles area.", "Vendor Selection", "Based on the proprietary nature of Mitsubishi elevator equipment, staff recommends that a sole source agreement be granted to Mitsubishi Electric US, Inc., for elevator maintenance service. Mitsubishi would furnish all supplies, materials, labor and equipment necessary to provide monthly preventive maintenance, replacement and repair service for elevator equipment at the Main Library and the PSF. Mitsubishi is offering a 5% discount and first month free for both facilities if the City enters into a five-year agreement. The agreement includes up to 3% price adjustment per year and a 20% contingency for repairs per year for both sites (Attachment B & Attachment C). Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contractual services agreement to be awarded to Mitsubishi Electric US, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $296,600 for a five-year period starting on November 1, 2016. Funds in the amount of $33,100 for November 1, 2016 \u2013 June 30, 2017 are included in the FY 2016-17 budget plan in the Public Works Department. The contractual services agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Amount", "Contingency", "Total", "014523.533225 (PSF)", "$15,530", "$3,110", "$18,640", "014523.533226 (Library)", "$12,050", "$2,410", "$14,460", "Total Not To Exceed, FY 2016-17:", "$27,580", "$5,520", "$33,100", "Full budget breakdown for the duration of the contract is included in Attachment C. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of Custodial Cleaning Chemicals", "Department": "Public Works, Facilities Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1.  Award Bid #4249 to Staples Contract & Commercial, Inc., a Massachusetts-based company, for the purchase of custodial cleaning chemicals;2.  Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Staples Contract & Commercial, Inc. for custodial cleaning chemicals in the amount not to exceed $114,000 (including a 10% contingency) for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options per manufacturer\u2019s pricing increase or decrease each year for a total amount not to exceed $607,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City purchases environmentally sensitive/low toxicity cleaning chemical products for custodial needs at various City facilities and locations. The current purchase order with Hillyard, Inc. is expiring on June 30, 2016. In March 2016, the City conducted a formal bid process for the purchase of cleaning chemicals. After reviewing seven bids and sampling the top five vendors product lines, staff recommends Staples Contract & Commercial, Inc. (Staples) as the best bidder for an amount not to exceed $114,000 for one year, with four one-year renewal options for a total not to exceed amount of $607,000.", "Background", "The City purchases environmentally sensitive/low toxicity cleaning solutions and chemicals for custodial purposes at various City-owned and City-leased locations, including 1437 4th St., 1717 4th St., 1901 Main St., Animal Shelter, Annenberg Beach House, City Hall, City Yards, Ken Edwards Center, libraries, parks, Print Shop, Public Safety Facility, Santa Monica Airport, Santa Monica Pier, and the Swim Center. These products, used by in-house and contracted custodial staff, include air deodorizers, all-purpose cleaners, bathroom cleaners, carpet cleaners, degreasers, disinfectants/sanitizers, floor care products, glass cleaners, polish, stain removers, and wood cleaner.", "On April 24, 2012, the City Council approved a sole source purchase with Hillyard, Inc. for cleaning solutions and chemicals based on superior product performance, the availability of tamper-proof dispensing units, the sustainable nature of the products, and their compatibility with existing dispensing units in the City (Attachment A). The current purchase order expires after June 30, 2016.", "Discussion", "In recent years, continuous advances in green cleaning chemicals have significantly increased the pool of qualified vendors that could meet the City\u2019s sustainability goals. While Hillyard\u2019s products and customer service have been satisfactory, staff decided it would be prudent to evaluate custodial cleaning solutions and chemicals available in the marketplace today. The pending expiration of the current sole source purchase order presented an opportunity to allow more qualified vendors to compete in an open competitive bid process, ensuring that the City is getting the best products at the best prices.", "Vendor Selection", "On March 21, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and provide cleaning chemicals and solutions in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 51 vendors downloaded the bids. Seven bids were received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016, per Attachment A. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. During on-site product sampling conducted at two different high-use City locations, custodial supervisors and custodians tested various areas and surfaces with cleaning chemicals from all top bidders and concluded that Staples\u2019 products best meet the City\u2019s custodial standards and needs.  Staples is not the lowest bidder, but it offered competitive pricing, satisfactory customer service, free dispensing units plus installation, and received consistently high scores across all categories, such as product performance, product safety and sustainability, ease of use, scent, and dispensing/dilution properties (Attachment B). In addition, Staples received the highest scores from Risk Management and the Office of Sustainability and Environment due to its products\u2019 overall lower toxicity level, health impact to employees and the environment, minimal scents, controlled metering and lockable product dispensing system, and the availability of safer hydrogen peroxide-based, plant-based, and sugar-based cleaning products.  Based on the above criteria, Staples is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts & Budget ActionsThe purchase order to be awarded to Staples Contract & Commercial, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $607,000 over a five-year period. Funds of $114,000 are included in the FY 2016-17 budget plan in various departments. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "First Modification to Professional Services Agreement for Historic Resources Inventory Update", "Department": "Planning Commission Agenda (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to agreement #10087 (CCS) in the amount of $37,880 with Architectural Resources Group, Incorporated (\"ARG\"), a California-based company, to provide professional services for additional community engagement and historical property analysis for the City's Historic Resources Inventory update that is currently in progress. This would result in an amended contract that terminates on December 30, 2018 with a new total amount not to exceed $254,485, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This agreement is for a first modification to an existing contract to provide additional professional services for the update of the City\u2019s Historic Resources Inventory (\"HRI\") that is in progress and involves the completion of a Citywide survey of structures built 40 years ago or more (through 1977), and the development of historical context statements describing the City\u2019s neighborhood, architectural, cultural, and social history. On June 23, 2015, the Council awarded a contract for historic preservation services to ARG in an amount not to exceed $216,605. Following project initiation in late 2015, City staff identified the need to expand the project's community outreach program to the City's eight Neighborhood Organizations and provide documentation of additional historical context statements for neighborhoods not identified in previous City HRI surveys. This new scope of work also provides for two additional discussions/presentations to the Landmarks Commission to gather periodic feedback and recommendations during the update process.", "Background", "The City\u2019s existing Historic Resources Inventory was first developed in 1983 and was last updated in 2008 and released to the public in 2011. It lists approximately 1,600 properties as existing and potential historic resources. This information provides a strong foundation in supporting the goals of the City\u2019s Historic Preservation Element as implemented through the Landmarks and Historic Districts Ordinance.  These goals include identifying properties that contribute to the community\u2019s character, that of its neighborhoods, or that illustrate its historical and architectural development, and preserving and protecting these resources through the land use decision-making process.  Architectural Resources Group is currently working on a number of project deliverables and has started the community outreach component of the project. The reconnaissance field survey of all buildings in the City over 40 years of age will begin in July. Project completion is anticipated in summer 2017 and will include a comprehensively updated Historic Resources Inventory Report with updated historic context statements for the City, and an online and searchable property database.", "Discussion", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On May 13, 2015, the City published an RFP for professional services for the update to the HRI. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and", "Municipal Code provisions. Responses for the RFP were due by June 1, 2015. A total of two proposals were received. Planning and Community Development Department staff evaluated proposals based on criteria listed in the RFP. As detailed more fully in Attachment \"A\", staff selected ARG as the best qualified firm to complete the scope of work. ARG was selected based on the depth of their historic preservation expertise, their knowledge of the City\u2019s architectural history and range of cultural resources relative to the qualifications described in the RFP, the breadth of their experience completing similar work in other Southern California communities, and their ability to meet the schedule and budget.  The professional services contract to conduct the Citywide HRI update project was authorized by Council on June 23, 2015 for an amount not to exceed $216,605.", "Additional Scope of Work \u2013 Community Outreach", "The purpose of this first modification to ARG\u2019s professional services contract is to provide funds to implement a more robust community outreach program for the Citywide Historic Resources Inventory update. The initial scope of work required ARG to develop and conduct an outreach program to inform the community of the HRI update and answer questions about its importance in implementing the City\u2019s Historic Preservation Program. In the original scope of work, ARG proposed a series of Landmarks Commission presentations and discussions, and a series of community workshops for the outreach program.", "However, given the active role the City\u2019s eight Neighborhood Organizations have in facilitating resident input on community issues, staff recommends expanding the content of the outreach program to include ARG attending a monthly meeting of all eight Neighborhood Organizations to present information on the HRI update and to gather resident input on potential historic properties, themes, and individuals of interest in our community. These eight neighborhood-based meetings would provide a forum for discussions tailored to different subareas of the City and complement the existing scope of work for outreach that is currently focused on larger community workshops and Landmarks Commission presentations.", "This first contract modification would also provide funding for the additional time necessary to prepare a more detailed Citywide Historic Context Statement and for two additional presentations to the Landmarks Commission to ensure that its feedback is gathered throughout the project.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Architectural Resources Group, Incorporated is in the amount of $37,880, for an amended contract total not to exceed $254,485. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The agreement will be charged to account 01266.555060."]}, {"Title": "Third Modification to Contract to Provide Emergency Ambulance and Billing Services", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to Contract No. 9438 (CCS) with Ameri-Care Ambulance, a California-based company, to provide emergency ambulance and billing services. This will result in a six year amended contract at no cost to the City.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 26, 2011 Council approved Contract No. 9438 (CCS) with Ameri-Care to provide emergency ambulance and billing services for a three-year term beginning August 4, 2011. On July 22, 2014 Council approved a first amendment to Contract No. 9438 (CCS) with Ameri-Care to extend the terms of the contract until July 31, 2015 with an additional one-year extension through July 31, 2016. On March 22, 2016 Council approved the second amendment to the Ameri-Care contract extending the term for another year. Upon further review, it was determined that a second modification was already processed under the terms of the first modification which allowed for an additional one-year extension through July 2016. This third modification to the agreement is to align the modification with Council approved action for an extension of services for a one-year term until July 31, 2017. Ameri-Care\u2019s compensation is based on billing for transported patient services. Ameri-Care also generates a separate bill for City services, resulting in anticipated cost-recovery of $908,025, as reflected in the FY 2016-17 Budget.", "Discussion", "The City has utilized an emergency ambulance and billing service company since 2004 to provide emergency medical transport and billing services for the response, assessment, treatment and/or transportation of members of the public by Fire Department paramedics. Charges are assessed based on the Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee adopted by Council on June 15, 2004 and the Skilled Nursing Facility fee adopted on June 15, 2010. The Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee is the difference between the Los Angeles County approved Advanced Life Support (\u201cALS\u201d) rate ($1,561) and the Los Angeles County approved Basic Life Support (\u201cBLS\u201d) rate ($1,012.75) as set forth in the most current Los Angeles County General Public and Ambulance Rates Schedule. On the City\u2019s behalf, Ameri-Care bills approximately $548.25 per transport based on the current fee structure, excepting Medi-Cal and Medicare patients. Ameri-Care also bills the Skilled Nursing Facility fee on behalf of the City, the fee is currently $902.17.", "The Fire Department responds to nearly 12,000 emergency medical calls annually and calls for patient transport have increased 5% as compared to the previous year; Ameri-Care transports approximately 7,200 patients annually. The Fire Department\u2019s response model includes six paramedic engine companies and other support units deployed as needed, including four rescue ambulances which are mainly used for special events. Contracted Ameri-Care emergency ambulances are used to transport patients on behalf of the Fire Department with Santa Monica Fire Department paramedics on-board during an advanced life support transport to provide patient treatment in the ambulance while enroute to a medical facility.", "The City currently uses Ameri-Care as its ambulance provider and ambulance related billing services. Ameri-Care has successfully provided ambulance services for the past five years. Staff recommends extending their term for an additional one-year of service while the Department undergoes a cost/revenue analysis of all options available for the delivery of Fire Department-based emergency medical services including the current delivery system and practices. There are significant opportunities for rethinking our current models for service delivery and funding. The newly appointed Fire Chief will lead the collaborative interdepartmental exploration of the best options for presentation to the City Council.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In May 2011, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for an emergency ambulance and billing services. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. In addition, the notice was disseminated to 16 licensed ambulance companies in Los Angeles County. Five Los Angeles County ambulance providers submitted proposals. Proposals were evaluated on price, response capabilities, commitment to purchase property in Santa Monica to locate an ambulance station, redundant dispatch and operation system, and an ability to provide real-time vehicle location services. After a thorough review, the selection committee recommended Ameri-Care as the best bidder based on the evaluation criteria.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate budget or financial impact related to this staff report. Ameri-Care\u2019s compensation is based on billing for transported patient services. Ameri-Care also generates a separate bill for City services, resulting in anticipated cost-recovery of $908,025, as reflected in the FY 2016-17 Budget."]}, {"Title": "Audit and Compliance Services for Business License Tax, Parking Facility Tax and Transient Occupancy Tax", "Department": "Finance Department, Revenue Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 74 to MuniServices, LLC, a California based company, to provide audit and compliance services for Business License Tax, Parking Facility Tax and Transient Occupancy Tax.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with MuniServices, LLC in an amount not to exceed $400,000 for five years with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with State law and the Santa Monica Municipal Code (the Code), the City levies and collects Business License Taxes, Parking Facilities Taxes and Transient Occupancy Taxes. The City periodically conducts audits of businesses to ensure compliance with the Code and collection and remittance of the appropriate amount of taxes. During the past three years, Business License Tax and Parking Facility Tax audits have recovered approximately $1 million in revenues for the City.", "In March 2016, the City solicited bids for audit and compliance services for Business License Taxes, Parking Facility Taxes and Transient Occupancy Taxes. Based on evaluation responses to the Request for Proposals (RFP), staff recommends MuniServices, LLC as the best qualified firm and that the City negotiate a new five-year contract. The cost of the services for a five-year term will be in an amount not to exceed $400,000.", "The City also levies and collects Utility Users Taxes. Due to the complex nature of these taxes, audit and compliance services are governed by a different contract.", "Background", "Audit and compliance services are specialized in nature and require an in-depth knowledge of local and state government operations and legislation. Since 2013, the City has contracted with MuniServices, LLC (MuniServices) to provide tax audit and compliance services. The City\u2019s current contract with MuniServices (Contract #9736 CCS) was authorized by Council on May 14, 2013 (Attachment A). On April 28, 2015 (Attachment B), Council approved a first contract modification which extended the contract term and resulted in a three year amended contract with no change to the contract value. The current contract with MuniServices has been in place since June 7, 2013 and expires on June 30, 2016. MuniServices also provides audit and compliance services for Utility Users Tax under a separate contract (Contract #9730 CCS). On April 23, 2013 (Attachment C), Council approved a five-year contract with MuniServices for compliance and audit services for Utility Users Tax.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s Municipal Code provides for the City to levy and collect Business License Taxes, Parking Facilities Taxes and Transient Occupancy Taxes. Audit and compliance services ensure that the City is applying local law equitably and accurately for all individuals and entities subject to local taxation in the City of Santa Monica. The information below provides a brief description of the local taxes that would be subject to audits under this contract.", "Business License Tax", "The City issues approximately 23,000 business licenses annually, generating approximately $31 million annually in Business License Taxes. Section 6.08.030 of the City\u2019s Municipal Code establishes a tax structure based upon annual gross receipts of a business. The business license tax schedule for business classifications are provided in Section 6.12.010 of the City\u2019s Municipal Code.", "Parking Facility Tax", "The City levies a 10% tax on private and public parking fees collected and remitted to the City. Parking Facility Taxes from 200 businesses and City-owned parking facilities generate over $11 million annually.", "Transient Occupancy Tax", "The City levies a 14% tax on transient room rentals generating approximately $48 million annually in Transient Occupancy Taxes; the revenue collected is from approximately 40 hotel lodging facilities and a number of home share businesses located in Santa Monica.", "The audit and compliance services would include conducting audits of businesses, parking facilities and lodging properties to ensure compliance with local taxation regulations. In the past three years, such audits have resulted in the collection of approximately $1 million in additional revenues. The consulting services offered by MuniServices would include policy, regulatory and legislative consulting support. Audits and compliance reviews would be conducted by the consultant as directed by City staff.", "Consultant Selection", "On March 9, 2016, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP #74) for audit and compliance services for Business License Tax, Parking Facility Tax, and Transient Occupancy Tax. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 251 vendors were notified and 31 vendors downloaded the RFP. Proposals were received from the following four firms:", "\u00b7 Hdl Software, LLC", "\u00b7 MuniServices, LLC", "\u00b7 Sotomayor & Associates", "\u00b7 Davis Farr LLP", "An evaluation panel composed of representatives from the Finance Department reviewed and ranked the proposals using the criteria set out in the RFP. Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, MuniServices was recommended as the best qualified firm to provide the services. MuniServices was selected based on the firm\u2019s long-standing and documented success in audit recoveries, ability to meet project work plan and timeliness, experience and qualifications of staff, methodology that would be used to maximize City revenues, financial stability, available resources, and compliance with City scope of work. Pricing was also considered during the selection process. MuniServices had competitive pricing and was also the most qualified firm, thereby providing the best value for the service.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to MuniServices is for an amount not to exceed $400,000 over five years. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Finance Department. Staff anticipates that revenue recoveries from the audits will offset a significant portion, if not all, of the costs. The contract will be charged to account number 012241.555060 and future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Agreement to Provide a Comprehensive Digital Strategy and Information Architecture Services", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Office of Communications", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #76 to Rightpoint Consulting, LLC a Chicago-based company for Digital Strategy and Information Architecture Services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Rightpoint Consulting LLC, in an amount not to exceed $275,000 (including a $25,000 contingency) for a one-year term.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In a rapidly evolving digital world, Santa Monica has fallen behind leading practices for effectively communicating information and providing our residents and businesses access to 24/7 services via the web. A large-scale effort will be undertaken to use modern tools, techniques, and technologies to make the City\u2019s web presence and social media offerings more coherent and user-centric. At the core of the City\u2019s efforts to improve information and service delivery is a digital strategy to provide a modern and future-ready blueprint for the creation, management, and organization of online information and services. Unlike the execution phase of building a website, which focuses on \u201cwhat\u201d and \u201chow\u201d, digital strategy will focus on \u201cwhy\u201d our website exists. By incorporating a holistic strategy at the outset of the project the City is creating a roadmap to provide the following benefits: place customers at the forefront of online information and service delivery; reduce information silos; create a lasting yet malleable information architecture strategy; reduce redundancy; and reduce propensity for posting conflicting information.", "Staff recommends executing an agreement with Rightpoint Consulting, LLC for Digital Strategy and Information Architecture Services to provide a comprehensive digital strategy and information architecture plan that will serve as a blueprint for effectively rebuilding the City\u2019s online presence in a user-centric and cohesive manner at a total cost not to exceed $275,000, including contingency.", "Background", "The City\u2019s current web presence, smgov.net, has been providing services and information to constituents without any significant changes or enhancements since being released in 2008. As illustrated in the chart below, usage of the World Wide Web and the manner in which information is consumed by consumers have changed drastically in the years following the release of the City\u2019s website. Most notably, information is increasingly being sought out by consumers via mobile devices, as opposed to traditional desktop computers.", "Medium", "% of Sessions in 2014*", "% of Sessions in 2015**", "% of Sessions in 2016***", "Desktop", "67.9%", "62.2%", "58.4%", "Mobile", "23.7%", "30.5%", "35.6%", "Tablet", "8.4%", "7.3%", "6%", "* Date range evaluated: January 1, 2014 to June 1, 2014 ** Date range evaluated: January 1, 2015 to June 1, 2015 ** Date range evaluated: January 1, 2016 to June 1, 2016", "The City has begun the process to rebuild and modernize its web presence as a priority project in alignment with the City\u2019s Strategic Goals. The City\u2019s next generation of websites will utilize established and emerging web development tools and techniques, such as responsive web design, search engine optimized pages, high levels of Americans with Disabilities Act accessibility, and opportunities for two-way communication. In addition, the City will deploy numerous software packages, including but not limited to a new Content Management System, in support of its newly developed website.", "Information (i.e. web content) and services are at the core of any web offering. To date, the City has never conducted a holistic assessment of its content strategy. The City\u2019s current web presence is filled with a silo-rich approach to content management in which departments and divisions design and develop content with little-to-no coordination. This practice often leads to diluted, fragmented, duplicative and sometimes conflicting information being released to the public.", "A wide-reaching digital strategy and information architecture assessment is proposed as the initial step for the City\u2019s new web presence. Staff endeavors to create a more cohesive and cooperative series of digital offerings which places the user/customer at the core of the web experience.", "A Request for Proposal (RFP) was released on March 22, 2016 seeking the services of an experienced firm to assist the City with numerous requirements, including: internal stakeholder analysis, external stakeholder analysis, website analytics analysis, persona creation, site search analysis, and content audit to identify content and information architecture requirements. In addition, the City asked for deliverables pertaining to competitive (i.e. government) and non-competitive (i.e. non-government) benchmarking to identify pertinent trends in website features to maximize service delivery in-line with user\u2019s expectations.", "Discussion", "Building a website for the City of Santa Monica that offers a robust level of services to the community requires planning and strategy. The inclusion of digital strategy and information architecture at the outset of a new website build is analogous to an architect drafting blueprints prior to a building being constructed. Aesthetic elements, while important, are generally simple to change. In contrast, changes to content strategy and governance are non-trivial and extremely difficult to incorporate effectively if not well thought out. For example, many of the City\u2019s websites are currently organized by departmental structure. In addition to not being user-centric, this manner of information architecture becomes obsolete the moment a City department undergoes a re-organization. Significant effort is - required to shift content, adjust templates, and apply necessary security modifications. In contrast to this approach, the City strives to build future sites in a topical manner, in which the user do not need to know what department or division site to visit in order to find the information or service they require. To effectively reach this desired goal, a thorough analysis of the City\u2019s current content is required. Ideally, this includes a \u201chigh-touch\u201d approach, such as conducting interviews with typical users of the site to determine areas for improvement, as well as \u201clow-touch\u201d approaches such as a thorough evaluation of the City\u2019s site usage and traffic patterns.", "Staff recommends executing an agreement with Rightpoint Consulting, LLC for Digital Strategy and Information Architecture services to provide a blueprint for effectively rebuilding the City\u2019s online presence in a user-centric and cohesive manner at a total cost not to exceed $275,000, including contingency.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On March 22, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Digital Strategy and Information Architecture Services seeking the services of an experienced firm to assist the City with numerous requirements, including: internal stakeholder analysis, external stakeholder analysis, website analytics analysis, persona creation, site search analysis, and content audit to identify content and information architecture requirements. In addition, the City asked for deliverables pertaining to competitive (i.e. government) and non-competitive (i.e. non-government) benchmarking to identify pertinent trends in website features to maximize service delivery in-line with user\u2019s expectations.", "The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 55 vendors downloaded the RFP and three (3) firms responded. Proposals were submitted by the following companies:", "Avasant, LLC", "Rightpoint Consulting, LLC", "The Understanding Group, LLC", "Proposals were evaluated based on the following criteria: Expertise, Cost, Work Plans and Timeline, References, Project Team, and Sample Materials. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the City Manager\u2019s Office, Office of Communications and the Information Systems Department, Web Development Division. Vendor interviews were conducted with the three firms that submitted proposals.", "Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Rightpoint Consulting, LLC as the best qualified firm to provide Digital Strategy and Information Architecture Services with the most competitive pricing. Rightpoint has extensive experience in providing digital strategy and information architecture services to agencies facing challenges similar to the City. Current customers of Rightpoint in the digital strategy realm include HermanMiller, Whirlpool, McDonalds, United Airlines, General Mills, and the Kennedy Space Center. In each of the examples exhibited, Rightpoint demonstrated an un-paralleled ability to understand and react to end-user behavior. In addition to having a strong approach towards end-user engagement, Rightpoint has demonstrated the ability to work with internal stakeholders in varied and diverse organizations.", "The company has the closest proximity to the City as a fully-staffed office exists on the Third Street Promenade. In addition to providing digital strategy and information architecture services, Rightpoint is a full service agency capable of providing additional resources, including: marketing, web development, web design, and content authoring services if necessary.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Rightpoint Consulting, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $275,000. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 Adopted budget in the City Manager\u2019s Office. The contract will be charged to account 012071.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Fourth modification to agreement with RAND Corporation to complete second Local Wellbeing Index including conducting survey and other data analysis", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement No. 9837(CCS) in the amount of $175,000 with RAND Corporation, a California-based company, for the production of the second Local Wellbeing Index, including survey fielding and data analysis. This will result in a 4 year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $915,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "What is the cumulative purpose and impact of the services performed by City government? How can we better measure and target those services to produce the greatest public value? Governments around the world are starting to recognize that economic growth alone does not determine a community\u2019s success. True measures of progress take into account the wellbeing of people. By measuring wellbeing, the City of Santa Monica is able to move beyond the traditional measures capturing the conditions of the social, physical, and economic environments, and gaining a qualitative understanding of the cumulative impact of all that our city does.", "In 2013, Santa Monica was one of five winning cities in the United States awarded a one million dollar prize from the Bloomberg Philanthropies\u2019 Mayors Challenge competition for local government innovation. The Wellbeing Project was selected as a model for establishing and measuring the factors that impact individual and community wellbeing in localities. In November 2013, Council approved a professional services agreement with RAND Corporation (RAND) in the amount of $650,000 for the development of the Local Wellbeing Index, a dynamic measurement tool combining quantitative and qualitative data to provide a multidimensional understanding of community wellbeing. A subsequent amendment was made in the amount of $90,000 to provide additional services to finalize The Wellbeing Index framework and communication platform. The first iteration of the Local Wellbeing Index was released in April 2015.", "An agreement modification in the amount of $175,000 is necessary now to complete a second Local Wellbeing Index. Key deliverables will include: fielding of an online resident survey; administrative data collection and analysis; identification of alternative non-city data sources; incorporation of youth wellbeing data into the Index; aggregation of all data sources and dimensional scoring for better communication and tracking over time; and development of written content to support the Index, bringing the total amount of the amended agreement to $915,000.", "Background", "On November 12, 2013, Council approved Agreement No. 9837 (CCS) for the development of The Local Wellbeing Index (\u201cIndex\u201d) with RAND Corporation (\u201cRAND\u201d) (Attachment A). The Index is a core deliverable of The Wellbeing Project, an effort to measure and actively improve community wellbeing. The RAND team was selected as the most qualified candidate from ten proposals received in response to a Request for Proposals (RFP). RAND engaged the expertise of the London-based, New Economics Foundation (nef) as a sub-contractor on the team. nef is well regarded as a research and policy development institution with a specialization in wellbeing measurement and action, with a focus on partnerships with government. Over the past two and half years, RAND and nef worked with City staff to develop the Index. This included conducting research with internal and external stakeholders; convening a panel of 19 interdisciplinary experts in the fields of behavioral science, psychology, economics, sustainability, public policy, public health, and technology; creation of a framework for the Index; extensive data collection and analysis; report writing and in the past year, developing a scoring rubric for the Index. The City Council modified RAND\u2019s agreement ($90,000) in May 27, 2014 (Attachment B) to fund additional services which were required in the area of user experience design and development, technical documentation and implementation, as well as end-user research and testing. Two subsequent modifications were made to the contract with the approval of the City Manager to extend the date of the contract\u2019s close.", "The Wellbeing Project has been described as having three key phases: define, measure and act to improve wellbeing in Santa Monica. Over the past two years, the RAND/nef team played a lead role in the \u201cdefine and measure\u201d phases of the Project.", "\u00b7 Define: The first 18 months of the project were spent using the emerging science of wellbeing and via the engagement of an international and interdisciplinary panel of experts, to create a six dimension framework for the Index. These dimensions include: Community, Place, Learning, Health, Economic Opportunity and Outlook, and provide the architecture for the Index. Key activities of this phase included a horizon scan and synthesis of existing literature and activities related to wellbeing, publication of an extensive white paper (\u2018A City of Wellbeing The What, Why & How of Measuring Community Wellbeing); three convenings of the panel of experts; a series of workshops with City staff; and focus groups with key partner organizations.", "\u00b7 Measure: The measurement phase consisted of a range of activities including data identification, collection and analysis over a 24 month period. The data collection process included data discovery, during which RAND staff met with representatives of all city departments to assess and review the potential City data sources for the Index. In addition, RAND worked to source non-City, external data to complement City administrative data. RAND further developed two \u2018proof of concept\u2019 options involving mining publicly available social media data. nef led the creation of the online resident survey about wellbeing behaviors and perceptions. RAND administered the survey for the city. RAND and nef worked together to analyze and integrate the survey data with administrative data. In addition, RAND and nef worked closely with City staff and a website development team to make all data available via the City\u2019s open data platforms, to develop data visualization and related work. The final Index, released in April 2015, included a 160 page report. Over the past year, the RAND/nef team have worked on a new scoring rubric, and identified processes and examples of new data sources to further strengthen the Index going forward.", "\u00b7 Act: The Act phase of the project involves using the baseline metric of wellbeing provided by the first Index to inform policies, focus resources, and catalyze partnerships with the goal of helping all individuals and groups achieve positive progress more quickly. This includes:", "o launching an online platform to disseminate the Index", "o presenting the findings to the City Council to inform the upcoming budget", "o staff workshops to analyze findings and develop city policy and program responses", "o communicating to community, neighborhood, business and civic groups about the Index", "o refining the data collection process to further develop the Wellbeing Index", "o sharing the work with other cities to both contribute to emerging knowledge about wellbeing and to encourage replication to increase our ability to understand Santa Monica\u2019s community wellbeing in the context of other cities.", "The work from the Define and Measure phases culminated in the release of findings from the first Wellbeing Index April, 2015. Given that the Index was created with the intent of being a dynamic tool based on the most pertinent and timely data available, it is now time to repeat the Indexing process. An agreement modification with RAND in the amount of $175,000 is necessary to retain their services to build on their prior work product and produce the second Local Wellbeing Index.", "Discussion", "Although there is increasingly influential work at the national and international levels on seeking alternatives to traditional measures such as the growth of Gross National Product, there is no recognized local model for identifying and measuring the unifying purpose and outcomes of government and community action. Do our residents feel empowered to make change? Are they happy, healthy, and connected to the community? Are they able access lifelong learning? Does the built and natural environment support health, safety, and community cohesion? These questions underlie the City\u2019s nationally pioneering work in developing a Wellbeing Index.Without these measures, governments are challenged to manage for better results. As a widely watched effort to forge such a model, Santa Monica\u2019s Local Wellbeing Index\u2019s development has been a careful balance of needs assessment, resource management, and efficiency. Over the course of development, the Office of Wellbeing and RAND has spent additional time engaging and educating city staff about the Index findings and their relevance to departmental work, as well as engaging with the community to generate collaborative efforts between community organizations and the city to improve community wellbeing. RAND, with nef, has demonstrated its dedication to advancing the work of The Wellbeing Project by engaging with these additional aspects of the project without increasing the cost for services.", "The cost to produce the second Index is substantially lower than the first iteration, due to the significant investment made towards the creation of the Wellbeing framework and the original data discovery work to surface relevant city data. The second iteration of the Index will build on the research and development of the first Index in a number of ways. The Index will incorporate additional city data surfaced via meetings with staff and RAND, and new non-city data identified by RAND as information that can contextualize Santa Monica\u2019s progress and challenges. The Wellbeing Survey will be fielded again with the expectation of increasing the response rate to surpass the 2200 responses received in the first survey, and RAND will analyze the results through demographic and geographic lenses, along with assessing citywide wellbeing. From this data each wellbeing dimension will be scored, and compared to year one wellbeing results to determine where Santa Monica is progressing in improving community wellbeing and where challenges remain.", "Partnering with RAND to complete this work is the most cost efficient means of replicating the Index at this time, due to their familiarity with city data, staff, and the Wellbeing framework. In addition, RAND is partnering with the City on the aforementioned Transferability Playbook, a key Bloomberg Philanthropies grant deliverable, and as such has maintained close relations with project staff since the completion of the first Local Wellbeing Index. As a result, the transition to beginning work on the second iteration of the Index will be seamless.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On September 10, 2013, the City of Santa Monica issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for development of the Local Wellbeing Index. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site.  901 vendors were notified, 42 vendors downloaded the RFP. 10 firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by an interdepartmental selection panel of staff.", "Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: understanding of the project and compatibility with project goals; experience with successful development of similar measurement tools using a panel of experts\u2019 process; track record for innovative solutions; and recommended approach to index development, including partnerships and deliverables. Staff then interviewed 3 shortlisted firms:", "USC Dornsife Center for Economic and Social Research", "Applied Survey Research", "RAND Corporation", "Based on these criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended RAND Corporation as the best qualified firm to provide development of the Local Wellbeing Index based on completeness of scope and corresponding budget.", "RAND Corporation has partnered with the New Economics Foundation (nef) on research and analysis components of The Wellbeing Project. These two nonprofit research organizations together bring a great depth of knowledge in wellbeing analysis, measurement development, city planning, research, and policy development and built a solid foundation for The Wellbeing Project.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to RAND Corporation is $175,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $915,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Community and Cultural Services Department. The agreement will be charged to account 01501.555060.90578W.  Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Contract for Planning Services related to Complete Street Network Planning and Implementation", "Department": "Mobility (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Award RFP# 79 to Nelson/Nygaard Consulting Associates, a California-based company for complete streets and mobility planning policy and implementation services; 2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Nelson/Nygaard subconsultant ALTA Planning + Design, in an amount not to exceed $85,000 (including a $13,000 contingency) for project tasks of the Samohi Safe Routes to School design adjustments and construction documents; and,3.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Nelson/Nygaard Consulting Associates, in an amount not to exceed $390,000 (including a $40,000 contingency) for project tasks related to complete streets policy, Downtown Community Plan, protected bikeway strategy, and 17th Street initial design services.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica adopted a progressive Circulation Element of the General Plan in 2010 to guide the management and enhancement of the City street network (LUCE). Subsequent work on the Bike and Pedestrian Action Plans, Wellbeing Project, and Council-identified strategic goal to create \u201ca new model for mobility\u201d also informs the city\u2019s work on transportation issues. Even with proactive and continuous work on circulation since adoption of the LUCE, meaningful gaps and barriers to complete streets and active transportation still exist in the city\u2019s physical and operational networks. In spring 2015, the Council accepted the Mayor\u2019s Challenge for \u201cSafer People, Safer Streets\u201d issued by United States Transportation Secretary Anthony Foxx. Major findings from staff work on the Challenge were the value of better coordinating enhancement and maintenance efforts, aligning internal practices and data, and developing comprehensive guidance through a Complete Streets policy.", "The City issued a Request for Proposals in May 2016 for complete streets and mobility planning policy and implementation that would advance the LUCE and projects described above, and that would continue the work needed to create, maintain and manage a street network that encourages all modes of travel, supports wellbeing and local activities. Specifically, the RFP sought consultant services to develop concepts and plans for select complete streets projects and to provide strategic mobility policy guidance that advances the adopted Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) and through the following implementation efforts:", "a. Complete Streets Policy: Facilitate the creation and adoption of a complete streets policy for Santa Monica that addresses Vision Zero and provides tools to support multi-modal transportation management, decision-making and future developments.", "b. Downtown Community Plan: Provide strategic support for updating the Access & Mobility Chapter of the Downtown Community Plan.", "c. Protected Bikeway Strategy: Create a protected bikeway implementation strategy to update the Bike Action Plan that is based on evaluation of demand, network completeness, crash information, high-conflict areas, etc.", "d. 17th Street Pedestrian Comfort and Bike Safety Design: Complete conceptual and schematic design for 17th Street grant-funded pedestrian improvements and protected bikeway.", "e. Samohi Safe Routes to School Connections: Complete design adjustments and construction documents for additional buffering of students walking and biking to Samohi.", "The consultant team lead by Nelson/Nygaard Consulting Associates, with subconsultants ALTA Planning + Design, responded to the RFP and was selected by an internal review committee as the most qualified and most responsive bidder. Because the Samohi Safe Routes to School task would deliver final construction documents which carry different consultant liability, and service requirements as outlined in the RFP, it is recommended that the work be contracted in two separate agreements with a total value not to exceed the amount of $475,000.", "Background", "The City of Santa Monica adopted a progressive Circulation Element of the General Plan in 2010 to guide the management of and improvements to the City street network [Adopted LUCE]. The LUCE provided broad policy guidance for increasing transportation options, creating a complete network of bicycle and pedestrian routes, improving access to transit including the new Expo Light Rail stations, integrating multiple modes for a seamless transportation experience, and proactively managing the network. Specific related goals include:", "\u00b7 Goal LU19: Design Complete Streets - Design and manage complete streets and alleys to support adjacent land uses and human activity, keeping in mind the unique character of each area of the City.", "\u00b7 Goal T17: Create a Street Network that is accessible to all modes of transportation.", "\u00b7 Goal T18: Encourage a more sustainable transportation system.", "\u00b7 Goal T20: Manage the transportation system to prioritize flexibility, cost effectiveness and accountability.", "\u00b7 Goal T21: Use all available tools to make the most effective possible use of the transportation system.", "Policies and actions to implement these and other goals of the Circulation Element cover physical improvements, policy needs, internal practices, and measurement techniques.", "In 2011, Council adopted a Bike Action Plan that further defined priority bicycle networks and a 5-year and 20-year improvement plan, and associated programs, encouragement and enforcement activities [Adopted Bike Action Plan]. In early 2016, Council adopted a Pedestrian Action Plan that comprehensively evaluated pedestrian conditions and volumes, and projected pedestrian demand based on land use, health, equity, circulation and transit access factors. The Plan incorporated the City\u2019s first statement on Vision Zero - a target to eliminate severe injury and fatal collisions as a guide for implementing the Pedestrian Action Plan.", "Complementing these plans, the Council also accepted US DOT Secretary Anthony Foxx\u2019s Mayor\u2019s Challenge for \u201cSafer People, Safer Streets\u201d [Mayor\u2019s Challenge Information] in Spring 2015. The challenge highlights the diversity of strategies needed to foster safer streets for everyone. City staff have inventoried current efforts and identified the need to prioritize and pursue the most valuable efforts that implement the challenge. Major findings were the value of better coordinating enhancement and maintenance efforts, aligning internal practices, and developing comprehensive guidance through a Complete Streets policy. While the City of Santa Monica has proactively established overarching policies in plans completed to date, meaningful gaps and barriers to complete streets and active transportation still exist.", "In 2015 the City of Santa Monica launched the Wellbeing Project, after a research effort funded by a Bloomberg Philanthropies grant, to evaluate and understand the conditions that lead to community wellbeing [Wellbeing Project]. The Wellbeing Project Index incorporated health, economic access, and social cohesion factors that are closely connected to mobility. In August 2015 the City Council identified mobility as one of the Council\u2019s five strategic goals, focused on creating \u201ca new model for mobility\u201d that improves mobility options for people who live, work and visit Santa Monica.", "Discussion", "This complete streets and mobility planning policy and implementation effort is proposed to advance the efforts described above, and to continue the work needed to create, maintain and manage a street network that encourages all modes of travel, supports Wellbeing and local activities. The RFP sought consultant services to develop concepts and plans for a few specific complete streets projects that are time sensitive and link to schools and Expo stations, and to complete selected policy documents that advance the adopted Land Use and Circulation Element and its implementation efforts:", "a. Complete Streets Policy: Facilitate the creation and adoption of a complete streets policy for Santa Monica that addresses Vision Zero and provides tools to support multi-modal transportation management, decision-making and future developments.", "b. Downtown Community Plan: Provide strategic support for updating the Access & Mobility Chapter of the Downtown Community Plan.", "c. Protected Bikeway Strategy: Create a protected bikeway implementation strategy to update the Bike Action Plan that is based on evaluation of demand, network completeness, crash information, high-conflict areas, etc.", "d. 17th Street Pedestrian Comfort and Bike Safety Design: Complete conceptual and schematic design for 17th Street grant-funded pedestrian improvements and protected bikeway.", "e. Samohi Safe Routes to School Connections: Complete design adjustments and construction documents for additional buffering of students walking and biking to Samohi.", "The consultant team was asked to propose a project approach, work tasks, schedule and budget that best delivers these efforts. After review of all submittals by a staff team, one team was uniquely positioned for this work. The Nelson/Ngaard team offers a desired mix of technical knowledge, practical project implementation experience and community engagement skills to work productively on this efforts and ultimately deliver usable final products, based on consensus among the stakeholders. The Nelson/Nygaard team has experience in several similar or related efforts, such as the Santa Monica Bike Action Plan and Pedestrian Action Plan, Green Streets Design Charettes for the City of Los Angeles, Foster Road Transportation and Streetscape Plan for the City of Portland, the National Association of City Transportation Officers (NACTO) Urban Street Design Guide, and City of Honolulu Complete Streets Implementation Study. The Nelson/Nygaard team proposal demonstrates a clear understanding of the project tasks and knowledge of challenges, and outlines clear and well organized steps to achieving the requested outcomes. The project team proposes effective engagement of internal and external stakeholders that will inform decision-making on all tasks. This proposal was the most effective in integrating the project tasks, to create efficiencies and solve issues in a comprehensive way.", "As lead consultant of the multi-disciplinary team, Nelson/Ngaard will coordinate the activities of the sub-consultants and will be responsible for deliverables and work products, as well as regular communication with City staff and internal partners. Nelson/Nygaard will take a lead role in task management and project delivery services, integrating the work of their staff and sub-consultant staff from ALTA Planning + Design. ALTA Planning + Design work is focused largely on the Samohi and 17th Street project tasks where there technical and construction document preparation skills will be most effective.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In May 2016, the City published Request for Proposals (RFP) for complete streets planning policy and implementation services. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 71 vendors downloaded the RFP. Staff received five submittals prior to the June 3 deadline. Proposals were received from teams led by Nelson/Nygaard Consulting Associates, Stantec Consulting Services, Sam Schwartz Engineering, Steer Davies Gleave, and IBI Group. The proposals were objectively reviewed by a committee of Planning and Community Development and Public Works staff. Based on information presented in the written proposal, the review committee unanimously selected the team led by Nelson/Ngaard Consulting Associates based on their team composition and relevant experience, project approach and understanding, availability of consultant time, and competitive cost.", "Evaluation was based on the quality of the proposed project approach, work plan, schedule and budget, and the following selection criteria:", "\u00b7 Experience and Technical Competence", "\u00b7 Stakeholder Engagement and Responsiveness to Local Conditions", "\u00b7 Ability to Meet Project Work Plan and Timeliness", "\u00b7 Quality Control", "\u00b7 Cost of Services, Cost Control", "\u00b7 References", "Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends contracting with Nelson/Nygaard Consulting Associates, a California-based company in an amount not to exceed $475,000 (including a $53,000 contingency) to provide complete streets and mobility planning policy and implementation services related to creating an integrated complete streets policy, protected bikeway study, community plan review, 17th Street concept design services, and design and construction documents for Samohi Safe Routes to School project access updates.", "The Samohi Safe Routes to School task would deliver final construction documents which carry different consultant liability, and service requirements as outlined in the RFP. ALTA Planning + Design will be completing those work tasks. Due to these unique elements of that project task, and liability requirements, it is recommended to contract that work directly to ALTA Planning + Design. That would result in two separate contracts to complete the work identified in the RFP with a total value not to exceed the amount of $475,000 as outlined below. A contingency of $13,000 is included, approximately 18 percent of design costs, because the project design is in an early stage during which a contingency above 10 percent is traditional.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to ALTA Planning + Design is for an amount not to exceed $85,000 (including $13,000 contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget and Planning & Community Development Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "01267.555060 Professional Services", "$72,000", "C014071.589000 Bicycle Infrastructure", "$13,000", "TOTAL", "$85,000", "The agreement to be awarded to Nelson/Nygaard is for an amount not to exceed $390,000 (including $40,000 contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget and Planning & Community Development Department. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "C017045.589000 MANGo Mich. Ave. Neighborhood Greenway", "$200,000", "01267.555060 Professional Services", "$29,000", "01267.555061 Professional Services \u2013 LUCE", "$161,000", "TOTAL", "$390,000"]}], [{"Title": "Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance to Amend the Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of SMMC Article 9) Making Minor Clarifications regarding applicability of Active Commercial Design and Active Commercial Use requirements in mixed-use and commercial districts (SMMC Section 9.11.030),  requirements for enclosed garages in the R-1 zone (SMMC Table 9.07.030), requirements for front setbacks in the OP3 zone (SMMC Table 9.09.030), and requirements for Maximum First Story Street Wall Height in the OF zone (SMMC Table 9.14.030).", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending the City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance making minor clarifications regarding applicability of Active Commercial Design and Active Commercial Use requirements in mixed-use and commercial districts, requirements for enclosed garages in the R-1 zone, requirements for front setbacks in the OP3 zone, and requirements for Maximum First Story Street Wall Height in the OF zone.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City Council last year adopted a complete rewrite of the City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance to conform to the Land Use and Circulation Element of the General Plan adopted back in 2010. Since the effective date of the new Zoning Ordinance in July 2015, staff identified a long list of unintentional errors, inconsistencies, or omissions that required minor clerical changes, corrections and clarifications which do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance. After Planning Commission review, these clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications were considered by the City Council. The majority were approved at the June 14, 2016 meeting, but the Council did not approve twenty recommended clarifications due to concerns that they may affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance. Council directed staff to further study the twenty recommended clarifications and bring back more information regarding clarifications that were immediately necessary to address pending issues.", "Staff has identified four clarifications that require Council direction due to questions raised in the course of recent plan checks or where the consequences of ambiguities in the Zoning Ordinance have resulted in unintended consequences. These four clarifications include:", "\u00b7 Applicability of Active Commercial Design and Active Commercial Use requirements in mixed-use and commercial districts", "\u00b7 Requirements for enclosed garages in the R-1 zone", "\u00b7 Requirements for front setbacks in the OP3 zone", "\u00b7 Requirements for Maximum First Story Street Wall Height in the OF zone", "For each of the four clarifications, this report summarizes the purpose of the standard, how the issue was brought to staff\u2019s attention, what the clarifying language will do, and consequences of not adopting the proposed amendment. The Planning Commission considered all of the text amendments presented in this report and recommended approval on March 16, 2016.", "Background", "On June 23, 2015, the City Council adopted a new Zoning Ordinance that became effective on July 24, 2015. Since its adoption, staff has identified unintentional errors, inconsistencies, or omissions that require minor clerical changes, corrections, or clarifications. On June 14, 2016, Council approved a set of minor clerical amendments to the Zoning Ordinance that fell into the general categories of: spelling, grammar, and punctuation; section references; formatting and organization; clarification; internal consistency with existing ordinance; and Council direction. Council did not adopt clarifications relating to continuity from prior zoning ordinance and others that were deemed potentially to raise policy issues. Council directed staff to bring back more information regarding clarifications that required immediate attention due to confusion caused by existing language in the Zoning Ordinance.", "Discussion", "The following four minor clarifications do not affect policy decision made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance. Rather, these provide clarifications as to how the standards should be applied thereby eliminating the possibility of multiple interpretations of the requirements, which has resulted in confusion in implementation of development standards.", "Applicability of Active Commercial Design & Active Commercial Use Requirements in Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts (SMMC Section 9.11.030)", "Purpose of the Standard", "The LUCE has stated policies to encourage active ground floor uses and predominantly housing above the ground floor. The Active Commercial Design and Use requirements in the mixed-use and commercial districts (MUB, MUBL, GC, and NC zones) are intended to implement these policies to ensure buildings are designed to engage the street. Ground floor uses are required to be active uses in all LUCE Activity Centers and Neighborhood Commercial Districts on Main Street and Montana Avenue. All office use is specifically prohibited on the ground floor in these areas. In all other commercial boulevards, office is also prohibited except for creative office or walk-in clientele (e.g. real estate offices).", "Figure 1: Map showing Active Use areas and Active Commercial Boulevards", "How this Issue was Identified", "An existing ground floor retail space on Montana Avenue was converted to an office space. At the time, Specific Limitation #21 indicated that office space was a permitted use in existing buildings. Active Commercial Design requirements include minimum ground floor height of 15 feet, storefront transparency, minimum space depth of no less than 25 feet, and at least one pedestrian entrance facing the street. As there are no stated thresholds for when Active Commercial Design requirements would apply, it could be interpreted that all existing buildings must be retrofitted to meet these design standards when they apply for any permit from the City, including minor tenant improvements and other minor permits. As a result, a reasonable interpretation has been made that the Active Commercial Design requirements apply only to new buildings. As drafted in the zoning ordinance, Active Use requirements are a subset of Active Commercial Design requirements. Applicants have therefore asserted that Active Use requirements only apply to new buildings. The conversion of a ground floor retail space on Montana Avenue to office was a result of the ambiguous drafting of the language in the zoning ordinance.", "What the Amendment Does", "The recommended text amendment would clarify that Active Design requirements apply to new buildings and that Active Use requirements apply to all buildings, existing and new. This would implement the LUCE policies of ensuring that new buildings will conform to Active Commercial Design requirements and that all changes of use must conform with the Active Use requirements.", "Consequences of Not Adopting the Amendment", "Staff is concerned that if the amendment does not clarify the applicability of the Active Commercial Design and Use requirements, that other retail spaces on commercial boulevards could also be converted to office or other non-active uses.", "Enclosed Garages in the R-1 Zone (SMMC Table 9.07.030)", "Purpose of the Standard", "Historically, off-street parking for single-family residential uses in the City have been required to be within an enclosed garage. The intent of this standard is to provide parking on-site and to protect neighborhoods from the effects of spillover parking, as envisioned by LUCE policies to maximize the availability of street parking. Additionally, requiring off-street parking to be in an enclosed garage furthers other LUCE policies to protect the residential character of a neighborhood by minimizing the visibility of parking from streets and ensuring the provision of accessible and attractive off-street parking facilities. Nowhere in the Zoning Ordinance does it explicitly state that required off-street parking spaces associated with a single-family residential use shall be in an enclosed garage.", "How this Issue was Identified", "Single-family residential uses in the City have been required to provide parking within an enclosed garage for many decades. As such, the absence of the \u2018enclosed garage\u2019 requirement was recognized by City staff fairly quickly in the course of implementing the new Zoning Ordinance following its adoption. Due to this omission, inquiries and proposals have been made to the City regarding the possibility of satisfying the off-street parking requirement for a single-family home through the provision of uncovered surface parking.", "There is no record that the removal of the \u2018enclosed garage\u2019 requirement from the Zoning Ordinance was intentional. As a result, the requirement for parking associated with single-family homes has led to confusion since the \u2018enclosed garage\u2019 requirement has been a long-standing development standard for single-family properties in the City.", "Table 9.04.10.08.040 of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance lists the number of off-street parking spaces required per use classification, and identifies the required number of off-street parking spaces for single-family dwelling units as, \u201c2 spaces in a garage per dwelling unit\u201d (emphasis added). In Table 9.28.060 of the 2015 Zoning Ordinance the minimum number of required off-street parking spaces for single-family uses is listed as, \u201c2 spaces per dwelling unit.\u201d In the drafting of the 2015 Zoning Ordinance, there was a deliberate effort to format Table 9.28.060 to only include parking quantities and to keep out any elements related to parking design. As a result, any reference to an enclosed garage was omitted from this Table and was inadvertently not replaced elsewhere in the Ordinance.", "What the Amendment Does", "The recommended text amendment seeks to reestablish the development standard that required off-street parking for single-family residential uses to be located within an enclosed garage. The integration of this development standard into the 2015 Zoning Ordinance would maintain a requirement that has been a City standard for decades and would help continue to protect and preserve the character of single-family neighborhoods, as envisioned by the LUCE.", "Consequences of Not Adopting the Amendment", "The requested text amendment is necessary to eliminate any ambiguity that would allow the off-street parking requirements associated with a single-family home to be satisfied through the provision of paved surface parking.", "Front Setbacks in the OP3 Zone (SMMC Table 9.09.030)", "Purpose of the Standard", "Front setbacks are intended to establish, maintain and protect street character within established neighborhoods. Additionally, front setback standards ensure a consistent development pattern along a neighborhood blockface.", "How this Issue was Identified", "A proposal for an addition in the OP3 zoning district was submitted and City Planning staff observed that the minimum required front setbacks for the district had decreased from what was previously required in the 1988 Zoning Ordinance. There is no clear record that the reduction in the front setback requirement for the OP3 zone was intentional. As noted in Table 1, the differing front setback standards are color-coded for clarity in identifying where the inconsistencies exist between the 1988 and 2015 Zoning Ordinances.", "Table 1: Comparison of OP3 Front Setback Requirements", "OP3", "Minimum Front Setbacks", "2015 Zoning Ordinance", "(Table 9.09.030)", "20 ft., or", "10 ft. if average setback of adjacent dwelling(s) is 10 ft. or less.", "1988 Zoning Ordinance", "(Sections 9.04.08.50.060(e) and 9.04.08.52.060(e))", "20 ft., or", "15 ft. if average setback of adjacent dwelling(s) is 15 ft. or less.", "What the amendment does", "The recommended text amendment would retain the minimum required front setback of 20 feet; however, the allowable reduced front setback and its applicability would change. Specifically, the allowable reduced front setback, as determined by the average front setback of adjacent properties, would be increased from 10 feet to 15 feet, as it existed in the 1988 Zoning Ordinance.", "Consequences of not adopting the amendment", "The allowable reduced front setback in the 2015 Zoning Ordinance, as determined by the average front setback of adjacent properties, has decreased from 15 feet to 10 feet. Furthermore, the average front setback threshold used to determine the applicability of the reduced front setback has also decreased from 15 feet to 10 feet. As currently drafted in the 2015 Zoning Ordinance, the development standards could have the effect of altering existing street character in the OP3 zone.", "The Ocean Park districts encompass an eclectic and unique residential neighborhood that contain parcels of atypical sizes and dimensions and a development pattern that warrants instances where a reduced front setback is appropriate. The recommended text amendment to Table 9.09.030 seeks to reestablish the same development standards that were applicable to the OP zoning districts in the 1988 Zoning Ordinance to protect the existing neighborhood character. Clarification of the intended minimum front setback requirements are critical to ensure that the existing neighborhood blockface and street character of the OP3 district is not adversely impacted due to unintentional typos or errors that may have occurred in the 2015 Zoning Ordinance.", "Maximum First Story Street Wall Height in the OF Zone (SMMC Table 9.14.030)", "Purpose of the Standard", "The LUCE establishes a maximum first story street wall height in order to define a consistent human-scale edge to the public sidewalk. This standard dictates how buildings are intended to engage the street in the OF (Oceanfront) zoning district.", "How this issue was identified", "A development application was submitted that highlighted the conflicting standards in Table 9.14.030. The title of the development standard indicates that minimum upper-story stepbacks are required above the maximum first story street wall height. The maximum allowable first story streetwall height is 20 feet in the OF District. As drafted in the Zoning Ordinance, the standard indicates that the building stepbacks should be required above 14 feet. It is unclear how a project would comply with a maximum first-story street wall height of 20 feet and also provide upper-story stepbacks above 14 feet. It is also unclear whether the upper-story stepbacks should occur above the maximum first story streetwall height of 20 feet or 14 feet.", "What the amendment does", "The recommended text amendment provides clarity as to how the upper-story stepback requirement should be applied based on internal consistency with the title of the section.", "Consequences of not adopting the amendment", "If the amendment is not adopted, there will continue to be no direction as to how to apply the standard and there could be inconsistency as to where upper level stepbacks are required on a building. There are currently two pending projects in the OF zone.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed minor clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance are categorically exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed changes may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended modifications represent minor clarifications that do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.", "Text Amendment Findings", "1. The Ordinance amendments are consistent in principle with the General Plan, in that the amendments do not affect policy decisions made with the City Council\u2019s adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance.", "2. The Ordinance amendments are consistent with the purpose of this Ordinance to promote the growth of the City in an orderly manner and to promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare, in that the amendments maintain the existing policies, standards, and regulations of the Zoning Ordinance that promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Review and give direction on procurement methods; Repeal Resolution suspending travel to Arizona; and, Introduce for first reading an ordinance amending Municipal Code Chapter 2.24 to reflect current purchasing practices.", "Department": "Finance Department, Procurement", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Receive the attached report on Santa Monica procurement; and2) Repeal Resolution No. 10479 (CCS), suspending official travel to the State of Arizona and developing additional financial sanctions while the Arizona law SB1070 remains in effect; and3) Introduce for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 2.24 to reflect proposed changes to current purchasing practices; and4) Give staff direction to pilot or implement new methods of procurement, including reverse auctions, broad problem statements and partnerships, and an eMarketplace site, to increase purchasing power, vendor participation and innovation.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In recent years, improving market conditions and the City\u2019s commitment to innovative and sustainable practices have resulted in a growing number of one- and two-bid procurements that threaten to weaken the City\u2019s ability to achieve value and inclusivity in its purchasing. The policies and procedures guiding the procurement process, including the development of scopes or specifications, the outreach process, proposal evaluation and contract award, have been established to maximize competition, quality, fairness and transparency. It is, however, important to review these processes from time to time to identify opportunities for improvements.", "In this report, staff identifies challenges to an effective procurement process. For each challenge, staff presents a response that includes new ideas, best practices currently being implemented, and recommended changes to the City\u2019s law, policies, and procedures, some of which require Council action, as summarized here:", "\u00b7 Technological limitations: Staff recommends process changes to transition from hard copy to electronic bid submission. This addresses a timing constraint that vendors identified as a barrier to submitting bids. This recommendation takes advantage of the City\u2019s online bidding system\u2019s existing features.", "\u00b7 Disclosure and documentation requirements: Staff recommends the Council repeal the resolution limiting official travel to Arizona and requiring additional scrutiny for purchasing from Arizona companies. This will ease the burden on all vendors, and broaden the potential vendor field.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica\u2019s needs are ahead of the market: The convergence of innovative practices and traditional procurement processes often results in low response to bids. Staff recommends increasing the use of more flexible, broader procurement solicitations, such as requests for qualifications, and incorporating broad problem statements and partnerships to increase potential responses and solutions that support Santa Monica\u2019s innovative practices.", "\u00b7 Lengthy, complicated process: Staff recommends the Council adopt changes to the Municipal Code shortening the City\u2019s protest procedure. This will provide for faster resolution to protest disputes and a faster overall process.", "\u00b7 Decentralized purchasing can be inefficient: Staff monitors individual department purchases to make sure that any standard purchases are combined into citywide contracts that take advantage of the best possible pricing. This process will be simpler with the additional technical capacity of the City\u2019s new enterprise resource program (ERP) system. Standardized contract management, training, and contract reporting assist in identifying any areas of inefficiency or where contracts could be combined.", "\u00b7 Limited participation and low purchasing power: Staff will continue proactive outreach to vendors through its online vendor portal and through local organizations. Procurement staff will train key staff throughout the City to use its online market research subscription for better information about scope of work development and pricing standards for specific commodities and services, and will be more proactive in pursuing piggybacking and cooperative purchasing practices. Staff will also identify areas where reverse auctions could lead to better pricing.", "Background", "In the past two years, 27% of City procurements received one or two bids, suggesting a weakening in the City\u2019s position to achieve the best value. Council has expressed concerns about this trend, and asked staff to provide a report on the City\u2019s current procurement practices as well as efforts to encourage minority, women, veteran, or disabled-owned businesses\u2019 participation in City procurement. To provide context for the discussion, the following is a summary of the City\u2019s current procurement policies and practices.", "Purchasing Authority and Competitive Bidding", "The City Charter (Sections 608, 1507, and 1508) and the Municipal Code (Chapter 2.24) define Santa Monica\u2019s procurement authority and practices. The Charter establishes a centralized purchasing system in the Finance Department and requires that, before making any purchase of, or contract for, materials or services, the City must provide ample opportunity for competitive bidding within parameters established by ordinance and through administrative policies and procedures.", "The Municipal Code establishes exceptions to the competitive bid procedure in limited cases. These include where the amount of the purchase is small; competition does not exist (such as with a proprietary software); competitive bid procedures have already been formulated by other government agencies (piggybacking or cooperative purchasing); and in emergency situations.", "Cumulative totals apply when a particular vendor, consultant or contractor is used by the same or several departments for like goods and/or services and without a competitive process. If a vendor is selected through the competitive process, the cumulative policy does not apply regardless of how many departments are using the same vendor. The type of competitive process to be used in a procurement is based on the type of item being purchased and the dollar amount of the purchase, as follows:", "Type of Purchase", "Type of Competitive Process", "Exempt", "Informal", "Formal", "Goods and Contractual Services", "$0 - $10,000", "X", "$10,001 - $175,000", "X", "$175,001 and up", "X", "Professional Services", "$0 - $10,000", "X", "$10,001 - $80,000", "X", "$80,001 and up", "X", "\u00b7 An exempt process does not require multiple price quotes.", "\u00b7 An informal process requires that staff solicit at least three quotes from competing vendors.", "\u00b7 A formal process requires that staff advertise the proposal, follow strict rules in opening bids, and request Council authorization to enter into the contract.", "In FY 2014-15, the City conducted more than 470 competitive processes for goods, contractual services, construction and professional services, totaling over $50,000,000.", "Type of Agreement", "Number", "Informal Quotes", "242", "Formal Bids", "124", "Request for Proposals (RFP)", "92", "Request for Qualifications (RFQ)", "11", "Request for Information (RFI)", "8", "TOTAL", "477", "Sustainable Purchasing", "The Sustainable City Plan (Attachment A) guides City purchasing within the Charter and Municipal Code guidelines. This plan establishes requirements for categories of products and services based on their environmental impact and the City\u2019s goals.", "Purchasing Process", "City policies and procedures guide the development of scopes or bid specifications, the outreach process, and proposal evaluation and contract award to ensure competition, quality, fairness and transparency in City procurement.", "Specification/Scope Development", "The department purchasing a good or service begins the process by preparing specifications or a scope of work: a written description of the requirement for materials and/or services. Procurement staff reviews the description and may require additional justification if a specific requirement appears to be unreasonably restrictive or inappropriate. This oversight is meant to allow for the broadest range of competition possible given the City\u2019s needs.", "Outreach", "Outreach processes are aimed at reaching the largest possible pool of potential vendors. The City notifies its vendors electronically, through its online vendor portal and bidding system (PlanetBids), and through newspaper advertising, as the Municipal Code requires. In addition to those vendors registered on Planet Bids, Procurement works with staff to identify a list of vendors who provide services like those being requested and reach out to invite them to join the online bidding system.", "Evaluation and Award", "Evaluation teams rate bids or proposals based on the quality of the material or service, qualifications, project plans, financial stability, experience, references, and price. The City\u2019s evaluation process is based on a best responsible bidder model, in which several criteria play a role in vendor selection, rather than a lowest responsible bidder model where cost is the primary selection factor. This is to ensure that the City receives the best possible service and thus most effective use of resources, which is not always indicated by the lowest cost option.", "Staff created this process to maximize the City\u2019s purchasing power; provide for competition for all segments of the supplier community; protect against corruption, waste, fraud and abuse; and ensure appropriate public access to contracting information. This process should provide the answer to a central question for every procurement: how can the community be sure that the recommendation represents the best value?", "Discussion", "Out of 120 formal bids since 2015, 88 bids received over three responses, while 17 offerings received one bid and 15 received two bids. The one-bid procurements were for specialized vehicles (25%), specialized goods or services (17%), and services requiring a particular vendor certification (47%). CNG and electric powered vehicles, membrane replacement for the water treatment plant and bus surveillance equipment maintenance are examples of one- and two-bid awards.", "Through discussion with vendors who downloaded bids but chose not to submit proposals, staff identified 1) technological limitations; 2) disclosures and documentation requirements; and 3) the City\u2019s innovative needs being ahead of the market, as challenges to attracting more bid offerings.", "Also putting the City at a disadvantage are improving market conditions, where vendors are benefiting from greater demand for their products and therefore do not have the capacity or interest in participating in a large number of solicitations.  In this economic climate, an efficient, understandable and flexible process has a greater ability to retain or draw new vendors.", "For each challenge, staff presents a response that includes new ideas, best practices currently being implemented, and recommended changes to the City\u2019s law, policies, and procedures, some of which require Council action. In addition to recommendations tied directly to these specific challenges, staff identifies innovative practices and process improvements to further streamline purchasing and to reach a larger range of potential service providers.", "Key Factor No. 1: Technological Limitations", "Issue overview: Vendors indicated that the requirement to submit hard copy bids prevented them from submitting proposals when they otherwise would have done so. The City currently requires wet signatures on all documents. This practice has the negative effect of discouraging vendors from submitting bids because they must build in extra time to allow for mailing or delivery.", "Response: The City\u2019s online vendor portal and bidding system has the ability to accept bids electronically. Staff will revise bidding procedures to allow electronic submission for initial bids, but will continue to require the selected bidder to submit a hard copy of the signed bid after it is awarded. This transition to a real-time electronic platform during the selection process will improve customer service and potentially increase the number of vendor responses. Electronic submittals would also facilitate data collection used for reporting and reduce time-consuming and error-prone manual processes.", "Key Factor No. 2: Disclosure and Documentation Requirements", "Issue Overview: Vendors who have chosen not to submit a proposal frequently noted the large number of disclosures as an impediment. With limited exceptions, regulations require vendors to comply with a number of requirements to do business with the City. Compared to neighboring cities (see Attachment B), Santa Monica has more requirements in its bidding process. A number of these requirements are mandated within the City\u2019s Charter or the Municipal Code and facilitate transparency (the Oaks Initiative Charter Provision), fair wages (the Living Wage Ordinance), and accountability (the Business License Ordinance), while others protect both the City and vendors (Non-Discrimination Policy and Insurance documentation). Vendors must also comply with the City\u2019s Arizona disclosure requirement, related to Santa Monica\u2019s policy stance against Arizona's anti-immigration law, Senate Bill 1070 (SB 1070).", "Council adopted Resolution 10479 (CCS) in 2010, denouncing Arizona's anti-immigration law. The resolution suspends official travel to the State of Arizona and develops additional financial sanctions until such time as the new law was revoked. The law remains partially in place. Senate Bill 1070 was immediately challenged after its implementation, and, after the City\u2019s guidelines had been issued, the U.S. Supreme Court struck down much of the law. The Supreme Court\u2019s decision reduced SB 1070\u2019s potential to do harm, and subsequent challenges further weakened the law, although one key negative element \u2013 related to whether peace officers may check for immigration status based on \u201creasonable suspicion\u201d that a person is in the country illegally \u2013remains. The Arizona disclosure requirement negatively impacts the competitive process in that any vendor located in Arizona is discouraged from bidding, and may not be selected unless considered a sole source purchase and approved by the City Manager and/or City Council, depending on the amount of the purchase. Even vendors not based in Arizona have taken exception to the sanctions, and have refused to sign the disclosure stating that they are not an Arizona firm, thereby eliminating themselves from the bidding process. Finally, the City is legally precluded from imposing the Arizona sanctions when using Federal funds. This complicates the process even further since not all purchases are subject to the Arizona sanctions.", "Response: Staff recommends the City Council repeal Resolution 10479 related to Arizona sanctions. Other required documents provide necessary transparency and provide other protections for the City and vendors. To mitigate the difficulty with required forms, staff has developed instructions, examples, and detailed descriptions to assist vendors in understanding and completing these documents.", "Key Factor No. 3: Santa Monica\u2019s Needs are Ahead of the Market", "Issue Overview: The City values innovative services and products that are not currently mass-produced. This can result in low-response bids and less competitive prices. When Procurement contacted vendors that did not bid in response to one-bid procurements in the past fiscal year, the vast majority stated the product or service was too specialized for them. In the past year, these have included CNG and electric vehicles, LNG tank refurbishments, single jet water meters, and electrical services on motors for the Water and Wastewater treatment plants.", "While the City\u2019s value for new and innovative products impacts many procurements, it is most frequently tied to the City\u2019s environmental standards. The market for sustainable products has expanded over time, but at times only a limited number of vendors will be able to meet the City\u2019s specifications for environmentally preferable products or services. Procurement of the following items generally include very limited specifications:", "\u00b7 Vehicle purchases: The City\u2019s goal is to have 80% of its fleet vehicles using alternative fuels by 2020 as part of its effort to drive down greenhouse gas emissions and achieve goals set out in the 15 x 15 Climate Action Plan and the Sustainable City Plan. Alternative fuel vehicles operate on fuels other than gasoline or diesel to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and pollution. These vehicles exceed the basic standards all new vehicles must meet to be sold in California. As a result, the majority of the trucks the City purchases cannot be simply purchased off the lot or from a regular dealer. Instead, an unleaded fueled vehicle on the lot must have its engine and fuel components removed and replaced with a CNG system. In some cases, a vehicle may be prebuilt as a CNG vehicle; however, only one brand may offer this option, and then the vehicle must also be California Air Resources Board (CARB) certified for the specific model year. Vehicle purchases, which form a significant part of City purchasing and which can seem simple on the surface, are limited in the context of sustainability requirements.", "Equipment size requirements can also restrict specifications when purchasing a vehicle that will be used in tight spaces, alleys and buildings that were built to older code standards regarding height of openings.", "The total cost of ownership for vehicles also plays a role in the development of specifications. Factors such as standardization and worker safety can have a significant impact on fixed and variable costs over time, as follows:", "o Standardization: The adoption of a single product or group of products to be used by a department or the City as a whole streamlines the training of mechanics, tools used, and parts, and the inventory for the product.", "o Worker Safety: For those employees who continuously use a vehicle, and repeatedly enter and exit the vehicle, attention to ergonomic and safety details on the front end reduces injury to workers and prevents workers\u2019 compensation claims.", "\u00b7 Other examples of purchases subject to restrictive specifications are those controlled by the following sustainability-focused policies:", "o Toxic Use Reduction Policy for City Chemical Purchases", "\u00a7 Janitorial Products Purchasing Criteria", "\u00a7 Integrated Pest Management Program", "o Regulation of Ozone-Depleting Compounds (Section 5.28 of the Municipal Code): Regulates the purchase and recycling of coolants in mobile refrigerant/air conditioning systems and release of halon from fire extinguishers", "o Fleet Maintenance Policy: Guides the purchase of re-refined oil, retread tires, and water-based parts cleaners", "Response: The City is committed to its sustainability principles, and to pursuing innovative products. However, staff has identified several areas where expanding existing practices could address this limitation, and where new procurement practices could open up new solutions.", "\u00b7 Specification Review. As part of the City\u2019s regular purchasing process, procurement staff reviews the specifications or scope of work, and requires additional justification if a specific requirement appears to be unreasonably restrictive or inappropriate for the specified product. Staff will continue encourage purchasers in departments to broaden their scope.", "\u00b7 Subscription Market Research Service. The City seeks out reliable external information to inform all aspects of its procurement process. In July 2015, the City subscribed to International Business Information Services (IBISWORLD), an online membership that provides market research, market prices and forecasts for all commodities and services. IBISWORLD gives the City an advantage during the solicitation, award, and renewal process. During the solicitation process, the City has access to sample scopes of work for various purchases, based on market research. During the evaluation and award phase, the City may access information about supplier performance and price comparisons, in addition to sample contract terms that might be specific to a particular industry. Finally, during the renewal phase, the City benefits from market research to understand whether price escalations are warranted.", "\u00b7 Request for Qualification. The City has effectively used requests for qualifications (RFQs) to establish a short list of vendors for broadly-defined services. The City solicits vendors to provide their qualifications, often relating to a broad array of specialized services such as hazardous materials cleanup services or organizational training, developing short lists that can be referred to as the need arises and increasing the efficiency of the bidding process. In the future, staff anticipates using the RFQ process to solicit qualifications from experts who will assist us in developing solutions. One such instance could be the implementation of a performance-based framework for the City \u2013 a project that is defined broadly but that will benefit from a more open-ended procurement process. An RFQ process would provide the City with a range of options and ideas based on what experts have completed in other areas, and would give the City the information needed to develop a Request for Proposals for the final vendor selection.", "Staff has also used RFQs to take advantage of time-sensitive electricity rates in its direct access purchasing of power. Staff established a pre-qualified list of green power vendors from which pricing can be solicited on an annual basis. The direct access program enables the City to purchase green power directly from smaller vendors rather than through conventional electricity providers such as SCE, enabling the City to buy at less expensive rates. This process could provide a further opportunity, which the Office of Sustainability is researching, to combine electricity purchases with other agencies, creating a consortium that would combine needs and bid for the larger quantity.", "Staff will train department purchasers on the benefits of this type of procurement, and assist them in using this process where appropriate.", "\u00b7 Broad Problem Statements and Partnerships. A broad problem statement is an alternative to highly prescribed requirements that can tend to favor existing approaches and established vendors. A problem statement informs potential vendors of the City\u2019s end goal, and invites them to submit solutions. This shift opens the door for small businesses and entrepreneurs with new ideas, potentially leading to low-cost, innovative solutions that could improve the way the public sector has traditionally bought goods and services. Procurement staff will work with departments to identify procurements where broad problem statements could be appropriate, like the recent partnership with local business groups and businesses for the Hack the Beach Challenge (hackthebeach.com), which challenged firms to provide innovative solutions to any one of the City\u2019s five strategic goals. Staff will also consider opportunities to allow unsolicited proposals from the private sector, as long as other competitors are able to bid on the same project. Staff will support such practices with a simple and clear guide to City procurement, to ensure that entrepreneurs get the same information as established vendors.", "Key Factor No. 4: Lengthy, Complicated Process", "Issue Overview: Policies that promote fairness, transparency and accessibility in procurement can also result in a long and complicated process. On average, a formal procurement can take from three to six months, depending on the complexity of the product or service. Research, analysis, and communication needed in various parts of the process add time. In a typical process, specification development can take one month, formal processes require ten days to advertise at least twice, vendor proposal development takes three to four weeks, and evaluation and reference checks may take two to three weeks. Another factor that adds time to the process is the protest period, which occurs after the initial contractor selection is made and therefore negatively impacts customer service as the vendor is now poised to begin work but must wait. Section 2.24.105 of the Municipal Code sets forth the City\u2019s protest procedures for all competitively bid contracts, with the exception of Public Works contracts, where the protest procedure is included in bid documents but is not yet codified. The protest procedure provides an opportunity for vendors who feel their proposals were not evaluated according to the rules of the City to protest the City\u2019s recommended award before the City enters into a contract. The current process takes up to 34 days: seven days to submit a protest to the Purchasing Services Manager after the City announces a recommended selection on the City\u2019s online vendor portal, ten days for the City to respond, followed by another seven days for the vendor to appeal the City\u2019s decision to the Finance Director, who has another ten days to respond. The lengthy process delays project implementation and resolution of the concern for the vendor.", "Response: Procurement staff will continue its practice of engaging departments in planning for future purchases, and recommends a change to the Municipal Code to streamline the protest procedure.", "\u00b7 Protest Procedure. Staff recommends a change in the Municipal Code that will add a protest procedure to Public Works contracts and will allow vendors to address protests directly to the Finance Director for non-Public Works contracts, and the Public Works Director for Public Works contracts. This change will shorten the protest process and provide faster resolution. The protester would then have the opportunity to appeal to the City Council, which is the same ultimate step as in the current process.", "\u00b7 Create Efficiencies. Staff has begun meeting with departments in the beginning of the fiscal year to strategically lay out a purchasing plan of the department\u2019s needs. Procurement will continue to collaborate with departments by assisting in the development of the bid or proposal. In addition to speeding up the process, this continued facilitation has the ability to increase savings, quality and value while lowering risk and cost. Additional efforts to speed up the process include development of bid and proposal templates and a process for departments to obtain their own quotes for smaller one-time purchases. This process meets the Charter requirement for a centralized system of supervised purchasing. Together, these solutions will improve the administration of the current process and allow the Procurement team to focus on strategic planning and improvements.", "Key Factor No. 5: Managing Decentralized Purchasing", "Issue Overview: While Procurement staff reviews and sets standards for City purchasing, each City Department initiates and manages its own purchases. This can lead to inefficiencies if multiple departments purchase similar products at a smaller volume, as larger value and longer-term contracts generally provide cost savings and price protections, and lessen the workload from repetitive purchases.", "Response: Procurement staff will continue with current practices that address the potential for inefficient purchasing, and will research an online purchasing tool that could provide a new way to manage internal purchases.", "\u00b7 Citywide Contracts. Staff regularly reviews all informal quotes and formal bids to identify repetitive purchases conducted across multiple departments. Staff then combines like goods and services into citywide bids. Over the past year, the City has converted 150 individual bids into 17 citywide bids and saved over $200,000 per year.", "\u00b7 Contract Management. Contract management helps ensure effective management and use of resources. The City conducts quarterly contract management training sessions and has created standardized contract documents easily available to all City staff. Over 75 employees have participated in the training, with another 30 signed up for the fall. A dedicated Contract Coordinator position ensures frequent monitoring and compliance testing to support the City\u2019s partially decentralized system. Finally, the procurement team will present a contract closeout report to Council along with the Year-End Budget report in the fall that will include for each closed contract the initial funding budgeted, the actual funds spent over the term of the contract, and the work completed.", "\u00b7 eProcurement / eMarketplace Site. The City has begun researching an eMarketplace site: a customized \u201cAmazon\u201d site selling goods and services for which the City has bid. If the City implemented such a site, all department staff could access the webpage and order the supplies directly from the supplier, charge the appropriate account and send data to Procurement. This tool would create an automatic approval workflow, improve compliance by using a standard set of catalogs and pricing, and increase transparency as spending data and analytic information could easily be converted to management reports. This method could also tie most purchases to the City\u2019s purchasing card, reducing cost and time for check printing, improving cash management, increasing the amount of the rebates earned on purchasing card transactions. Staff will present the results of research into this option in the next fiscal year.", "Key Factor No. 6: Limited Participation and/or Low Purchasing Power", "Issue Overview: Santa Monica can receive a low number of bids because vendors are not aware of opportunities or are intimidated by the procurement process. And, Santa Monica as a smaller city may receive higher prices than would be available for larger entities with larger volume needs.", "Response: Staff will continue with best practices for proactive vendor outreach to break down barriers to the bidding process, and will increase use of piggybacking and cooperative purchasing options to effectively augment the City\u2019s purchasing power and take advantage of lower prices.", "\u00b7 Vendor Outreach.", "PlanetBids. While many agencies throughout the country are still contemplating converting to an electronic bidding system, the City has been using PlanetBids, its online vendor portal, for nine years. PlanetBids reaches a large number of participants and has the capability to support innovative procurement practices. Through PlanetBids, the City advertises its formal and informal opportunities, notifies vendors of any upcoming solicitations, and notifies proposers of proposal selection. Vendors registered with the system receive automatic email notifications when opportunities in their selected commodities and services are available. In this way, the City is able to reach a large number of vendors quickly, and track the number of vendors viewing and downloading bids. Santa Monica currently reaches 15,393 vendors, 794 of which are local. The City also has the ability to send bid notifications to an additional 250 vendors registered with neighboring cities that also use PlanetBids.", "Local Vendor Outreach. The City holds annual outreach events for Santa Monica vendors, with the Chamber of Commerce\u2019s support. At these events, staff explains the City purchasing process and the Sustainable Purchasing and Buy Local resources, and also helps vendors register on PlanetBids or sign up as a Buy Local vendor and have their business featured on the City\u2019s website. Over 50 people attended the most recent event on October 21, 2015. Staff is working on additional opportunities to reach the business community in partnership with the County, the various Chapters of the Chamber of Commerce and the City\u2019s Business Improvement Districts.", "\u00b7 Piggybacking and Cooperative Bidding. Municipal Code Section 2.24.080(b) establishes exceptions to the competitive bid procedure in limited cases, including when competitive bid procedures have already been formulated by other government agencies. Piggybacking is a form of intergovernmental purchasing in which an agency extends the pricing and terms of its contract to another agency. Generally, a larger agency will extend its pricing to smaller agencies, which would otherwise be unable to achieve the economies of scale achieved by the larger agency with its larger purchase.  Using this method, the City recently purchased 22 Police Interceptor patrol vehicles using the State bid, resulting in fleet pricing and payment discount, an estimated $11,000 or 1.5% cost savings. Staff will look to expand use of this method, especially through other progressive cities or government agencies with similar sustainability goals.", "Cooperative bidding, the other exception to competitive bidding, occurs when two or more agencies combine their requirements to obtain advantages of volume purchases that usually result in lower pricing. The City can arrange the process so that various public agencies purchase from the same supplier using a single bid. The City currently participates in a cooperative office supplies contract with Staples, which provides discounts for any agency that buys from this government contract. The City will emphasize not only using these alternative processes, but also initiating the contracts that facilitate collaborative purchasing, where capacity exists, thereby helping to expand the market for innovative, sustainable goods and services.", "\u00b7 Subscription Market Research Service. Staff now has access to IBISWORLD, an online membership that provides market research, market prices and forecasts for all commodities and services. During the solicitation process, the City has access to sample scopes of work for various purchases, based on market research. During the evaluation and award phase, the City may access information about supplier performance and price comparisons, in addition to sample contract terms that might be specific to a particular industry.", "\u00b7 Reverse Auction. Reverse auctions are a process whereby cities determine a base price for a commodity and ask vendors to bid against each other, on an electronic bidding system, allowing the city to purchase the commodity at the lowest price. Since these procurements are based solely on price, however, they could affect the quality of the product being bid on and received. The initial step of prequalifying the vendors and having the terms and specifications clearly defined therefore becomes very important, as to leave no room for ambiguity. Reverse auctions are most effective when used to purchase large amounts of basic commodities, such as fuel, water treatment chemicals, supplies such as safety gloves, office paper, traffic signal LEDs, and engineered parts and equipment that many distributors or suppliers can provide. Goods and services that can be provided by only a few sellers cannot be acquired by reverse auction. The City\u2019s current online vendor portal, PlanetBids, has the capability for an electronic bidding system and has the ability to accommodate reverse auctions. Procurement staff will work with departments to identify procurements where a reverse auction process could yield savings.", "Inclusiveness / Preference", "At its July 14, 2015 meeting (Attachment C), Council expressed an interest in various preferences that might broaden and encourage vendor participation. California law and current experience with preferences in procurements involving federal funds indicate that additional preference practices could involve significant tradeoffs.", "Per SMMC Chapter 2.24, City businesses receive a one and one half percent (1.5%) price preference (equal to the portion of the sales and use tax rate that returns to the City) when determining the rank order of the bids in the selection process. If after the 1.5% preference is applied, a City business has submitted a bid that is equal to or is lower than all other bids, the Purchasing Agent shall award the contract to the City business so long as it is otherwise the best bidder. During the past four years, only one of the bids eligible for local preference consideration has been selected.", "The City Charter (Article IV, section 608), states that, \u201cto the extent permitted by law, the City Council shall adopt procedures that encourage the award of City contracts to disadvantaged or minority persons\u201d. Thus, the City has an existing framework to support additional preference policies. However, State law limits the City\u2019s options. In 1996, Proposition 209 amended the California Constitution to prohibit public institutions from discriminating on the basis of race, sex or ethnicity, including in the area of public contracting. This prohibition includes policies intended to assist minority or women-owned businesses by providing advantageous bidding conditions, except where such a prohibition would make an agency ineligible for a federal program or funding. What State law still allows, and what is required for some Federally-funded programs, is the Disadvantaged Business Enterprise (DBE) program. To qualify as a DBE, the business must be owned and controlled by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged persons. Generally the certification process is done at a local or regional level; Metro and Cal-Trans, the closest certifying agency is in downtown Los Angeles. The City currently takes part in the DBE program for transit and construction projects. Federal law mandates a number of stringent requirements with respect to DBEs. These requirements include setting DBE use goals; design and implementation of a DBE program; and outreach, monitoring and reporting. The department receiving the funds must abide by these requirements, which are under the jurisdiction of the US Federal program issuing the funds.", "To implement a DBE preference for all its competitive processes, the City would need to meet the requirements listed above and create a program to monitor and report on the process. Adopting such a program for all City procurements would be prohibitive in terms of additional staff needs and other resources, and would further limit participation in City bids or lengthen the amount of time necessary to bid on and complete projects, or both. At the same time, a large number of vendors on PlanetBids with access to City solicitations have DBE status (Attachment D). Given the tradeoffs involved, that the City participates in preference programs through $10 to $20 million annually in federally funded programs, and that our vendor portal shows that the City is already reaching a large number of disadvantaged businesses, staff recommends no changes at this time.", "Alternatives", "Council could choose to maintain the Arizona exclusion policy and protest procedure as is, and could direct staff away from pursuing any of the proposed innovative practices in the report: broad problem statements, reverse auctions, and eProcurement. Finally, Council could direct staff to implement a DBE preference program in Santa Monica. Should Council choose any of these options, staff would work within these parameters and with existing methods to address the problem of limited participation in City bids.", "Summary of Recommended Changes", "Staff is recommending that the Council consider the following:", "\u00b7 Repeal Resolution 10479 restricting business with Arizona-based vendors;", "\u00b7 Change Section 2.24.105 of the SMMC to streamline the protest process;", "\u00b7 Give staff direction to pilot or implement new methods of procurement", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact associated with the staff recommendation."]}], [{"Title": "Consideration of a proposal by Santa Monica College for a potential November 2016 bond measure that would include funding for joint projects between the College and the City of Santa Monica", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council consider supporting Santa Monica College's proposal for a potential bond measure on the November 2016 ballot that would include partial funding for the expansion of Memorial Park, adopt a motion in support of the bond, and direct staff to work in partnership with College representatives to define terms of the bond and associated future legal agreements between the City and the College.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica College (SMC) Board of Trustees is considering adding a bond measure to the November 2016 ballot and if successful, would authorize a series of bond issuances for various improvements to SMC\u2019s main and satellite campuses. SMC has proposed to include partial funding for joint projects with partner agencies including the City of Santa Monica, the City of Malibu, and the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD). City and SMC staff have identified the expansion of Memorial Park to include the adjacent 2.9 acre former Fisher Lumber site as a potential project to be included in the proposed bond.", "The Memorial Park Expansion project would provide fields to accommodate the SMC women\u2019s softball and soccer programs at a location in close proximity to both the main SMC campus and the 17th Street Expo station. Currently the College\u2019s women\u2019s sports teams utilize the fields at John Adams Middle School (JAMS) and relocating the teams to the expanded park would free up these fields for other community programming.", "Background", "In December 2015, a consultant hired by Santa Monica College (SMC) conducted voter research to determine the probability of a successful bond measure on the November 2016 ballot. Approximately 69% of the Santa Monica and Malibu voters polled indicated they would support the proposed measure. On May 3, 2016 the Santa Monica College (SMC) Board of Trustees considered a proposal for a bond measure that would support capital improvement projects and continue implementation of the College\u2019s 2010 Career and Educational Facilities Master Plan (Attachment A). An initial list of potential projects that could be funded by the bond was presented to the Trustees and included various improvements to SMC\u2019s main and satellite campuses as well as possible joint projects between the College and SMMUSD, the City of Malibu, and the City of Santa Monica. The Board of Trustees is expected to take action on the bond proposal at its July 2016 meeting and College administration has committed to working with potential partner agencies, including the City of Santa Monica, to further define potential joint use projects in advance of that meeting.", "Discussion", "Project Selection", "City and SMC staff have considered several potential cultural and recreational facility projects that could be supported by the proposed bond and recommend that the expansion of Memorial Park be identified as the joint project of the College and the City of Santa Monica. In 2004, the City acquired the 2.9 acre former Fisher Lumber site adjacent to Memorial Park with the intent of developing the land as an extension of the park. Since that time residents and the Recreation and Parks Commission have strongly advocated for this site to be developed as park space. In both the Open Space Element and the Parks and Recreation Master Plan Memorial Park\u2019s importance is highlighted given its central location within Santa Monica.", "Furthermore, the community has voiced their strong support for this project at several outreach events, including those conducted in 2013 and 2014 for the Memorial Park Neighborhood Plan and most recently at the January and February 2016 Recreation and Parks Commission meetings related to setting Santa Monica priorities for the Los Angeles Countywide Needs Assessment (Attachments B and C). Memorial Park Expansion was included on the final list of the City\u2019s priority park projects adopted by Council on March 22, 2016 (Attachment D) and submitted for the Countywide Needs Assessment final report (Attachment E).", "The Memorial Park Expansion project would add close to 3 acres to the existing 10.5 acre park, and would provide fields to accommodate the SMC women\u2019s softball and soccer programs at a location in close proximity to both the main SMC campus and the 17th Street Expo station. This would allow other community uses of the JAMS fields where the College\u2019s women\u2019s sports teams currently play.", "The City\u2019s adopted FY 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) includes funding in the amount of $1.35 million in FY 2017-18 for design and development of a master plan for Memorial Park including both the existing park and the new acreage. Funding for construction would need to come from alternate funding sources.", "The proposed bond would be sold in a series of issuances. SMC and the City will work together to determine timing and availability of funds.", "Alternatives", "Council could choose to recommend that the expansion of Memorial Park as a potential joint project to be supported by Santa Monica College\u2019s proposed bond not be included in the bond measure and could suggest a different project.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Potential Revenue and Advisory Measures for November 2016 Ballot", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": "Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on potential revenue and advisory measures for the November 2016 ballot related to increased local funds, affordable housing, and other community priorities, and direct staff to prepare ballot measure language based on the Council\u2019s direction.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Advancing the Council's strategic goal related to maintaining an inclusive and diverse community will rely on a robust and well-funded affordable housing program. Becausefunding for the City\u2019s affordable housing programs was obliterated by the state\u2019s elimination of the local redevelopment agency, Council and the Housing Commission have identified potential new funding sources for affordable housing. Thisreport presents recent polling of Santa Monica voters and frames policy questions for Council consideration related to: which revenue measure will resonate with voters, how a companion ballot measure related to affordable housing might be crafted, and whether a partnership in support of local public schools or other local needs should be considered for the November 2016 ballot.", "Background", "Santa Monica has a long history of supporting social equity, housing affordability, and community inclusivity. Santa Monica voters have expressed their support for housing affordability through a series of voter-approved initiatives, starting in 1979 with the adoption of rent control and continuing through 2010 with the adoption of Citywide eviction protections. However, local measures to support affordability and inclusivity in Santa Monica have been undermined by state actions, including legislation allowing for vacancy decontrol of rent-controlled apartments and removal of rent-controlled apartments, as well as the 2012 elimination of the Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency, the City\u2019s primary funding source for the production and preservation of low\u2011income housing. Over the past five years, approximately 200 to 400 long-term, rent-controlled apartments have gone to market rents each year. Without a stable source of financing for affordable housing, there has been a significant diminution in the tools available to the City to combat the loss of housing that is affordable to low\u2011andmoderate-income households.", "In November 2014, Santa Monica voters considered a ballot measure to increase the local documentary transfer tax, as well as an advisory measure to direct all funds toward affordable housing if the transfer tax increase was approved. A majority of voters supported directing funds toward affordable housing, though the transfer tax increase failed to receive majority support. As a result, the City is left without a significant, stable source of funding for affordable housing, thereby impacting the City\u2019s ability to maintain inclusivity and diversity. At its August 23, 2015 retreat, the City Council reaffirmed its support for affordable housing by identifying \u201cmaintaining an inclusive and diverse community\u201d as one of its top strategic goals.", "On August 25, 2015 (Attachment A), Council held a study session regarding the current state of housing affordability in Santa Monica, as well as various approaches to creating a local funding source for affordable housing. During 2015, the Housing Commission focused its efforts on receiving broad input regarding the community\u2019s support for affordable housing and possible funding mechanisms to support affordable housing programs.  The Commission hosted a series of meetings, including presentations from local experts, to understand the historical efforts and achievements of Santa Monica\u2019s affordable housing policy and programs, as well as the current dilemma regarding the need for affordable housing and lack of funding sources. The Commission also created several opportunities for the community-at-large to provide input regarding the type and scope of affordable housing in Santa Monica, including a special weekend meeting. The Housing Commission\u2019s efforts culminated in a report to Council, provided as Attachment B.", "The Housing Commission report contains a series of recommendations, including establishing an annual budget of $15 million per year to support affordable housing. The report recommends two strategies to achieve the desired budget. The first strategy is to re-prioritize existing General Funds in order to create approximately half of the desired funding. The Council\u2019s action on June 14, 2016, which directed loan repayments associated with the former redevelopment agency toward affordable housing, addresses the first strategy for the next several years. The second strategy is to raise additional General Fund revenues that the Council could allocate toward affordablehousing. The Commission identified three potential revenues sources to address the second strategy: an increase in the documentary transfer tax, a construction tax, and an increase in the transaction and use tax. A transaction and use tax is similar to a sales tax, with proposals for \u00bc-cent and \u00bd-cent increases.", "On January 12, 2016 (Attachment C), Council considered potential local funding sources for affordable housing, using the report from the Housing Commission as the basis of its discussion. At that meeting, Council authorized Goodwin Simon Strategic Research (GSSR) to conduct a voter survey regarding potential strategies. The results of the polling were transmitted to the City Council on May 12, 2016 (Attachment D). OnMay 24, 2016, Council authorized GSSR to conduct additional polling regarding potential ballot measures that encompass deeper support for affordable housing, as well as measures that address needs related to parks and open space.", "Discussion", "Between March 23 and 28, 2016, GSSR conducted a telephone survey of 602 Santa Monica residents likely to vote in the November 2016 election. A summary of the poll is provided as Attachment D. GSSR conducted an additional telephone survey in June2016. The results of the second survey will be presented at the January 28, 2016 Council meeting. Inconsidering potential measures for the November 2016 ballot, staff recommends that the City focus on three primary questions:", "1. Which revenue measure is most likely to resonate with voters?", "2. Should an advisory measure accompany the revenue measure? If so, what should be included related to affordable housing?", "3. Should the advisory measure encompass the needs of local public schools? If not, should the advisory measure encompass other local needs, such as parks and open space?", "Each of the questions is discussed briefly below.", "Revenue Measures", "Pursuant to the Housing Commission\u2019s recommendations, the potential ballot measures are conceived as a revenue measure and an advisory measure that allow voters to express their wishes regarding how the increased funds are spent. If the revenue measure is not approved by voters, the advisory measure loses the ability to make a direct impact on City policy and programs. As a result, selecting an appropriate revenue measure is paramount.", "The GSSR poll, considered in tandem with a poll completed by Fairbank, Maslin, Maullin, Metz & Associates (FM3) in 2014 (Attachment E), provides voter reflections on the three primary revenue sources recommended by the Commission in its December2015 report (Attachment B). The two polls show that there are similar levels of support for increases in the documentary transfer tax and transaction and use tax, as well as imposition of a construction tax, with more than a majority of likely voters favoring each tax increase. However, the City\u2019s experience with Measures H/HH on the November 2014 ballot shows that even with majority support in a poll, organized and well-funded opposition can impact the success of a revenue measure. As previously discussed by the Council and Commission, the three measures would raise similar funds on average, though the documentary transfer tax and the construction tax are extremely volatile and receipts in any year could vary dramatically. Each potential revenue measure is discussed below.", "Documentary Transfer Tax: A documentary transfer tax (DTT) is collected whenever real property is sold within Santa Monica. The current rate is $3 per $1000 of salesvalue. The proposed increase considered by voters in 2014 would have raised the rate to $9 per $1000 of sales value for sales over $1 million. The DTT is a volatile revenue source as the amount the City receives in any year can be significantly impacted by the general volume of real estate sales activity as well as by large sales of commercial properties that may or may not occur in any year. Evaluating over a five\u2011year historical period, an increased DTT would have raised between $4 million and $10 million per year. During the November 2014 election, the California Association of Realtors implemented a well-funded, well-organized campaign against the DTT increase. If an increase were placed on the November 2016 ballot, a similar opposition campaign would be expected.", "Commercial Construction Tax: A commercial construction tax (CCT) would accompany any building permit for commercial construction, whether new construction, rehabilitation of existing buildings, or tenant improvements. The proposed CCT would levy a tax of five percent of building permit valuation. Like the DTT, the CCT would be a volatile revenue source for the City as the value of commercial construction that receives building permits can vary significantly from year to year. Evaluating over a five-year historical period, the CCT would have raised between $3.6 million and $12million per year, with an average of $6.8 million. Given that commercial property owners, particularly those with many tenant spaces that receive regular investments in tenant improvements, would be primarily impacted by the CCT, a well-funded opposition campaign would be expected.", "Transaction and Use Tax: A transaction and use tax (TUT) functions like a sales tax, as it is imposed upon the sale of goods. The Council and Housing Commission have contemplated \u00bc-cent and \u00bd-cent TUTs. Currently, a 9.5 percent levy is imposed on taxable sales in Santa Monica. The potential TUTs would raise the total levy to 9.75percent or 10 percent, respectively. As of April 2016, eight California cities have sales levies totaling 10 percent, including four in Alameda County, one in Contra Costa County and three in Los Angeles County (La Mirada, Pico Rivera, and South Gate.) Another 23 cities have sales levies that total 9.5 percent, including Santa Monica, Culver City, and Inglewood. The cities of Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, and WestHollywood have total levies of 9 percent. If Santa Monica were to adopt a \u00bd-cent TUT, the local levy would be on par with the eight top cities. A total levy of 10 percent is the maximum allowed under state law. If the County of Los Angeles adopts a \u00bd-cent sales tax for transportation in November 2016, the increase would be authorized pursuant to special state legislation that allows the County to increase the allowed total levy.", "TUTs have been embraced by communities throughout California and typically do not stimulate organized and well-funded opposition. Many community members have expressed views that the TUT is a \u201cuniversal\u201d tax because everyone pays it, including residents, visitors, and businesses. One area of concern is that voter support for the TUT is just above the 50percent threshold required for voter approval. However, GSSR has indicated that voter polling completed in spring 2010 showed Santa Monica voter support for a TUT was similar. When Measure Y was placed on the ballot, it passed with support from over 60 percent of Santa Monica voters. Based on the recent polling, GSSR has recommended that the City pursue a \u00bd-cent TUT with a companion measure that includes housing and other local needs, such as support for the publicschools.", "A frequent concern with a TUT or a sales tax is that they are typically regressive in nature, hitting low-income households harder than other households. However, in California, where food, medicine, housing, and services are exempt, the regressive impacts are muted. Basedon observed spending patterns (that include taxable and non-taxable goods) of California residents, the average person would pay an additional 12 cents for every $100 of spending if a \u00bd-cent TUT were enacted. Research completed at the Los Angeles County level shows that a significant portion of sales levy revenue comes from visitors and businesses, rather than residents. With Santa Monica\u2019s high concentration of visitors and businesses, it is likely that an even higher share of revenue would come from non-residents.", "Advisory Measure Related to Affordable Housing", "A potential advisory measure, which could allow voters to express their wishes that increased revenues be directed toward affordable housing, should be carefully crafted. The advisory measure should address not only pressing local issues related to housing affordability; it should also address issues that are important to the local electorate. Ideally, the advisory measure should be broad enough that voters understand how it will serve people in need, yet not so broad as to commit to programs that may not be successful over time. The following are housing-related uses of funds that could be included in the companion measure. Staff seeks Council direction on any housing\u2011related uses of funds that should not be included in potential ballot language.", "1. Acquisition and rehabilitation of existing apartments to protect current tenants and provide long-term affordable housing. Some community members have suggested that the measure be limited to preservation of existing housing in order to provide the double benefit of providing safeguards for existing tenants while creating deed\u2011restricted affordable housing that could serve low- and moderate-income households for many generations. Another advantage of limiting the funds to preservation is that it alleviates fears that the increased revenues would be used to support development.", "2. Providing affordable housing for emergency workers (nurses, paramedics, etc.) and public school educators who serve in Santa Monica. The poll shows voter support for housing targeted to workers that provide key community services. Providing affordable housing for local workers, particularly workers who provide key public services, achieves a variety of public policy goals related to transportation, community engagement, and emergency resilience. While policies that provide preferences for local employees can be constructed, fair housing laws make it difficult to restrict housing to employees only. As a result, identifying housing for emergency workers in the advisory measure could create a potential mismatch between public expectations and the City\u2019s ability to deliver.", "3. Providing affordable housing for Santa Monicans that are currently unhoused. Addressing homelessness has been at the forefront of Santa Monica\u2019s policies and programs for many years. The issue has recently risen to the top of the agenda for the County and City of Los Angeles.  Los Angeles leaders are considering a variety of strategies, including increasing funding for permanent supportive housing. Identifying permanent supportive housing in the companion measure could demonstrate Santa Monica\u2019s continuing commitment.", "4. Rental assistance to help rent-burdened Santa Monica households stay housed. Recent census data shows that many Santa Monicans are rent-burdened. Rentalassistance could help such households stay in the community and have sufficient remaining funds to address other key needs such as food, medicine, andeducation. Pursuant to Council direction, a pilot program will be conducted in the coming fiscal year. The companion measure could provide permanent funding for rental assistance programs.", "5. Financing assistance to help moderate-income Santa Monica residents purchase housing in the City. The poll shows voter support for homeownership assistance.  Such assistance would likely target residents whose incomes are higher than those typically served by affordable housing. The scope and reach of such assistance would likely be limited, given the price of ownership housing in Santa Monica. Financial assistance would also create some risks for the City if foreclosures by primary lenders were to occur.", "6. Building new affordable housing. Newly constructed affordable housing provides an opportunity to address the needs of certain households that may not be well-served by existing housing. Two examples of housing typologies that tend to be better served by new construction include large-family housing with multiple bedrooms and on-site homework centers, as well as permanent supportive housing with on-site social services. However, the poll showed lower support for new affordable housing construction compared with preservation of existing housing. Given community concerns regarding new development, Council could choose to limit the use of the new revenues.", "Advisory Measure to Support Public Schools", "The first poll tested the idea of a \u00bd-cent increase in the sales tax, with an advisory measure that would allocate half of the increased revenues toward affordable housing and the other half toward public schools\u2019 needs. Directing funding toward public schools achieved the highest levels of support within the poll. Slightly lower voter support for a \u00bd-cent sales tax increase (compared to a \u00bc-cent increase) is countered by voter desire to increase funding for Santa Monica\u2019s public schools. Preliminary discussions with school district staff has indicated support for the notion of a joint measure, though the school community is evaluating whether sufficient volunteer support currently exists to support the prospective measure.", "Advisory Measure for Support Parks and Open Space", "In addition to testing a \u00bd-cent TUT with an advisory measure allocating all funds toward affordable housing, the second GSSR poll tested the idea of a \u00bd-cent TUT with an advisory measure allocating half of the increased revenues toward affordable housing and the other half toward parks and open space. The results of the GSSR poll will be presented at the January 28, 2016 Council meeting.", "Relationship to Strategic Goal", "The Council\u2019s strategic goal of maintaining an inclusive and diverse community is closely aligned with the City\u2019s initiatives related to providing affordable housing. Duringthe past several months, staff has begun to consider potential goals and metrics related to inclusion and diversity. Staff presented preliminary ideas to the Housing Commission on April 21, 2016 (Attachment F). The concepts include goals and metrics related to the percentage of Santa Monica residents of low or moderate incomes, the average annual increase in the number of deed-restricted affordable residences, and the percentage of Santa Monica\u2019s residents in poverty and without housing assistance and other supportive services. Achieving goals related to inclusion and diversity relies on a robust and well-funded affordable housing program.", "Commission Action", "On May 19, 2016, the Housing Commission considered the results of the initial GSSR poll and recommended that the Council support the \u00bd-cent sales tax, with a companion measure that would allow voters to express their support for sharing the new revenues with local public schools. With respect to the housing-related services to be identified in a companion measure, the Commission recommended that the Council include all identified uses in order to engender broad support to address a variety of community needs related to affordable housing.", "Next Steps", "Based on Council direction, staff would return on July 12, 2016 with recommended language for the November 2016 ballot.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Potential Amendments to City Charter Article XXII (the Oaks Initiative) for November 2016 Election", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and approve the proposed language amending Article XXII of the City Charter (the Oaks Initiative).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its most recent meeting on June 14, 2016, Council conducted a study session on possible proposed amendments to Article XXII of the City Charter, commonly known as the Oaks Initiative. Council provided guidance on specific potential amendments, which would, among other things, strengthen the measure by clarifying its requirements, protect constitutional rights and facilitate enforcement; and Council directed staff to return with proposed language that would implement its guidance. This report fulfills that direction.", "The proposed amendments supported by Council and recommended by staff appear on Attachment A. If approved by the voters, they would: expand the scope of the Oaks Initiative\u2019s prohibition to include those receiving public benefits; clarify the initiative\u2019s application by defining the term \u201cpublic official\u201d; exempt persons providing uncompensated, volunteer services to some nonprofits; state that the initiative\u2019s prohibition applies outside the City limits; specify enforcement procedures; and clarify that remedies are cumulative. At least for now, staff continues to recommend against modifying the Oaks Initiative to reach back in time for the reasons discussed at the last Council meeting.", "In addition to placing the amendments shown in Attachment A on the November ballot, staff also supports making modifications to the guidelines, as discussed at the last Council meeting. However, staff recommends making those at an upcoming meeting or meetings so that any additional concerns discussed during consideration of the amendments to the measure and changes approved by the voters may also be addressed.", "Background", "The staff report of June 14th includes background information on the Oaks Initiative and the currently proposed amendments. Because it was before Council at its most recent meeting, that information is not repeated here.", "At the June 14th study session, Council supported or did not question proposed amendments that would: expand the scope of the measure so that its prohibition applies to recipients of public benefits; define the term \u201cpublic official\u201d to include the City Manager, Department Heads and their designees who award benefits; exempt uncompensated volunteers who serve nonprofits that receive City funding, clarify that the remedies specified in the Oaks Initiative are not exclusive and that the prohibition applies outside the City\u2019s geographic boundaries; and specify procedures for enforcement.", "Additionally, Council discussed whether \u201cno\u201d votes that have financial value should be included within the prohibition (along with \u201cyes\u201d votes), but Council members expressed various concerns about proposing that change. Among others, those concerns included making the Oaks prohibition applicable to a \u201cno\u201d vote that does not change the status quo and the difficulties of valuing the \u201cno\u201d vote.", "Council also discussed whether the Oaks Initiative should be modified and expanded to \u201creach back\u201d to prohibit bestowing a personal advantage in anticipation of later receiving a public benefit. Most Council members who spoke to this issue and the City Manager, expressed concern about how this change would be administered and enforced. However, because the discussion occurred in the context of a study session, Council did not vote on the issue.", "Discussion", "The amendments supported by Council and shown on Attachment A are all recommended by staff. They would:", "\u00b7 Clarify the applicability of the Oaks prohibition by defining \u201cpublic officials\u201d to include City Council members, Planning Commission members, the City Manager, Department Heads and their designees who confer \u201cpublic benefits\";", "\u00b7 Expand the scope of the prohibition to include not just \u201cpublic officials\u201d but also those who confer private advantages in return for receiving public benefits, e.g., City contractors and campaign donors;", "\u00b7 Exempt from the prohibition are persons providing volunteer, uncompensated service as directors, trustees, partners or officers of nonprofit corporations that receive City funding; however, this exemption would not apply to trustees, directors, partners or officers of organizations that control or actually are political committees as defined by state and federal law and organizations that control or own other organizations;", "\u00b7 Clarify enforcement procedures by expressly obligating the City Attorney to refer Oaks complaints to the Chief Deputy of the Criminal Division or an independent investigator;", "\u00b7 Expressly state that the remedies established by the measure are cumulative rather than exclusive;", "\u00b7 Establish that the Oaks prohibition applies outside the boundaries of the City so that the Oaks prohibition may not be avoided by simply accepting the personal advantage in another city.", "Staff continues to recommend against expanding the Oaks Initiative\u2019s prohibition so that it would reach back in time for the reasons given at Council\u2019s last meeting. They include, among others, uncertainty as to which applications for \u201cpublic benefits\u201d would ultimately be approved, uncertainty as to exactly what procedural pathway a particular application would take, and the fact that residents would have to choose between applying for approvals and exercising their constitutional right to participate in the political process through campaign contributions. Moreover, as was noted at the last meeting, additional amendments to the Oaks Initiative may be proposed in the future, if experience shows they are warranted; and, in any event, future clarifications can and will be accomplished through modifications to the guidelines. Nonetheless, if Council decides to propose amendments that would make it \u201creach back\u201d, Council could use the language suggested by Hueston Hennigan. (It appears in Attachment B.) However, staff notes that other changes to the Oaks Initiative would likely also be necessary to ensure that the expansion of the prohibition in one section does not create inconsistencies with others.", "Next Steps", "Once language is approved, staff will bring a resolution to Council that includes the actual ballot language. Additionally, staff will return to Council with proposed changes to the guidelines that are consistent with Council\u2019s and the voters\u2019 decisions about proposed amendments.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Approving this language for the proposed amendments will cause no financial impact. Placing the proposal on the ballot will increase the City\u2019s election costs by an insignificant amount."]}], [{"Title": "Annual Appointments to Boards and Commissions", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items", "Body": ["Board/Commission", "No. of Appts.", "Airport Commission", "1", "Architectural Review Board", "2", "Arts Commission", "4", "Building and Fire-Life Safety Commission", "(1 California licensed or registered architect, 2 California licensed or registered civil engineer, and 1 California licensed building contractor)", "4", "Commission for the Senior Community", "2", "Commission on the Status of Women", "2", "Disabilities Commission", "(One position must be filled by a person with a self-identified disability)", "3", "Downtown Santa Monica, Inc.", "(Must be City residents or persons who are employed, own property or hold business licenses in the City of Santa Monica)", "3", "Housing Commission", "1", "Landmarks Commission", "(1 Real Estate Licensee and 1 Registered Architect)", "2", "Library Board", "1", "Personnel Board (term ends on June 30, 2021)", "1", "Planning Commission", "2", "Recreation and Parks Commission", "3", "Social Services Commission", "2"]}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmembers O\u2019Day, Davis and Mayor Pro Tem Winterer that the Council establish a Big Blue Bus Zero Carbon 2030 Fleet Plan, direct staff to provide an analysis outlining the steps that the City would undertake to plan, implement, and track progress toward zero carbon emissions for Big Blue Bus operations, and authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Professional Services Agreement with a qualified consultant to assist BBB staff in conducting the analysis.  The analysis will include the opportunities and challenges of operating electric vehicles in an urban transportation environment, electric vehicle range, vehicle cost, Big Blue Bus facility infrastructure cost, industry best practice, sources of electricity and carbon offsets, and evaluating potential funding opportunities to fund the project, including the use of the proceeds from the sale of the 4th/Colorado terminus site to Metro, for achieving this goal by 2030.    Staff will report back to Council in a study session within 6-9 months.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez and Councilmember Himmelrich that staff return with proposals for a ballot measure that could provide a \"voter-approval as a requirement before large-scale development\" charter amendment that would protect and be acceptable to the broadest base of our residents.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1529022600": [[{"Title": "City Manager's Report:  Public Safety Dispatch", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Award Bid for Purchase of Big Belly/Smart Belly Dual Compactor Stations", "Department": "Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4245 to Waxie Sanitary Supply, a California-based company, for the purchase of Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Waxie Sanitary Supply for the purchase of Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations in an amount not to exceed $145,000 for one year, with four-additional one-year renewal options, with an up to two percent annual increase on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $754,586 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Across Santa Monica, there are over 400 refuse containers in the pedestrian right-of-way to handle high foot traffic areas near business districts and bus stops. The majority of the existing open top refuse containers are gradually being replaced by solar powered Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations to increase efficiency and recycling. In March 2016, the City solicited bids for the continuous purchase of Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations. After reviewing the only bid received, staff recommends Waxie Sanitary Supply to provide the dual compactor stations for a total not to exceed amount of $754,586 over a five-year period.", "Background", "Prior to 2002 there were various sizes and styles of litter containers throughout the City. Most of them were more than 10 years old and in poor condition. As part of the Transit Mall project, a design was developed for a more durable litter container that could be used in the Transit Mall and throughout the City. These are the concrete open top single-stream trash containers currently in use today.", "In FY2012-13, staff implemented a pilot program that replaced 13 concrete containers on Main Street with the new Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations.  These fully enclosed dual compactor stations were being considered as an alternative to the open top container as a means to eliminate trash overflow, control pests and reduce litter.  Staff was also looking for a system that would increase operational efficiencies.  The Big Belly dual compactor station was the only system on the market that provided point of disposal compaction, which allowed for five times more trash to be collected.", "After completion of the pilot program, staff evaluated the service levels at these locations and found that the collection frequencies had dropped significantly. Collection service dropped from daily service to three times a week, complaints concerning overflowing litter from the businesses along Main Street decreased, and a recycling component was added enhancing the City\u2019s diversion goals.  As a result, staff recommended that the program be expanded to other business districts and high frequency bus stops.", "On December 17, 2013 Council awarded Bid #4103 to Waxie Sanitary Supply, for the purchase of the Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations to begin the replacement of the existing concrete containers (Attachment B). The purchase order was amended twice during the three-year period; on May 27, 2014 to purchase seven dual compactor stations for Big Blue Bus (Attachment D) and on April 12, 2016 to purchase seven grant-funded dual compactor stations (Attachment E).", "To date, 69 of these new dual compactor stations have been installed throughout the City including Main Street, Montana Avenue, Santa Monica Pier, Ocean Avenue and various other locations city-wide (Attachment C).", "Discussion", "There are over 400 refuse containers in the pedestrian right-of-way to handle high foot traffic areas near business districts and bus stops. The majority of the open top refuse containers are gradually being replaced by the new solar powered dual compactor stations.  It is estimated that the city would purchase 20 containers per year for a total of 100 over the five year term. At the end of this five-year term the replacement project will be 70% complete. The first year replacements would be along Santa Monica Blvd., Business District.", "The overall objectives for transitioning to the fully enclosed dual compactor stations was to increase service levels while reducing staff time to collect trash, reduce carbon emissions by reducing the number of trips per week, reduce the number of containers on the streets, reduce overflow and wind-blown trash, and increase recycling.  As of 2015, 34 percent of the waste has been diverted from the landfills.", "Each Big Belly station includes a CLEAN management dashboard, a proprietary software program developed by Big Belly Solar, which captures real-time data on bin capacity, operational status and waste diversion. This provides staff with the management tools needed for efficient route scheduling and collection.  By employing this program, service frequencies at the Big Belly dual compactor stations have decreased from daily collection to 3 times per week, which means less servicing by the crews. In turn, this frees up staff to perform other needed tasks.", "The Big Belly Solar system is the only product of its type in the North American market. There is however a similar product currently emerging out of Asian and European markets. The product has yet to be introduced in North America. No data is available to compare the effectiveness of the new product to the Big Belly product as this time.", "Vendor Selection", "In March 2016, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 24 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016, per Attachment A. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; one vendor responded. The vendor indicated that they were not an authorized distributor of the Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactor stations.", "Staff contacted Big Belly Solar, Inc. the manufacturer of the Big Belly solar powered dual compactor stations, who confirmed that these systems can only be procured directly from an authorized distributor. The only distributor authorized to provide Big Belly products, services and technology to the City of Santa Monica is Waxie Sanitary Supply. Since these dual compactor stations can only be purchased from this vendor, staff evaluated the vendor on its pricing and responsiveness, Prices have only increased by 3% since 2013 and they have been highly responsive to the City\u2019s needs. Based on these criteria, Waxie Sanitary Supply is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Waxie Sanitary Supply is for an amount not to exceed $754,586. Funds of $145,000 are included in the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan in the Public Works Department. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "C270227.589000", "Refuse Container Purchases", "$108,500", "27441.566640", "State Recycling Program", "$ 36,500", "TOTAL", "$145,000", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid to Furnish Material and Labor for the Landscape and Irrigation Conversion Project", "Department": "Public Works, Public Landscape", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4250 to Clean Cut Landscape, a California-based company to furnish material and labor for the landscape and irrigation conversion project at various City locations; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual services agreement with Clean Cut Landscape, in an amount not to exceed $700,000 (includes a $73,230 contingency).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with statewide drought mitigation efforts, the City is acting to reduce its own institutional water consumption. According to the City\u2019s Water Resources Division, in 2015, City landscaping accounted for 39% of the City government\u2019s total water usage. The proposed landscape and irrigation conversion project would reduce water use in 39 locations citywide by roughly 2.4 million gallons a year. In April 2016, the City solicited bids to furnish material and labor for landscape and irrigation conversions at various City locations. Staff recommends Clean Cut Landscape as the best and lowest bidder for this project for a total cost of $700,000 (includes a $73,230 contingency).", "Background", "On January 13, 2015 (Attachment A), Council adopted the updated Water Shortage Response Plan (WSRP), reconfirmed a Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage, established a citywide 20% reduction target from 2013 water usage by December 31, 2016, and approved the implementation of water use allowances for all water customers (except non-potable accounts) and penalties for exceedances of the allowance.", "On April 1, 2015, Governor Brown issued an Executive Order directing the State Water Resources Control Board to impose mandatory restrictions to achieve an aggregate statewide 25% reduction in potable urban water use by February 2016. To support the City\u2019s drought response, Council approved the purchase of smart irrigation controllers on March 22, 2016 (Attachment B).", "To further advance water conservation, staff identified three approaches to reducing water use, namely landscape and irrigation conversions, that could be implemented in 39 locations citywide. These areas were selected because they are the most viable for turf removal and replacing spray with drip irrigation.", "Discussion", "The Public Landscape Division of the Public Works Department maintains 28 parks (130 acres) and 282 landscaped sites (92 acres) such as medians, parkways and curb bump-outs in the public right-of-way. Public Landscape Division staff responsibilities include the management of active turf for sports fields and lawn bowling, passive turf areas (low intensity use) such as the Civic Center and in front of City Hall, plant material and public trees. Additionally, staff oversees six water features and landscaping at 34 City facilities such as Woodlawn Cemetery and the Big Blue Bus. Due to the routine duties required to maintain the abovementioned sites, the division\u2019s five irrigation technicians do not have the capacity to perform the landscape and irrigation conversions.", "In an effort to support the City of Santa Monica\u2019s drought response, the Public Landscape Division identified 54 conversion projects throughout the City. Since the bids came in significantly higher than the budget, the projects were prioritized to the 39 highest water conserving projects within budget. These 39 water conservation projects would include:", "\u00b7 Converting planter bed spray irrigation to drip irrigation (at 32 sites):", "\u00b7 Removing turf and adding mulch to make tree rings (at four sites);", "\u00b7 Removing turf and installing decomposed granite and/or mulch (at three sites).", "Thirty-two sites totaling more than three acres would convert spray irrigation to a more water-efficient drip irrigation system. Drip irrigation systems deliver low volumes of water directly into the soil and root area and minimize water loss due to runoff, evaporation or overspray. According to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, drip irrigation systems use 20 to 50 percent less water than conventional pop-up sprinkler systems. Based on this figure and 2013 water use data, these conversions would save roughly a minimum of 1.9 million gallons per year. Additionally, 33,627 estimated square feet (.8 acres) of turf would be removed and replaced with decomposed granite or mulch. Based on 2013 data, the removal of this turf would save approximately 537,060 gallons per year. Based on 2013 data, the 39 proposed landscape and irrigation conversion projects would reduce water use by roughly 2.4 million gallons per year, an approximate savings of $22,500 per year based on average cost of tiers for commercial rates. Staff anticipates all work would be completed by the end of 2016.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On April 8, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish material and labor for the landscape and irrigation conversions at various City locations as required by the Public Landscape Division. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 42 vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on April 26, 2016 (Attachment C).", "Bidder       Bid Amount", "Clean Cut Landscape    $1,140,932", "Terra Form, Inc.     $2,954,778", "Both bids were significantly higher than the City\u2019s proposed budget of $700,000, which did not account for prevailing wage rates. Terra Form, Inc.\u2019s bid was much higher than Clean Cut Landscape primarily due to its substantially higher costs for turf removal. Since the bids came in significantly over the proposed budget, staff reduced the scope of work from 54 conversion projects to 39 conversion projects, while exploring other funding sources to address the remaining 15 conversion projects in the future. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria and references provided by Clean Cut Landscape for projects completed for the California Department of Transportation, Clean Cut Landscape is recommended as the best and lowest bidder to furnish material and labor for the landscape and irrigation conversion at various City locations in accordance with City specifications.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Clean Cut Landscape is for an amount not to exceed $700,000 (includes a $73,230 contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C259132.589000."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Authorizing the City Manager to Execute Memorandum of Understanding with the Administrative Team Associates (ATA), Municipal Employees Association (MEA), the Public Attorneys Union (PAU), amend the Memorandum of Understanding with Santa Monica Firefighters Local 1109 IAFF, and revise the Executive Pay Plan (EPP), and the Confidential Unrepresented Employees (CUE) Pay Plan", "Department": "Human Resources Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the attached resolution accepting the tentative agreements and authorizing the City Manager to execute Memoranda of Understanding (MOU) between the City and the Administrative Team Associates (ATA), Municipal Employees Association (MEA), the Public Attorneys Union (PAU), a tentative agreement amending and modifying the terms and conditions the MOU with the Santa Monica Firefighters Local 1109 (Local 1109), and to execute revisions to the Executive Pay Plan (EPP), and the Confidential Unrepresented Employees (CUE) Pay Plan, 2. Approve the attached revised salary schedule effective as a result of the negotiated tentative agreements reached for the classifications represented by ATA, MEA, PAU, EPP and CUE.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Negotiations for successor MOU between the City and the following bargaining units have resulted in tentative agreements: ATA, MEA and PAU. The terms of the tentative agreements are summarized below. Revisions are also being proposed to the Executive Pay Plan (EPP) and the Confidential Unrepresented Employees (CUE) Pay Plan. The total cost of the negotiated changes is approximately $1,928,300 for FY 2016-17. The budget impact of these changes was included in the General Fund FY 2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Five-Year Financial Forecast.", "The City engaged in the meet and confer process and has tentatively agreed to amend the current Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) between the City and the Santa Monica Firefighters, Local 1109 (Local 1109). The terms of the tentative agreement are summarized below. The total cost of the negotiated changes of $74,600 was included in the General Fund FY 2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Five-Year Financial Forecast.", "Background", "The MOU's with ATA, MEA, and PAU expire June 30, 2016. Per the terms and conditions of the MOU\u2019s, negotiations with ATA, MEA, and PAU for successor MOU\u2019s have resulted in tentative agreements on the terms for new MOU\u2019s.", "The EPP establishes terms and conditions of employment for Department Heads and other at-will employees who receive EPP benefits as part of separate employment contracts. There is no expiration date for the EPP; terms are amended as needed and typically occur as changes are made to agreements with other non-sworn employee bargaining units. The CUE Pay Plan establishes the salary, benefit and additional terms and conditions of employment for employees in classifications not represented by a bargaining unit, covered by the EPP, or covered by separate employment agreements.", "The current term of the MOU between the City and Local 1109 which was approved on August 26, 2014, describes the terms and conditions of employment and is set to expire on June 30, 2017. During negotiations for the 2014-2017 MOU certain assignment bonuses for various classifications were eliminated and included in the base salary. Unfortunately, the defined salary relationships which are set between ranks to avoid compaction issues were not adequately addressed and updated to reflect the new base salaries. The issue of compaction and the salary differentials between ranks must be addressed or else several issues arise: the supervisor-subordinate salary and working relationship is negatively impacted, the incentive to promote to a higher-rank is weakened, and a violation of the current MOU arises if the proper salary relationships are not observed.", "Discussion", "The substantive terms of the tentative agreements are summarized for each bargaining unit or group below. In one case, the term is simply being extended by one year, including a cost of living adjustment consistent with other agreements citywide as mandated by the \u201cme too\u201d clause in the current contract. In the case of two new agreements reached through collective bargaining, \u201cearly signing bonuses\u201d are included. Unlike cost of living adjustments, these one-time payments are not built into salaries, nor are they counted in the calculation of PERS retirement benefits. Here is the summary of the terms of the various agreements recommended for approval:", "Administrative Team Associates", "Term of the Agreement", "A one-year agreement has been negotiated with ATA effective July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2017.", "Significant Negotiated Changes", "1. 1.5% cost of living adjustment effective July 2016", "2. One-time lump sum payment (early signing bonus), equal to $728.00 per employee, in recognition of a timely conclusion of the meet and confer process", "3. Increase of $500.00 to Tuition Reimbursement, to a maximum of $2,500.00 per year", "4. Non-substantive language revisions", "Municipal Employees Association", "Term of the Agreement", "A one-year agreement has been negotiated with MEA effective July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2017.", "Significant Negotiated Changes", "1. 1.5% cost of living adjustment effective July 2016", "2. One-time lump sum payment (early signing bonus), equal to $440.00 per employee, in recognition of a timely conclusion of the meet and confer process", "3. Non-substantive language revisions", "Public Attorney\u2019s Union", "Term of the Agreement", "A one-year extension of the current agreement has been negotiated with PAU effective July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2017.", "Significant Negotiated Changes", "An extension of the current MOU includes a 1.5% cost of living adjustment effective July 2016 as a result of the current \u201cme-too\u201d clause, and an extension of the sunset clause relating to performance bonuses.", "Santa Monica Firefighters Local 1109 IAFF", "Term of the Agreement", "The current term of the 2014-2017 MOU is not being extended and will expire on June 30, 2017.", "Significant Negotiated Changes", "1. Effective July 1, 2016, the salary relationships between certain ranks will be modified to address the elimination of assignment bonuses and to maintain the salary relationships that have existed historically.", "2. The City agreed to memorialize the employee contributions to the Retiree Health Benefit Trust which is administered by Local 1109.", "3. Modify the Hazardous Materials Response Team and Urban Search and Rescue (USAR) bonuses from a flat amount of $300 to 4.00% of top step firefighter base salary to ensure salary relationships continue.", "4. Update the constant staffing amount to reflect current levels.", "5. Revise language regarding time off for union business.", "Executive Pay Plan", "Term of the Agreement", "While there is no contract expiration for the EPP, this amendment would set salaries for EPP covered employees for a one-year period through June 30, 2017.", "Revisions", "1. 1.5% cost of living adjustment effective July 2016", "Confidential Unrepresented Employees", "Term of the Agreement", "While there is no contract expiration for the CUE pay plan, this resolution would set salaries for CUE employees for a one-year period through June 30, 2017.", "Revisions", "1. Benefits and privileges as set forth in the MOU\u2019s between the City and the bargaining unit to which the confidential unrepresented classifications are aligned.", "Attached is a resolution for Council consideration approving the tentative agreements and authorizing the City Manager to execute Memoranda of Understanding for ATA, MEA and PAU bargaining units, approving the tentative agreement with Local 1109 amending and modifying the terms and conditions of its MOU, revising the EPP and CUE Pay Plan, and a resolution approving the revised salary schedule effective as a result of the negotiated tentative agreements reached with the various bargaining units.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The total cost of the negotiated changes contained in the new agreements is approximately $2,002,900 for FY 2016-17. The budget impact of these changes was included in the General Fund FY 2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Five-Year Financial Forecast. The FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget includes General Fund appropriations in Non-Departmental. FY 2016-17 appropriations for all funds will be included in the FY2015-16 Year-End Budget for Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Professional Service Agreement (PSA) for Annual Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award RFP# SP2429 to Cannon Corporation, a California-based company to provide engineering design services, develop construction documents and provide engineering support during the construction of the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Cannon Corporation in an amount not to exceed $86,135 (includes a 15% contingency).3. Authorize the City Manager to accept all grant renewals for grant (Grant No. XP-96945401).4. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant (Grant No. XP-00T79601) awarded in the amount of $848,000 from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for the Santa Monica Water Reliability Infrastructure Improvement project, and to accept all grant renewals. 5. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.6. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project would replace approximately 3,820 lineal feet of water distribution pipelines at various locations in the City to ensure an adequate and reliable supply of water to customers. This project is based on a long-term replacement and maintenance plan for water mains based on age, condition and capacity demands. Staff recommends Cannon Corporation to provide engineering design services, develop construction documents and provide engineering support during the construction phase of the project for an amount not to exceed $86,135.", "Background", "On September 12, 2006 (Attachment A) the City accepted grant funds for the Santa Monica Water Reliability Infrastructure Improvement Project from the United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), comprised of $529,900 in reimbursable grant funding and $460,700 in matching City funds for a total of $990,600 (Grant Number XP-96945401).  To date, the city has spent $348,677 of the $460,700 local match funds.", "In January 2012, the EPA awarded another grant to the City for the Santa Monica Water Reliability Infrastructure Improvement Project, comprised of $848,000 in reimbursable grant funding and $693,818 in matching city funds for a total of $1,541,818 (Grant Number XP-00T79601).", "These grants were made pursuant to the Federal Water Resources Development Act and titled Water Infrastructure \u2013 Santa Monica Reliability Improvement Project. Initially, the project comprised both a potable and recycled reservoir. In 2007, the City Council retained a consulting engineering firm to conduct a feasibility study, a preliminary design report, CEQA/NEPA documents, financing alternatives, public outreach, project management services and design build documents for the drinking water storage facility. Construction cost estimates for the project proved prohibitive (exceeding $30 million). Subsequently, the size of the reservoirs was reduced; ultimately the project was reduced to a single 1 million gallon recycled water reservoir. Even then the projected cost of the project was financially infeasible.", "In order to avoid the lapsing of the available grants, staff from the Water Resources Division worked with EPA to revise the work plan and requested the remaining grant funds be used toward the replacement of the existing water mains in the City.  In October 2015, the City received EPA\u2019s approval to repurpose the grant funds for the replacement of the existing water mains throughout the City and to extend the project period end date.", "Discussion", "The City operates and maintains a 205 mile network of water distribution mains with pipeline sizes ranging from 4 to 36 inches. The City\u2019s water system serves over 86,000 residential and business customers providing 12 million gallons of water per day.  In order to achieve the City\u2019s ongoing commitment to supplying safe and clean water to all its residents and businesses, and preserve the water quality and efficiency going forward,  the Water Resources Division in 2011 developed a business case evaluation study to identify and prioritize the aged cast iron water mains. The study focuses on the oldest cast iron pipe installations built prior to the 1970s. The study provides cost and probabilities of potential water main breaks while making recommendations to replace and upgrade the aged water mains throughout the city.", "Staff also reviewed maintenance records to identify the most problematic areas where unexpected low water pressure occurs. Low pressure in the old cast iron pipes is typically caused by rust build up, restricting water flow which affects the water quality as well. Based on this information, a list of priority water distribution system improvements was produced to implement the replacement and upgrade of water mains at the following locations, for a total of approximately 3,820 linear feet of water main;", "\u00b7 Ocean Park Blvd. - from 14th Street to 18th Street", "\u00b7 17th Street - from Pearl Street to Ocean Park Blvd.", "\u00b7 Ocean Avenue - from Pico Blvd. to Bay Street", "\u00b7 Ashland Avenue- from 3rd Street to 4th Street", "Consultant Selection", "On April 8, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposal (RFP) for engineering design services, construction documentation, and engineering support services during the construction phase of the Water Infrastructure Reliability Improvement Project. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code Provision.  59 vendors downloaded the RFP and six firms responded (California Watershed Engineers, Cannon Consulting, CivilSource Corporation, KPFF Consulting Engineers, Quantum Consulting, Inc., and Willdan Engineering). Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Water Resources and Civil Engineering.", "Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, work plans, project team, creativity, technical competence and understanding of the project\u2019s scope. Staff then ranked all six firm from 1 to 6. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Cannon Corporation as the best qualified firm to provide engineering design services, for an amount not to exceed $86,135. Cannon Corporation demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience with similar projects in urban and coastal municipalities, including the cities of Manhattan Beach, Beverly Hills, Glendale, and Golden State Water Company. Cannon Corporation also demonstrated through past projects its ability to offer experienced design teams that can complete project designs in an expeditious manner and at competitive hourly rates.", "After completion of the design work, staff will prepare the bidding document, advertise the project in City\u2019s on-line bidding site, select a contractor, and prepare a staff report to award the contract. The anticipated timeline for the design phase of the project is approximately 6 months (early August 2016 to late January 2017).", "The second phase of the project is the construction phase which will take approximately 4-6 months after award of the contract by the City Council.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $848,000 grant from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for the Santa Monica Water Reliability Infrastructure Improvement project requires the following FY 2015-16 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20671.403951 in the amount of $848,000.", "2. Appropriate $848,000 to account C209196.589000 to reflect receipt of the Water Infrastructure \u2013 Santa Monica Water Infrastructure grant.", "3. Move $693,818 from account C250136.589000 to account C259196.589000 in FY2016-17 to fund the local match obligation.", "Renewal of the $529,900 grant U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) for the Santa Monica Water Reliability Infrastructure Improvement project requires the following FY 2015-16 budget changes:", "1. Move $112,023 from account C250136.589000 to C250609.589000 to fund the remaining local match obligation.", "The professional services agreement to be awarded to Cannon Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $86,135 (includes a 15% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C250136.589000."]}, {"Title": "Modification to Contract with PlanetBids, Inc. for Maintenance and Product Support Services", "Department": "Finance Department, Procurement", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to Contract #1450 in the amount of $19,125 with four one-year options totaling $82,415 for a total amended amount of $101,540 with PlanetBids Incorporated, a California-based company, to provide maintenance and product support services for the online bidding portal pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code. This will result in a 14 year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $313,863, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "PlanetBids is the on-line bidding portal that the City currently uses to advertise informal and formal solicitations. The current contract expires on June 30, 2016. Staff recommends a modification to the existing agreement that piggybacks on the City of Palo Alto Contract No.S15155399. The five year extension will result in a 14 year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $313,863.", "Background", "PlanetBids is a fully automated web-based vendor and bid management system that allows the posting of all solicitations in a centralized location and ensures that all vendors receive the same communications regarding solicitations. This system simplifies the process of doing business with the City by providing vendors with a searchable on-line database of current bid and proposal solicitations. Additionally, vendors wanting to do business with the City may create a profile that allows them to be notified when the City is soliciting proposals for certain commodities and services.", "Currently there are 14,172 vendors registered with the City through PlanetBids. The City also has the ability to open its solicitations to an additional 250 vendors registered with other public agencies within the surrounding region. On average, the City posts 450 formal and informal solicitations annually.", "In order to evaluate competing systems in 2007, staff published a Request for Proposals (RFP) and evaluated various vendor solutions. Responses were evaluated by a multi-departmental committee based on product approach, cost, and ability to meet the City\u2019s technical specifications and product support requirements. PlanetBids was determined to be the best bidder and met the City\u2019s technical specifications and product support requirements. The City has used PlanetBids to post online solicitations since 2007.", "On May 27, 2014 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to the contract, extending the term by two years, for a nine-year agreement in an amount not to exceed $212,323. The two-year extension was to delay reissuing a Request for Proposals for web-based vendor and bid management systems so that staff could evaluate any similar services available through its new Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system.", "Discussion", "As part of the ERP selection process, staff requested that proposers offer a vendor and bid management portal that would provide the system functionalities currently offered by PlanetBids. The City selected Tyler Technologies to replace its existing ERP system in May 2015. Tyler\u2019s vendor and bid management system does not provide the comprehensive service PlanetBids offers in centralized posting, centralized communication, and access to additional vendors; and in addition would require all existing vendors to re-register through the Tyler System. In addition to offering a better platform, PlanetBids provides Reverse Auction and Emergency Operations (EO) Mobile modules that respond to current needs. The Reverse Auction module allows vendors to bid against each other on an electronic bidding system, increasing the likelihood that the City purchases the commodity at the lowest price. The EO Mobile module allows staff to access the vendor portal via a mobile operation system (IOS) device during an emergency, resulting in a faster response that could minimize the impact of a disaster. PlanetBids provides the City access to a larger database of vendors, including those not registered with the City, and offline access to all information from the application that is stored on the IOS device.", "When preparing to issue a Request for Proposals (RFP), the City found that a number of other California cities had recently completed competitive processes for vendor management portals and had selected PlanetBids. Palo Alto is one of several cities that issued such a request over the past 12 months and selected PlanetBids. Palo Alto\u2019s procurement process allows for other cities to piggyback on its contracts. Since those cities\u2019 contracts are larger and they are purchasing up to 30 licenses, it allows for Santa Monica to access a quantity discount it might not otherwise receive as it is only paying for up to 10.", "Contractor Selection", "Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, Exception to Competitive Bidding, allows the City to utilize a competitive bidding process that has already been completed by Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, to purchase the same supplies or equipment that the other entity has already purchased under an existing bid. Staff recommends utilizing this process in this case in order to obtain the most competitive pricing.", "Procurement staff obtained copies of other proposals for like services from the City of Santa Barbara\u2019s recent competitive process to confirm that the pricing on the Palo Alto contract was below market pricing. Staff determined that the City of Palo Alto\u2019s contract No.S15155399, awarded to PlanetBids on June 1, 2015 would be able to save the City money on the per license cost compared to prices quoted to Santa Barbara for similar services. Additionally, the EO module implementation fee included in the Palo Alto PlanetBids agreement is a third of the cost of what City of Palo Alto and City of Santa Barbara had paid previously. Staff estimates that piggybacking on the City of Palo Alto\u2019s RFP will save the City over $4,500 annually compared to comparable prices quoted to other cities for similar services. #0", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to PlanetBids Inc. is for $19,125, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $313,863.  Funds are available in the approved FY 2016-17 budget plan in the Finance, Public Works, and Information Services Departments. The agreement will be charged based on use, to the following accounts:", "01221.533580 $11,475", "01402.533580 $ 2,869", "01403.533580 $ 2,869", "01243.533580 $ 1,912", "TOTAL  $19,125", "Future funding is contingent upon Council approval and budget adoption."]}, {"Title": "First Amendment to Subscription Agreement for American Express Credit Card Acceptance Services with American Express Travel Related Services", "Department": "Finance Department, Treasury", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first amendment to Subscription Agreement No. 2404 in an estimated amount of $1,772,000 for an additional five year term with American Express Travel Related Services Company (AMEX), a New York-based company, for American Express credit card acceptance services. This will result in a nine year and eight month amended agreement for an estimated total of $3,000,000. The actual contract amount will vary based on credit card usage and assumes annual increases of 5.5%.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City requires the services of a merchant account processor in order to accept credit card payments from the public. The City currently contracts with American Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc. (AMEX) for American Express card processing. In accordance with Municipal Code 2.24.080, the City is allowed to forego competitive bidding if the competitive bidding process has been utilized by another government agency or if the procurement is part of cooperative purchasing with another agency, where the same item or services are supplied at same price or better. The City\u2019s current AMEX agreement piggybacks on the State of California\u2019s agreement with AMEX under this exception. The State amended its contract with AMEX on May 17, 2016. Staff recommends a first amendment to the existing agreement using the same terms as the State modification, which includes no change to the merchant processing fee. Based on a historical average, staff estimates the cost to be approximately $354,400 per year, or $29,500 per month. Actual costs will depend on usage.", "Background", "On June 11, 2013 (Attachment A), Council approved a subscription agreement with AMEX through June 30, 2014 with an option to extend the agreement for an additional two years. The subscription agreement will expire on June 30, 2016. The City has maintained a separate agreement with AMEX to accept American Express credit cards since 2011. Following a competitive process conducted on November 6, 2014, the City also contracts with TransFirst Health and Government Solutions (TransFirst) for MasterCard, Visa, Discover, and some American Express card processing services that are not currently covered under the American Express agreement.  The subscription agreement with AMEX, which piggybacks off the State contract, provides a lower processing rate than if the charge was processed through TransFirst. Council last approved a contract with TransFirst on April 28, 2015 (Attachment B).", "Discussion", "The City accepts credit card payments for a variety of services and fees as a convenience to customers and to provide quick and efficient payment collection. Parking-related transactions account for 98.5% of the American Express transactions. Credit cards have become a more widely used form of payment and the costs of accepting credit cards will continue to increase due to higher volume, transaction amounts, and incentives/rewards offered by credit card companies that encourage customer usage.", "Under the State of California\u2019s amended contract with AMEX, charges are incurred at the rate of 2.15% of the transaction amount. The State of California\u2019s contract with AMEX, Inc. is for a period of nine years and 8 months and the agreement terminates on June 30, 2021. Based on the historical data, the cost associated with this rate would be approximately $29,500 per month. The City\u2019s continued participation in the subscription agreement would maintain the lower processing rate until the agreement terminates.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff opted to piggyback on the State of California\u2019s Master Agreement with AMEX due to the lower processing rate offered by AMEX to the State of California compared to that offered directly to the City during its 2015 bidding process for credit card processing services. Piggybacking is the post award use of a contractual process that allows an agency not involved in the original competitive process to contract the same firm through that original process pursuant to Municipal Code 2.24.080.", "The Master Agreement between the State of California and AMEX was executed on July 1, 2009 and expires on June 30, 2021. The City\u2019s subscription agreement with AMEX would continue for as long as the Master Agreement is in effect. Staff recommends that Council approve a first amendment to the subscription agreement to maintain the 2.15% processing rate.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to AMEX is for an estimated amount of $1,772,000, for an amended agreement estimated total of $3,000,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 and FY 2016-17 budgets in the Finance, Community and Cultural Services, and Public Works Departments for the General Fund, and in the Beach Fund, Airport Fund and Cemetery Fund portions of credit card charges. Payments will be processed and charged based on credit card usage to the following accounts:", "012241.522230 (for General Fund charges)", "012241.556010 (for utility bill AMEX charges)", "11523.522230 (Beach Fund charges)", "33431.522230 (Airport Fund charges)", "37641.522230 (Cemetery Fund charges)", "Future funding is contingent upon Council approval and budget adoption."]}, {"Title": "Approve Agreement for Minimum Wage Enforcement Services with Los Angeles County", "Department": "Finance Department", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Los Angeles County to provide enforcement services for the City of Santa Monica\u2019s minimum wage. The agreement is for an amount not to exceed $125,000 for one year, with four one-year renewal options, for a total not to exceed amount of $625,000 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and2) Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In reports to Council leading up to and including Santa Monica\u2019s minimum wage law adoption, staff indicated its intent to work with Los Angeles County for wage enforcement. Santa Monica\u2019s minimum wage goes into effect July 1, 2016. The City must enforce the law\u2019s provisions to realize its benefits for workers and to ensure all businesses abide by the new law. Los Angeles County has established and funded a wage enforcement division to enforce its minimum wage law in the Los Angeles region\u2019s unincorporated areas, which include some areas near Santa Monica. This enforcement division is also set up to provide enforcement services to cities within the Los Angeles County region. Partnering with Los Angeles County will support a regional approach to wage enforcement, and is an effective use of resources as staff cannot estimate the level of wage enforcement activity. Staff recommends entering into an agreement with Los Angeles County to provide wage enforcement services for the City of Santa Monica. The agreement is based on a $90 per hour rate, which references a fully loaded staff cost, for an estimated not to exceed total of $125,000 for FY 2016-17. Staff is also providing education and outreach to Santa Monica\u2019s businesses and employees through advertising and social media, and agreements with community organizations.", "Background", "Los Angeles County passed its minimum wage law in July 2015, and announced a wage enforcement plan the following November, which the Board of Supervisors approved and funded in April 2015. Since November, staff has worked with the County\u2019s Department of Consumer and Business Affairs (DCBA) to assess the possibility of the City contracting with the DCBA for minimum wage enforcement. Council adopted Santa Monica\u2019s minimum wage ordinance on January 12, 2016 (Attachment A), and adopted amendments to finalize the ordinance provisions on April 26, 2016 (Attachment B). Wage provisions take effect starting July 1, 2016.", "Discussion", "The State is currently responsible for enforcing labor laws. Santa Monica has no enforcement experience in this area, and does not have existing staff available to pursue wage law violations or claims. Therefore, wage enforcement would be a new function for the City. Staff analyzed how other cities with new local minimum wage laws have conducted enforcement, and how those cities compare to Santa Monica.", "Designating an enforcement agency or function has contributed to effective wage enforcement in San Francisco, which has a strong record of wage recovery and successful claims; and the UCLA Labor Center and other wage enforcement experts recognize it as an enforcement best practice. All California cities with local minimum wage laws \u2013 including Berkeley, Oakland, Sunnyvale, Mountain View, San Jose, Richmond, San Diego, and recently Los Angeles City and County \u2013 have established wage enforcement functions or identified an agency outside of the organization to take on this role. Enforcement functions vary in scale and level of dedicated resources. Larger cities, namely San Francisco, San Jose, and Los Angeles City and County, have added staff and funding to support this function. San Diego, whose wage is pending a ballot result in November, plans to add staff and resources for this purpose. Smaller cities have chosen to proceed in a variety of ways. Pasadena, which adopted its minimum wage law this year, is in the process of developing an internal wage enforcement function. However, Mountain View and Sunnyvale, both of which adopted minimum wage laws that took effect July 1, 2015, have contracted with neighboring San Jose for wage enforcement. San Jose\u2019s relationship to these cities is similar to LA County\u2019s with Santa Monica as its wage law covers a significantly larger area and population, is geographically close by, and has established and funded a wage enforcement agency. Staff spoke with city representatives from the client cities (Mountain View and Sunnyvale), who reported a very positive experience with the arrangement, and recommended it as an option for smaller city enforcement.", "Vendor Selection", "Staff recommends Los Angeles County to provide wage enforcement services as an exception to the competitive bidding process, based on the lack of competition in this area. Research and discussion with other cities indicated that contracting with another government entity is the best, and potentially only, alternative to internal enforcement. Staff contacted Los Angeles City and County, the two possibilities for providing this service. The City of Los Angeles was not prepared to offer wage enforcement services to Santa Monica at this point in the development of its enforcement program. The County program is set up to provide these services, and based on the proposed program, staff believes it is the best option for wage enforcement in Santa Monica.", "Staff contacted DCBA staff following the Board of Supervisors\u2019 direction to establish a wage enforcement plan that includes the potential to provide wage enforcement services to other cities within Los Angeles County. The County plans to provide robust and proactive wage enforcement in its area of jurisdiction, including an in-depth and multi-faceted approach to education and outreach, meaningful enforcement, and additional services. It has begun a comprehensive media outreach campaign, and wage enforcement staff have participated in trainings with the U.S. Department of Labor and the State\u2019s Department of Labor Standards Enforcement (DLSE) and Bureau of Field Enforcement (BOFE) to prepare for enforcement activity and to create connections with State enforcement.", "Staff believes the LA County program presents a comprehensive and effective approach to wage enforcement that fits Santa Monica\u2019s needs. Wage enforcement services, to be made available to the City as needed under the terms of the agreement, include:", "\u00b7 Responding to inquiries from the public (multilingual assistance in person, by phone, or online)", "\u00b7 Making initial contact, taking complaints, conducting investigations, and writing reports", "\u00b7 Taking enforcement actions, including issuing administrative citations and conducting settlement negotiations", "\u00b7 Participating in the administrative hearing process and court proceedings, in coordination with the City Attorney\u2019s Office", "\u00b7 Collecting and disbursing back wages", "\u00b7 Conducting proactive site visits to employers", "In addition to the services above, LA County staff would:", "\u00b7 Respond to City staff questions", "\u00b7 Gather data and track wage claims activity", "\u00b7 Provide regular reports to the City", "The budget and term of the proposed agreement takes into account the uncertainty in the initial year of the new law. Staff cannot predict the volume or type of enforcement activity resulting from the minimum wage law in Santa Monica, and LA County staff also have no clear indication of workload or the amount of time they will spend on given tasks. The contract cost is based on an hourly rate, which comes from the average fully loaded cost of DCBA staff working on a wage enforcement activity. This method is flexible enough to cover the wide variety of services required for Santa Monica enforcement, and provides a basis for an estimated cost to the City. The estimated not to exceed amount is based on approximately 70% of one person\u2019s work over one year. Staff believes this is a generous estimate based on other cities\u2019 experience. The proposed agreement is for one year, with four one-year options to renew. This provides the opportunity to reassess needs once both parties have more information, and gives the City the option to maintain and build on the partnership through the law\u2019s ramp up to $15 per hour. It also provides flexibility to change strategy once the State rate also reaches $15 per hour.", "Other Actions", "To complement enforcement efforts and reduce the need for punitive action, the City will reach businesses and workers through advertising, direct information and social media, and has enlisted community partners to broaden this outreach and support.", "\u00b7 Communication. Staff has created ads for the Big Blue Bus and City parking structures; developed legal posters, paycheck inserts, frequently asked questions and one-page summary resource for employers; and notified employers through business license reminders and direct mailing. Staff has also developed social media messages in support of the project.", "\u00b7 Outreach and Education. The City has awarded small grants to community organizations for education and outreach to Santa Monica\u2019s businesses and employees. Staff selected these organizations based on their knowledge of Santa Monica, experience in communications and with providing business and worker training, and capacity to provide the services needed. These organizations will seek out and provide direct service to Santa Monica businesses and workers. They will track information such as number and type of trainings conducted and employees and businesses reached, and will provide reports to staff. Staff will include this information in future reports to Council on the law\u2019s implementation.", "Alternatives", "The City could establish a wage enforcement function within Santa Monica. This would involve, at a minimum, additional training for existing staff, and hiring one full-time and potentially additional as-needed staff members to respond to inquiries and handle investigations and citations. This could provide the City more direct control over the process, and better ensure prompt and appropriate response to complaints. However, this model would be less flexible in being able to adjust to volume and complexity of wage complaints and changes as the State rate reaches $15 per hour, and could potentially be significantly more costly to the City. If Council chooses this option, staff would return quickly with a plan for the enforcement structure, and request for funding.", "Council could also choose to enforce the law with existing staff and resources, relying on a complaint-based process and assistance from the City\u2019s community based organization partners. Discussions with other cities indicate that this approach strains existing staff resources, and wage enforcement research indicates this reactive approach to enforcement is not the most effective.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Approving the agreement with Los Angeles County to provide wage enforcement services requires a one-time appropriation of $125,000 to account 01221.555060 in FY 2016-17. The account will be charged based on services provided. If the City chooses to renew after one year, staff will submit a budget request with the FY 2017-18 budget based on information from the first year of implementation. #1"]}, {"Title": "Resolution to Accept California Energy Commission (CEC) Grant for MicroGrid", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council:1. Adopt the attached resolution necessary to accept the grant award from the California Energy Commission for Phase One of the proposed Microgrid project at the City Yards.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On May 24, 2016, Council approved the recommended actions to accept a grant award from the California Energy Commission under GFO-15-312, by authorizing the City Manager to accept the award and execute the necessary documents; and authorizing the budget changes to accommodate the revenue. The grant award of $1,487,609 will be used to support the design and development of a multiuser microgrid based within City Yards. In order to accept the grant, Council needs to formally adopt a resolution. The necessary resolution is included with this report for Council adoption.", "Background", "On November 24, 2015, the California Energy Commission (CEC) released a grant funding opportunity entitled \u201cThe EPIC Challenge: Accelerating the Deployment of Advanced Energy Communities.\u201d The submission was due to the CEC February 17, 2016. The solicitation called for applicants to propose measures to plan, design and permit communities that:", "\u00b7 Minimize need for new energy infrastructure costs, such as transmission and distribution upgrades.", "\u00b7 Provide energy savings by achieving and maintaining zero net energy community status (accounting for behavior and increasing loads from vehicle and appliance electrification).", "\u00b7 Support grid reliability and resiliency by incorporating technologies such as energy storage.", "\u00b7 Are financially attractive from a market standpoint (developers, home buyers, renters).", "\u00b7 Provide affordable access to renewable energy generation, energy efficiency upgrades, and water efficiency and reuse technologies that reduce electricity consumption for all electric ratepayers within the community.", "\u00b7 Makes use of smart-grid technologies throughout the community.", "Santa Monica was awarded aPhase I grantof approximately $1.5Mto plan, design and permita small, localized energy grid (microgrid) consisting of onsite renewable generation and energy storage based at the City Yards and Bergamot Arts Center. A Phase II grantopportunitywouldbecome available in early 2018, which would fund $8M for construction of such a project.", "Discussion", "A resolution must be submitted to the California Energy Commission in order to formally accept the award. On May 24, 2016, Council approved the recommended actions to accept the grant award from the California Energy Commission under GFO-15-312 and to authorize the City Manager to execute the necessary documents. Unfortunately, no resolution was included for the Council to adopt.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to Issue Purchase Orders to Temporary Staffing Agencies", "Department": "Human Resources Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP #56 to AppleOne Employment Services \u2013 Government Solutions Division, a California-based company; Chrysalis Enterprises, a California-based company; First Call Staffing, Inc., a California-based company; JAS Pacific, a California-based company; Johnson Service Group, an Illinois-based company; NTT Data, Inc., a Massachusetts-based company; Partners In Diversity, Inc., a California-based company; Top Tempo - Future Personnel Agency, Inc., a California-based company; Two Roads Professional Resources, Inc., a California-based company; and Ultimate Staffing Services, a California-based company; for temporary staffing services;Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue purchase orders with AppleOne Employment Services \u2013 Government Solutions Division, Chrysalis Enterprises, First Call Staffing, Inc., JAS Pacific, Johnson Service Group, NTT Data, Inc., Partners In Diversity, Inc., Top Tempo - Future Personnel Agency, Inc., Two Roads Professional Resources, Inc., and Ultimate Staffing Services for temporary staffing in the amount not to exceed $700,000 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options to extend on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $3,500,000, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue purchase orders to ten temporary staffing agencies on an as-needed basis for a one-year term, with four additional one-year renewal options to extend on the same terms and conditions. City Departments utilize Temporary Staffing Agencies for a variety of reasons including temporarily staffing positions held by permanent employees on leave, assisting with more specialized projects or to temporarily work in an open position during the recruitment process. In these rare instances City Departments request a temporary staff person through the Human Resources Department. Human Resources Staff works with the requesting Department to fully assess the need and then selects from the list of pre-approved agencies to supply the personnel. Once the temporary staff person is dispatched, Human Resources Staff will remain in communication with the requesting Department to monitor the effectiveness of the appointment. The use of temporary staff is infrequent, with only 28 temporary staff hired in Fiscal Year 2014-2015. The estimated expenditure for temporary staff is expected to be less than $700,000 dollars annually. This estimate is based on past expenditures of $702,641 in FY 2013-14 and $663,634 in FY 2014-15.", "Background", "Prior to July 2005, City Departments independently utilized the services of temporary staffing agencies. They were typically used to temporarily staff project-based work requiring specialized staff such as engineers, IT professionals and accountants. In addition, the agencies were used to quickly and efficiently provide general staff to cover positions ranging from administrative work to facility maintenance due to the temporary absences of permanent employees or while recruitments were completed by the Human Resources Department.", "This resulted in difficulties in monitoring and regulating temporary staffing agency usage across departments. It was determined that the temporary staffing should be centralized in Human Resources. The Human Resources Department issued a Request for Proposal (RFP) to temporary staffing agencies in June 2005 and received Council\u2019s approval in February 2006, to establish a list of seven agencies to provide temporary personnel. This proved to effectively address the issues while still meeting the needs of the department. Following expiration of RFP results from 2005, the Human Resources Department issued a new RFP in 2009 for temporary staffing services, which was approved by the City Council on October 27, 2009. The 2009 RFP process resulted in 12 agencies selected as approved vendors through FY 2013-14.", "In FY 2014-15 and FY 2015-16, while a new RFP process was underway, purchase orders for temporary staffing services have been approved by the City Manager. In FY2015-16, the City utilized staff from temporary agencies 44 times to support administrative and professional functions. A summary is below.", "Position Type", "Utilization", "Administrative Support", "33", "Civil Engineer", "1", "IT Specialist", "3", "Mail Courier", "2", "Permit Specialist", "2", "Plan Check", "2", "Transportation Engineer", "1", "TOTAL", "44", "Discussion", "The Human Resources Department receives all requests for temporary staff. This ensures that temporary staff are hire appropriately and allows for monitoring the total number of hours the individual works. The monitoring performed by Human Resources makes sure that the City remains in compliance with CalPERS regulations and that temporary staff are hired for the appropriate reasons. Staffing through these agencies is more costly than directly hiring as-needed staff so Human Resources works periodically reviews the placements to determine if the assignment can be handled in a more efficient or permanent way. For example, the City recently hired a temporary Transportation Engineer while a recruitment is being planned. This required the use of a certain type of professional for an extended time period given the length of the exam process. The City has reduced its usage of temporary staffing agencies since the original RFP was conducted in 2006. At that time it was estimated at over $1 million a year and it is now estimated to be approximately $700,000 per year.", "Vendor Selection", "On October 9, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for temporary staffing services as required by various City Departments on an as-needed basis. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 73 vendors downloaded the RFP and 17 proposals were received. Proposals were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, including cost, background/reference and reputation, flexibility, utility and suitability.", "Agencies selected demonstrated an ability to respond to staffing requests quickly, with existing pools of temporary staff covering a range of positions at competitive pricing. Some were also included due to their specialization in a particular field. Emphasis was placed on agencies that perform these services for comparable clients and cost.", "Based on these criteria, a pre-qualified list of ten vendors is recommended as best qualified to provide temporary personnel. The chart below demonstrates what staffing specializations each of the selected agencies offers.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase orders to be awarded to the above-referenced temporary staffing agencies are for an amount not to exceed $3,500,000 over five years. Funds in the amount of $700,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget in the various Departments submitting the requests for temporary staffing services."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Table 9.11.020 Governing the MUBL, MUB, GC, and NC Zoning Districts To Only Apply Specific Limitations #17 and #19 To Commercial Uses Not Currently Subject To Discretionary Review and To Expand The Discretionary Review Requirement For Office Uses, Media Production Support Facilities, Medical Offices and Dental Offices In Specific Limitations #21", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on May 24, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Table 9.11.020 governing the MUBL, MUB, GC, and NC Zoning Districts to only apply specific limitations #17 and #19 to commercial uses not currently subject to discretionary review and to expand the discretionary review requirement for office uses, media production support facilities, medical offices, and dental offices in specific limitation #21.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Making Minor Clerical Changes, Corrections, and Clarifications to the City's Zoning Ordinance, (Division 1-5 of Article 9 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code) and to the City's Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6 of Article 9 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on May 24, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance making minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the City's Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of Article 9 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code) and to the City's Land Use and Zoning related provisions (Division 6 of the Article 9 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code).", "These amendments fall into the following general categories: spelling, grammar, and punctuation; section references; formatting and organization; clarification; continuity from prior zoning ordinance; internal consistency with existing ordinance; and Council direction.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Establishing Interim Development Procedures and Standards Pending Adoption of the Downtown Community Plan, Modifying the Alcohol Establishment Cap for Restaurants in the Bayside Commercial Zoning District, and Prohibiting the Conversion of Existing Full Service Restaurants into Restaurants That Do Not Provide Full Service within the BSC-1 Zone", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on May 24, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance establishing interim development procedures and standards pending adoption of the Downtown Community Plan, modifying the alcohol establishment cap for restaurants in the Bayside Commercial Zoning District, and prohibiting the conversion of existing full service restaurants into restaurants that do not provide full service within the BSC-1 Zone.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}], [{"Title": "Resolutions related to the General Municipal Election to be held on November 8, 2016, Agreement for Election Services & Supplies, and Amendments to the City's Election Code", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt three resolutions to: a) call for a General Municipal Election to be held on November 8, 2016; b) request that the Municipal Election be consolidated with the Los Angeles County Statewide General Election; and c) request services from the Los Angeles County Registrar-Recorder for the General Municipal Election; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Martin & Chapman, a California based company, for election services and supplies required to conduct the General Municipal Election in an amount not to exceed $164,100.3. Introduce and adopt an ordinance amending sections 11.04.101, 11.04.160 and 11.04.165; and of the Santa Monica Municipal Code making clerical changes, corrections and clarifications, and section 11.04.120 to incorporate State law pertaining to candidate statements.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As part of the first steps of conducting and administering the November 8, 2016 General Municipal Election, staff recommends that the City Council adopt the following resolutions to: 1) call for the General Municipal Election, 2) request to consolidate the election with the Statewide General Election, 3) and request election services from the Los Angeles County Registrar-Recorder. In addition to City Council and Rent Control Board elections, the elections for members of the Board of Education and the College's Board of Trustees are consolidated with the City\u2019s Municipal Election.", "Staff also recommends entering into a contract with Martin & Chapman Company for election services and supplies required to conduct the General Municipal Election in an amount not to exceed $164,100.", "Additionally, after a review of the Santa Monica Election Code, staff is recommending the introduction and adoption of an ordinance amending Chapter 11.04 Elections of the Santa Monica Municipal Code to: 1) update the requirement in accordance with State law that petition circulators can be any person who is 18 years old or older; 2) remove references to Exhibits that were deleted from the Chapter in November 2015; 3) clarify that candidate disclosure statements to be filed with the City Clerk\u2019s Office must be \u201celectronically filed\u201d; and 4) prohibit references to candidates\u2019 party affiliations or political organizations in candidate statements, and require the translation of candidate statements to be completed by certified translators.", "Background", "Section 1400 of the City Charter provides that a General Municipal Election shall be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday of November of each even numbered year for the purpose of the election of elected officers. The City of Santa Monica has been consolidating municipal elections and obtaining services from the LA County Registrar-Recorder since the mid 1980\u2019s.", "As a result, it is necessary to adopt the resolutions calling the election, request consolidation with the Statewide General election and requesting election services from LA County Registrar-Recorder.", "On January 1, 2014, State law changed from allowing any person registered to vote at the election to circulate petitions to any person who is the age of 18, regardless of their voter registration status or United States citizenship.", "At the November 10, 2015 Council meeting, the Council amended the City\u2019s Elections Code by deleting exhibits of sample petitions, and mandating electronic filing of campaign statements for referendums, candidates and controlled committees. This proposed ordinance will delete references to those exhibits which appear in other sections of Chapter 11.04.", "At the June 9, 1992 Council meeting, the Council last amended section 11.04.120 (Candidate\u2019s Statement of Qualifications) as part of a Campaign and Election Reform Ordinance.", "Discussion", "The first resolution (Attachment A) calls for the General Election and gives notice that four City Council seats, two Rent Control Board seats, three Board of Education seats, and three Community College District Board of Trustees seats are to be filled at the November 8, 2016 General Municipal Election. At this time, no measures have qualified or been placed on the ballot.", "The second resolution (Attachment B) requests that the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors approve the consolidation of the City\u2019s General Municipal Election with the statewide General Election to be held on the same date, and that the statewide General Election and General Municipal Election be held in all respects as if there were only one election.", "The third resolution (Attachment C) requests that the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors direct the Los Angeles County Registrar of Voters to provide all necessary election services, to the extent determined necessary by the City Clerk, to: prepare, print and mail sample ballots and polling place information to the registered voters of the City.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends the City Manager to enter into a contract with Martin & Chapman Company, in an amount not to exceed $164,100. The company would furnish and provide election consulting services and supplies such as pre-election materials, nomination forms, voter information pamphlets, mailing labels, postage and delivery/mailing services and certified Spanish translation services. This year, staff plans to publish two separate Supplemental Sample Ballot and Voter Information Pamphlets in English and Spanish, and mail Spanish pamphlets in Spanish to only those voters who are on the County voter file as having requested a pamphlet in Spanish.  Based on 2014 costs, the savings from reducing the number of printed pages and postage is estimated to be $8,100. This purchase meets the City's exception to competitive bidding criteria as competition does not exist. The County of Los Angeles and most Southern California municipalities that conduct stand-alone elections have historically obtained services from Martin & Chapman. The City of Santa Monica also has a long history of obtaining election services with Martin & Chapman.", "Amendments to Santa Monica Municipal Code, Chapter 11.04 Elections", "The following are proposed amendments to the Election Code to sections 11.04.101, 11.04.160 and 11.04.165 respectively, to make corrections and clarifying changes:", "The following proposed amendments to section 11.04.120 (Candidate\u2019s statement of qualifications), updates and incorporates State guidelines to the Municipal Code:", "Limitations on Contributions from Persons", "Although not a part of the proposed amendments, it should also be noted that the limitations on contributions to City Council and Rent Control candidates will be adjusted from $325 to $340 commencing on July 1, 2016 (SMMC 11.04.050). Calculations are based on the amount equal to the percentage change in the CPI-W Index for the Los Angeles County area (increase of 5.3%), as published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest five dollars. The next adjustment will be on July 1, 2021 and affect the November 2022 Election.", "Public Outreach", "Notice of the election will be published in the local newspapers and mailed to neighborhood groups and interested entities. All election information will be available on www.smvote.org and promote the election on Seascape, the City\u2019s social media sites and videos on CityTV\u2019s YouTube Channel.", "As in previous years, the City Clerk\u2019s Office will: host two Candidate Workshops on the first day of the Nomination Period, and a Fair Political Practices Commission (FPPC) Workshop for Candidates/Treasurer in August; and hold voter registration drives at the Santa Monica Farmers Market. Earlier in the month, the City Clerk participated in an election workshop with the Santa Monica League of Women Voters, staff held voter registration drives at Santa Monica High School and the Open Streets COAST Event. The Clerk\u2019s Office also served as the County\u2019s Will Call Ballot Pickup and Drop-Off facility for the June 7th Primary Election and if the County deems the program successful, hope to do so again for the November election.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The proposed FY 2016-17 budget includes an elections budget of $505,156 in the Records & Election Services (City Clerk) Department. The consolidated costs, once received from the Los Angeles County Clerk, will be pro-rated and the City will be reimbursed by the Santa Monica Rent Control Board, the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District, and the Santa Monica Community College District for the costs of each respective election. Reimbursements for costs will be deposited in revenue account 01212.401020. It is estimated that Santa Monica's pro-rated cost for the City Council election is $140,500. Funds are available in the proposed FY 2016-17 budget in division 01212.", "The contract to be awarded to Martin & Chapman Company is for an amount not to exceed $164,100. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Records & Election Services (City Clerk) Department. The contract will be charged to account 01212.555060."]}, {"Title": "Qualification of Initiative Petition for Proposed Ordinance Entitled Land Use Voter Empowerment", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council accept the qualified initiative petition for a proposed ordinance entitled \"Land Use Vote Empowerment\u201d as verified by the Los Angeles County Clerk/Registrar Recorder and:1. Adopt the resolution accepting the certification of the City Clerk that the petition is sufficient and has exceeded the minimum qualified signatures of 6,430; and 2. Take one of the following actions:a) adopt the ordinance;b) direct staff to return on June 28, 2016, with a resolution and ballot language placing the measure on the November 8, 2016, municipal election ballot; or,c) Council already having directed staff to conduct a study on the possible impacts of the proposed measure, direct staff to return with the results of that study within 30 days.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On February 18, 2016, a notice of intent to circulate a petition proposing an ordinance to amend the City of Santa Monica for the purpose of amending the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) of the General Plan, as well as amending the Municipal Code, to establish a majority vote requirement for defined major development projects and major modifications to the City\u2019s land use planning documents, was filed with the City Clerk's office. A copy of the text of the proposed ordinance, and the ballot title and summary as prepared by the City Attorney, are attached (Attachment A). The petition was subsequently circulated and then submitted to the City Clerk's office on May 4, 2016, containing approximately 10,116 signatures.", "Upon submittal of the petition, the City Clerk requested the Los Angeles County Clerk/Registrar Recorder (\u201cCounty Clerk\u201d) verify the signatures submitted therein. In order to qualify the measure for the November 2016 election, the petition needed a minimum of 10% of the registered voters of the city.", "The registered voter population at the time of publishing was 64,300, and based on that number, 6,430 valid signatures were needed for qualification. The County Clerk\u2019s Office has verified that the petitions contain the minimum number of valid signatures required to place the proposed ordinance on the ballot for a public vote (Attachment B).", "Discussion", "The Election Code provides for Council to:", "\u00b7 adopt the ordinance as submitted at the meeting at which the qualified petition is presented or within 10 days after it is presented;", "\u00b7 submit the ordinance to the voters; or", "\u00b7 order a report on the effects of the proposed measure.", "As to ordering a report on the proposed measure, State Elections Code provides in Section 9212, in part, as follows:", "9212. Report on effect of proposed initiative to legislative body.", "(a) During the circulation of the petition, or before taking either action described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9214, or Section 9215, the legislative body may refer the proposed initiative measure to any city agency or agencies for a report on any or all of the following:", "And also,", "b) The report shall be presented to the legislative body within the time prescribed by the legislative body, but no later than 30 days after the elections official certifies to the legislative body the sufficiency of the petition.", "As provided for in Subsection 9212(b), Council may direct staff to return with the results of the study no later than 30 days after accepting the qualified petition. If Council chooses this option, when staff returns with said report on July 12, 2016, Council must do one of the following: Adopt the ordinance, without alteration; or submit the ordinance, without alteration, to the voters.", "As noted above, Council also has the option at this time to either adopt the ordinance as presented, with no changes, or approve a motion to place the measure on the ballot and direct staff to return with a resolution approving the ballot language.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "If Council decides to adopt the ordinance, there will be no election-related costs. Costs related to implementation and enforcement of the ordinance are unknown at this time. Staff can provide this information at a subsequent meeting. If Council places the measure on the November 8th ballot, the cost will be covered by the funds budgeted for the municipal election."]}, {"Title": "Proposed Amendments to Article XXII of the City Charter (the Oaks Initiative)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on proposed amendments to Article XXII of the City Charter (the Oaks Initiative) and direct staff to proceed with preparation of a ballot measure.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As part of its ongoing effort to ensure best governmental practices, the City Council directed staff to agendize Council discussion of possible amendments to City Charter Article XXII (the Oaks Initiative), which was adopted by the voters in 2000 for the purpose of averting corruption in the form of \u201ckickbacks\u201d. This report fulfills Council\u2019s direction. It discusses amendments proposed by Hueston Hennigan in conjunction with the report to Council of April 18, 2016 and includes other suggestions from staff.", "The amendments proposed by Hueston Hennigan would expand and thereby clarify the definition of \u201cpublic officials\u201d subject to the Oaks\u2019 prohibition, exempt from the prohibition persons serving as directors of charitable nonprofits, clarify enforcement responsibility, and broaden the scope of the law to prohibit bribes as well as \u201ckick backs\u201d.  As explained in this report, staff fully supports the first three proposals but has concerns about the fourth.", "Additionally, staff recommends Council consider other possible amendments to the Oaks Initiative and perhaps also to the City\u2019s Municipal Code. Once Council gives direction, staff will prepare specific language and return promptly to Council with the resolution necessary to place the amendments on the November 2016 ballot.", "Background", "The Oaks Initiative qualified for the ballot in Santa Monica and four other California cities in 2000. At the time, there was significant controversy about the constitutionality of some of the initiative\u2019s provisions, with one city (Vista) even taking the unusual course of filing suit to keep it off the ballot. Over time, four cities sought judicial determinations of its constitutionality, though no one disagreed with the measure\u2019s indisputably laudable purpose. Ultimately, two cities adopted competing or replacement measures to achieve the same or similar \u201cgood government\u201d purposes. A third city adopted guidelines but no violations have been prosecuted. In the fourth, the initiative was never implemented, apparently based on doubts about its constitutionality. Santa Monica sought a judicial determination of the constitutional questions and also placed a measure proposing amendments on the ballot, but the voters rejected the proposed amendments.  After that, the City implemented the Oaks Initiative as to the City Council members and City contractors and posted notice of the measures requirements.", "Fifteen years after the measure was adopted, the City Attorney\u2019s Office received the first complaint of a violation. Because of an apparent conflict, that complaint was referred to the Los Angeles County District Attorney, who rejected it; and then to the California Attorney General, who also rejected it.  Both rejection letters gave multiple reasons, including concerns about constitutionality and the belief that the City Attorney\u2019s Office could ethically prosecute such violations by \u201cwalling off\u201d a prosecutor.", "Later, when the City Council hired Attorney John Hueston of the law firm Hueston Hennigan to provide advice about governmental best practices, he concurred that a member of the City Attorney\u2019s Office could be \u201cwalled off\u201d; but he also recommended establishing the enforcement alternative of hiring an independent investigator. Mr. Hueston also recommended both the adoption of guidelines and amendments to the initiative to clarify and strengthen it and thereby facilitate enforcement. Staff prepared guidelines, working from his draft. Council adopted them and directed staff to return with proposed Charter amendments. This report fulfills that direction.", "Discussion", "The changes proposed by Mr. Hueston are shown in the attachment to this staff report and are explained and discussed in this report by section number. Under the proposal,", "Section 2202, \u201cDefinitions\u201d, would be amended by the addition of language clarifying the term \u201cpublic official\u201d by defining it to include Council members, planning commissioners, the city manager and department heads and their designees, among others. Staff supports this proposal. It would reduce ambiguity as to the application of the Oaks prohibition. Doing so would facilitate enforcement because, generally speaking, criminal sanctions may only be utilized to enforce legal prohibitions that are clear and unambiguous.", "Under the proposal, Section 2202 would also be modified by creating an exemption for trustees, directors, partners, or officers of charitable nonprofits. Staff strongly recommends this proposed modification to Article XXII. As currently worded, it purports to prohibit a community member, serving as a (volunteer) board member of a city-funded charitable nonprofit from making a political contribution to a Council member who voted to approve the funding. Thus, the Oaks Initiative forces some community members to choose between serving their community on non-profit boards and exercising their First Amendment right to participate in the political process through contributions. The proposed amendment would eliminate one of the potential constitutional infirmities in the Oaks Initiative that motivated Council to challenge the measure in court. Moreover, the proposed amendment would not undermine the initiative\u2019s purpose because the exemption would not include political non-profits.", "As to Section 2203, the proposal is to broaden the basic prohibition of Article XXII. As currently worded, it prohibits a public official who approves or confers a public benefit from thereafter receiving a \u201cpersonal or campaign advantage\u201d from the beneficiary. The period covered by the prohibition runs from the date the official approves the benefit and through a period of up to six years. The amendment proposed by Hueston Hennigan would expand the time period, by backing up its commencement to include the application or proposal period.  This proposal is apparently connected to a proposed revision in the section on penalties and enforcement, and their combined effect is discussed below.", "Section 2206 on penalties and enforcement would be changed in at least two ways by the Hueston Hennigan proposal.  Language would be added directing the City Attorney to refer all complaints of violations to the Chief Deputy of the Criminal Division or another attorney in the City Attorney\u2019s Office or to an independent investigator hired by the City. Legal staff continues to have some concerns about the possible appearance of a conflict of interest. However, given that the District Attorney will not handle these cases, staff supports the proposal because some remedy must be made available. Moreover, the proposal provides two, alternative approaches, which should afford the flexibility necessary to meet the circumstances of individual cases or complaints. And, as a matter of fact (rather than appearance) staff believes that the work can be successfully \u201cwalled off\u201d within the City Attorney\u2019s Office. The Chief Deputy of the Criminal Division is fully capable of making objective and independent determinations about the handling of individual cases. Indeed, he does so, every day.", "The other recommendation regarding Section 2203 would apparently expand liability for violations. At present, the Oaks prohibition applies only to \u201cpublic officials\u201d. The Hueston Hennigan draft would expand criminal and civil liability to include persons and entities who confer personal or campaign advantages. Thus, for instance, if a Council member accepted a contribution from a contractor whose contract the Council member had voted to approve, both the Council member and the contractor could be criminally and civilly liable. Likewise, if a department head accepted employment from a contractor whose contract she/he had approved, both the department head and the contractor could be liable. Staff supports the concept of ensuring that contractors and other recipients of \u201cpublic benefits\u201d are held responsible. If Council approves this concept, staff may propose somewhat different wording to accomplish this purpose.", "This proposed expansion in liability is apparently linked to the proposed modification of the relevant time period, contained in Section 2203, which would include the application or proposal period. The proposal is somewhat unclear. Apparently, if, during the application/proposal period, a would-be contractor confers a \u201cpersonal or campaign advantage\u201d upon a public official who will later award the contract, both the contractor and the official could apparently be held liable for an Oaks violation.  However, it\u2019s unclear how this prohibition could be effectuated. Under the City Charter and Municipal Code, the bidding and proposal process are handled exclusively by staff in order to achieve separation from political influence. Professional staff conducts the process and later, after the competitive process is completed, makes recommendations to Council. Thus, a Council member would be unaware of the identity of the bidders/proposers and would not know that she/he could not accept a contribution from one of them.", "Staff assumes that this particular Hueston Hennigan proposal would prohibit what amounts to bribery. However, modifying local law to address that very serious form of corruption is arguably unnecessary. Actions undertaken to influence the future award of public benefits are already prohibited by state laws. See, e.g., Penal Code Section 68. Bribery, which is a felony, is a crime actively enforced by the District Attorney\u2019s Office. Therefore, it is apparently unnecessary to create a local, misdemeanor remedy.   Moreover, doing so appears to fall outside the scope of the Oaks Initiative, which serves the laudable public purpose of prohibiting \u201ckickbacks\u201d as private rewards for past decisions made in officials\u2019 public capacity.", "Thus, staff does not recommend these particular proposed modifications.  Nonetheless, if Council determines that this particular proposal should be included in the package of Oaks Initiative amendments, staff recommends also amending the basic prohibition in Section 2203 (a) to make clear that it reaches both forward and back from official approval so that Article XXII is internally consistent.", "Alternatives", "In addition to the changes proposed by Hueston Hennigan and discussed in this report, others may warrant Council consideration. For example, one of the early concerns about Article XXII is that its penalties attach only to awards, not denials of \u201cpublic benefits. Only \u201cyes\u201d votes by Council members trigger the Oak\u2019s Initiative prohibition, even though some \u201cno\u201d votes may be equally valuable to prospective contributors. For example, a neighbor opposing a proposed project could be inclined to reward a \u201cno\u201d vote with a \u201ckickback.\u201d Thus, Council may wish to consider expanding the prohibition to cover kickbacks for valuable \u201cno\u201d votes. Doing so would address another of the perceived infirmities that motivated the City Council\u2019s decision to challenge the Oaks Initiative in court. On the other hand, determining the \u201cvalue\u201d of a denial could be difficult.", "Council may also wish to consider modifying the thresholds of value set forth in Section", "2202. Likewise, Council might wish to consider shortening the duration of the prohibition on accepting a personal or campaign advantage because the prohibition operates to restrict the constitutional rights to participate in the political process through contributions and to work. Given that these are protected rights, duration of up to six years may be excessive. (This was also one of the legal claims made in the litigation challenging the measure.)", "Finally, if Council is concerned about risks relating to City employees accepting work from City contractors, staff again suggests that modifications to the Municipal Code might be advisable to supplement the protections afforded by the Oaks Initiative. It limits the conduct of those who award \u201cpublic benefits\u201d such as contracts, but it does not apply to City employees charged with the responsibility for managing or monitoring contracts. Council may wish to consider expanding the City\u2019s \u201crevolving door\u201d ordinance to, for example, safeguard against those employees being offered jobs by the contractors they monitor.", "Next Steps", "Once Council gives direction, staff will prepare final language for proposed amendments to Article XXII and will bring that language to Council in time for its placement on the November ballot.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no direct financial impacts resulting from formulating a measure for the November ballot. The costs of placing another measure on the ballot are minimal."]}], [{"Title": "Adoption of the Second Year of the Fiscal Year (FY) 2015-17 Biennial Budget, Adoption of the First Year and Approval of the Second Year of the FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget and Approval of FY 2015-16 Year-End Budget Changes", "Department": "Finance Department, Budget Division", "Sponsors": "Director Donna Peter, Director Martin Pastucha", "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council, Housing Authority, Parking Authority and Successor Agency to the Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency:1. Adopt a Resolution of the City Council of the City of Santa Monica adopting the second year of the Fiscal Year 2015-17 Biennial Budget and adopting the first year and approving the second year of the Fiscal Year 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget at Attachment A, as amended by Attachment D;2. Adopt a Resolution of the Housing Authority of the City of Santa Monica adopting the second year of the Fiscal Year 2015-17 Biennial Budget and adopting the first year and approving the second year of the Fiscal Year 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget at Attachment B, as amended by Attachment D;3. Adopt a Resolution of the Parking Authority of the City of Santa Monica adopting the second year of the Fiscal Year 2015-17 Biennial Budget and adopting the first year and approving the second year of the Fiscal Year 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget at Attachment C, as amended by Attachment D; and4. Approve certain changes to the FY 2015-16 Revised Budget, as listed in Attachment E. Staff also recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt a Resolution of the City Council of the City of Santa Monica revising portions of the City\u2019s schedule of various permit and user fees and charges in the Planning and Community Development, Public Works, Fire, Finance, and Community and Cultural Services Departments and in the Santa Monica Public Library, and establishing certain permit and user fees and charges in the Fire and Community and Cultural Services Departments and the City Manager\u2019s Office (Attachment F);2. Adopt a Resolution of the City Council of the City of Santa Monica setting forth the administrative citation schedule of fines for certain violations of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, setting civil penalties for parking violations and for the late payment of penalties, setting fines for Police and Fire Department responses to excessive false fire alarms, and setting fines for the Santa Monica Public Library (Attachment H);3. Adopt a Resolution of the City Council of the City of Santa Monica establishing rental and membership rates for the Breeze Bike Share System (Attachment I);4. Adopt a Resolution of the City of Santa Monica establishing new classifications and adopting salary rates for various listed positions (Attachment J) and approve the position and classification changes (Attachment K);5. Adopt a Resolution of the City of Santa Monica establishing the Gann appropriations limit for FY 2016-17 (Attachment L);6. Direct staff to set aside all funds received from repayment of former Redevelopment Agency loans for affordable housing;7. Approve the Proposed FY 2016-17 Human Services Grants Program (HSGP), incorporating the proposed funding levels (Attachment M);8. Approve the Proposed FY 2016-17 Organizational Support Program (OSP) Grants for Arts and Culture Nonprofits, incorporating the proposed funding levels (Attachment N);9. Accept Federal Supportive Housing Program (SHP) Renewal Grant funds from the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) in the amount of $446,822 for the Serial Inebriate Program; and10. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for and accept three grants totaling $3,610,000 from the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) Active Transportation Program, including the commitment to expend $902,500 for local match obligations and $937,500 for associated project components ineligible for grant funding, and to include such grant funds and local match obligations in the City\u2019s future fiscal year budgets if awarded.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report presents information and requests actions necessary to adopt the FY2016\u201117 proposed operating and capital budget, and to approve the second year of the biennial capital budget for the City of Santa Monica, the Santa Monica Housing Authority and the Santa Monica Parking Authority. The Proposed Budget has been changed from what was presented to the Council at the Budget Study Session on May24, 2016 (Attachment P) to include input from Council and the community on construction funding for the Civic Center sports field, as well as adjustments based on new information.", "Fiscal Year 2016-17 is the second year of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget, adopted by City Council on June 23, 2015 (Attachment Q). It is also the first year of the FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program (CIP) Budget (Attachment O). Operating budget changes, as well as an assignment of reserve funds for the Civic Center sports field construction, are detailed in Attachment D. The FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget as revised, including operating and capital budgets, is $621.9 million. The CIP budget plan is $121.7 million in FY 2017-18.", "The report also includes updated fee and fine schedules that include cost of living adjustments, minor corrections and realignment with state laws, and changes to include new rates for CityTV and the waiver of application fees for Landmark Designation and Structure of Merit for Landmarks Commissioners and nonprofits.", "In this report, staff recommends continued funding to most Human Services Grants Program and Organizational Support Program grantee organizations at the FY 2015-16 funding levels, plus a 2% cost of living adjustment, and the acceptance of federal Supportive Housing Program renewal grant funds and California Department of Transportation Active Transportation Program grant funds.", "Finally, staff proposes to set aside all funds from repayment of former Redevelopment Agency loans for affordable housing, and to appropriate any such funds received to date for this purpose.", "Background", "On June 23, 2015, Council adopted the first year and approved the second year of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget, and adopted the second year of the FY2014-16 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget. On October 27, 2015 (Attachment R) and January 26, 2016 (Attachment S), Council approved revisions to the FY 2015-16 Adopted Budget that adjusted revenues and expenditure budgets, including modifying staffing levels and classifications. In January, staff also presented Council with an update to the City\u2019s five-year financial forecast.", "During the May 24, 2016 budget study session, staff presented Proposed FY 2016-17 Budget changes, the FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget, and the May 2016 Financial Status Update for the General Fund. During the study session, Councilmembers directed staff to consider incorporating various proposals into the proposed operating and capital budgets for the budget adoption public hearing on June14, 2016.", "Discussion", "The proposed fiscal year 2016-17 budget is balanced and begins the shift of resources towards the City\u2019s strategic goals and the elements that will lay the groundwork for a new operating and strategic framework for the City. This framework (based on the dimensions of the Wellbeing Index and long-standing principles of sustainability, and reflective of the Council\u2019s five strategic goals) will act as the foundation for the City\u2019s FY2017-19 Biennial Budget. Changes to the Proposed FY2016-17 Budget have been revised from the document presented to the public on May 24, 2016 to reflect final changes based on Council feedback and new information received. The FY2016-17 Proposed Budget as revised is $621.9 million. A more detailed discussion of these changes is included below. The FY 2017-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget Plan is $121.7 million.", "Proposed Budget Revisions", "Modifications to the Proposed Budget, known as final changes, shown in Attachment D are based on Council direction, new information and identified omissions. Revenue changes reflect a decrease of $0.8 million due to a partial suspension of water rate increase from 9% to 5%. Expenditure changes reflect an increase of $0.2 million for the addition of a 1.0 FTE Chief Performance Officer in the City Manager\u2019s Office.", "Updates to Proposed Biennial Capital Improvement Program Budget", "On May 24, 2016, Council directed staff to earmark or assign funds for the construction of the Civic Center Sports field and to provide regular updates to Council on the status of the project to ensure that it moves forward as quickly as possible. The FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget includes $200,000 for project design in the FY 2016-17 budget, and the five-year capital plan includes $3.25 million for construction in FY 2018-19. Reserve funds will be assigned for the construction portion of the project, as shown in Attachment D, and funding will be available as soon as construction can proceed.", "Construction is currently estimated to begin in summer 2018 and take roughly one year to complete. Regulatory approval from the Coastal Commission, parking analysis to address loss of parking from the field, and potential environmental remediation are factors that could impact the estimated timeline. Design work and an associated parking utilization study will begin in the fall of 2016. The City Manager will provide regular updates to Council on the status of the project, and staff will work to complete the high priority project in the most expeditious manner possible.", "There are no other changes to the FY 2016-18 Biennial CIP budget or the FY 2016-21 five-year capital plan that Council reviewed on May 24, 2016.", "Updates to Proposed Operating Expenditures and Staffing Adjustments \u2013 General Fund", "Since the May 24, 2016 report, staff has made the following strategic changes:", "\u00b7 To lead the City\u2019s efforts in measuring, managing and improving performance, staff is requesting a 1.0 FTE Chief Performance Officer and the appropriation of $500,000 originally earmarked for the Airport jumpstart project, as well as $182,000 earmarked for jumpstart contingency to resources that support the development of performance metrics.", "Updates to Proposed Revenue Adjustments \u2013 Other Funds", "Since the May 24, 2016 report, staff has made the following revenue adjustments:", "\u00b7 Water Fund \u2013 decrease of $0.8 million to reflect partial suspension of water rate increase from 9% to 5%; and", "\u00b7 Community Broadband Fund \u2013 increase of $0.02 million to reflect the Digital Inclusion Broadband Pilot rate revenue.", "With the adjustments above, the proposed FY 2016-17 revenue budget is $578.6 million (net of reimbursements and transfers), a $21 million (3.8%) increase over the FY2016\u201117 budget plan. The change reflects increases in General Fund revenues from greater parking revenues, settlement from agreement payments, and increased tax revenues. Non-General Fund revenue changes reflect increased lease revenues from the Airport Fund and the Pier Fund; increased development agreement contributions and Energy Efficient Rebates from efficiency projects; and a correction to Wastewater Fund revenues to reflect a lesser impact of water conservation on sewer service changes. These changes were discussed at length in the May 24, 2016 report.", "The proposed expenditure budget is $621.9 million, a $7.8 million or 1.3% increase over the FY 2016-17 budget plan, primarily due to additional communications personnel, operating changes and capital projects that advance Council\u2019s five Strategic Goals, partially offset by the delay of Fire Station 1 construction. The budget remains balanced when these adjustments are incorporated.", "Council Discretionary Funds", "Each year, Council allocates discretionary funds to assist the community in special projects or support important but otherwise unfunded priorities.", "Traditionally, Council has supported community partners like the Business Improvement Districts, Santa Monica traditions like the Fourth of July Parade, one-time programs, and community students through science or music grants allowing Santa Monica youth to participate in special events. Allocation of the funds may occur along with Budget Adoption or throughout the year.", "Including unprogrammed FY 2015-16 discretionary funds and FY 2016-17 discretionary funds, the Council has access to $492,331 in discretionary funds in FY 2016-17.", "Fees/Fines/Rates", "Per previous Council actions, most City user fees will increase by 4.5% on July1,2016, reflecting the projected FY 2016-17 increase in total City compensation, which includes salary, healthcare, retirement, and workers\u2019 compensation costs. In addition to the 4.5% increase to fees, some minor changes are proposed to other portions of the City\u2019s master fee and master fine schedules as well as some revisions to the Breeze bike share program fees. City TV fees and rates are being incorporated into the City\u2019s master fee schedule. Attachment G provides the master fee list incorporating all changes effective July 1, 2016.", "The changes proposed in addition to the 4.5% increase are discussed in further detail below. Any revenue impact from all changes is included in the proposed FY 2016-17 Budget.", "Office of Communications/CityTV:", "\u00b7 Rates charged by City TV to other organizations for the production and airing of programming have been traditionally done on a case by case basis through Memorandums of Understanding or similar agreements. In an effort to standardize such rates, staff is proposing that a comprehensive rate schedule be included in the City\u2019s master fee resolution. This will provide a more effective process for working with other organizations for production and airing of content pertinent to the residents of Santa Monica. Additionally, this rate schedule will address internal productions and provide a consistent approach across departments for reimbursement of CityTV costs.", "Finance:", "\u00b7 Performance permit fees, which were originally authorized by Resolution No. 9207 (CCS), are now being incorporated into the master fee resolution. The fees will remain unchanged at $37/per year.", "Fire:", "\u00b7 An additional fee level for individual suites or units of 0 to 500 square feet in the amount of $33.15 is proposed to more accurately reflect total inspection time spent on these smaller units. The proposed fee will result in a reduced fee for suites or units of this size.", "\u00b7 The Fire Department is recommending changes to certain administrative fines to match changes made to the California Fire Code.", "Planning and Community Development:", "\u00b7 The fee descriptions for the Employee Annual Transportation Fees have been updated to reflect Ordinance No. 2486 (CCS) adopted June 23, 2015.", "\u00b7 Language regarding fee waivers for (1) Inspection of Small or Large Family Day Care for State Social Services Licenses; (2) Installation of electrical service for electric vehicle chargers, solar voltaic and solar; and (3) Landmarks and Historic Districts \u2013 all permit and plan check fees that was inadvertently removed from the prior master fee resolution is being added to the proposed resolution.", "\u00b7 On August 25, 2015, in order to encourage participation in the City\u2019s historic preservation program, the City Council adopted Resolution Number 10909 (CCS), reducing fees for Historic District Designation, Landmark Designation, and Structure of Merit. The fees established by Resolution 10909 are being incorporated into the City\u2019s comprehensive fee schedule. In addition, to encourage participation in the City\u2019s historic preservation program further, a waiver of application fees for Landmark Designation and Structure of Merit for Landmarks Commissioners and nonprofit organizations has been added to the comprehensive fee schedule.", "\u00b7 Breeze Bikeshare Program - After monitoring the first six months of bike share operations, staff recommends adjusting the existing fee structure in order to: move towards regional integration bike share goals, incentivize monthly and annual membership subscriptions, respond to user comments and needs, expand options for students and low-income users, and encourage new riders by providing corporate employee benefit and low-income rates. Staff recommends adjusting the existing structure to: combine all monthly and annual plans into to two rates; increase the Pay-As-You-Go rate to match the rate plans of other Westside cities; and extend the plan to any student with an .edu email verification, and adjust rates to better align with students\u2019 monthly budgets and schedules. In the first six months, the bike share system has raised enough user and sponsorship revenue to be cost-neutral on the General Fund, but is not yet generating significant overages.", "Community and Cultural Services:", "\u00b7 Staff is proposing a restructuring of certain CREST Childcare fees based on feedback from parents and school officials. Recommendations include replacing current Childcare options with the CREST Club bundle ($300/month), which consists of program blocks that allow for program and staffing flexibility; adding a discounted AM Care rate for CREST Club registrants, continuing Late Start AM Care at three schools ($126.00/year); and the addition of PM Extended Care ($30/week).", "\u00b7 Staff is proposing that the current process of entering into annual license agreements for the Community Gardens rentals be changed to an annual permit which provides a shorter approval process for the requests for both the customer and City staff. This change is operational only and does not affect the annual fee.", "\u00b7 Staff is proposing to correct an oversight by adding reduced fees for seniors using the Memorial Park fitness room. The senior fees would be 50% of the adult fees, which is consistent with fees for the use of the Memorial Park Gym.", "\u00b7 In response to the public request for longer rental periods, staff is proposing a change to the structure of the fee for Beach House Canopy Rentals from the current $30.00 for three hours to $40.00 for four hours.", "\u00b7 Minor language corrections to Beach House fees are included on the proposed master fee resolution.", "Public Works:", "Staff proposes to reduce the fee for Newsrack Permit: Annual Renewal from $91.70 to $46.00. The reduction will encourage the continued existence of print media within the City, which is a vital means of disseminating information to the public, and will also align the City\u2019s fee more closely with the fees of neighboring cities.", "Airport:", "\u00b7 Changes to footnotes clarifying that monthly rates for tie-downs and the annual charge for Light Aircraft Covers and 22T hangars are not subject to annual cost of living adjustments (COLA),but may increase annually based on lease agreements and/or periodic appraisals. Fuel flowage fees are also periodically based on appraisals rather than subject to annual COLA increases.", "Resource Recovery and Recycling:", "\u00b7 The fee for Bulky Items Collection is being removed from the master fee resolution as these charges are now included in Solid Waste bi-monthly rates.", "Library:", "\u00b7 Administrative action to remove non-resident library cards from the master fee resolution. The fee is no longer charged per previous Council action.", "\u00b7 In June 2014, the Library Board approved rates for meeting and facilities use. Certain meeting room charges are being incorporated to correct inadvertent omissions from the previous master fee resolution.", "Personnel Changes", "As part of the budget process, proposed employee classification and compensation changes are reviewed by the Human Resources Department and the City Manager\u2019s Office. The resulting classification and salary changes and position list are presented in Attachments J and K.", "Budget Resolutions", "Adopting the resolutions in Attachments A-C would:", "1. Adopt the FY 2016-17 budget revenues at the account level, with operating expenditure appropriations for the Salaries and Wages and Supplies and Expenses (including Capital Outlay) major expenditure categories within a fund for each department, and capital improvement program budget within a fund;", "2. Authorize staff to roll over appropriations for multi-year operating grants not completed at the end of the fiscal year, unspent donations dedicated to programs, and the encumbrances for goods and services contracted for by FY2015-16 year-end but not delivered or provided until FY 2016-17.", "3. Authorize staff to roll over appropriations for the General Fund and all other Non-General Fund unencumbered balances and unexpended encumbrances for the FY 2015-16 capital improvements program budget.", "Gann Appropriations Limit", "State law places limits on the amount of Santa Monica\u2019s General Fund appropriations that can be made without voter approval based on a growth factor calculated on changes in either City or County population growth and either State per capita personal income growth or the growth in non-residential assessed valuation. This restriction was placed in effect in November 1979 with the approval of Proposition 4, commonly known as the (Paul) Gann Initiative. The City\u2019s Gann Appropriations Limit, based on growth in non-residential assessed valuation times the annual percentage population change for the City in FY 2016-17 is $1,910,159,058.", "A comparison of the City\u2019s FY 2016-17 Gann Appropriations Limit as set forth in the City\u2019s Proposed FY 2016-17 Budget follows:", "Proposed Gann Limit-related Spending for FY 2016-17", "Gann Limit", "$1,910,159,058", "Appropriations Subject to Limitation", "231,701,481", "Net (Over) Under", "$1,678,457,577", "FY 2016-17 appropriations subject to limitation are $1,678,457,577 less than the City\u2019s Gann Appropriations Limit. A resolution to establish the City\u2019s FY 2016-17 Gann Appropriations Limit is included in Attachment L.", "Goals and Objectives", "During the FY 2016-17 exception-based budget process, departments reviewed goals and objectives with the City Manager, and made minor changes to reflect updated timelines and programs. These revised goals and objectives will be incorporated in the FY 2016-17 Adopted Budget online documents and in department workplans, which are tracked quarterly.", "Human Services Grants Program (HSGP) and Organizational Support Program (OSP) for Santa Monica\u2019s Arts and Culture Non-Profits", "The FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget includes funds to most grantee organizations at the FY2015\u201116 funding levels, plus a 2% cost of living adjustment. The only exceptions include agencies previously receiving funding for the Supportive Housing Program (SHP) Coordinated Case Management project, for which the Los Angeles Homeless Services Authority has discontinued funding for FY 2016-17, and the Virginia Avenue Project, which ceased operations. Attachments M and N list the individual grantee agreements approved for funding through the FY 2015-19 Human Services Grants Program and Cultural Arts Organizational Support Program (OSP) and the grant amounts for the FY 2016-17 Budget.", "Acceptance of Federal and State Grants", "Federal Supportive Housing Program (SHP) Renewal Grant", "On March 21, 2005, the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) announced a $10 million funding initiative for housing for people who are homeless and addicted to alcohol. Staff is requesting authorization to accept Serial Inebriate grant funds from HUD in the amount of $446,822 for a one year renewal (for the eleventh year of the grant).", "California Department of Transportation Active Transportation Program Grant", "Staff seeks funding for capital and programmatic projects that advance the implementation of the Land Use and Circulation Element to enhance the character of Santa Monica and expand mobility options. In 2013 the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) created the Active Transportation Program (ATP) which consolidated existing federal and state transportation programs, including Transportation Alternative Program (TAP), Bicycle Transportation Account (BTA), and State Safe Routes to School (SR2S), into a single program. Annually, Caltrans provides public agencies the opportunity to apply for funding for active transportation projects. The three grant applications, which are for the proposed funding year of FY2019-20, total $3,610,000. If awarded, they would require $902,500 for local match obligations and $937,500 for associated project components ineligible for grant funding, to be funded by Transportation Impact Fees (TIF) and Prop C Local Return revenues.", "The proposed projects advance Council\u2019s Strategic Goal to create a new model for mobility, and support wellbeing with a focus on active living for all ages. Local match sources, amounts, and cash flows were reviewed to ensure that local matching funds would be both eligible and available in the event of award; all local matches can be supported without any impact to the General Fund.", "17th/SMC Station & Regional Path Mobility Hub & Learning Campus", "The proposed Mobility Hub & Learning Campus features a bike center building (approximately 4,700 SF) that incorporates bike storage, an attendant office, bike repair, a service shop, lockers, ADA accessible bathrooms with shower, a bicycle training classroom, and storage/utility space. The project would be built on Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority\u2019s existing Right of Way (lease terms to be determined). The project total is $3,750,000 [grant funds: $2,250,000; local match: $562,500 (Transportation Impact Fees), plus an estimated $937,500 for ineligible grant activities which is also planned to be funded by Transportation Impact Fees].", "Pico Blvd and Santa Monica College Pedestrian Safety Improvements", "The project would include pedestrian crossing improvements at five intersections along Pico Boulevard between 17th Street and Cloverfield Boulevard that would increase pedestrian comfort and safety along the densely populated mixed-use corridor. This project was identified in the Pedestrian Action Plan in the 5-year implementation project list and is located in a High Priority Investment Area, to improve health and income disparities. The project total is $1,200,000 [grant funds: $960,000; local match: $240,000 (Transportation Impact Fees)].", "Safe Routes for Seniors", "The project would pilot the development of a Safe Routes for Seniors program that encourages seniors to walk (and bike for those able) as a means to improve health, mobility and social interaction. It would develop tools and services to help seniors find ways to meet their transportation needs through trips that include walking to bus or light rail or walking alone; programs will include group walks geared towards seniors to encourage developing social networks while fostering health and independent living. The project total is $500,000 [grant funds: $400,000; local match: $100,000 (Prop C Local Return)].", "FY 2015-16 and FY 2016-17 Budget Changes \u2013 Affordable Housing", "During its August 2015 study session, Council identified \u201cmaintaining an inclusive and diverse community\u201d as one of the City\u2019s top strategic goals, including the need to identify potential new funding sources for affordable housing. The Housing Commission\u2019s December 2015 report on affordable housing recommended that the City spend approximately $15 million per year on affordable housing preservation and production, as was done prior to the dissolution of redevelopment. The report further recommended that the City dedicate approximately $7.5 million of existing moneys per year toward affordable housing, with a new General Fund revenue source funding the remaining $7.5 million.", "The January 12, 2016 staff report on affordable housing financing summarized the Housing Commission\u2019s recommendations. The report also identified the repayment of City loans made to the former Redevelopment Agency (RDA), along with $1.2 million in Redevelopment residual revenues from the General Fund already committed to affordable housing, to approximate an average of $7.5 million annually that could be designated for affordable housing. Based on recent approvals by the California Department of Finance (DOF), staff anticipates that the City will receive an estimated $72.8 million in loan repayments over nine fiscal years, an average of $8 million per year. Following this period, the City will need to make difficult decisions regarding spending priorities in order to continue to effectuate the Housing Commission\u2019s recommendations. The $72.8 million estimate includes $7.9 million already received by the City for FY 2015-16, as well as $4.0 million in DOF-approved loan repayments for FY 2016-17. Staff is requesting the appropriation of these funds in the appropriate budget years as shown in Attachments D and E, and also requesting Council direction to dedicate the remaining loan repayment proceeds to affordable housing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Adoption of the Proposed Budget as amended by Attachment D will formally adopt the second year of the City\u2019s FY 2015-17 biennial budget for City\u2019s programs and services. Adoption of Attachment O will formally adopt the first year of the Fiscal Year 2016-18 Capital Improvement Program Budget. Approval of the changes as detailed in Attachment E will revise the FY 2015-16 budget as shown."]}], [{"Title": "2016 Boards and Commissions Report", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "10. Board and Commission Reports", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and comment on the 2016 Boards & Commissions Video Report and the attached Written Reports comprised of projects that were completed during the 2015 calendar year; and2. Receive and file the 2016 Boards & Commission Report;3. Direct staff to return with recommendations for consideration relative to the format of future Boards and Commissions Reports.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "All Council-appointed boards and commissions are required by resolution to provide the City Council an annual report. Current and past practice has been to present the report in the form of a video at the Annual Boards and Commission Dinner. This year the video report was shortened and presented at the dinner on May 2, 2016. Staff is currently looking at ways to improve this process and provide the report in a creative, efficient and cost effective way. The goal is to continue to highlight the accomplishments and goals of each of the boards and commissions. Staff is seeking feedback from the City Council and public. Additionally, staff will comprehensively review the entire board and commission program seeking opportunities for improvement and effectiveness and will return to Council with recommendations/alternatives in all areas such as training, attendance, appointments, annual reports, etc.", "Background", "Prior to 1999, special joint meetings of the City Council and City Boards and Commissions were scheduled to hear annual reports from each board or commission. It is a requirement for all Council-appointed boards and commissions to give annual reports to the City Council, per Resolution Number 10200 (CCS). The reports were given orally and consisted of projects completed during the previous calendar year. Over time, the annual reports became lengthy and it became logistically difficult to calendar joint meetings.  A more effective and efficient method was needed. For this reason, the Council established the Annual Boards & Commissions Dinner and board/commission reports were presented to Council in video format. The annual video report reduced presentation time to 15-20 minutes, and made the numerous activities and accomplishments easier to understand. The City Council last discussed the format of the annual report at the February 24, 2009 Council meeting; however, no actions to change the format were taken.", "Discussion", "Since 1999, new Council-appointed bodies were created, and temporary task forces and the elected Rent Control Board have been invited to participate in the annual video report and dinner. Although each advisory board\u2019s segment was limited to one minute, the video report has extended to over 30 minutes long. Staff time and expenditures to produce the video has increased due to the reports becoming more complex with multiple filming locations, or special services such as studio time or incorporating outside footage. Ultimately it required more oversight and resources from City Clerk, CityTV staff and staff liaisons.", "In previous years, boards and commissions were responsible for creating their own scripts and concepts and recording sessions took place in various locations throughout the City.  These recording sessions took as much as 1.5 to 2 hours and were scheduled over two to three weeks. To streamline the production process and minimize costs, a new video format following that of the City\u2019s 2014-2015 Annual Report Video and website was produced. Boards and commissions were asked to complete written report forms and a Producer then used that information to write a 30-second script explaining each board/commission\u2019s top accomplishment of 2015. All segments were recorded at CityTV Studio to maintain the same visual format; the work was completed in two days. The run time of this year\u2019s video was condensed to 15 minutes. The supplemental written reports allow boards and commission to provide the City Council and public with more detail on their projects (Attachment A).", "The 2016 Boards and Commissions Video Report was recently presented at the Boards and Commissions Dinner which took place on May 2, 2016. The video report is now available on CityTV\u2019s YouTube Channel where boards and commissions can link to it from their respective websites. Staff welcomes feedback from the City Council, board or commission members and the public on the format of the Boards and Commissions annual reports. Staff will continue to evaluate this process, incorporating feedback while balancing effectiveness, cost and efficiencies and return to Council with options.", "The City Clerk\u2019s Office will return to Council in July with recommendations for the attendance policy for boards and commissions. The research thus far has also caused staff to look at other areas of the program such as training, consistency, applications and annual report with a goal of improving and streamlining internal processes. Staff will return to Council with recommendations in these areas at a later date.", "The following are the Boards, Commissions and other bodies that participated in the 2016 annual video report:", "Boards & Commissions", "Airport Commission", "Architectural Review Board", "Arts Commission", "Building & Fire-Life Safety Commission", "Commission for the Senior Community", "Commissions on the Status of Women", "Disabilities Commission", "Housing Commission", "Landmarks Commission", "Personnel Board", "Planning Commission", "Santa Monica Library Board", "Social Services Commission", "Special City Boards and Bodies", "Downtown Santa Monica, Incorporated", "Santa Monica Pier Corporation", "Santa Monica Travel & Tourism (formerly the Convention & Visitors Bureau)", "District Boards", "Los Angeles County West Vector Control District", "Metropolitan Water District", "Task Forces and Committees", "Task Force on the Environment", "Urban Forest Task Force", "Clean Beaches & Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee", "Elected Board", "Rent Control Board", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2016.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Commission on the Status of Women for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Recommendation to accept Lynn Robb's resignation from the Architectural Review Board and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tempore Winterer and Councilmembers Davis and Himmelrich that the Council allocate $10,000 to the Church in Ocean Park, a 501(c)3, to continue the work of the Girl Central program of the Santa Monica YWCA which is closing its doors June 30th. Starting July 1st the Church will create a new program called Youth Creating Change which will serve the same young women and girls who participated in the YWCA's program. The $10,000 will allow the Church to hire one of the YWCA's staff members for three months to provide continuity; subsequently the Church will seek to raise funds from other sources to continue and expand Youth Creating Change program.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1527208200": [[{"Title": "Proclamation: Perinatal Depression Awareness Month", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "Presentation of 2016 Boards & Commissions Video Report: \"Preserving, Enhancing & Strengthening our Hometown of Santa Monica\" (To be heard with Item 10-A)", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items", "Body": ["To be heard with Item 10-A: 2016 Boards & Commissions Video Report.", "The 2016 Boards & Commissions Video Report can be viewed by clicking on the web link under Attachments, or going to https://youtu.be/rTtOKaf9-wQ."]}], [{"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of Thirty One Compressed Natural Gas Ford F150 Pickup Trucks", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Award Bid #4238 to Fritts Ford, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of 31 Ford F150 Compressed Natural Gas Pickup Trucks;2.  Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Fritts Ford for the purchase and delivery of 31 Ford F150 Compressed Natural Gas Pickup Trucks in an amount not to exceed $1,350,229 with future year funding contingent on Council Budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This purchase would replace 29 existing pickup trucks that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful lives through the Vehicle Replacement Program and would add 2 new pickup trucks to the City\u2019s fleet. Vehicles are utilized in Code Enforcement, Engineering, Facilities Maintenance, Fire Department, Fleet Management, Park Maintenance, Urban Forest, Police Department Animal Control, Resource Recovery and Recycling, Street Maintenance, and Traffic Signals.  In April 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of 28 Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Ford F150 Pickup Trucks, or equal, with the option to purchase up to four additional vehicles at the same price, terms and conditions. After reviewing the sole bid and all \u201cNo Bids\u201d received, staff recommends Fritts Ford as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of 31 CNG Ford F150 Pickup Trucks in the amount of $1,350,229. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing vehicles powered by CNG fuel.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The existing vehicles have a cost-effective useful life span of ten years. The current vehicles were purchased between 1997 and 2006 and are between ten and 19 years old.", "If this purchase is not approved, the current monthly rental rate for a pickup truck from Enterprise Rent-A-Car is $878 per month. Enterprise Rent-A-Car was awarded the bid for rentals in January 2016. Rental costs are significantly more expensive than the average cost of $138 per month to maintain the vehicle in-house and the average cost of $362 in monthly depreciation. In addition, rental vehicles use unleaded gas and not alternative fuel.", "\u201cAdditional Purchases\u201d language was included in the bid to ensure an expedited replacement process and purchase of identical vehicles approved for replacement during the procurement process or after the bid closed without the need for a second bid process for a like vehicle. Staff anticipated the approval to replace four additional equivalent vehicles during this process and included \u201cAdditional Purchases\u201d language for up to four vehicles at the same price, terms, and conditions.", "The 29 pickup trucks that would be replaced by this purchase are utilized in the following divisions:", "Fleet Management (1 Vehicle)", "Responsible for ensuring that City vehicles and other automotive-related equipment are available, dependable, and safe to operate.", "Engineering (2 Vehicles)", "Responsible for providing various services related to the enhancement of public infrastructure and management of the public right-of-way throughout the City.", "Facilities Maintenance (5 Vehicles)", "Responsible for upkeep and maintenance of City buildings and properties, including the carpentry, electrical, heating-ventilation-and-air-conditioning (HVAC), paint and plumbing, as well as construction/remodeling projects.", "Park Maintenance (12 Vehicles)", "Responsible for maintaining and improving the City\u2019s parks and landscapes, including tennis and basketball courts, athletic fields, and park amenities.", "Urban Forest (1 Vehicle)", "Responsible for managing over 33,000 trees in Santa Monica\u2019s urban forest.", "Police Department \u2013 Animal Control Unit (1 Vehicle)", "Responsible for enforcement of local and regional laws concerning the care and treatment of animals.", "Fire Department (1 Vehicle)", "Responsible for responding to and effectively mitigating fire, medical accident, and hazardous materials-related emergencies.", "Resource Recovery and Recycling (2 Vehicles)", "Responsible for residential and commercial refuse collection, street sweeping, and recycling.", "Street Maintenance (3 Vehicles)", "Responsible for maintenance and upkeep of all streets, alleys, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, City-owned parking lots, and State highways located within the City. One of the four vehicles will add one new vehicle to the City\u2019s fleet for a new Street Maintenance Crew Leader position that was created but never received a vehicle.", "Traffic Signals (1 Vehicle)", "Responsible for installing, maintaining, and operating all City-owned Traffic signals and associated equipment within the City of Santa Monica. This includes: Traffic signals; pedestrian push buttons; pedestrian walk / don't walk indicators; vehicle indications; emergency preemption devices; vehicle and bicycle detection devices; lighted crosswalks; flashing beacons; vehicle speed feedback signs, and fiber optic networks.", "The 2 pickup trucks that would be added by this purchase will be utilized in the following divisions:", "Code Enforcement (1 Vehicle)", "Responsible for enforcing City ordinances and State laws regulating construction activity and the maintenance of buildings and property. This vehicle will add one new vehicle to the City\u2019s fleet for conducting code enforcement duties along the beach including hauling abandoned vendor supplies off of the beach.", "Street Maintenance (1 vehicle)", "This vehicle would be assigned to a new Street Maintenance Crew Leader position that was created but never received a vehicle.", "Example of a CNG Ford F150 Pickup Truck", "Vendor Selection", "In April 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 28 CNG Ford F150 CNG Pickup Trucks, or equal, with the option to purchase up to four additional vehicles at the same price, terms, and conditions, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 18 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016, per Attachment A. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; four \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms were received. All vendors that submitted \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms stated they could not furnish goods or services as specified.", "In addition to the supplemental outreach, Purchasing staff contacted Ford to find out if it sells these vehicles directly to customers. Ford reported that it does not do direct sales of these vehicles and that a limited number of dealerships are authorized to sell CNG.", "The City purchases alternative fuel vehicles to meet the City\u2019s Sustainable Fleet requirements. Alternative fuel vehicles operate on fuels other than gasoline or diesel in order to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and pollution. These vehicles exceed the basic standards all new vehicles must meet to be sold in California and include low emission vehicles (LEVs) and zero emission vehicles (ZEVs). As a result, the majority of the trucks the City purchases cannot be simply purchased off the lot or from a regular dealer. Instead, an unleaded fueled vehicle on the lot must have its engine and fuel components removed and replaced with a CNG system which can be an expensive and not always effective option. The City prefers to purchase vehicles that are prebuilt for CNG application, however, only one brand offered this option that was California Air Resources Board (CARB) certified for the specific model year. The City has made a commitment to procurement decisions that minimize negative environmental impacts, resulting in a limited number of vendors being able to meet the City\u2019s specifications and environmentally preferable products.", "Ford is only able to produce a certain number of CNG Ford F150 vehicles per model year. Ford allocates the vehicles based on when orders are received. The deadline for placing orders for a CNG Ford F150 is July 1, 2016. If the City does not get the order in as soon as possible, it runs the risk of not being able to obtain vehicles until the 2017 model year that begins production in December 2016. Also, the 2017 model might not be available in CNG, which was the case with the 2015 model. This would push the procurement process to December of 2017 or result in the City having to purchase other CNG truck alternatives such as the F250 at a higher cost. Another alternative would be to rent pickup trucks. All rental vehicles use unleaded gas and therefore do not contribute to the sustainable fleet policy and cost approximately $878 per month. This is more expensive than the average cost of $138 per month to maintain the vehicle and the average cost of $362 in monthly depreciation.", "The bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, Fritts Ford is recommended as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of 31 Ford F150 CNG Pickup Trucks in the amount of $1,350,229.", "#0", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Fritts Ford is for an amount not to exceed $1,350,229. Funds of $1,297,121 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget. Funds of $53,108 will be included in the proposed FY 2016-17 Capital Improvement Program Budget for Council approval. The purchase order will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "C540167.589100", "Vehicle Enhancement Purchase", "$93,782", "C540167.589200", "Vehicle Replacement Purchase", "$1,256,447", "Total", "$1,350,229"]}, {"Title": "Agreement for Purchase, Installation and Configuration Services of Storage Array System", "Department": "Information Services Department, Infrastructure and Cloud Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 72 to Nth Generation, a California-based company, for the purchase of hardware and services related to the installation, configuration and three years of maintenance of an electronic data Storage Area Network solution, to replace the City\u2019s aging Dell/Compellent data storage system; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with Nth Generation in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (includes a 10% contingency) over a three-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City currently uses a centralized data storage solution, Dell/Compellent Storage Area Network (SAN) systems, to host the City\u2019s business software applications and to house the application\u2019s electronic data, including video storage on its Primary and Disaster Recovery (DR) Data Center facilities. The SAN system for the City\u2019s Primary Data Center is housed in City Hall and hosts approximately 350 servers that support more than 350 software applications, used by the public and City departments, which are necessary for City business operations. Software applications and data that are mission critical are replicated from the Primary SAN to a secondary SAN system located in Las Vegas, for DR and business continuity purposes.", "A replacement of the current SAN environment is required to address the City\u2019s storage growth needs, increased performance requirements for current and future applications, to introduce next generation storage technology to the City\u2019s IT infrastructure, and to reduce maintenance costs associated with the current system\u2019s aging hardware. Staff recommends executing a contractual services agreement with Nth Generation for the purchase of hardware and services related to the installation, configuration and three year maintenance of the new SAN system at a total cost not to exceed $500,000, including 10% contingency.", "Background", "In 2003, the City implemented a centralized storage solution by deploying a Hewlett-Packard EVA3000 SAN system at the City Hall Data Center for accommodating the rapidly increasing data volumes generated by the City\u2019s technology infrastructure. In 2010, the City replaced the Hewlett-Packard solution due to the high maintenance costs associated with its aging hardware and its eventual end-of-life support by Hewlett-Packard. The system was replaced with a Dell/Compellent SAN, a cost effective next generation solution that included features such as automated tiering, the ability to dynamically move information between different disk types for more efficient storage of information; superior performance; thin provisioning, a method of optimizing the efficiency with which the available disk storage space is utilized in storage area networks; snapshot technology for rolling back any unwanted changes and prevent data loss; and, ease of data replication between two sites for business continuity, which is an important feature to execute the City\u2019s Disaster Recovery plan. The Dell solution was evaluated against other leading storage solutions at the time and selected based on its advanced technological features, price, and, ease of administration and implementation. Since its deployment, various upgrades have been implemented on the Dell solution, including added storage and replacement of fast solid-state drives to increase performance. The City also implemented a second Dell/Compellent SAN system in a Colocation Data Center facility in Las Vegas, as part of developing its Disaster Recovery (DR) strategy for its mission critical application servers and business data.", "Currently, the primary SAN located in the City Hall Data Center is at 88% storage capacity. The hardware has a watermark of 90%, at which point additional drives will need to be added to the system. At the DR location, the SAN is at 89% capacity, prohibiting replication of new systems due to lack of storage space. In order to address these storage needs, on February 26, 2016, the City released a Request for Proposals (RFP) to replace the Dell/Compellent SAN with a new industry standard and next generation storage system to achieve a significant improvement in hardware, storage, performance and reliability.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s current SAN system is now past the industry-standard five year replacement cycle for storage solutions. Hard drive failures are now on-going, resulting in a gradually unreliable storage system, which will be encumbered with an extended hardware support beyond the initial five years. The total SAN storage capacity is reaching its limit in both the Primary and Disaster Recovery sites and cannot accommodate for the large amounts of data expected to be produced by current and future applications. The lack of storage space in the Disaster Recovery site will prohibit replication of new systems such as the Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) servers. Low storage availability will also restrict utilization of essential features of the SAN system (snapshot technology) for data protection, and protection of information from external threats such as Ransomware and Malware. It is imperative that the system be replaced immediately to ensure the business continuity of City applications.", "City staff and the public use the SAN system for storing, editing and accessing data via City software applications and web services. The data housed in the SAN system are produced by the many City business software applications and supporting databases, including the financial and payroll systems, public safety systems, Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD), records management systems, the City\u2019s automated permitting system, Big Blue Bus and fleet fuel systems, the City\u2019s utility billing and water systems, parking access and revenue control system, and the City\u2019s enterprise software applications, including email, GIS system, web content management, and file and print services. The City\u2019s mission critical servers, their applications and data are replicated daily to the DR Data Center in Las Vegas for availability, in the event of a loss to the City\u2019s Primary Data Center. In all, the SAN storage serves the City\u2019s current 350 server environment supporting more than 65 City business units, out of which 70 servers are designated as mission critical, including the public safety systems, payroll and financial systems, permitting systems, parking system, and file and print services.", "Implementation of a replacement SAN system would ensure the continued functionality, performance, space availability and security of the City\u2019s software applications and digital information. It would also resolve the issues stated above, alleviate the risk of data loss due to hardware failures, provide enhanced performance with faster, more reliable solid-state drive technology, deliver more advanced operational features, and would be equipped to host performance-demanding applications, such as the new ERP Tyler/Munis and transaction-intensive Parking Access and Revenue Control systems. The system replacement would include the purchase of sufficient usable storage capacity for the next three years. The increase in storage would ease storage restrictions on file servers and would accommodate for present needs and projected growth for the next three years, with the assumption that the City would transition some services to the Cloud (hosted services).", "While most of the benefits related to performance may not be immediately apparent for all of the business applications, those that are transaction intensive would benefit the most from the replacement system. Moreover, the City is considering a virtual desktop PC solution which is in-line with the City\u2019s goals around mobility and sustainability, the new Solid-State Drive (SSD) technology included in the replacement system would offer the greatest benefit around this solution. The new SAN solution also provides a platform for hosted services of City business applications and systems under a Private Cloud environment, which is critical to the orderly transition into other future potential alternatives, such as Public Cloud hosting services, or a Hybrid Cloud environment. The City\u2019s efforts to transition to hosted services started a few years ago. These transition efforts will require some time to complete for most of the City\u2019s business applications and will have a major impact to the department operations. Staff is diligently evaluating all City applications to identity those best suitable for transitioning into the Public Cloud. Factors used to determine whether applications should be transitioned to Cloud/hosted services include evaluating the performance of the applications running under a hosted environment, dependencies of the applications on other in-house applications/data, privacy and security of data, and the cost of hosted services. Currently hosted services are cost prohibitive in most cases, although this will likely change in the future.", "At this time, staff recommends executing a contractual services with Nth Generation for the purchase of hardware and services related to the installation, configuration and three year maintenance of a Hewlett-Packard Enterprise (HPE) 3PAR SAN system for both the Primary and Disaster Recovery Data Centers at a total cost not to exceed $500,000, including 10% contingency. Funding for infrastructure replacement has been set aside and is available in the Information Technology Replacement & Services Fund.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On February 26, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for design, configuration and installation services for a replacement Storage Area Network for the City\u2019s Primary and Disaster Recovery Data Center facilities. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,215 vendors were notified, 58 vendors downloaded the RFP and 13 firms responded. Proposals were submitted by the following companies: Scale Datacom, Sysorex, Nth Generation, P1Sidepath, TWE, ePlus (proposed three solutions), VPLS (Proposed two solutions), ViON and SigmaNET. Proposals were evaluated based on the following criteria: Technical Merit/Design of Product, Price, Experience and References, Warranty and Support, Implementation Team, and Project Timeline. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Information Systems Department.", "Staff then interviewed 3 shortlisted firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Nth Generation as the best qualified firm to provide hardware and services related to installation, configuration and three year maintenance of an electronic data Storage Area Network solution. Nth Generation\u2019s proposed solution implements a Hewlett-Packard Enterprise (HPE) 3PAR SAN system for both the Primary and Disaster Recovery Data Centers. The solution is designed to provide high performance and high availability along with specific features that enhance the HPE server environment and integrates seamlessly with the virtualization, backup data protection and disaster recovery technologies already in place in the City. It is based on Solid-State Drive (SSD) technology that delivers a more robust performance and is more reliable than traditional mechanical drives. Nth\u2019s proposal meets the City\u2019s requirement for present and future (3-5 years) storage capacity needs and was priced significantly less than similar SSD only solutions proposed by other bidders and slightly more expensive than other proposed hybrid solutions. The advantage in performance and reliability of SSDs compensates for the HP 3PAR\u2019s price difference as compared to the hybrid models. Maintenance (parts and labor) for the 3PAR, beyond the initial 3 years included in the proposal is in line with the other similar solutions.", "Nth Generation has implemented similar solutions for public and private agencies, including the City of Moreno Valley (CA), the Gemological Institute of America (Carlsbad, CA) and Volcano/Phillips (San Diego, CA). Additionally, Nth has an extended list of clients in various market segments (Enterprise, Health Care, Financial, Media & Entertainment, and Manufacturing) as well as City and County Agencies (San Diego, Los Angeles, Irvine, Orange, and Manhattan Beach).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Nth Generation is for an amount not to exceed $500,000, including 10% contingency. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program in account C55000314.589000."]}, {"Title": "Award Construction Contract for Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) Neighborhood Lighting Project for Enhanced safety, Walking and Community Access", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1.  Award Bid #SP2435 to Elecnor Belco Electric Inc., a California-based company, for the installation of new pedestrian light poles and the replacement of existing high pressure sodium (HPS) street lights luminaires with Light Emitting Diode (LED) street light luminaires;2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Elecnor Belco Electric Inc., in an amount not to exceed $738,364 (including a $67,124 contingency);3.  Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As part of a phased implementation of the Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) plan, the CDBG funded Neighborhood Lighting Project for Enhanced Safety, Walking, and Community Access (Project) consists of the installation of new pedestrian street light poles with Light Emitting Diode (LED) fixtures, and the replacement of existing High Pressure Sodium (HPS) street light luminaires with LED street light luminaires in residential neighborhoods along Michigan Avenue between Lincoln Blvd and 17th Street and along 14th Street between Michigan Avenue and Colorado Avenue. Elecnor Belco Electric Inc., the best and lowest bidder, is recommended for the project at a not to exceed amount of $738,364.", "Background", "On February 11, 2014, Council approved the conceptual design of MANGo and directed staff to pursue a phased implementation of this plan. MANGo will enhance Michigan Avenue and connect streets on the eastern and western ends to realize a multi-modal corridor in the Pico Neighborhood that would provide a safe and comfortable place for neighbors of all ages to walk, bike, recreate, and interact with one another. The recommended concept of MANGo includes pedestrian lighting, landscaping, improved crosswalks, roadway striping, and traffic calming as well as signage and way-finding to identify the corridor and neighborhood destinations, mini-parks, and green walls. MANGo was directed to be implemented in phases as funding becomes available.", "Staff identified Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) funds as an available source of funding to implement this Project. Funds were approved in the City\u2019s FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget.", "Discussion", "The Project would provide 52 new pedestrian street light poles with LED fixtures that encourage walking, biking and transit use especially by residents whose trips do not coincide with daylight. Nighttime safety is a substantial concern and multiple user surveys have named lighting as a key reason that people do not walk more.", "By creating well lit pedestrian routes, especially to the new light rail stations, mobility would be greatly enhanced, particularly for transit dependent households in the area. Additionally, the proposed lighting would ensure that these streets are perceived as safe pedestrian routes to transit and light rail, parks and schools, would encourage active forms of transportation, and would reduce single occupant automobile trips.", "This Project would replace 43 existing HPS Cobra Head street light luminaires with LED street light luminaires. This Project would also install 52 new pedestrian street light poles with LED fixtures, associated conduits, pull boxes and other necessary equipment along Michigan Avenue between Lincoln Blvd and 17th Street and along 14th Street between Michigan Avenue and Colorado Avenue. The height of the pedestrian light poles are normally 14 -16 feet.", "Replacement of existing HPS lighting fixtures with LED lighting would provide an energy efficient system that would reduce the City\u2019s on-going maintenance and operating costs. LED fixtures consume less energy than HPS fixtures potentially reducing energy consumption by 40%. LED luminaires/lamps are expected to have a longer lifetime, thus less frequent maintenance would be necessary.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach during the design development was provided by City staff. City staff from the Planning and Community Development and Public Works Departments attended the November 12, 2015 Pico Neighborhood Association (PNA) Board meeting to share the project details and seek input. In addition, a community meeting was held at Virginia Avenue Park on November 17, 2015 to present the proposed project, respond to questions and to seek input from the public. Notices were mailed to all owners and residents within the surrounding neighborhood 10 days prior to the meeting.", "Construction management and public outreach for this project would be provided by City staff. Construction management would include inspecting the contractor\u2019s work during construction, verifying and documenting field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigating impacts as a result of the construction activities, attending contractor\u2019s safety meetings, attending periodic progress meetings, and maintaining all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work conducted during construction. Public outreach would include notifications distributed to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope of the project, potential impacts and schedule with additional periodic updates.", "Contractor Selection", "On March 9, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for this Project. The Bid documents were posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions and the Federal Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) requirements. 1635 vendors were notified, 33 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Base Bid", "Elecnor Belco Electrical, Inc.", "$ 671,240", "California Professional Engineering, Inc.", "$ 674,550", "Comet Electric", "$ 834,402", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, capability to perform the work, experience on similar projects, availability of material, equipment and qualified staff, understanding of the project requirements, ability to meet the desired time frames, and performance on similar projects. Staff contacted references provided by Elecnor Belco Electric Inc. for similar projects in the cities of Glendale, Newport Beach and Orange, which were completed in 2015, and additional projects for the cities of Los Angeles, Victorville and Irvine, which were completed in 2014. All reference agencies reported that work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractor\u2019s State License Board that Elecnor Belco Electric Inc., license is current, active, and in good standing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Elecnor Belco Electric Inc., is for an amount not to", "exceed $738,364. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C199121.589000."]}, {"Title": "Purchase and Deliver Renewable Natural Gas (RNG) Fuel to Big Blue Bus", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Transit Maintenance", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4228 to Clean Energy Fuels Corporation, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Clean Energy Fuels Corporation for the purchase and delivery of Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas in the amount not to exceed $2,959,499, including a 10% contingency for one year, with four additional 1-year renewal option(s) on the same terms and conditions for a total not to exceed $17,671,997, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Big Blue Bus\u2019 entire fleet of 198 motor coaches is powered by clean burning and Renewable Natural Gas that is harvested and processed locally. The City of Santa Monica is a nationally recognized leader for its sustainability policies and actions. BBB has progressively contributed to the City\u2019s sustainability narrative through its use of alternative fuel and phasing out of diesel-fueled motor coaches. Staff recommends award of Bid #4228 and to negotiate and execute an agreement with Clean Energy Fuels Corporation (Clean Energy) for the purchase and delivery of Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas for a one year period in the amount of $2,959,499 with four additional one-year renewal options, for an amount not to exceed $17,671,997 over a five-year period.", "Background", "BBB currently operates 198 natural gas-powered transit coaches. The fuel used is 100% domestically produced, Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas (RLNG). The fuel is derived from harvested landfill methane. The use of RLNG significantly reduces harmful greenhouse gas emissions and further reduces the City\u2019s emission of harmful pollutants. The measure of emissions reductions involves calculating Low Carbon Fuel Standard credits and greenhouse gas emissions.", "The Low Carbon Fuel Standard (LCFS) promotes the use of greenhouse gas reducing transportation fuels (such as liquid biofuels, renewable natural gas, electricity, and hydrogen) through a fuel-neutral declining carbon intensity standard, which is administered by the California Air Resources Board. Carbon intensity is a measure of the greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions associated with the production, distribution, and consumption steps in the \u201clife cycle\u201d of a transportation fuel. In order to achieve the GHG reductions at the lowest cost and in the most consumer-responsive manner, the LCFS utilizes a market-based credit trading system to allow providers to choose how they reduce emissions while responding to consumer demand.", "The award of Bid #4228 to Clean Energy would enable the continued use of Renewable Bio-Liquid Natural Gas to power transit buses and other City vehicles. It also provides the City a share of the Low Carbon Fuel Standard (LCFS) credits from the producer, Clean Energy, as a fixed discount on a per gallon basis. Clean Energy has provided service since 2011 with exceptional service meeting all city specifications.", "Discussion", "The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) sets the Carbon Intensity (CI) for each fuel type. The CI number is the measurement of energy used to produce, process, deliver and consume fuel and is the measurement of how clean the fuel is for the environment.", "The RLNG that BBB uses to power the current fleet of 198 transit buses has a CI value of 29.71, compared to Ultra-Low Sulfur Diesel CI value of 97.05 or conventional Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) of 66.25. Staff recommends continued use of Renewable Liquid Bio-Natural Gas that is 55.15% cleaner for the environment than conventional CNG that derives from less sustainable methods.", "Renewable Bio-Liquefied Natural Gas is non-fracked methane harvested from organic waste in landfills. The process of harvesting and processing Renewable Methane Gas provides a product that has fewer impurities than conventional natural gas and thus is a cleaner burning fuel source. Historically, this gas has been burned off into the atmosphere. However, with advances in renewable technology, the gas is now harvested through a series of membranes implanted in the ground of landfills. Renewable methane gas is processed through a filtration and refining process and transported via pipeline to end users. As a result of the harvesting and filtration process renewable methane gas has fewer impurities than conventional natural gas and thus is a cleaner burning fuel source. Operating transit buses through this waste-to-energy fuel source, BBB continues to contribute to fulfilling the City\u2019s commitment to protecting the environment by using the cleanest transportation fuel available.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On February 4, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver Renewable Liquid Bio-Natural Gas as required by the BBB Transit Maintenance Division responsible for the fueling of transit buses in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on Planet Bids, the City\u2019s online bidding site, in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City notified 337 vendors, of which, 18 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids from two vendors were received and publicly opened on February 23, 2016 per Attachment A. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, ability to provide a share of LCFS credits, previous experience, ability to deliver RLNG with the lowest greenhouse gas pathway to Santa Monica, ability to deliver RLNG from landfills with the lowest Carbon Intensity, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications.", "Attributes of Clean Energy\u2019s Bid", "\u00b7 Includes, in the price per RLNG gallon, a fixed discount based on a share of LCFS credits.", "\u00b7 Conforms to City specifications.", "\u00b7 Offers the lowest of the fixed-pricing bids in the base year and in the first option year.", "\u00b7 Enables the City to lock in fixed-pricing through the term of the contract which would provide enhanced budgetary planning and cost forecasting.", "\u00b7 Offers RLNG derived from landfills that produce RNG with lower Carbon Intensity.", "\u00b7 Includes use of Clean Energy\u2019s RLNG fuel delivery trucks that would emit 75% less greenhouse gas emissions. Please see the table below:", "RLNG Fuel Delivery Truck Greenhouse Gas Emissions", "Number of RLNG fuel deliveries", "312", "Bidder", "GHG emission per delivery", "GHG emission per year", "Percentage Variance", "Clean Energy", "210", "65,520", "75.81%", "Applied LNG", "868", "270,816", "Variance", "205,296 lbs GHG emissions", "Based on the ability to provide RLNG fuel that meets City specifications, ability to provide a share of LCFS credits, ability to provide the lowest Carbon Intensity fuel and the ability to provide fuel deliveries with the least GHG emitted to atmosphere, Clean Energy\u2019s fixed-price bid is recommended as best bid.", "The bid results as follows (includes an increase in usage due to anticipated service changes):", "Based on the following Usage:", "per week", "85,000", "per year", "4,420,000", "Clean Energy", "Applied LNG", "Base Year", "2,690,454", "2,943,720", "Option Year 1", "2,980,484", "2,987,920", "Option Year 2", "3,315,000", "3,036,540", "Option Year 3", "3,445,390", "3,085,160", "Option Year 4", "3,634,124", "3,138,200", "Total 5-Year", "16,065,452", "15,191,540", "Clean Energy Variable Pricing Bid:", "An alternate bid from Clean Energy, a variable pricing per RLNG gallon model, includes a discount based on monthly market pricing of Low Carbon Fuel Standard (LCFS) credits. The variable-priced bid is based on the monthly market pricing of LFCS credits. Due to market variability of LCFS credits, the monthly market fluctuations will make budgeting and long-term cost forecasting unmeasurable. The Clean Energy variable pricing bid is not recommended.", "Protest", "On March 5, 2016, City staff posted a pending award notification on the City\u2019s online bidding site, putting all bidders on notice that staff\u2019s recommendation to Council would be to award Bid #4228 to Clean Energy. On March 17, 2016, the City\u2019s Purchasing Agent received a timely protest from Applied LNG.", "On March 25, 2016, after review of the protest documentation submitted, and speaking with BBB staff who had conducted the bid review and selection process, the Purchasing Agent denied the protest based on lack of evidence and grounds for protest.", "On March 30, 2016, Applied LNG filed a timely appeal of the Purchasing Agent\u2019s decision to the Finance Director. The appeal made claims almost identical to those set forth in the original protest letter.", "On April 8, 2016, after conducting her own review of the Purchasing Agent\u2019s decision and all the documentation submitted by Applied LNG, the Finance Director upheld the Purchasing Agent\u2019s decision and denied the protest. Per the City\u2019s Purchasing Ordinance, the Finance Director\u2019s decision is the final determination of the protest.", "Based on the Finance Director\u2019s final determination to deny the protest, staff recommends that Bid #4228 be awarded to Clean Energy. Alternatively, Council may reject all bids, and, in its discretion, instruct staff to re-advertise for the work.", "Based on the criteria stated above, it is recommended that the best bidder is Clean Energy with its alternative fixed-price bid response for an amount not to exceed $17,671,997, including a 10% contingency, over a five-year period. The 10% contingency is for unanticipated increase in revenue service miles with Expo service.", "Breakdown of pricing with Clean Energy:", "Contingency (10%)", "Total", "Base Year", "$ 2,690,454", "$ 269,045", "$ 2,959,499", "Renewal Option 1", "$ 2,980,484", "$ 298,048", "$ 3,278,532", "Renewal Option 2", "$ 3,315,000", "$ 331,500", "$ 3,646,500", "Renewal Option 3", "$ 3,445,390", "$ 344,539", "$ 3,789,929", "Renewal Option 4", "$ 3,634,124", "$ 363,412", "$ 3,997,536", "$ 17,671,997", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Clean Energy Fuels Corporation is for an amount not to exceed $17,671,997.  Funds of $2,959,499 are available in the FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. The agreement will be charged to account 41654.522974. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid for Replacement of Dry-Standpipe at Parking Structures #4 & #5", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid# SP2397 to Concept Consultant, Inc., a California-based company, for the Dry-Standpipe Replacement at Parking Structures #4 and #5 project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Concept Consultant, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $ 238,000 (including a 10% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.4. Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.#0", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This project would reconstruct the dry standpipe systems, consisting of fire standpipes, hose connections and fire department connection outlets at parking structures 4 and 5. The standpipes, to which fire hoses can be connected allowing manual application of water in case of a fire, are in need of replacement due to the deteriorated pipes causing pressure loss and leaks in the systems.", "Staff recommends Concept Consultant, Inc., for the Project in an amount not to exceed $238,000 (including a 10% contingency).", "Discussion", "The existing dry-standpipe systems in parking structures 4 and 5 have failed routine fire department inspections. Pressure loss and leaks in the system are caused by deterioration and aging pipes. A fire dry standpipe is a rigid pipe which is built into multi-story buildings in a vertical position. During a firefight, the Fire Department would pressurize the standpipe with water and would be able to connect the fire hoses at each level of the multi-story facility.", "This project would replace existing pipes and systems in parking structures 4 and 5. The project would take three months, starting in June of 2016 without interrupting any functions of the parking structures. The pipes to be replaced are at each of the two stairways of the parking structures. For safety of the general public and for construction efficiency, at any given time, only one stairway at each parking structure would occasionally be closed during regular business hours between 8 am to 6 pm. The stairways would be open on the weekends, holidays, and outside of regular business hours. A total of ten parking spaces would not be available during construction staging at each parking structure. Subsequently, for a two-week duration, during installation of pipes, fourteen additional parking spaces would be unavailable at each parking structure.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach prior to and during construction of this project would be provided by City Staff in coordination with the City\u2019s parking administrative staff and the City\u2019s parking operator. Public outreach would include notifications distributed to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope of the project and potential impacts. Weekly updates would be posted on the City\u2019s \u201cKnow Before You Go\u201d (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily Press. Updates regarding the project would be provided on the City\u2019s website and various social media channels. Some of the construction impacts would include deliveries to the parking structures, the appearance of the construction fencing and equipment in the project vicinity and stairway closures to ensure public safety. The notice would provide general project information to raise awareness of the construction activities. Properties impacted by the project would receive a construction notice. The general notice would be mailed to properties adjacent to the proposed work two weeks prior to the start of construction with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts, and contact information. The notices would be prepared by Public Works staff and distributed by the contractor.", "Vendor Selection - Construction", "On March 22, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services for the Dry-Standpipe Replacement Project at Parking Structures 4 and 5. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 2,103 vendors were notified and 33 vendors downloaded the bid. Seven contractors attended the mandatory pre-bid meeting on April 4, 2016. Four bids were received and publicly opened on April 13, 2016. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "Concept Consultant, Inc.", "$ 217,932", "Link-Nilsen Corporation", "$ 270,100", "Golden Phoenix Construction Co. In.", "$ 272,392", "Gamma Builders, Inc.", "$ 365,000", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City scope of work. Concept Consultant, Inc., has completed recent similar projects for the cities of Santa Monica, Manhattan Beach, Long Beach and Rancho Palos Verdes. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package and all respondents reported that work performed by Concept Consultant, Inc., was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that Concept Consultant, Inc., and its subcontractors\u2019 licenses are current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, Concept Consultant, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for construction services for the project.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The construction contract to be awarded to Concept Consultant, Inc., is for an amount not to exceed $ 238,000 (including a 10% contingency). Funds in the amount of $190,100 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019052.589000. Award of the contract requires the following budget actions:", "1. Release of fund balance from reserve account 1.380246 (FY 2014-15 Capital Improvement Project savings) of $47,900;", "2. Appropriate $47,900 to account C019052.589000."]}, {"Title": "Agreement to Manage Culver City Bus Advertising Sales Program", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Community & Government Engagement", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to enter into a three-year Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the City of Culver City to manage the bus advertising sales program for Culver CityBus, with two one-year options to renew. No new costs are associated with this program.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff proposes Big Blue Bus (BBB) continue to serve as exclusive advertising concessionaire for Culver CityBus, a program which was first authorized by City Council on June 14, 2011. A Memorandum of Understanding (MOU), No. 9381 CCS, was established to allow BBB staff to manage the Culver CityBus advertising program. The original agreement was effective for two years. Subsequently, a First, Second and Third Modification of the Agreement were established to extend terms of the agreement by one year, respectively. The City has exercised all renewal options and the MOU expires on June 30, 2016. Big Blue Bus projects to receive $1.4M over the three-year agreement. Staff recommends a three-year MOU to begin July 1, 2016, with the City of Culver City to manage the bus advertising sales program.", "Background", "Since 2001, BBB has been operating its own advertising sales program, selling advertising space on buses to a variety of clients which generates a revenue stream that financially supports transit services. In an effort to increase geographic coverage and increase overall inventory to fulfill the market\u2019s demand for additional premium advertising space, BBB staff presented a proposal to the City of Culver City to sell advertising space on Culver CityBus. The City of Culver City agreed and on June 14, 2011, Council authorized Big Blue Bus to become Culver CityBus\u2019 advertising sales concessionaire.", "Discussion", "As required by the MOU, BBB staff coordinates the posting of ads on the Culver CityBus fleet of approximately 50 buses at its bus yard, managing all aspects of the advertising program. BBB staff promotes and advertises Culver CityBus ad space along with its own, negotiates contracts for ad placement, contracts with and manages the installation of all ads and handles the accounting and billing. In exchange for these services BBB receives a 30% commission of gross advertising sales. The actual cost of posting services is applied to the net advertising sales amount with the remaining balance identified as the net advertising revenue that is paid to Culver CityBus. Net advertising sales is defined as the sum of the gross advertising sales amount minus the 30% commission. Big Blue Bus provides Culver CityBus with quarterly reports which reviews the number of ads sold and gross sales amounts, along with the calculation of their estimated net revenue.", "There are no budgetary expenditure increases associated with managing the Culver CityBus advertising program. Operation of the program is done by existing Big Blue Bus administrative staff. The ad posting is done by BBB\u2019s current vendor, Outdoor Services Providers, and related costs are deducted from the net sales amount.", "Over the last two fiscal years of the current MOU, the Culver City Advertising Program generated $761,044 in gross revenue, of which $216,468 was retained as BBB\u2019s commission.", "The advertising program between the City of Santa Monica and the City of Culver City has proven beneficial to both cities, therefore City staff would like to continue managing the Culver CityBus program. Staff recommends the establishment of a new MOU that would extend the program for three years with two one-year extension options.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Revenue and expenditures are included in the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan for City Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Design Contract Modification for New Fire Station No. 1.", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #9960 (CCS) in the amount of $55,000 with Rob Wellington Quigley, FAIA Corporation, a California-based company, for additional design services related to the complex code and zoning requirements that relate to the Fire Station No. 1 design and the City-owned 5th Street property land swap. This will result in a 5-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $1,825,219.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Additional design services have been identified for the Fire Station No. 1 project. The original scope of work, cost, and design timeline did not anticipate significant requirements, which are now identified for this complex project that involves the construction of a new facility and the exchange of land. Staff recommends modifying the existing agreement #9960 (CCS) with Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation in the amount of $55,000, for a new total agreement amount not to exceed $1,825,219.", "Background", "Fire Station No. 1 was constructed in 1955 and has surpassed its expected useful life span as an essential services building, as defined by the Essential Services Buildings Seismic Safety Act of 1986. The Fire Station must be able to provide continuity of services to the public and ensure continued operation of the building after a seismic incident. Additionally, Fire Station No. 1 does not support the Fire Department\u2019s current and future operational and service needs. Currently, apparatus must be parked outside the structure due to lack of space. Staff access to the apparatus inside the structure is compromised by narrow aisles. Additionally, storage for personal protective equipment and supplies is inadequate.", "On June 26, 2007 (Attachment A), Council authorized staff to execute a contract for a feasibility study to determine if the existing Fire Station No. 1 could be retrofitted or if it should be rebuilt. This study indicated that the existing facility is in need of a seismic retrofit, facility upgrades, and building improvements in order to be in compliance with all current codes, including the Americans with Disabilities Act and meet current staffing requirements. The seismic upgrades needed to retrofit the facility would add wall thickness and additional corridors, which would further narrow the apparatus bays and eliminate at least one bay. Therefore retrofitting the building would not improve the existing fire station. The feasibility study concluded the need to build a larger Fire Station No. 1 to address seismic, code compliance, and space requirements.", "On January 10, 2012 (Attachment B), Council authorized staff to issue a Request for Proposals to exchange property in Downtown Santa Monica for a new site suitable to build a replacement facility for Fire Station No. 1.", "On August 14, 2012 (Attachment C), Council authorized the exchange of City-owned property located at 1338-42 and 1321 5th Street for property located at 1337-45 7th Street (\u201c7th Street Property\u201d) which would serve as the new site to build a replacement facility for Fire Station No. 1, provided the City complies with the applicable requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA).", "On October 23, 2012 (Attachment D), Council authorized a professional services agreement with Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation (RWQ), a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $1,770,219 to provide design and preconstruction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project. Additionally, on October 23, 2012 (Attachment E), Council approved the Resolution adopting the Mitigated Negative Declaration and Mitigation Monitoring Program for Fire Station No. 1 Land Exchange and Construction, and thereby providing the City\u2019s compliance with the CEQA guidelines.", "On March 14, 2013, RWQ commenced the design work; the schematic design work is complete. The project is currently at 50% design development. On January 20, 2016, the project was presented to the Architectural Review Board (ARB) for an informal float up. Board members\u2019 comments related to the use of brick and stucco and increased glazing for community connection. The project will return to the ARB in June to present the final design. On April 6, 2016 the project was approved by the Planning Commission", "On December 17, 2013 (Attachment F), Council authorized staff to continue with design of a new Fire Station No. 1 and Council reviewed staff\u2019s proposal for funding Fire Station No. 1 construction.", "Discussion", "The design phase for the rebuild of Fire Station No. 1 has identified additional scope of work requirements that exceed the project\u2019s allocated contingency, and were not included in the original Request for Proposals issued in 2012 and awarded to Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation (RWQ).", "An impact to the design scope of work to rebuild Fire Station No. 1 is the Critical Operations Power Supply (COPS). COPS is a system that the Santa Monica Fire Department opted to add to the project scope because the facility is an essential services building. COPS is an energy management system that sheds electrical loads in times of disaster relief/emergency response to conserve fuel and power until more supplies can be delivered. The COPS requirement results in additional design work to separate circuitry for the facility.", "Additional requirements have resulted from the exchange of property. Additional scope of work to design the new parking lot located at 1338-42 5th street was added to RWQ\u2019s Fire Station No. 1 contract. Also, the City-owned property, located at 1338-42 5th Street had a temporary use permit (TUP- City owned) that had to be changed to a conditional use permit (CUP-non City owned). The CUP requires the property to have storm water mitigation.", "Vendor Selection", "On February 7, 2012, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) to provide design and preconstruction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project. The RFQ was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 581 vendors were notified, 154 vendors downloaded the RFQ. 27 firms responded. On July 12, 2012, staff issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to the top three firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommended Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation (RWQ) as the best qualified firm to provide design and preconstruction services for the Fire Station No. 1 project based on a strong cohesive team with demonstrated experience in the design of a full service fire station in a tight urban setting, in-depth understanding of the design process in a municipal setting, clarity of roles and responsibilities, project approach and understanding, examples of creative solutions in a tight urban environment, and competitive pricing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Rob Wellington Quigley FAIA Corporation is $55,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,825,219. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program in account C014063.589000."]}, {"Title": "Sole Source Purchase of Water Treatment Chemical Analyzer Equipment, Instruments and Reagents", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a blanket purchase order with Hach Company, a Colorado-based company, for water treatment chemical analyzer equipment and reagents. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d) and is for a total amount not to exceed $350,000 over a five-year period ending June 30, 2021 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Arcadia Water Treatment Plant and Charnock Well Field are equipped with 48 Hach analyzers to measure water quality and chemistry for groundwater treated and delivered to Santa Monica customers via the City's potable water system. City treatment plant operators and chemists use Hach instruments and reagents to measure the accuracy of analyzers and perform daily water quality testing in order to both meet federal, state and local regulations and satisfy Santa Monica water customer expectations for taste, odor, appearance and other aspects of water quality. Hach Company is the sole source manufacturer and distributor of these products. Since July 2013, $127,140 has been spent through May 2016 under sole source purchase orders. Staff recommends Council approve an additional purchase order award with Hach Company for water treatment analyzers, instruments and reagents used by staff to measure potable water quality and chemistry for a five-year period ending June 30, 2021 not to exceed $350,000.", "Background", "The Hach Company is a long-established firm headquartered in Loveland, Colorado, which manufactures and distributes analytical instruments and reagents for water testing and water quality analysis. To assist in monitoring the water quality and chemistry of groundwater sourced from the Santa Monica Basin being treated and supplied to Santa Monica customers via the City's potable water system, 48 Hach analyzers have been installed at the Arcadia Water Plant (1228 S. Bundy Drive) and Charnock Well Field (11375 Westminster Avenue). These analyzers measure various aspects of water quality and chemistry including pH, ammonia, chloramines, chlorine, conductivity, fluoride, sulfides, turbidity and other properties. City water treatment plant operators and chemists use Hach instruments and reagents to calibrate testing equipment and perform daily water quality testing. The analyzers provide staff with the data needed to make adjustments at various steps during the water treatment process in order to deliver potable water that meets or exceeds federal, state and local requirements as well as satisfy customer expectations for taste, odor, appearance and other characteristics.", "The majority of the analyzer equipment was purchased from Hach Company in 2011. Repair and maintenance costs have increased each year, corresponding with the aging of the system. In addition, while each analyzer has an expected lifespan of approximately 10 years, staff has had to replace a small number of analyzers over the past three years. Should analyzers fail in the future, replacements would cost approximately $10,000 to $20,000 apiece. Since July 2013, $127,140 has been expended under sole source purchase orders approved under the City Manager's purchase authority:", "FY 2013-14 - $38,644", "FY 2014-15 - $45,512", "FY 2015-16 - $42,984 as of May 2016.", "Discussion", "In order to keep the Arcadia Water Plant and Charnock Well Field Hach analyzers in adequate operating condition to measure and ensure proper water quality and chemistry, staff recommends continuing purchases of parts, instruments and reagents from Hach Company for a five-year period ending June 30, 2021 in a not to exceed amount of $350,000.", "Vendor Selection", "Staff recommends Hach Company to furnish and deliver water treatment chemical analyzer equipment and reagents as an exception to the competitive process per SMMC Section 2.24.080 Exception to Competitive Bidding Section. Hach analyzers were installed by Black & Veatch in 2011 as part of plant upgrades bid through a competitive process. Hach Company is the sole authorized manufacturer and direct distributor for all Hach-branded instrumentation and chemistry. Replacement of Hach analyzers with another brand would be currently cost-prohibitive at an estimated replacement cost of $500,000; however, should individual analyzers become inoperable, the City would consider alternative models from other manufacturers that do not require consumable reagents for testing and calibration. Replacement analyzers from other manufacturers would require additional staff training for proper operation.", "Should the Water Resources Division discontinue use of Hach analyzers or should Hach Company begin licensing its products for re-sale, this purchase order would be terminated.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The blanket purchase order to be awarded to Hach Company is for an amount not to exceed $350,000. Funds in the amount of $70,000 are included in the FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget in the Public Works Department. The blanket purchase order will be charged to account 25671.544010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Grant for Santa Monica City Yards Advanced Energy District", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant award in the amount of $1,487,609 from the California Energy Commission: Accelerating the Deployment of Advanced Energy Communities for the Santa Monica Advanced Energy District project at the City Yards, and to accept all grant renewals.2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to accept the grant and all grant renewals.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On March 25, 2016, the Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE) received a grant award of approximately $1.5M from the California Energy Commission for its Santa Monica Advanced Energy District project proposal. The intent of the project is to integrate a small, localized energy grid (microgrid) consisting of onsite renewable generation and energy storage based at the City Yards and Bergamot Arts Center. This microgrid would provide efficient, reliable, and cost-effective energy that has a low environmental and carbon impact. It could also store energy, allowing the City Yards and surrounding businesses to continue critical operations in case of a major power outage. Grant funding for Phase 1 would be used to develop and finalize the Santa Monica Advanced Energy District prior to the commencement of construction.", "Background", "On November 24, 2015, the California Energy Commission (CEC) released a grant funding opportunity entitled \u201cThe EPIC Challenge: Accelerating the Deployment of Advanced Energy Communities.\u201d The submission was due to the CEC February 17, 2016. The solicitation called for applicants to propose measures to plan, design and permit communities that:", "\u00b7 Minimize need for new energy infrastructure costs, such as transmission and distribution upgrades.", "\u00b7 Provide energy savings by achieving and maintaining zero net energy community status (accounting for behavior and increasing loads from vehicle and appliance electrification).", "\u00b7 Support grid reliability and resiliency by incorporating technologies such as energy storage.", "\u00b7 Are financially attractive from a market standpoint (developers, home buyers, renters).", "\u00b7 Provide affordable access to renewable energy generation, energy efficiency upgrades, and water efficiency and reuse technologies that reduce electricity consumption for all electric ratepayers within the community.", "\u00b7 Makes use of smart-grid technologies throughout the community.", "Santa Monica was awarded a Phase I grant of approximately $1.5M to plan, design and permit a small, localized energy grid (microgrid) consisting of onsite renewable generation and energy storage based at the City Yards and Bergamot Arts Center. A Phase II grant opportunity would become available in early 2018, which would fund $8M for construction of such a project.", "Discussion", "The traditional electrical grid functions in a one-way system, in which energy is generated from a massive power plant and transmitted one-way over hundreds of miles of transmission lines and substations to its customers. However, as the needs of customers have changed with electric vehicle charging, mobile and electronic device plug loads, on-site solar and energy storage, there is a need for the grid to evolve into a decentralized system that allows for local generation, building-to-grid or vehicle-to-grid electricity flow and grid independence.", "Microgrids provide the link between decentralized local energy generation and storage capabilities and the larger regional grid. Generally, a microgrid consists of at least one generation system, like solar, batteries and controls. This controlled energy system allows for buildings or campuses to disconnect from the larger utility grid in times of outages or emergencies. Microgrids also allow for greater optimization of onsite energy generation, by capturing unused energy in batteries and deploying the energy when it is needed.", "When the grant was announced, staff from the Office of Sustainability and the Environment, the Public Works Department and the Planning and Community Development Department identified the City Yards as a prime area of opportunity. This area is ideal for several reasons:", "\u00b7 It is City owned and operated.", "\u00b7 It has reached the end of its useful life and is undergoing a complete reconfiguration through a City-led master plan effort which will coincide with the implementation of this EPIC challenge grant.", "\u00b7 It has aggressive sustainability goals for zero net energy, non-potable water use and greater community integration.", "\u00b7 It is relatively low rise, with a fairly low energy density which means that the addition of renewable energy such as photovoltaics will likely have a surplus that could be used in adjoining parcels.", "\u00b7 It contains alternative fuel vehicle charging, including electric vehicles, which offers a unique energy storage opportunity.", "\u00b7 It may be designated as an \u201cEssential Services Facility\u201d, acting as an operations center for public works and first responders, thus, further necessitating local energy sources and control.", "The project concept would not be limited to the City Yards, but would seek to include adjoining properties under City control, such as the Bergamot Arts Center. This area would comprise the initial Santa Monica Advanced Energy District. By providing local renewable energy, storage and electric vehicle charging and other grid services, the Advanced Energy District can play an important and valuable role in promoting sustainable development of the surrounding area. As an anchor to the microgrid and major stakeholder in local redevelopment, the City can utilize policy levers and incentives to expand the microgrid to multiple users. These policies and tools would be explored in the grant activities.", "The project would utilize four strategies to establish a multiuser microgrid. First, the City would own and operate its own microgrid, serving the City Yards facility. Second, the City would work with Worthe Development Group at the City-owned Bergamot Arts Center, to develop appropriate regulations and incentives through the entitlement and development agreement process and establish a unique partnership model. Thirdly, a master plan over this area would be developed to delineate the integration and interconnection between the City, the public and the utility. And finally, the City would explore the utility of its role as a Community Choice Aggregator to incentivize, construct and generate retail power supply.", "The grant activities are being led by the Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE), in close collaboration with the Public Works Department, Housing and Economic Development Department, Planning and Community Development Department.", "\u00b7 The Office of Sustainability and the Environment will serve as the grant administrator, manage the primary contractors and convene the various municipal departments, utilities, and other stakeholders.", "\u00b7 The Architecture Services Division will lead the City Yards Design Team to ensure the required microgrid components are integrated into the redevelopment project.", "\u00b7 The Economic Development Division and the Planning and Community Development Department will be the main points of contact and advisors to the real estate transactions and redevelopment negotiation with the private developer of Bergamot Arts Center.", "The activities conducted under the Phase I grant award would support robust planning of advanced energy systems. A Phase II grant opportunity would become available in early 2018, which would fund $8M for construction of such a project. Accepting the Phase I grant funds does not commit the City to fund the construction.", "Staff will present the City Yards feasibility study to Council later this year and request authorization to proceed with a guaranteed maximum price for design-build from Hathaway Dinwiddie, the existing City Yards design-build contractor. If approved, funds from the grant would be used to support the additional scope of work of microgrid design.", "Staff will return to Council with a request to authorize awarding a contract to a firm to develop a master plan for and design the microgrid at the City Yards.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $1,487,609 grant from the California Energy Commission: Accelerating the Deployment of Advanced Energy Communities requires the following FY 2015-16 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20226.410360 in the amount of  $1,487,609.", "2. Appropriate $1,487,609 to account C209195.589000 for expenditures related to the City Yards Microgrid Project grant.", "If renewals are awarded, budget changes would be included in subsequent year budgets, contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Purchase of a Specialized Response Vehicle for the Police Department", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Lenco Industries, Inc., a Massachusetts-based company, for the purchase of a Specialized Response Vehicle. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (b) and is for a total amount not to exceed $316,701.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The global fight against terrorism continues both internationally and locally. Events such as the Boston Marathon bombing and the recent San Bernardino terrorist attack demonstrate that an incident of terrorism can happen anywhere. Additionally, the spree shooting incident, which occurred in Santa Monica on June 7, 2013, brought home the importance of well-trained and appropriately equipped first response personnel. The Police Department continues to train its officers to be prepared to respond to a variety of potential incidents. The Department also continually reviews and assesses its emergency response inventory to ensure the proper equipment is in place and is readily available should the need arise. The Police Department has identified the need to replace a decades old emergency response vehicle with a more contemporary specialized response vehicle. The proposed vehicle would enable first response personnel to enter highly dangerous and dynamic environments to rescue members of the public or downed officers with minimal risk.", "The proposed specialized response vehicle would be constructed by Lenco Industries, Inc. Lenco Industries, Inc. has built hundreds of specialized response vehicles and is widely regarded as an industry leader in the construction of these vehicles. Lenco Industries, Inc. provides different options which allow the custom design of the vehicle to meet current and future Police Department needs. Based upon the proposed design and the ability to purchase the vehicle using competitive pricing from a pre-existing GSA contract, staff recommends award of the contract to Lenco Industries, Inc. in the amount of $316,701.", "Background", "Recent events of terrorism and mass shootings have highlighted the need for local law enforcement to be well prepared to respond to those incidents which pose a substantial threat to public safety.", "Specialized response vehicles provide law enforcement with a unique tool to better protect the public. Last year, the tragic events in San Bernardino, California demonstrated the value of these specialized response vehicles. These vehicles can be used to evacuate members of the public or, if necessary, rescue injured members of the public or officers during incidents involving active shootings. During the San Bernardino incident, the world watched live images of local law enforcement agencies using various specialized rescue vehicles to rescue members of the public who were trapped in offices during an extremely dangerous, evolving situation; these vehicles were also instrumental in enabling the officers to safely engage and stop the threat posed by heavily armed suspects who were intent on committing more mayhem even as they attempted to escape. Specialized response vehicles can be used to safely deliver officers, medical personnel, and needed life-safety equipment to those areas where in-progress shooting or other mass casualty incident is occurring. The use of a specialized response vehicle under these circumstances enables a rapid response while minimizing the risk of injury or death to responding public safety personnel. In addition to the tactical benefits, these vehicles are often equipped to detect Chemical, Biological, Radiologic, Nuclear and Explosive (CBRNE) materials thereby enabling first response personnel to enter affected areas that would otherwise be inaccessible without significant risk.", "In 2006, the Police Department obtained a High Mobility Multipurpose Wheeled Vehicle (HMMWV), commonly referred to as a Humvee, through what was then known as the Department of Defense, Defense Reutilization and Marketing Office (DRMO) program. The program enabled the military to transfer surplus equipment that would otherwise not be available or would be cost prohibitive for local law enforcement agencies to acquire. The Police Department obtained the used vehicle and modified it to maximize its usefulness as an urban rescue and transport vehicle. As the vehicle has aged, replacement parts have become more difficult and more costly to obtain, resulting in the vehicle being out of service for extended periods of time.", "As a result of the vehicle\u2019s recurring maintenance challenges and its inconsistent availability, the Police Department has routinely resorted to borrowing specialized response vehicles from either the Beverly Hills Police Department or the South Bay Police Group. Over time, borrowing specialized response vehicles from other agencies has resulted in the delayed deployment of specialized resources and the occasional need to defer police action, circumstances which have the distinct potential to increase the risk to community safety.", "On March 22, 2016, Council approved acceptance of the 2015 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant in the amount of $200,000 for the partial funding of the specialized response vehicle. An amendment will be forthcoming for supplemental 2015 UASI grant funding in the amount of $10,000 for a total funding amount of $210,000.", "Discussion", "A specialized response vehicle would provide the Police Department with the ready capability to enter a variety of dangerous or hazardous situations while also providing the appropriate level of protection for the first response personnel. This vehicle can also serve in a rescue capacity, allowing public safety personnel to enter dangerous situations in order to render aid by extracting downed officers or injured citizens who cannot get to safety.", "The proposed vehicle would be able to transport up to 12 first response personnel, including paramedics. This heavy-duty, wheeled vehicle, constructed with ballistic materials capable of withstanding high-capacity rifle fire, would be used to enter those dynamically evolving circumstances constituting a direct and immediate threat to public safety. The proposed vehicle would also be fully equipped to detect CBRNE materials thereby enabling emergency services personnel to safely enter an area to mitigate a potential threat associated with dangerous materials.", "The proposed vehicle, funded in part by the 2015 Urban Areas Security Initiative (UASI) grant, would be considered a regional asset to be operated by the City\u2019s first response personnel in accordance with established mutual aid response protocols which require a response to critical incidents occurring in neighboring communities.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Lenco Industries, Inc., furnish and deliver a state-of-the-art specialized response vehicle as an exception to the competitive bidding process; this is a piggyback purchase from the GSA contract. This item has already been competitively bid by another governmental agency or is part of cooperative purchasing with another agency, where the item or services are supplied at the same price or better.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Lenco Industries, Inc., is for an amount not to exceed $316,701. In addition to funds of $200,000 available in CIP account C209139.589000, award of the contract requires a budget transfer of $116,701 from account 01304.544010 to CIP account C01xxxx.589000: The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "C209139.589000", "$200,000", "C01xxxx.589000", "$116,701", "TOTAL", "$316,701"]}, {"Title": "Memorandum Of Understanding for Beach Dune Restoration Pilot Project", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and enter into a Memorandum of Understanding with The Bay Foundation to conduct a pilot restoration of a three acre portion of Santa Monica State Beach.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Bay Foundation is proposing to complete a pilot project involving the passive restoration of a three acre portion of Santa Monica Beach with the intent to restore native plant and animal species and demonstrate a low-cost, natural approach to address future sea level rise and coastal flooding related to climate change. This project would be fully funded and implemented by The Bay Foundation with guidance provided by City staff. The Memorandum of Understanding (Attachment 1) outlines the terms and conditions that The Bay Foundation would need to meet in order to proceed with the project. There is no financial or budgetary impact to the City from entering into the Memorandum of Understanding with The Bay Foundation.", "Background", "Over 17 million visitors frequent the beaches of Santa Monica every year. Southern California beach systems and associated wildlife are highly impacted by threats, including native species extirpation and extinction, erosion, non-natural sediment and sand transport through mechanical means, pollution, and loss of natural morphology due to daily vegetation and top soil removal through grooming and other regular maintenance. However, these systems also offer essentially the last line of defense in terms of natural \u201csoftscape\u201d protection. As a vital part of the coastline, beaches and dunes support and protect homes, roads, and infrastructure, providing a natural buffer from sea level rise (SLR) as well as from tidal and wave action from the ocean. Beach habitats and dunes are critical in managing sand transport to create resilient beach morphologies, which naturally adapt to climate change impacts.", "Since the 1960s, beaches in the Los Angeles area, including Santa Monica State Beach, have been subjected to the continuous removal of natural features. Mechanical maintenance of beaches has significant impacts on the physical and biological processes of natural beach and dune ecosystems. Over much of the state, and in many parts of the country, beaches are not frequently groomed, but are instead allowed to develop natural features such as low dunes away from active recreation areas. These features not only support native, and in many cases, rare and endemic species of plants and animals, they also provide a cost-effective buffer to storm surges and other regular, predictable threats, including SLR and increased erosion.", "In addition to providing habitat for birds and other animals, including federally-designated \u201ccritical habitat\u201d for the threatened western snowy plover, coastal strand habitats have a varied native vegetation community and provide a vital habitat for invertebrate species. Thus, the current condition of groomed and flattened sand with vegetation removed provides almost no habitat value and removes all of the ecosystem services. Without vegetation, erosion is more frequent and there is nothing to trap wind-driven transport of sand.", "Discussion", "The Bay Foundation (TBF), a 501(c)3 non-profit organization founded in 1990 to restore and enhance Santa Monica Bay and local coastal waters, approached the City of Santa Monica with a proposal to develop a pilot beach dune restoration project to achieve goals of restoring native plant and animal species and demonstrating a low-cost, natural approach to address future sea level rise and coastal flooding related to climate change.", "Staff determined that conducting a pilot project on a portion of Santa Monica\u2019s beach could benefit the City by providing a more sheltered habitat for the threatened western snowy plover population that annually winters on Santa Monica\u2019s beaches, and by evaluating a possible model for mitigating impacts of future sea level rise along the city\u2019s coastline. The project would also result in a publicly-accessible natural habitat area on Santa Monica Beach that would provide opportunities for bird watching, science education and passive recreation activities. TBF has obtained support for the pilot project from the California Department of Parks and Recreation (DPR), Santa Monica Bay Restoration Commission, University of California, Santa Barbara, Loyola Marymount University, Audubon Society, California Native Plant Society, Heal the Bay, Friends of Ballona Wetlands, several elected officials, and additional expert scientists.", "The preferred site for the pilot project is a single contiguous three acre zone of beach located adjacent to the northern City boundary, between the high tide line and the beach bike path and just north of the Annenberg Community Beach House (Attachment 2). This pilot project would involve utilization of existing sediments to passively restore and transform a portion of the current beach into a sustainable coastal strand and foredune habitat complex which would be resilient to sea level rise. It would involve installation of sand fencing around the perimeter of the site and hand seeding of four species of native dune plant species throughout the area. After seeding and planting vegetation, sandy coastal strand habitats and plant hummocks would develop, which would then begin to support invertebrates and birds. As the vegetation grows it would begin trapping sand transported by wind, naturally increasing the elevation of plant hummocks over time to an estimated height of 2-3 feet. Because beach dunes accrete sediment transported from the ocean they would continue to grow concurrently with rising sea levels. This dynamic process can continue as long as the vegetation community is robust and healthy. This process has repeatedly been demonstrated in pilot projects in other California counties, such as the Surfer\u2019s Point restoration project in Ventura County. Future restored conditions would include no mechanized raking or flattening of the sand and removal of vegetation, however the site would continue to be accessible to the public via pathways and from the shoreline.", "All funding for the project for fencing, signage, seeds and plant materials and other project expenses would be provided by TBF. Permitting, implementation, and post-restoration maintenance and monitoring would also be coordinated and conducted by TBF. TBF would consult with the City of Santa Monica on all project logistics, design and implementation and would not proceed without City approval. TBF would implement a biological, physical, and social monitoring plan before the restoration to collect baseline data, for the duration of the restoration project, and several years afterwards to assess success. Additional \u201ccontrol\u201d data along the adjacent unrestored beach would be collected as part of a before-after-control-impact ecological assessment monitoring program. Data would be collected for up to ten years to evaluate the ecological health of the created coastal strand ecosystem and its potential for long-term adaptation to accelerated rates of sea level rise. Funding for monitoring and maintenance will also be provided by TBF.", "Public Outreach", "TBF has met with members of the Beach Club, which is directly adjacent to the proposed project site to discuss the project and identify any potential concerns. At that meeting the Beach Club did not identify any significant concerns with the proposed project and expressed general support for it moving ahead. TBF also hosted a public meeting at the Annenberg Community Beach House on April 27, 2016, to which property owners and residents along Pacific Coast Highway, between the project site and the Santa Monica Pier, were invited. Eighteen people including local residents, members of the Audubon Society, Heal the Bay, and other stakeholder groups attended the meeting. Questions and discussion focused on the location of the pilot, accessibility of the site to the public, the types of fencing to be used, and the maintenance and monitoring of the site. No significant concerns were raised regarding the proposed project.", "This pilot project has the support of adjacent property owners and other stakeholders and would benefit the City of Santa Monica by restoring native plant and animal species, demonstrating a low-cost, natural approach to address future sea level rise and coastal flooding related to climate change, and providing a publicly-accessible natural habitat on Santa Monica Beach.", "Environmental Analysis", "Section 15333 of CEQA Guidelines provides (Class 33) exemption for the maintenance, restoration, enhancement, or protection of habitat (no greater than 5 acres) for fish, plants, or wildlife provided that:", "1) There would be no significant adverse impact on endangered, rare, or threatened species or their habitat", "2) There are no hazardous materials at or around the project site that may be disturbed or removed, and", "3) The project will not result in impacts that are significant when viewed in connection with the effects of past, current, or probable future projects", "The project consists of the utilization of existing sediments to passively restore and transform approximately 3 acres of the current beach into a sustainable coastal strand and dune habitat complex which would be resilient to sea level rise. The project would result in a beneficial impact on wildlife and would not result in the disturbance or removal of hazardous materials at the site. Furthermore, the project will not result signification impacts in combination with other projects. Therefore, this project is a Class 33 project that is categorically exempt per Section 15333 of the CEQA Guidelines.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Carousel Fare Roll Back to 5 Cents on June 12, 2016 for Looff Hippodrome Centennial Celebration", "Department": "Pier Management, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council Adopt Resolution to Set Carousel Ticket Fare Rate to 5 Cents on June 12, 2016 in conjunction with the Looff Hippodrome Centennial Celebration.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The historic Looff Hippodrome, which houses the Santa Monica Pier Carousel will turn 100 on June 12, 2016. As part of a celebration planned for that day to mark this important occasion, staff requests Council authorization to roll back carousel ticket fares to the ticket price charged in 1916 --- to 5 cents per ride. Carousel ticket fares are set by Council resolution, therefore to lower the fare for this one day event Council must authorize the change by resolution. If approved, the cost to ride the Carousel on June 12, 2016, would be 5 cents per rider.", "Background", "Charles I. D. Looff, a renowned builder of hand-carved carousels, and a pioneer amusement park entrepreneur constructed \u2018Looff\u2019s Pier\u2019 alongside the City\u2019s Municipal Pier following lengthy negotiations with the City. The jewel of his new pier was the Byzantine-Moorish styled Hippodrome building which opened its doors to the public on June 12, 1916. Over the century, Looff\u2019s Hippodrome has housed a succession of vintage merry-go-rounds and Wurlitzer organs. Today the Hippodrome is home to the ornate 1922 Philadelphia Toboggan Company Carousel #62. The City purchased the Looff Hippodrome in 1977, and completed its restoration in 1981. It was declared a National Historic Landmark in 1987. The building is the last remaining original structure from Looff\u2019s Pier and its iconic appearance has served as a beacon attracting and inspiring generations of visitors to the Pier. Roth Management operates the Carousel under contract with the City.", "Discussion", "On June 12, 2016, as part of a celebration planned by the Santa Monica Pier Corporation to mark this momentous occasion, staff requests Council authorization to roll back carousel ticket fares to the ticket price charged in 1916 --- to 5 cents per ride. The regular fare is $1 for children and $2 for adults (14 years and older). Average carousel revenue on a Sunday in June is approximately $1,035 with a ridership count of 645.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Staff does not anticipate that this special one day promotion would significantly impact the City\u2019s carousel revenue projections for FY 2016-17. Therefore there is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.", "Prepared by: Elana Buegoff, Sr. Development Analyst", "Attachment A. Resolution"]}, {"Title": "Purchase of Tasers for the Police Department", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Proforce Law Enforcement, an Arizona-based company, for the purchase of Taser Model X26P. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080(d) and is for a total amount not to exceed $232,585.18.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Police Department currently utilizes the Taser model X26 manufactured by Taser International and distributed through the sole source distributor for Southern California, ProForce Law Enforcement. The Taser X26 is a conductive energy device which is a self-defense tool relied upon by officers to overcome the resistance presented by violent, combative subjects. Because the Police Department\u2019s current X26 Taser inventory is well beyond its expected lifespan, the equipment is no longer serviced by Taser International, thereby rendering any units requiring maintenance or software updates unusable. The Taser X26 has been discontinued and replaced by the more technologically advanced model X26P.", "Given the age of and increasing numbers of inoperable Taser X26 units currently in the Police Department\u2019s inventory, Staff recommends the award of a purchase order in an amount not to exceed $232,585.18 to Proforce Law Enforcement; the awarding of this purchase order is an exception to the competitive bidding process articulated in Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 2.24.080(d); competition does not exist because only one vendor possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder.", "Background", "In 2003, the Santa Monica Police Department purchased the first of many Taser X26 devices. This equipment provides officers with a less-lethal option which can be deployed in order to subdue violently resistive subjects while minimizing the injury potential for officers and the involved subject. This conductive energy device has proven to be highly effective in stopping even the most focused and aggressive subjects. By equipping the Department\u2019s officers with Taser X26 equipment, the number of officer injuries associated with violent encounters has been substantially reduced. Importantly, the number of injuries to violent and resistive suspects has also substantially decreased.", "Taser International, an Arizona-based company, is the only company that manufactures a consistently reliable, time-tested, conductive energy device. As a result, the Taser product line is that most often utilized by contemporary law enforcement organizations. Recent advancements in the technology associated with conductive energy devices include the incorporation of internal monitoring and auditing functions and video capture capability. Deployment information such as the date, time, internal temperature, and duration of each discharge is automatically captured and stored in the device\u2019s data portal; for risk management purposes, this information can be essential when conducting post-deployment reviews.", "In July 2006, July 2007, September 2011, and April 2012 the City Manager\u2019s Office authorized the sole source purchase of Tasers from Proforce Law Enforcement, Southern California\u2019s sole distributor for Taser International. In April 2013, the City Manager\u2019s Office authorized a five-year sole source option for the purchase of Tasers.", "Discussion", "Conductive energy devices have long been considered a vital tool in preventing and de-escalating violent physical encounters. The Police Department has successfully relied upon the Taser Model X26 during encounters with violent and potentially violent individuals with the result being less severe or minimal injuries to the involved officers and subjects than would have been the case had the Taser not been deployed. A conductive energy device is controlled and regulated by a microprocessor which delivers a low grade shock which is generally sufficient to disrupt the behavior of violently resistive individuals thereby enabling them to be taken into custody.", "In order to be consistently effective, conductive energy devices require routine maintenance, battery recharging/replacement, software updates, and data downloads supported by consistent training and comprehensive usage policies.  As the Department\u2019s inventory has aged, replacement parts have become more difficult to locate, and service/repair costs may exceed the value of device replacement. The Taser X26 currently in use in the Police Department has exceeded its functional service expectancy; a significant number of Tasers are currently inoperable.  Because of the age of the existing equipment, Taser International no longer provides service, maintenance, software updates, or replacement parts for the X26.", "Although there are various conductive energy devices in the marketplace, these devices require the device to be in direct contact with the target subject. Taser International is the only manufacturer of a conductive energy device which enables both direct contact and the valuable ability to deploy the device from a distance of up to 15 feet from the target subject. This distance has the potential to provide an enhanced safety zone for the officer when he/she is interacting with a violently resistive subject.", "Staff recommends replacing all of the Police Department\u2019s existing inventory of X26 models with the new and updated X26P model, the most current device offered by Taser International, and distributed by Proforce Law Enforcement.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Proforce Law Enforcement provide and deliver the Model X26P Tasers as an exception to the competitive bid process.  The Taser X26P qualifies as an item of the original equipment manufacturer and/or their authorized exclusive distributor and meets the criteria of a proprietary purchase. The Taser X26P is a goods which is copyrighted, patented, or otherwise only available from a license holder ProForce Law Enforcement. The Santa Monica Police Department is receiving a volume discount for the purchase of the replacement devices. Proforce Law Enforcement is the only authorized Southern California distributor for Taser International.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Proforce Law Enforcement is for an amount not to exceed $232,585.18. Funds are available in the FY 2016-17 expenditure control budget in the Police Department. The purchase order will be charged to account S010300.589000."]}, {"Title": "Contract Modifications for Ongoing Meter Operations and Maintenance", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to agreement #9496 (CCS) in the amount of $7,247,219 with IPS Group, Inc., a California-based company and extend the term of the agreement for an additional five years for the ongoing maintenance for parking meters and sensors, battery replenishment, miscellaneous parts, credit card processing communication services, and a web-based management system. This will result in a 10 year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $17,544,169, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On October 25, 2011, Council awarded Contract No. 9496 to IPS Group, Inc. for the purchase and installation of credit card enabled on-street single space parking meters with in-ground sensors, ongoing maintenance for meters and sensors, battery replenishment and miscellaneous parts, credit card processing communication services, and a web-based management system. The contract was amended pursuant to the First Modification dated April 22, 2013 and Second Modification dated May 28, 2014.", "This Third Modification would extend the term of the contract for five additional years from December 9, 2016 to December 8, 2021 with no additional options to extend and increase the estimated annual not to exceed amount to $18,738,410 for the additional five years of maintenance and to account for increased credit card transactions. The modification would also add a warranty on all sensors at no cost to the City through December 31, 2018, provide the City with the option to terminate services related to the meter sensors on December 31, 2018, provide a new, lower IPS credit card communication pricing option, and would provide the City with the option to test new meter sensor technology on 100 meters for a period of 6 months at no cost to the City.", "Background", "On October 25, 2011 (Attachment A), Council awarded contract no. 9496 to IPS Group, Inc. (IPS), in the amount of $4,500,000 to purchase meters and in-ground sensors, plus an annual estimated ongoing operating cost of $612,000 for a total not to exceed amount of $7,560,000, which included communication and software costs for a five year term with one five year option to extend.", "On March 19, 2013 (Attachment B), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute the first modification which included a Battery Replenishment Program to be performed by IPS; the purchase of miscellaneous parking meter parts; and an increase to the contract maximum annual payment to pay for the Battery Replenishment Program and increased credit card transactions processing for total not to exceed amount of $9,694,345 with no change to the five year term.", "On April 22, 2014 (Attachment C), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute the second modification for a one-time purchase of 350 additional parking meters with in-ground sensors for a total not to exceed amount to $10,296,950 for the parking meter and in-ground sensor ongoing operating costs with no change to the five year term.", "The City currently operates 5,950 single space meters with varying enforcement hours and rates. All meters are credit card enabled and are predominantly used to enforce curbside on-street parking to assist with managing demand and to ensure turnover. A small number of single space meters are used in downtown parking structures. The Police Department enforces meter time limits and payment and issues citations for parking violations; the Finance Department collects payment on parking citations and collects and processes revenue from parking meters; and the Public Works department is responsible for meter maintenance and repairs. The Parking Operations Division of Planning and Community Development is the contract manager for IPS equipment and services and other parking enforcement, permitting, and parking citation appeal hearing examiner services.", "Discussion", "Meter revenue in FY2013-14 was $13,147,837 and $14,781,223 in FY2014-15, an increase of $1,633,386 or 12.4%. Revenues in FY2015-16 are currently estimated to reach $15,257,000. Revenue from credit card payments accounted for 64% of all meter revenue. This is up from 40% in April 2014, when Council approved the last contract modification.", "IPS Credit Card Transaction fees[1] are variable fees paid by the City to IPS on a per credit card transaction basis when a parker pays with a credit card at a meter instead of with cash. Due to the continued increase in credit cards used at meters as well as the addition of 134 meters since the last contract modification approved by Council in April 2014, credit card payment transactions have increased. In FY2014-15 there were 4.9 million credit card transactions with a projected 5.2 million transactions for FY2015-16, or a 6.1% increase[2]. This volume of credit card transactions necessitates an increase in the estimated annual not to exceed amounts for the remaining term of the contract to cover these additional expenditures. The amended contract would also provide for a lower cost option for IPS credit card communication fee, reducing the fee from $0.13 per transaction to $0.06 per transaction, providing an estimated monthly reduction in fees by approximately $360,000  annually over existing pricing and transaction volume.", "The amended agreement would also provide a warranty on all sensors, at no cost to the City, through December 2018 and provide the City with the option to terminate the in-ground sensor related services after December 2018 when the free warranty expires. In conjunction with this provision, IPS will provide the City with the option to test new meter technology, including new sensor technology that is mounted to the meter instead of being placed in the ground. IPS would install, at no cost to the City, up to 100 meters to test in locations chosen by the City. This will allow staff to evaluate technology and establish a long term strategy for implementing parking payment, enforcement, and data management technologies that are best suited to meet the needs of the City and its mobility goals.", "Additionally, due to the need to increase the not to exceed amount on the agreement at this time, staff recommends exercising the one-time, five year option on the existing contract which expires December 8, 2016 to ensure continued and smooth operations of all meters after December 8th.", "Contractor/Consultant Selection", "In January 2011, the City initiated a trial program to test new single-space on-street parking meters with electronic payment options. All companies that produce credit-card enabled single or multi-space parking meters were invited to participate, and one took part in the trial. Based on customer feedback and functionality, staff recommended a single-space meter solution. IPS was the only company that could deliver a functional single-space product at that time. IPS single-space meters have been widely deployed in Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, and West Hollywood and are commonly accepted and known by on-street parkers in the Los Angeles area. IPS is a San Diego-based company. Staff will initiate a competitive process for parking meter equipment and payment services prior to the end of the next five year term to ensure a transparent and competitive process for parking meter services that best serve the public good at the most competitive price.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to IPS is $7,247,219, for an amended contract total not to exceed $17,544,169. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The contract will be charged to account 01417.555010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4235 to Municipal Maintenance Equipment. Inc., a California-based company for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles;Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Municipal Maintenance Equipment. Inc. for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles in an amount not to exceed $1,064,263.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for parking enforcement and traffic control duties. This purchase would replace 23 vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In February 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles, or equal. After reviewing all submittals received, staff recommends Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. as the sole and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles in the amount of $1,064,263. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing vehicles powered by electricity.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The existing vehicles have a cost-effective useful life span of six years. The current equipment was purchased between 2003 and 2009 and is between seven to 13 years old. The maintenance and repair costs on all the vehicles have exceeded their original purchase price, with at least five of these vehicles having maintenance and repair costs double the original purchase price over their 13 year life (Attachment B). In addition, at least four of our existing Go-4\u2019s will have the CNG fuel tank expire in September 2016, which would require an additional expense of about $4,500 per vehicle for new tanks.", "The Police Department\u2019s Traffic Services Unit would utilize the GO-4 Electric Vehicles for routine parking enforcement duties throughout the City and for use when providing traffic control. The unique single-occupant, three-wheel design of the GO-4 EV allows Traffic Services Officers to perform their duties with no or minimal impedance of traffic, and maneuver through congested roadways all while having the appropriate lighting and warning equipment to alert motorists of their presence.", "Example of a Westward Industries GO-4 electric vehicle", "The Police Department\u2019s Traffic Services Unit tested various conventional vehicles, such as the Honda Civic, Smart Car, Mini Cooper, and other specialized vehicles, and determined the three-wheel, single-occupant configuration of the GO-4 meets their operational requirements best by providing a vehicle that has the least impedance of traffic flow and can maneuver more easily through congested roadways and tight spaces as compared to a two-axle, four-wheel vehicle. In addition, Traffic Services Officers enter and exit their vehicle hundreds of times per day. The low-to-the-ground vehicle base with high seat and single-occupant configuration of the GO-4 allows the operator to sit in a position that does not require stress or strain on the operator\u2019s knees each time they enter or exit the vehicle, thus greatly decreasing driver injuries and workers compensation claims. In addition, sliding doors prevent operators from accidentally opening doors into oncoming traffic.", "The GO-4 EV meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing vehicles powered by electricity. Because of the nature of the equipment used by the Parking Enforcement staff to ensure safety, visibility, and to maintain communication, vehicles designed for this capability are able to meet these rigorous demands. The combination of electric powered vehicles in the unique setting is one of the factors that has a substantial impact on the type of vehicle that can be used. Furthermore, the City of Santa Monica, a leader in sustainability, is one of the first municipalities that would place a large size order for GO-4 electric vehicles rather than unleaded models.", "Vendor Selection", "In February 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles, or equal, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 604 vendors were notified and 13 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on February 25, 2016, per Attachment A. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; out of the 13 vendors that downloaded the bid, only one response was received in the form of a \u201cNo Bid\u201d form from Alvarez Electric Motors, which stated they are unable to supply the goods specified because they do not meet the specifications. Their vehicle uses absorbed glass mat batteries, not lithium ion, has a 40 to 50 mile range, not 65 to 75 miles, has four wheels, not three, and is not capable of towing the portable trademarked speed boards used by Traffic Enforcement to notify a driver of their speed versus the posted limit. Lithium ion batteries are industry standard, have a longer life span, are lighter, and have a lower maintenance cost. Also, Traffic Service Officers are out in the field the entire day and have multiple shifts, which could utilize the same vehicle around the clock. The longer battery range allows the operation to continue working without the need to charge the vehicle in between shifts.", "In addition to the supplemental outreach conducted by Purchasing, staff reached out to municipalities throughout the country that have purchased a Westward Industries GO-4 vehicle within the past few years. The City of Pacific Grove, City of Portland, City of Santa Barbara, City of Pasadena, City and County of Denver, City of Manhattan Beach, City of Minneapolis, and City of Las Vegas were contacted about the procurement process they conducted. All municipalities reported that they purchased an older model year than 2016 model, received a single bid after conducting a competitive process, and all municipalities except for the City of Pacific Grove and City of Portland purchased the unleaded fuel model.", "The City of Pacific Grove purchased one 2015 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicle with different options than staff requested for this purchase. Although the bid price is lower than the bid price the City received, the 2016 model year with manufacturer upgrades as outlined below and additional options requested in the City\u2019s bid account for the difference in price.", "Staff reached out to the manufacturer, Westward Industries, to explain the difference in unit price from the 2015 electric model to the 2016 electric model. They reported that the new production models have a rear independent suspension versus the stiffer leaf springs suspension of the older model and the previously optional extended battery pack with newer battery technology has become the standard battery pack. The new pack is 20.2 KiloWatts versus 19.2 KiloWatts, is longer lasting and much lighter in weight.", "Staff explored the option of rejecting the bid in order to negotiate a sole source agreement with Westward Industries and see if the vendor would be willing to extend a quantity discount. The manufacturer indicated they would not offer a quantity discount, as these vehicles would need to be manufactured and their pricing reflects their cost plus profit. MME indicated that they would offer a discount for payment received within 15 days of receipt.  Based on this information staff determined that the time it would take to reject the bid, negotiate a sole source and seek Council approval thereafter would result in a delayed delivery of new vehicles beyond the available service date of certain vehicles, CNG tanks of four of the 23 to be replaced vehicles will expire in August 2016. In order to ensure Traffic Services\u2019 operations are not affected, staff would need to replace the CNG tanks on four vehicles. Due to this fact, staff decided that the benefit of moving forward with this bid award would be the most beneficial to the City of Santa Monica.", "The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, as well as the extensive outreach conducted, staff recommends Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. as the sole and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles in the amount of $1,064,263.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Municipal Maintenance Equipment, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $1,064,263. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "First Modification for the Parking Structure Condition Assessment, Testing, Analysis and Repair Services for Parking Structures 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 9 and 10", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10148 (CCS) in the amount of $264,063 (including a 15% contingency) with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc., a California-based company, for the development of construction documentation for Parking Structures 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 9 and 10 and for the development of a detailed structural engineering assessment involving testing and analysis at Parking Structures 1 and 3. This will result in a one year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $420,063 (including a 15% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City\u2019s parking structures are vital assets, and their continued operation and functionality are an essential service provided by the City. A key component in maintaining this service is the development of a condition assessment along with a systematic and robust maintenance plan for these structures to ensure continued operation and functionality. Initially, the City identified parking structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10 as candidates for assessment. Other parking structures such as 1, 3, 6, 7, 8, and Civic Center were not included in the initial assessment for various reasons. Currently, alternate uses are being considered in the short and long term for parking structures 1 and 3, while parking structures 7 and 8 are maintained by Macerich Company at Santa Monica Place. Parking structures 6 and Civic Center are relatively new structures.", "Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. (the Consultant) has provided the City with condition assessments, evaluations and preliminary costs of repairs for parking structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10. With the scope of repairs identified, the Consultant has provided the City with a cost to develop construction documentation for these repairs.", "On March 8, 2016, concrete spalls fell from the second floor slab in Parking Structure 1. An investigation of the floor slab necessitated the installation of temporary slab supports and requires an immediate structural engineering assessment involving testing, analysis, and construction documentation for permanent repairs.", "On April 26, 2016 the City Council directed staff to include parking structure 3 as part of this contract modification, in which the scope of work will be identical to the other structures.", "Staff recommends that Council approve a first modification in an amount not to exceed $264,063 (including a 15% contingency) to professional services agreement with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc., to develop construction documentation for repair of parking structures 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 9, and 10 and additional engineering assessment, testing, and analysis at parking structures 1 and 3 in an amount not to exceed $420,063 (includes a 15% contingency).", "Background", "The original parking structures 2, 4 and 5 were constructed in the 1960s. Parking structures 4 and 5 were originally built as five-story structures with the upper four-story additions completed later in the 1970s and 1980s, respectively. Parking structures 2, 4 and 5 were seismically upgraded in 2010, 2009 and 2005, as these structures experienced some degree of damage after the 1994 Northridge earthquake. Parking structure 9, built in 2001, and parking structure 10, built in the 1980s, were built as three and two-level structures, with housing constructed on top of each.", "In 2009, severe concrete spalling occurred at one of the downtown parking structures prompting the City to inspect all City owned parking structures. Multiple spalling locations were identified and subsequently repaired. Additionally, many slabs depicted various types of cracking which over time, may result in moisture intrusion and cause long term corrosion of the steel in the structural slabs.", "On July 28, 2015, the City Council authorized executing a professional services agreement with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $156,000 (including a 15% contingency) to conduct engineering assessment, testing, analysis and repair for Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9, and 10, per Attachment A. Initially, Parking Structure 1 and 3 were not considered for engineering assessment because of the City\u2019s intention to redevelop the parcels. Recent incidents have prompted the inclusion of these two facilities in the assessment and repair project.", "Discussion", "On October 9, 2015, the City and Consultant entered into a professional services agreement. As part of the original scope of work in the RFP, the City suggested a four-phase approach to the project which consisted of the following:", "Phase 1 - Condition Assessment Survey and Chemical and Physical Testing Program - including document review, field assessment and development of a testing program.", "Phase 2 - Laboratory Testing and Inspections \u2013 included field testing and laboratory analysis.", "Phase 3 - Evaluation Report and Recommendations \u2013 included compiling field data and prioritizing final repair and maintenance programs on a high, medium and low scale. Also included cost estimates for the repairs.", "Phase 4 - Construction Documents, Construction Engineering, Administration & Closeout", "During the RFP process, it was determined that a realistic scope and cost proposal for phase 4 could not be determined with accuracy without first preparing the final repair and maintenance program scope developed in phase 3. Currently, Phases 1 through 3 have been performed by the Consultant which provides a clear understanding of the additional required time and effort needed to complete construction documentation as part of Phase 4.", "Parking Structure 1 Inclusion", "Parking Structure 1 is located at 1234 4th Street and is a 5-story parking structure built in 1968. On March 8, 2016, two large pieces of concrete fell from the bottom of the second level slab and onto the City of Santa Monica Promenade Maintenance Office, located on the ground level of Parking Structure 1.", "Staff directed the Consultant to assess the situation immediately.", "During the visual assessment, the Consultant noticed structural deficiencies in the concrete slab just above the Promenade Maintenance office. Due to the severity of the deficiencies near the office, the Consultant recommended installation of temporary shoring of the second level slab in the affected area in order to stabilize the area, per Attachment B.", "After a preliminary evaluation of the entire structure, the Consultant noted that Parking Structure 1 is in \u201cfair\u201d condition with localized areas in \u201cpoor\u201d or \u201cfailed\u201d conditions. The following recommendations were developed by the Consultant in order to assess the condition of the structure and determine the extent of damage and develop a repair strategy:", "\u00b7 Detailed structural assessment and analysis of the entire structure.", "\u00b7 Develop and implement a repair program for immediate and high priority items in order to stabilize the structure and keep it in operation.", "\u00b7 Implement a long term maintenance plan for the structure.", "Because of the immediate attention needed to evaluate and rectify these issues, staff recommends adding this additional scope and fee as part of the first modification to professional services agreement #10148 with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc.", "Parking Structure 3 Inclusion", "Parking Structure 3 is located at 1320 4th Street and is a 5-story parking structure built in 1966. Currently, private developers for Arclight Theatres have submitted a proposal for the construction of a new movie theatre and mixed-use space which would include the demolition of parking structure 3. The project is currently pending approval. For these reasons along with overall cost versus benefit scenarios, Parking Structure 3 was not included in the previous contract.", "On April 26, 2016, the City Council directed staff to include Parking Structure 3 as part of this contract modification in order to determine comparisons between financial impacts related to future repair costs of the structure versus replacing the structure with the future redevelopment.", "Consultant Selection", "On April 8, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposal (RFP) #SP2373 for Parking Structure Condition Assessment, Testing, Analysis and Repair Services for Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Eight firms responded. Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. ranked highest among the eight firms. Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience on numerous projects similar in nature.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $264,063 (including a 15% contingency) for an amended agreement total not to exceed $420,063 (includes a 15% contingency). Funds in the amount of $264,063 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program. The agreement modification will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "C019053.589000", "Parking Structure Seal", "$150,424", "M019054.589000", "Maintenance for Parking Structures and Lots", "$113,639", "TOTAL", "$264,063", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}], [{"Title": "Financial Status Update, FY 2016-17 Proposed Operating Budget, and FY 2016-18 Proposed Biennial CIP Budget", "Department": "Finance Department, Budget Division", "Sponsors": "Director Donna Peter, Director Martin Pastucha", "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Receive the FY 2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Financial Status Update; and2. Review and provide direction to staff regarding the FY 2016-17 Proposed Operating Budget and FY 2016-18 Proposed Biennial Capital Improvement Program (CIP) Budget.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As part of maintaining our AAA credit rating, the City has established a two-year Operating Budget schedule and a rolling five-year General Fund budget projection. The City has also consistently invested in maintaining its vital infrastructure through a Biennial Capital Improvement Program adopted in the \u201cexception year\u201d of the two-year Operating budgets. The upcoming FY 2016-17 budget year is an exception year and so the emphasis is on both capital budgeting and looking ahead to the next cycle for the Operating Budget in light of future fiscal trends.", "The May 2016 General Fund Financial Status Update includes the Proposed FY 2016-17 Budget in its projection of the City\u2019s future budget climate. The Update shows positive balances during the first three years of the five-year forecast and shortfalls of $3.5 and $6.4 million (1.6% of the General Fund Budget), respectively, in the last two years. These shortfalls reflect large-scale capital infrastructure improvements and also anticipate that costs associated with providing current service levels are expected to increase at a faster pace than revenues.", "To maintain fiscal sustainability in future years, it is incumbent on the City to focus resources where they are most impactful. The FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget begins this shift of resources towards the City\u2019s strategic goals and the elements that will lay the groundwork for a new operating and strategic framework for the City. This framework, (based on the dimensions of wellbeing as defined by the Wellbeing Index and long-standing principles of sustainability, and reflective of the Council\u2019s five strategic goals) will act as the foundation for the City\u2019s FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget. The financial status of non-General funds remains stable. The proposed Citywide FY 2016-17 exception year operating budget is $508.1 million.", "As in recent years, the FY 2016-18 Proposed Biennial Capital Improvement Program (CIP) Budget makes significant investment in maintaining and enhancing critical City infrastructure and City facilities that are essential to providing City services. Santa Monica is a leader in responsible financial and environmental leadership in municipal capital planning and construction. Funding for critical infrastructure protects the City\u2019s existing capital investment and minimizes future maintenance and replacement costs. In addition, the Proposed Budget funds dozens of new projects that advance Council\u2019s five Strategic Goals \u2013 particularly the goal of establishing a new model for mobility \u2013 and proposes alternate financing to fund large community priority projects such as park expansion. The proposed Citywide capital budget is $113.7million for FY2016-17 and $121.7 million for FY 2017-18.", "The total FY 2016-17 Citywide Proposed Budget is $621.8 million, $372.3 million of which is in the General Fund.", "Background", "Council adopted the FY 2015-16 Budget and approved the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan on June 23, 2015 (Attachment A). Staff returned to Council on January 26, 2016 (Attachment B) with proposed midyear budget changes that reflected a higher growth in overall tax and parking revenues, and also increased expenditures slightly to account for operational needs. The January 2016 Update showed a potential shortfall of approximately $2.2 million in FY 2019-20. Since January, staff completed an exception-based budget process, identifying budget adjustments where programs, activities or revenue had changed significantly since the biennial budget adoption.", "Discussion", "Economic Update", "The national economy continues to grow at a slow pace. Economic growth has averaged only 2% annually since the end of the economic downturn, well below typical rates for periods of economic recovery, and the anticipated growth over the next two years is anticipated to be only slightly higher. There are also global economic concerns that may affect the national economy. However, the labor market has improved, with over 5 million jobs added during the last two years helping to drop the national unemployment rate to 5%. The housing market has continued to improve; recent economic forecasts project continued increases in home prices and sales are anticipated to continue to grow over the next few years. Inflation is expected to remain relatively low. In December, the Federal Reserve indicated its overall confidence in the economy by raising short term interest rates for the first time in nearly a decade.", "Like the national economy, the State economy is expected to show modest improvement over the next few years. Unemployment in the State has fallen to 5.6% after peaking at 12.4% in 2010, and is projected to drop below 5% by the end of 2017. Housing sales and median prices as well as the commercial real estate market remain strong and are expected to continue the recent trend over the next few years. The Governor has submitted a balanced budget for the fourth year in a row. Income tax and corporation tax revenues are expected to show solid growth and, as mandated by Proposition 2, any temporary spikes in revenue will be set aside for future recessions. However, sales taxes appear to be moderating.", "Santa Monica\u2019s diversified tax base and geographic location have led to a strong recovery from the most recent economic downturn. The City\u2019s economically-driven tax sources have recovered significantly to reach or exceed pre-recession levels. However, the local recovery has shown some signs of moderating over the last year.", "Property values remain the third highest in Los Angeles County. Assessed values are expected to increase by 4% in FY 2016-17 and 3% annually in future years. Sales tax growth is expected to moderate going forward, reflecting a continued shift of sales to online platforms. Tourism, which provides a strong stimulus to the local economy by creating jobs and producing revenues, continues to be one of the strongest performing components of the local economy. Staff recently calculated that approximately 18.5% of General Fund revenues are generated by the tourism industry. Transient Occupancy Tax revenue growth continues to be strong, but the rate of increase is moderating as FY2015-16 growth of 4% is projected to be less than half of the average annual increase over the last five years. Moderate growth is expected over the forecast period as average room rates continue to increase and two new hotel properties are scheduled to come online in FY 2016-17. Business license taxes are expected to decrease by 0.4% in FY 2016-17, reflecting the loss of several large taxpayers, and then grow slowly over the forecast period. Utility Users Taxes are expected to grow about 2.5% due to additional UUT from prepaid phone charges per AB 1717, then grow about 1.4% annually over the forecast period as non-taxed internet-enabled telecommunications services gain ground over the more traditional services that are currently taxed, and as water conservation measures lower the amount of water consumed and therefore taxed. Additionally, the ending of the federal Internet Tax Freedom Act moratorium may pose a significant risk to UUT from telecommunications in the future.", "Organizational Framework and Performance Management", "Staff is embarking on a strategic, multi-year effort to create an operational and strategic framework, align City operations under this framework, and clarify desired outcomes. This framework will be based on the dimensions of wellbeing as defined by the Wellbeing Index and long-standing principles of sustainability, and will be reflective of the Council\u2019s five strategic goals. A revised performance management system will measure and track how various services and programs impact or sustain the wellbeing of the community. An outcome-based budgeting approach will focus resources where they are most impactful. The first elements of this initiative will be adopted along with the FY2017-19 Biennial Budget.", "General Fund Financial Status Update", "The chart above reflects five years of fund balances for the General Fund as projected in the Financial Status Update once the FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget is incorporated. The primary reason for the dip in the last two years is the introduction of $4 million in annual debt service costs for the City Yards Modernization project, the end of contributions made from General Fund savings to workers\u2019 compensation self-insurance reserves, and continued increases to pension contributions. It is clear from these projections that continued pressure on increasingly limited resources will require the City to prioritize programs and operations and shift resources to those most effective and important needs in order to maintain a balanced budget in the future.", "Under the Probable Case Scenario, the General Fund shows a potential shortfall of $3.5million in FY 2018-19, which increases to $6.4 million (1.6% of the General Fund budget) in FY 2019-20. Revenue growth is expected to increase at an average rate of 2.6% during the forecast period. Expenditure growth rates, anticipated to average 3.9% during this period, will exceed revenue growth, gradually lowering the surplus each year.", "The Best Case Scenario reflects slightly higher revenues than are projected in the Proposed Budget as well as lower healthcare costs. In the best case, the General Fund fiscal condition would be positive throughout the forecast period, with a positive balance of $5.6 million in FY 2019-20.", "The Worst Case Scenario reflects lower revenues than are projected in the Proposed Budget (reflecting the effects of a potential recession) as well as continued increases in workers\u2019 compensation claims and the impact of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act\u2019s (ACA) \u201cCadillac Tax\u201d, an excise tax on high-cost health plans, in the last year of the forecast. While the Cadillac Tax has already been postponed by a year, it is anticipated that, even if the tax were eliminated, employers would ultimately pay higher premiums necessary to subsidize the cost of the ACA program. The worst case shows a potential shortfall of approximately $5million, or 1.4% of the City\u2019s General Fund budget, in FY 2016-17, increasing to $20.5 million (5.2% of the General Fund budget) in FY 2019-20. Since deficit spending is prohibited under California law, any revenue shortfall would be offset by reductions in expenditures or use of reserves.", "Other Funds Status", "Other major funds that are included in the Financial Status Update fall into two categories: 1) funds that operate with sufficient revenues to sustain necessary operating and capital needs, and 2) funds that have a structural deficit where ongoing revenues are not sufficient to cover ongoing expenditures.", "Self-Sustaining Enterprise Funds", "TheResource Recovery and Recycling (RRR),WaterandWastewater Fundshave sufficient revenues to cover current operations, due to rate increases in the Water and RRR Funds that will allow the implementation of the Sustainable Water Master Plan and the Zero Waste Master Plan, respectively, while also maintaining reserve levels. The Wastewater Fund continues to have adequate revenues and reserves to meet current operational and capital expenditures.", "The Big Blue Bus Fund will maintain a positive fund balance over the next five years.", "TheBeachandAirport Fundswill also generate adequate revenues to sustain their operations throughout the next five years.", "Staff projects thePier Fundto be self-sustaining through the end of FY 2017-18, contingent on capital project expenditures. Capital needs that are unable to be funded by the Pier Fund during the forecast period must compete with capital needs addressed through the General Fund.", "TheCemetery Fundis planning to implement a green burial program in FY 2016-17 which is projected to increase revenues, eliminating the need for a General Fund subsidy through the end of the forecast period.", "Funds Requiring General Fund Subsidies", "TheHousing Authority Fund has a projected operating structural deficit of $500,000 - $850,000 annually through the forecast period, due to the loss of redevelopment funding for the administration of the senior voucher program, and the reduction of U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) allocations.", "Exception-Based FY 2016-17 Operating Budget Adjustments", "As part of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget, Council adopted the FY 2015-16 Budget and approved the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan. Under biennial budgeting policies, staff requests adjustments to this plan only if programs, activities or revenues have changed significantly since the Biennial Budget adoption. This year, the changes are more forward-looking, reflecting a greater shift towards the City\u2019s strategic goals and the early efforts at creating a unifying and metrics-based framework that will be the foundation for the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget and beyond.", "The Citywide operating FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget is $508.1 million, $335.2 million of which is in the General Fund. Staff recommends $26.8 million in adjustments to the FY2016-17 Budget Plan approved by Council in June 2015. The majority, or $21.4 million, are revenue adjustments. $7.3 million, or 34% of the revenue changes are a continuation of FY 2015-16 adjustments made at midyear. Expenditure adjustments total $5.4 million. Changes are summarized below, and listed in detail in Attachment C.", "Revenue Adjustments \u2013 General Fund", "The FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget for the General Fund includes a number of recommended revenue adjustments, netting to an increase of approximately $6.2million. Of this amount, $3.7 million reflects the resumption of scheduled settlement payments from Boeing, which are restricted as to use. Unrestricted on-going adjustments total $2.5 million. Significant increases include $3.9 million from Downtown parking structure fee increases that further the City\u2019s mobility goals, and $2.2 million from increased parking usage. Adjustments in tax revenues reflect trends in the greater economy as noted in the Economic Update section. These include an additional $3.1million from higher than anticipated property taxes and $0.7 million from Documentary Transfer Taxes as the local real estate market continues to improve; and $0.9 million in Sales Taxes.", "Partially offsetting are decreases in Transient Occupancy Taxes (-$3.5 million) reflecting a decrease in occupancy rates over the last year, and a several month delay in the opening of two new hotels, decreases in Utilities User Taxes (-$1.8 million) due to changes in the telecommunications market and the proliferation of nontaxed telecommunication services, and decreases in electricity use and natural gas prices; and the transfer of Community Broadband revenue to the new Community Broadband Fund (-$2.1 million). All revenues recommended for adjustments are identified in Attachment C.", "Revenue Adjustments \u2013 Other Funds", "Significant revenue adjustments in other funds include:", "\u00b7 Special Revenue Source (04) Fund \u2013 increase of $3.4 million due to increased development agreement contributions and Energy Efficient Rebates from efficiency projects, partially offset by a decrease from the elimination of the Downtown Shuttle Program;", "\u00b7 Housing Authority (12) Fund \u2013 increase of $1.0 million due to an increase in Section 8 housing assistance program vouchers and Section 8 administrative expense reimbursements;", "\u00b7 Community Broadband (28) Fund \u2013 increase of $2.1 million due to revenues transferred from the General Fund related to Community Broadband Services.", "\u00b7 Pier (30) Fund \u2013 increase of $1.0 million due to greater than anticipated lease revenues;", "\u00b7 Wastewater (31) Fund \u2013 increase of $1.7 million to reflect a revised impact on the fund from water conservation. Much of the water savings is being achieved from decreased use of water for landscaping, which does not use the sewer system.", "\u00b7 Airport (33) Fund \u2013 increase of $3.6 million due to renegotiated lease rates for Airport Office Shop Rentals; and", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus (41) Fund \u2013 increase of $1.1 million primarily due to increased capital grants and an extension of the federal fuel tax credit. Partially offsetting is a reduction in passenger revenues reflecting a decreasing trend in ridership.", "Operating Expenditure and Staffing Adjustments \u2013 General Fund", "Proposed General Fund operating expenditure adjustments result in a net appropriation of $1.4 million, including the transfer of $1.5 million to the new Community Broadband Fund. Changes are detailed in Attachment C. While a few of these adjustments are housekeeping items, realigning budgets with operations, staff is also recommending changes that transition the City\u2019s operations towards meeting the Council\u2019s five strategic goals, and changes that begin to lay the groundwork for the City\u2019s new outcome-based framework. Staff is recommending the following strategic changes:", "\u00b7 Focusing on Mobility, appropriate one-time funds to support the Gateway Access Master Plan and implement State CEQA changes that alter the way circulation impacts are measured;", "\u00b7 Focusing on securing local control of the City land occupied by the Santa Monica Airport, appropriate funds to lease land from the Airport for the 12 acre expansion of Airport Park on non-aviation land, and add 1.0 FTE limited-term Public Works Construction Specialist position, reimbursed by the Airport Fund, to oversee the progress of construction projects at the airport;", "\u00b7 Focusing on maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, appropriate $300,000 for a pilot program providing rental assistance to rent-burdened households living in rent-controlled apartments, for the purpose of preserving housing affordability (see Attachment D for full project description), appropriate one\u2011time funds for the Pico Neighborhood Plan to review development standards for the boulevard and neighborhood, add 1.0 FTE Tenant Relocation Coordinator to serve as a central contact and facilitator for displaced tenants, and adjust staffing in the Housing Division (with no net budget change) to accommodate the increasing complexity of affordable housing issues;", "\u00b7 Focusing on the Learn + Thrive goal, adjust Library staffing by a net of 1.0 FTE positions to accommodate increased library programming and implementation of the Library Strategic Plan, add 2.3 FTE positions to support programming at Lincoln Middle School Pool, and add 1.0 FTE Organizational Development and Training Coordinator to expand and enhance staff training at the Santa Monica Institute;", "\u00b7 Supporting multiple goals, add 2.3 FTE permanent and part-time attorney positions and legal assistant staff in the City Attorney\u2019s Office;", "\u00b7 Furthering the City\u2019s longstanding sustainability goals, staff is recommending the addition of 1.0 FTE Senior Sustainability Analyst to oversee the implementation of the Climate Action Plan, with no net budget change, extension of 3.0 FTE limited-term positions, reimbursed by the Water Fund, to focus on water conservation efforts, 2.0 FTE positions to maintain hardscape at the Colorado Esplanade, Tongva Park and Ken Genser Square, and a reorganization in the Architectural Services Division that will increase the capacity of staff to manage the City\u2019s infrastructure maintenance projects; and", "\u00b7 To lead the City\u2019s efforts in defining the data strategy that will serve the new performance management system, staff is requesting 1.0 FTE Chief Data Officer, and a two-year limited term 1.0 FTE position to develop a customer relationship management system that will link services and track data such as call topics, issues and response times. Both positions will be located in the City Manager\u2019s Office.", "The General Fund includes a net increase of 12.5 Full Time Equivalent (FTE) positions, largely offset by reallocation of funds and reimbursements from other funds, that results in a net General Fund appropriation of $0.1 million. Staffing adjustments are detailed in Attachment E.", "Operating Expenditure and Staffing Adjustments \u2013 Other Funds", "Proposed operating expenditure adjustments for other funds result in a net appropriation of $4 million. A detailed list is included in Attachment C. Significant, strategic and staffing-related changes include the following:", "\u00b7 Housing Authority (12) Fund \u2013 increase of $1 million to reflect an increase in Section 8 housing assistance program vouchers and administrative expenses;", "\u00b7 Water (25) Fund \u2013 increase of $0.6 million to reflect addition of a 1.0 FTE SCADA Software Analyst and extension of Water Conservation Unit limited-term staffing through FY2016-17 due to a delay in hiring;", "\u00b7 Community Broadband (28) Fund \u2013 create a new enterprise fund related to Community Broadband Services;", "\u00b7 Pier (30) Fund \u2013 transfer the Office of Pier Management from the City Manager\u2019s Office to the Public Works Department to better align day-to-day operations and management of the Pier;", "\u00b7 Airport (33) Fund \u2013 increase of $1 million to reflect additional maintenance costs as the City takes on the role of property manager for aviation property at the Santa Monica Airport, and reimbursement to the General Fund for the addition of a 1.0 FTE limited-term Public Works Construction Specialist;", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus (41) Fund \u2013 increase of $0.2 million to reflect a net decrease of 1.6FTE positions including the addition of a Motor Coach Operator Supervisor to accommodate the additional need of increased service associated with Expo, particularly related to on-time performance, an LCNG Technician position to meet the needs associated with the BBB\u2019s increased fleet size and its demands on the fuel and wash system, and additional training needs; and", "\u00b7 Self-Insurance, General Liability (56) Fund \u2013 increase of $0.1 million for consultant services to develop a system to administer mandated protected leave programs.", "Other funds include a net increase of 5.4 Full Time Equivalent (FTE) at a cost of $1.2million, which includes the transfer of $0.7 million for 4.0 FTE positions in the Community Broadband Fund. Staffing adjustments are detailed in Attachment E.", "Fees and Charges", "The master fee resolution is presented to Council annually with the budget. For FY2016-17, most fees will increase by the automatic cost of living adjustment. Additionally, there will be some modifications to the fee schedule, which for the most part are clean up items such as description changes and ensuring consistency with similar fees and related ordinances. Additionally, changes will be proposed to certain Newsrack Permit fees and CREST Childcare fees. These changes will be discussed in more detail in the budget adoption staff report presented to Council on June 14, 2016.", "In addition to the changes to the master fee resolution, staff will propose to establish for the first time a City TV rate card to standardize billing practices and fees, and will also be proposing changes to Breeze Bikeshare program fees. These will be discussed in more detail in the budget adoption staff report.", "Finally, there will be some minor changes proposed for the master fine resolution to ensure the City\u2019s fine schedule remains consistent with State law.", "Capital Improvement Program (CIP) Biennial Budget Process", "The City of Santa Monica biennially develops a five-year Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget (Attachment F). Funds for the first year (FY 2016-17) are approved and appropriated as part of the budget process, and funds for the second year (FY 2017-18) are approved now and will be appropriated prior to the start of the second fiscal year. Budget plan numbers for FY 2018-19 through FY 2020-21 are included as a planning tool to demonstrate total anticipated capital funding needs.", "The Capital Improvement Program (CIP) FY 2016-18 Proposed Biennial Budget makes significant investment in maintaining and enhancing critical City infrastructure and City facilities that are essential to providing City services. Funding for critical infrastructure protects the City\u2019s existing capital investment and minimizes future maintenance and replacement costs. In addition, the Proposed Budget funds dozens of new projects that advance Council\u2019s five Strategic Goals \u2013 particularly the goal of establishing a new model for mobility \u2013 and proposes alternate financing to fund large community priority projects such as park expansion.", "CIP Budget Overview", "The Citywide CIP Proposed Biennial Budget is $113.7 million in FY 2016-17, and $121.7 million in FY 2017-18. The FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget represents an increase of $27.5 million or 32% compared to the FY 2015-16 Adopted CIP Budget of $86.2million. Almost a third of this increase is due to the allocation of redevelopment-related loan repayments to affordable housing development. Another third results from the appropriation of settlement funds previously held in reserve for the design of the City Yards Modernization project. The last significant portion is in the Vehicle Replacement Program, where efforts are being made to catch up on deferred replacements. The General Fund represents $37.1 million or 33% of the total FY 2016-17 CIP Budget.", "The Proposed CIP Budget for FY 2017-18 is $121.7 million, and the General Fund Budget is approximately $61.9 million or 54% of the total. The General Fund budget is higher than usual in FY 2017-18 due to the Fire Station 1 construction budget of $41.6million. Bond funding was previously anticipated for this project, but bond issuance is now proposed for the larger City Services Building and City Yards Modernization projects instead. One-time reserves are available to fund the Fire Station 1 construction.", "All non-General Funds included in the CIP budget are able to support their respective capital improvement budgets, with the exception of the Pier Fund. While the Pier Fund can support its capital needs in FY 2016-17, the CIP Budget Plan projects a need for a General Fund subsidy toward Pier Fund CIPs in the amount of $1.4 million in FY2017\u201118 and FY 2018-19, and $1.7 million in FY 2019-20. These amounts will be finalized with each annual budget adoption and will be deducted from the annual CIP allocation for General Fund projects. Only projects deemed critical to Pier infrastructure maintenance or safety are recommended for funding.", "Budget Process", "Departments prepare project application submittals for funding consideration. The CIP Committee, comprised of the City\u2019s Department Heads and the Assistant City Manager, scores projects that are competing for limited funds according to three broad criteria, defined as follows:", "\u00b7 Mandated Activities", "\u00b7 Council / Community Priorities", "\u00b7 Fiscal Responsibility", "Capital Program Areas and Council\u2019s Strategic Goals", "The CIP Biennial Budget funds projects in several categories or program areas. The chart below presents the average budget breakdown by category over the biennial budget period.", "Note: Internal service transfer budgets are not included in this breakdown. Budgets for the computer, telecommunications, and vehicle replacement funds are in the General Government category.", "The FY 2016-18 CIP Biennial Budget and the five-year Capital Plan advance Council\u2019s adopted Strategic Goals. The goal of establishing a new model for mobility is central to the five-year Capital Plan. The Plan includes 29 mobility-related projects, both new and ongoing, with total recommended budget allocations exceeding $65 million over the five-year planning period.", "In addition, this budget appropriates over $10 million for affordable housing production and preservation, contributing to the goals of maintaining an inclusive and diverse community and taking a leadership role in regional efforts to address homelessness.", "While work to secure local control of the broader Airport land is underway, this CIP Budget includes $1.1 million in design funding for Airport Park Expansion, recognizing that converting 12 acres of land currently under City control to park land is a key Council and community priority.", "To advance the goal of continuing the partnership to support education from Cradle to Career, the CIP Budget includes an additional $1 million budget appropriation to the existing Early Childhood Education Center project, which will be built in partnership with Santa Monica College.", "Impacts on the Operating Budget", "If all projects proposed in this five-year plan are completed, they will add an estimated $0.5 million to the General Fund operating budget in FY 2017-18, increasing to an estimated $1.6 million in FY 2020-21. The most significant increase is $0.6 million annually to maintain the City Services Building once it is constructed. These ongoing costs are considered by the CIP Committee when projects are evaluated during the CIP Budget Process to ensure that the Capital Budget Plan does not create unsustainable ongoing maintenance needs.", "Alternate Financing Needs for Significant Projects", "Given the General Fund annual CIP allocation of $21 million, alternative financing strategies must be pursued to complete a number of large priority projects while still continuing to fund other capital improvements and infrastructure maintenance work that comprise much of the annual CIP budget. Design work on these projects is either already underway, or is budgeted in the first two years of the five-year CIP plan using available funds.", "Fire Station #1 Construction", "Project design costs for the construction of Fire Station #1 were budgeted in the previous CIP, and design is underway. Construction has been delayed due to land acquisition complications and as a result, construction costs have escalated. It was anticipated that bond financing would be required for this project, but funds are now available to pursue a pay as you go approach. Construction is estimated to cost roughly $41.6 million and is budgeted in FY 2017-18.", "City Services Building", "On March 27, 2012 (Attachment G), Council authorized staff to seek proposals for the feasibility, initial design and cost estimates for a City Services Building (CSB) located on the site just east of City Hall. On April 28, 2015 (Attachment H), Council authorized the City Manager to award a design services contract for the Building. If Council approves the resulting design, construction could begin on the City Services Building in FY 2018-19. Construction of the City Services Building and associated tenant improvements to the existing City Hall building are proposed to be financed with a lease revenue bond for approximately $74.5 million. The debt service payments would be partially covered from what the City would have otherwise paid in rent at other facilities, and the difference would be diverted from the General Fund CIP allocation annually in future budget cycles once the CSB is operational. The debt service contribution is currently estimated to reduce available CIP funding by approximately $3.2 to $3.4 million initially, and will decrease slightly each year until year 18-27 of CSB operations, depending on final financing. Over time, the building would generate lease savings that, along with utility savings, would eventually exceed the cost of annual debt service and provide long-term savings to the City. The building debt would be retired in 30 years while the building is designed with a useful life of 150 years.", "City Yards Modernization", "The City Yards is a 14.7-acre site located at 2500 Michigan Avenue that serves as the base for the City\u2019s maintenance operations, associated offices, storage facilities, and other industrial uses. The City Yards operates seven days a week and currently houses more functions and employees than it was designed to accommodate. The scope and breadth of the operations has evolved over time. Functional and space needs are no longer met by the facilities for any of the operations housed at the City Yards.", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment I), Council approved the City Yards Master Plan in concept, and on July 28, 2015 (Attachment J), Council awarded a bid to Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for concept design, cost estimation services, and feasibility analysis for the City Yards Modernization. The feasibility analysis indicates an estimated cost of $114 million to complete the first phases of the City Yards Modernization project. This CIP plan proposes utilizing $11.7 million in Charnock settlement funds to fully fund the design phase of the project. Remaining available Charnock settlement funds totaling $38.3 million will be used to fund a portion of construction.", "The remaining construction budget of $64 million is proposed to be funded with a lease revenue bond. The General Fund would not bear the full burden of debt service costs for the City Yards. Costs would be allocated to other funds with associated operations at the City Yards, including Resource, Recovery, and Recycling and the Vehicle Management Fund. At this time, staff is projecting a $4.0 million annual debt service cost for the General Fund. This cost is included in the General Fund Financial Status Update shown in this report, beginning in FY 2018-19.", "City Yards Modernization efforts would also be coordinated with adjacent Water and Wastewater plans, ensuring that those funds would also contribute their share of costs. Staff will explore financing options and feasibility and will return to Council with a recommendation.", "Park Expansion Efforts", "Santa Monica currently has 1.4 acres of parkland per 1,000 residents, which is well below the countywide average of 3.3 acres per 1,000 residents. This proposed capital budget includes a total of $3 million in design funding for the Airport Park Expansion, Memorial Park Expansion, and Temporary Civic Center Sports Field projects. Preliminary construction estimates for these three projects total approximately $86 million, which is more than the General Fund CIP annual allocation will be able to support. Alternate financing will be required for construction, and could come from parks and recreation development impact fees, bond proceeds from a potential future County parks bond measure, and proceeds from a potential future local general obligation bond. As design on these projects progresses and construction estimates are refined, staff will continue to explore alternate financing options and provide recommendations to Council.", "Concept design is already underway on the Airport Park Expansion project. There are some considerations of note that will need to be addressed in planning stages for Memorial Park Expansion and the Temporary Civic Center Sports Field. At Memorial Park, it will be critical to identify and secure a permanent home for the staff and vehicles from the Public Landscape Division that are currently housed at the Colorado Yards (former Fisher Lumber site). A Temporary Civic Center multi-purpose field suitable for soccer and lacrosse (60 x 110 yard plus sideline space, lighting, fencing and a temporary restroom trailer) would displace approximately 430 surface parking spaces.  Replacement of these spaces would need to be addressed prior to seeking Coastal Commission approval for the field project.", "Unfunded Projects", "Projects that do not receive funding are listed in the budget document and are tracked for consideration in future funding cycles. In many cases these are still high priority projects, but they may need to be deferred for a number of reasons such as exploring opportunities to leverage City funds with external funding where possible, or to acknowledge workload considerations where existing staffing capacity is fully committed to other urgent projects.", "In some cases, staff is able to continue preliminary or related work until it is possible to fully fund a broader effort. For example, due to a large number of high budget projects that are critical to maintaining core City services or infrastructure, there was insufficient funding available in this budget cycle to fund the Lincoln Neighborhood Corridor Plan. Staff will continue to explore funding options for this project, which is currently estimated to cost $18 million. In the current budget cycle, staff will also begin broader Streetscape Planning efforts to conduct visioning and financing analysis around improving streetscapes Citywide.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Staff will return to Council on June 14, 2016 to recommend adoption of the FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget.#1"]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Amending the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street to Change the Zoning Designation from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on May 10, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending the official districting map for 1419 19th Street.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Approving the Development Agreement Between the City of Santa Monica, A Municipal Corporation and DK Broadway LLC, and an Ordinance Amending the City's Official Districting Map to Change the Zoning Designation for a Portion of the Property Located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard from M1 (Industrial Conservation) to MUB (Mixed Use Boulevard)", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on May 10, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance approving the Development Agreement between the City Of Santa Monica, A Municipal Corporation, and DK Broadway LLC, and an ordinance amending the City's Official Districting Map to change the zoning designation for a portion of the property located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard from M1 (Industrial Conservation) to MUB (Mixed Use Boulevard)", "The ordinances are now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance to Amend the Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of SMMC Article 9) and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6 of SMMC Article 9) Making Minor Clerical Changes, Corrections, and Clarifications.", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending the City's Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions making minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications. These amendments fall into the following general categories: spelling, grammar, and punctuation; section references; formatting and organization; clarification; continuity from prior zoning ordinance; internal consistency with existing ordinance; and Council direction.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Since the adoption of a new Zoning Ordinance in July 2015, staff has identified unintentional errors, inconsistencies, or omissions that require minor clerical changes, corrections, or clarifications. These minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of SMMC Article 9) and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6 of SMMC Article 9). This report recommends that the City Council amend the City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions making these minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications through the adoption of an ordinance.", "Background", "On June 23, 2015, the City Council adopted a new Zoning Ordinance that became effective on July 24, 2015. Since its adoption, staff has identified unintentional errors, inconsistencies, or omissions that require minor clerical changes, corrections, or clarifications.", "On February 17, 2016, the Planning Commission adopted Resolution of Intention 16-001 (PCS), announcing its intention to consider these minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance. On March 16, 2016, the Commission reviewed the proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications and adopted Resolution 16-002 (PCS), recommending that Council make all of the proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance.", "Discussion", "The proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance. The specific minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications in the Zoning Ordinance are detailed in the attached Proposed Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5) Redline Modifications (Attachment B) along with brief explanations for each minor clerical change, correction, and clarification (Attachment D). The minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications fall into the following general categories:", "Spelling, Grammar, and Punctuation", "These modifications address minor spelling corrections and typos along with minor grammatical corrections.", "Section References", "These modifications fix incorrect section references as well as provide additional section references for clarity and informative purposes.", "Formatting and Organization", "These modifications reformat and reorganize several sections of the Zoning Ordinance to clarify the applicability of standards, correct the grouping of land uses, and eliminate potential confusion between different standards.", "Clarification", "These modifications provide more specificity, context, and information through the addition or elimination of language to clarify various standards and processes. Certain clarifications are also made to ensure consistency with State law.", "Continuity from Prior Zoning Ordinance", "These modifications bring continuity with the prior Zoning Ordinance for standards and processes that were inadvertently left out of the Zoning Ordinance update or incorrectly carried over and were not intended to be changed.", "Internal Consistency within Existing Ordinance", "These modifications correct internal consistencies between processes, standards, and nomenclature within the existing Zoning Ordinance.", "Council Direction", "The City Council has also directed staff to initiate an amendment pertaining to the required market rate bedroom mix for Tier 2 projects. This modification is included in the proposed changes.", "Other Scrivener\u2019s Errors Identified within the Categories Listed Above", "Other minor errors might be identified by staff and the City Council prior to or at the Council hearing. Aside from typographical or clerical errors, any additional proposed corrections will need to be reviewed by the Planning Commission prior to Council review.", "The Planning Commission has begun preliminary identification of policy issues that have arisen since the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance with the anticipation that it will soon commence formal discussion of these issues and consideration of potential Zoning Ordinance changes that may be warranted based on these discussions.", "Land Use and Related Provisions", "Minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications are also proposed for Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions contained in Division 6 of SMMC Article 9 and are detailed in the attached Proposed Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6) Redline Modifications (Attachment C) along with brief explanations for each minor clerical change, correction, and clarification (Attachment D). As Division 6 of SMMC Article 9 is not a part of the Zoning Ordinance, the Planning Commission did not review the proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications for this Division. These minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications fall into the same general categories discussed above for the Zoning Ordinance.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions are categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed changes may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended modifications represent minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications that do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.", "Text Amendment Findings", "1. The Ordinance amendments are consistent in principle with the General Plan, in that the amendments do not affect policy decisions made with the City Council\u2019s adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions.", "2. The Ordinance amendments are consistent with the purpose of this Ordinance to promote the growth of the City in an orderly manner and to promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare, in that the amendments maintain the existing policies, standards, and regulations of the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions that promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Introduction for First Reading an Interim Ordinance Extending Interim Ordinance 2487 (CCS) Establishing Development Procedures and Standards in the Downtown Core Land Use Designation Pending Adoption of the City\u2019s Downtown Community Plan, Waiving the Alcohol Establishment Cap in the Bayside Commercial Zoning Districts for Restaurants, and Prohibiting the Conversion of Existing Full Service Restaurants into Restaurants that do not Provide Full Service Within the BSC-1 Zone.", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an interim ordinance extending Interim Ordinance 2487 (CCS) to August 31, 2017 establishing interim development procedures and standards pending adoption of the Downtown Community Plan, Waiving the Alcohol Establishment Cap in the Bayside Commercial Zoning District for Restaurants, and Prohibiting the Conversion of Existing Full Service Restaurants into Restaurants that do not Provide Full Service Within the BSC-1 Zone.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On June 9, 2015, Council adopted an interim ordinance (IZO) establishing development procedures pending adoption of the Downtown Specific Plan (DSP), now retitled to the Downtown Community Plan (DCP). The IZO was extended by Council on July 14, 2015 until August 31, 2016. The timeline for the Downtown Community Plan has been extended to allow for more community outreach; the Plan will not be adopted prior to August 31, 2016. The proposed interim ordinance extension continues, until August 31, 2017, provisions of Interim Ordinance 2487. Extending the interim ordinance ensures there continues to be a development agreement process, in the interim, for Downtown projects over 32 feet high so that the City has flexibility to incorporate into the development review process goals for the Downtown, including urban design, open space, community benefits, and expanding transportation choice.", "This interim ordinance extension also includes two new amendments intended to address immediate issues related to the vitality and enjoyment of Downtown. Specifically, the interim ordinance proposes to prohibit conversions of existing full service restaurants into restaurants that do not provide full service within the BSC-1 zoning district. This amendment seeks to provide time to analyze the recent demand for \u201cfast-casual\u201d restaurants and their impact on the diversity of eating establishments in the Third Street Promenade area, and whether they should be characterized as restaurants or fast food.", "The interim ordinance also proposes to allow alcohol licenses associated with restaurants to exceed the existing limit of 50 alcohol establishments in the Bayside Commercial Zoning District. This amendment would serve to open a discussion as to whether limiting the number of alcohol establishments in the Bayside Commercial Zoning District continues to be desirable. Alcohol sales in restaurants are an incidental component of the primary use of the business as a restaurant. Further, alcohol-related impacts are generally not associated with restaurants that provide alcohol service. All restaurants are typically governed by a Conditional Use Permit or Alcohol Exemption that establish operational parameters including hours of operation and alcohol sales, limiting alcohol sales in outdoor seating areas, restricting percentage of gross revenue that can be alcohol sales, and compliance with the noise ordinance.", "The Draft DCP was released for public review in February 2016 and proposes goals and policies for various subject areas including a circulation framework that addresses the integration of Expo Light Rail into the Downtown system, freeway access, public parking structure access, and congestion, establishing the foundation for future land use and transportation decisions. The Draft DCP also includes proposed development standards such as height, FAR, maximum floor plate ratios, building setbacks from sidewalks, required open space, and vehicle and bicycle parking standards.", "Currently, there are 18 pending development agreement projects and four pending development review permit projects located within the DCP planning area. While the Draft DCP has had a series of public hearings and a multi-year public engagement process during which time built form, public open space, mobility strategies, community benefits and historic preservation have been largely discussed, the document has not yet been adopted. Consequently, specific standards and processes to govern the DCP\u2019s six land use districts have not been codified. An interim ordinance is essential to ensure projects are not approved in the Downtown Core that could potentially undermine the core concepts presented in the Draft DCP.", "The extension of the interim ordinance would apply to any application for a development project pending as of the effective date of this interim ordinance unless the development project has otherwise obtained a vested right to proceed and conversions of full service restaurants that have not yet submitted a plan check application as of the effective date of this interim ordinance. While this interim ordinance proposes minimal changes to the interim ordinance, it may be extended and modified as necessary as the DCP process continues.", "Background", "A staff report presented to Council on June 9, 2015 provided background information as to the intent of the interim ordinance. Interim Ordinance 2487 (CCS) was adopted in order to ensure that the core concepts of the DCP are applied in the development process while the DCP process continues. Eighteen development agreements and four Development Review Permits have been filed for projects in the Downtown Core and currently remain active. Of those development agreements, 12 are housing projects (two of which are part of a property exchange for a future Downtown Fire Department substation), one is a movie theater (Arclight), and five propose hotels (one hotel is a mixed-use project that includes several uses located at 4th/5th & Arizona Avenue on City property).", "Development review procedures and standards for Tier 2 projects have been adopted for all areas of the City outside the Downtown as part of the Zoning Ordinance Update. Work is underway to develop a similar tier structure in the Downtown Core for both Tier 2 and some Tier 3 projects through the adoption of the DCP, which would allow these projects to be processed through a discretionary permit subject to the requirements of applicable zoning districts, identified permitted uses, and objective development standards.", "The DCP planning process has been ongoing since the adoption of the LUCE, which deferred to a Specific Plan to assign appropriate development standards and address emerging issues such as diverse housing options, the need for open space, improved mobility strategies and linkages to the Expo Light Rail station. In addition to extensive public engagement, thus far, the process has included:", "\u00b7 Council direction regarding development standards to be in the Environmental Impact Report (August 13, 2013);", "\u00b7 Release of the Downtown Specific Plan Framework in 2013", "\u00b7 Release of the Draft Downtown Specific Plan in February 2014", "\u00b7 Planning Commission discussion of the Draft DSP in November 2015", "\u00b7 Release of the Draft Downtown Community Plan in February 2016", "\u00b7 Planning Commission discussion of the Draft DCP in March 2016", "On a parallel track, the corresponding Program Environmental Impact Report (PEIR) for the Downtown Community Plan was released in February 2016, and has been in circulation for public review for an extended time period of 90 days (between February 3rd, 2016 to May 3rd, 2016).", "Discussion", "As was detailed in the June 9, 2015 staff report, much of the existing zoning standards governing the Downtown were enacted prior to the adoption of the LUCE and the subsequent commencement of the original DSP preparation. The current Draft DCP proposes a tier structure similar to that established in the LUCE. The Tier 1 base height is generally established at 32 feet with some variation for projects that provide on-site affordable housing. Projects that seek additional height over 32 feet require discretionary review or a development agreement, are required to provide community benefits, and achieve increased trip reduction goals. Discretionary review means that a project requires a public hearing before the Planning Commission and/or City Council. Discretionary review allows for greater control over a project\u2019s mix of uses, form and scale, density, height, and Transportation Demand Management measures. Projects processed through a Development Agreement must be presented to both Planning Commission and the City Council, with Council making the ultimate decision to approve or deny the application.", "Desired outcomes of the DCP include", "\u00b7 Establishing updated development standards that provide greater flexibility for achieving desired urban form and incentives for preservation of scale and character;", "\u00b7 Increasing publicly accessible open space and pedestrian linkages;", "\u00b7 Increasing housing, employment and cultural enrichment opportunities;", "\u00b7 Establish high standards of sustainability for new development and public infrastructure; and", "\u00b7 Providing a comprehensive circulation and parking strategy for the Downtown that integrates the Expo Light Rail and improves transportation choice.", "Preserving Full-Service Restaurants in the BSC-1 Zone", "The BSC-1 zoning district encompasses the Third Street Promenade and immediately surrounding blocks. In recent years, the Third Street Promenade has seen replacement of full-service restaurants with other kinds of eating establishments. The 1988 zoning ordinance defines restaurant in part as, \u201cAny building, room, space or portion thereof where food is sold for consumption on site, except for uses qualifying as incidental food service\u2026\u201d The Zoning Ordinance Update refined this definition. Consistent with the definition in Section 9.51.030(B)(8) of the Zoning Ordinance Update, the interim ordinance would define full-service restaurants as, \u201cRestaurants providing food and beverage services to patrons who order and are served while seated and pay after eating. Takeout service may also be provided.\u201d Of the 18 restaurants operating in the BSC-1 zone, only eight are full-service restaurants. In the past six months, three additional full-service restaurants have closed. If the three spaces are occupied by non-full-service restaurants, the share of full-service restaurants would be further diminished.", "Fast-food restaurants, except those located in a fast-food court, are prohibited in the BSC-1 zone. The 1988 zoning ordinance defines fast-food restaurant in part as, \u201cA restaurant where customers purchase food and either consume the food on the premises within a short period of time or take the food off the premises. Typical characteristics of a fast-food restaurant include, but are not limited to, the purchase of food at a walk-up window or counter, payment for food prior to consumption and the packaging of food in disposable containers. A restaurant shall not be considered a fast-food or take-out restaurant solely on the basis of incidental or occasional take-out sales\u2026\u201d", "Changes in the restaurant industry and customer preferences have increased demand for \u201cfast-casual\u201d restaurants which contain attributes of both full-service and fast food restaurants. These restaurants are typically distinguished by orders taken and paid for at a counter with food being brought to a table by a server. Food is generally served on non-disposable containers. Many \u201cfast-casual\u201d restaurants have opened in the BSC-1 zone in recent years including Chipotle, Hummus Bar Express, Steak \u2018n Shake, and Bruxie. These restaurants have been permitted because their operations include food being served at a table, whether or not the order was placed at a counter; or food being served in non-disposable containers.", "The 1988 zoning ordinance does not specifically address whether \u201cfast-casual\u201d restaurants should be characterized as restaurants or fast food. If the \u201cfast-casual\u201d restaurants are characterized as fast food, they would be considered to be within the existing prohibition on fast food.", "There is concern that loss of all full-service restaurants may change the nature of the Promenade and the desire to provide a diversity of retail and dining options to visitors. By their nature, full-service restaurants may tend to result in visitors spending more time within Downtown potentially creating greater economic benefits for the area. In order to allow additional time to analyze this issue through the DCP process, staff recommends an interim prohibition on the conversion of existing full-service restaurants to restaurants that do not provide full service, pending the completion of the DCP.", "Supporting Restaurants with Alcohol Service in the Bayside District", "SMMC Section 9.04.08.15.080 currently limits the number of alcohol establishments in the Bayside Commercial zoning district to 50. This numerical cap was originally imposed on a block-by-block basis in 1996 (further amended in 2005) based on Policy 4.1.9 in the Bayside District Specific Plan, which states, \u201cThe number of on-sale alcohol outlets and food serving establishments in the Bayside District shall be limited on a block by block basis in order to provide for a mix of activities including retail and entertainment, and to prevent an over concentration of food serving and alcohol outlets.\u201d At the time the Bayside District Specific Plan was enacted in 1996, retail uses made up approximately a third of commercial space on the Promenade. The Promenade\u2019s emerging role as a local and regional entertainment center had attracted movie theaters, entertainment, and restaurant activity. There was a concern that there was an over-concentration of restaurants and therefore, there was great interest in increasing retail businesses in the Specific Plan area, which led to the development of Policy 4.1.9.", "A decade after the adoption of the Bayside District Specific Plan, the opposite effect took hold where restaurants were being converted to retail use. As a result, the City Council enacted new zoning regulations in 2006 that restricted the conversion of food use to any other new or expanded use on the ground floor level. The Promenade remains a highly successful outdoor place with a diversity of retail, dining, and entertainment options. The popularity of Downtown as a local and regional destination has spurred the opening of more restaurants within the Bayside District, defined as 1st Court to 4th Court between Wilshire Boulevard and Broadway. In an increasingly competitive restaurant market, many, if not all restaurants provide alcohol service associated with full meal service. Of the 50 alcohol licenses existing in the Bayside District, all but three are associated with restaurants (Type 41 and Type 47 ABC licenses). Alcohol sales in restaurants are incidental to the primary use of the business as a restaurant. All restaurants are governed by Conditional Use Permits or Alcohol Exemptions that establish operational conditions including hours of alcohol sales, limiting alcohol sales in outdoor seating areas, restrictions on percentage of gross revenue that can be alcohol sales, and compliance with the Noise ordinance. Alcohol-related impacts such as excess noise or public drunkenness are generally not associated with restaurants that provide alcohol service.", "The numerical limit on alcohol establishments in the Bayside District was reached in October 2014 and there is currently one application on the waiting list. Although four alcohol establishments have recently closed, those licenses will not become available until one year has lapsed from the date of last alcohol service. The interim ordinance proposes a minor amendment that would allow restaurants with alcohol service (i.e. Type 41 and Type 47 licenses) to exceed the cap of 50 alcohol establishments until the completion of the DCP. This amendment is intended to open a discussion as to whether placing a cap on alcohol establishments in the Bayside Commercial zoning district continues to be desirable in light of changing economic circumstances and the desire to maintain the diversity of dining and retail options in the Downtown.", "Pending Development Applications", "At present, there are 18 development agreements and two Development Review Permits pending review in the DCP Planning Area. There are four hotel projects, one movie theater, twelve housing projects, and the 4th/5th and Arizona project. In some instances, the proposed development standards in the Draft DCP differ quite significantly from the 1988 Zoning Ordinance. This disconnect is problematic in that ten of the development agreements for housing projects could convert to Administrative Approvals. The premise upon which the Administrative Approval process is based is no longer consistent with the proposed goals and policies of the Draft DSP, particularly with respect to: congestion management, addressing the lack of open space, and enhancing the public realm through quality urban form. If these tent housing projects were to convert to Administrative Approvals, it would mean a significant amount of growth could be approved and constructed inconsistent with the yet to be adopted DCP. Therefore, in order to preserve the opportunity for the DCP to establish an appropriate standard to assess development projects, requiring development agreements for all projects over 32 feet in height in the interim is essential to ensure that new development unfolds in a manner that is consistent with core concepts of the Draft DCP.", "Alternatives", "An alternative the City Council may consider is adjusting the applicability of the interim ordinance. Implementing this alternative action has the potential to increase or decrease the number of projects that would be subject to a development agreement and that must be consistent with the LUCE.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed interim ordinance is exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines in that CEQA applies only to projects having the potential to cause a significant effect on the environment. The proposed action to require that Administrative Approvals permits comply with the more restrictive of objective zoning or LUCE standards and uses and to require a development agreement application for projects over 32 feet in the Downtown Core does not have this potential. Rather, the proposed amendment will expand the number of projects subject to public review and evaluation pursuant to CEQA. Additional findings supporting this exemption are included in the attached ordinance.", "Public Outreach", "The proposed interim ordinance preserves the ability for the City to continue with the preparation of the DCP and the associated community engagement process that will extend throughout the summer and fall of 2016. The expansive outreach process will include consultation with residents, business owners, property owners, and other interested stakeholders in a variety of formats and experiences.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future."]}, {"Title": "Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance to Amend Santa Monica Municipal Code Table 9.11.020 Governing the MUBL, MUB, GC, and NC Zoning Districts to Only Apply Specific Limitations #17 and #19 to Commercial Uses Not Currently Subject to Discretionary Review and to Expand the Discretionary Review Requirement for Office Uses, Media Production Support Facilities, Medical Offices, and Dental Offices in Specific Limitation #21.", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending the City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance for the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts to apply Specific Limitations #17 and #19 in SMMC Table 9.11.020 to commercial uses that are not currently subject to discretionary review and to expand the discretionary review applicability for office uses in Specific Limitation #21.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Table 9.11.020, Specific Limitations #17 and #19 currently require a Conditional Use Permit (CUP) for individual tenant spaces exceeding certain size or ground floor street frontage thresholds in the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts. Some uses, such as auto dealerships, already have other specific limitations requiring discretionary review when certain size thresholds are exceeded. As a result, broadly applying Specific Limitations #17 and #19 presents conflicting permit requirements for some uses.", "The applicant, Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce, has applied for a text amendment modifying the applicability of Specific Limitations #17 and #19 to Commercial Uses that are currently not subject to discretionary review. Specific Limitation #21 would also be amended to apply the CUP standards established by Specific Limitations #17 and #19 to any existing ground floor, street-fronting, non-office use tenant space(s) being converted to individual office use tenant space and to any existing non-medical or non-dental office use tenant space being converted to individual medical or dental office use tenant space anywhere in an existing building.", "The proposed text amendment would eliminate confusion since certain uses would no longer be subject to multiple, differing discretionary review standards. The proposed text amendment would also expand the discretionary review requirement for office uses, media production support facilities, medical offices, and dental offices. The text amendment would help protect neighborhoods by encouraging design compatibility, maintaining neighborhood character, and requiring discretionary review of larger commercial tenant spaces that have the potential to generate more activity and traffic in neighborhoods. Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the proposed Zoning Ordinance text amendment.", "Background", "During the Planning Commission and City Council review of the Draft Zoning Ordinance, the Commission and Council discussed regulating the size of commercial tenant spaces as a method to regulate \u201cbig box\u201d retail stores by providing for discretionary review of these larger tenant spaces. The discussion first focused on the Neighborhood Commercial District and was later expanded to include the Mixed-Use Boulevard Low, Mixed-Use Boulevard, and General Commercial Districts.", "The Planning Commission\u2019s discussions of limiting tenant space sizes, particularly during its January 21, 2015 meeting during the Zoning Ordinance Update, focused primarily on retail commercial uses and concerns with the proliferation of \u201cbig box\u201d and chain stores and the potential loss of neighborhood character and uniqueness. The Planning Commission decided not to exclusively regulate chains. Specific Limitations #17 and #19 requiring CUPs for individual tenant spaces over the size thresholds apply to all tenant spaces in new or existing buildings regardless of use.", "The Zoning Ordinance was adopted by the City Council in June 2015 with the following limitations for individual tenant spaces in the NC, MUBL, MUB, and GC Districts in Table 9.11.020:", "(17) No individual tenant space in the NC District shall occupy more than 7,500 square feet of floor area and/or exceed 50 linear feet of ground floor street frontage without the approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "(19) No individual tenant space in the MUBL, MUB, and GC Districts shall occupy more than 12,500 square feet of floor area and/or exceed 75 linear feet of ground floor street frontage without the approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "These limitations apply to all tenant spaces in new or existing buildings in these mixed-use and commercial zoning districts regardless of the type of use.", "On December 16, 2015 and February 3, 2016 the Commission discussed the proposed text amendment. The applicant at that time had requested that Specific Limitations #17 and #19 apply to retail sales uses only but subsequently modified the proposed text amendment to also apply to Commercial Uses that are currently not subject to any discretionary review. The Commission expressed concern that applying these Specific Limitations only to retail uses could allow for other large commercial tenant spaces and added additional discretionary review thresholds for non-office use tenant spaces converting to office or media production use tenants spaces and for non-medical or non-dental use tenants spaces converting to medical or dental use tenant spaces.", "Text Amendments", "SMMC Section 9.46.030(C) allows for the initiation of a Zoning Ordinance text amendment by any qualified applicant. On September 25, 2015, a representative of the Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce filed the subject text amendment application. The Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce is representing two property owners whose projects located at 3402 Pico Boulevard and 1530 Santa Monica Boulevard may be impacted by the current CUP requirement.", "Discussion", "The applicant is requesting a text amendment that would modify the applicability of Specific Limitations #17 and #19 in Table 9.11.020 to apply to all Commercial Uses that are currently not subject to any potential discretionary review.", "A Conditional Use Permit is intended to allow for the discretionary review of potential changes in the character of the use of land or building or for the construction or substantial expansions in the use of land or building which may have an impact upon the general welfare or safety of the public. A CUP is also intended to ensure that a use is compatible with adjacent land uses. The CUP requirement may be cumbersome or unnecessary for certain types of uses such as general office uses that are already prohibited on the ground floor or will be consolidated from existing office tenant spaces on upper stories and would not result in an intensification of the use or require additional parking.", "The Zoning Ordinance standards for the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts currently provides CUP review thresholds for a variety of non-retail sales uses. Concerns with the potential sizes of bank and restaurant tenant spaces and new office and auto dealer square footage are addressed in Table 9.11.020:", "\u00b7 Any individual bank and credit union tenant space exceeding 7,500 square feet of floor area and/or 40 linear feet of ground floor street frontage requires approval of a CUP.", "\u00b7 A restaurant exceeding 5,000 square feet of floor area requires approval of a CUP.", "\u00b7 All new office construction, including new office additions of 50% or more additional square footage to an existing building requires approval of a CUP.", "\u00b7 An addition exceeding 7,500 square feet to existing automobile sales and leasing buildings require approval of a CUP.", "The sizes and thresholds for discretionary review of auto dealerships have also been previously discussed and analyzed and are specifically addressed in SMMC Section 9.31.070 by requiring a Development Review Permit for any new auto dealer facility conforming to the Urban Auto Dealership Format standards replacing an existing legally-established auto dealer facility or an expansion exceeding 25,000 square feet within the Tier 1 maximum limits.", "Given the existing size regulations for these uses, staff believes the proposed text amendment for the other commercial uses that are currently not subject to any discretionary review is consistent with the Planning Commission\u2019s primary objective of regulating commercial tenant space size to provide for the discretionary review of large commercial uses and encourage more neighborhood scale retail uses. The references to Specific Limitations #17 and #19 would be removed from the column headings in Table 9.11.020 and added to the other commercial uses that are currently not subject to any discretionary review. Staff proposes that these limitations also apply to any existing ground floor, street-fronting, non-office use tenant space(s) being converted to individual office use tenant space to clarify the applicability of these limitations in relation to the existing limitations for office uses detailed in Specific Limitation #21. In addition, the Planning Commission recommended that these limitations also apply to any existing non-medical or non-dental office use tenant space being converted to individual medical or dental office use tenant space anywhere in an existing building. The text amendment will eliminate confusion by not subjecting certain uses to multiple differing discretionary review standards. This is intended to provide greater review and discretion for larger medical and dental office use tenants, although Council may want to consider if this type of conversion warrants review through a CUP process particularly on upper floors of existing buildings.", "The proposed amended language for Specific Limitation #21 is as follows:", "(21) Permitted if within buildings existing as of the date this Ordinance is effective.July 24, 2015, subject to the Active Use Requirement in Section 9.11.030(A)(2). except:", "\u00b7 All new construction, including new additions of 50% or more additional square footage to an existing building at any one time, or incrementally, after the effective date of this Ordinance, requires approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "\u00b7 In the NC District, no ground floor, street-fronting, non-office use tenant space shall be changed to an individual office use or Media Production, Support Facility use occupying more than 7,500 square feet of floor area and/or exceeding 50 linear feet of street frontage without the approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "\u00b7 In the MUBL, MUB, and GC Districts, no ground floor, street-fronting, non-office use tenant space shall be changed to an individual office use or Media Production, Support Facility use occupying more than 12,500 square feet of floor area and/or exceeding 75 linear feet of street frontage without the approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "\u00b7 In the NC District, no non-medical or non-dental office use tenant space shall be changed to an individual medical or dental office use anywhere in an existing building occupying more than 7,500 square feet of floor area and/or exceeding 50 linear feet of ground floor street frontage without the approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "\u00b7 In the MUBL, MUB, and GC Districts, no non-medical or non-dental office use tenant space shall be changed to an individual medical or dental office use anywhere in an existing building occupying more than 12,500 square feet of floor area and/or exceeding 75 linear feet of ground floor street frontage without the approval of a Conditional Use Permit.", "The net effect of these amendments is that a CUP will be required for the following:", "\u00b7 All new office, medical, and dental uses in new construction", "\u00b7 All new office, medical, and dental uses in existing buildings if the individual tenant space is larger than a certain size (7,500 or 12,500 square feet) or it exceeds a maximum ground floor street frontage (50 or 75 feet)", "Consistency with the General Plan", "The proposed text amendment is consistent in principle with the goals, objectives, and policies of the General Plan as it will ensure a mix of local-serving retail uses in the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts, help support existing and local retail areas, and support the continued viability of existing office uses. The proposed text amendment will also help protect neighborhoods by requiring discretionary review of larger commercial tenant spaces that have the potential to generate more activity and traffic in neighborhoods, encourage design compatibility, and maintain neighborhood character.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed text amendment is exempt from the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to Section 15061(b)(3) in that it can been seen with certainty that there is no possibility the proposed text amendment may have a significant effect on the environment since the proposed amendment would affect the processing of development applications and would continue to require discretionary review for larger retail sales and medical office uses.", "Text Amendment Findings", "1. The Ordinance amendment is consistent in principle with the General Plan, in that the amendment will ensure a mix of local-serving retail uses in the Mixed-Use and Commercial Districts, help support existing and local retail areas, and support the continued viability of existing office uses. The proposed text amendment will also help protect neighborhoods by requiring discretionary review of larger retail tenant and medical office spaces that have the potential to generate more activity and traffic in neighborhoods, encourage design compatibility, and maintain neighborhood character.", "2. The Ordinance amendment is consistent with the purpose of this Ordinance to promote the growth of the City in an orderly manner and to promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare, in that the amendment will help protect neighborhoods, encourage design compatibility, and maintain neighborhood character by requiring discretionary review of larger retail and medical office tenant spaces.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "City Services Building Schematic Design", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on the schematic design and cost estimates for the City Services Building, and direct staff to proceed with design development.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff seeks City Council\u2019s review and comments on the schematic design of the City Services Building, an addition to City Hall that endeavors to achieve Living Building Challenge certification, which requires net-zero energy (NZE) and net-zero water (NZW) performance, and is the most rigorous environmental performance standard. The City Services Building would eliminate the majority of expensive offsite leased space unifying administrative staff and customer service in one location, which results in ongoing operational savings.", "Since the feasibility study was completed and presented to Council in January 2015, the estimated cost of construction has risen due to local market conditions and escalation. Innovative technologies have also contributed to increased cost. After applying an escalation rate sufficient to mitigate future market conditions, the estimated cost increased by $17,691,000 for an updated project total not to exceed of $74,566,130. In addition, associated tenant improvement modifications must be done to the original City Hall on several floors totaling $8 million in order to accommodate the staff and operations moving into those spaces. A total of $8,094,501 has already been appropriated and committed for the feasibility and design phases, leaving $74,471,629 to be funded by lease revenue bonds for the City Services Building and associated City Hall Tenant improvements.", "Background", "On March 27, 2012 (Attachment A), Council authorized staff to select a design consultant to provide initial design feasibility analysis and cost estimation services for the City Services Building in an amount not to exceed $500,000.  A City Services Building was part of the Civic Center Specific Plan and has long been needed in order to eliminate expensive offsite leased space and coalesce city services in one location.", "On April 8, 2014 (Attachment B), Council authorized staff to execute an agreement with design-build contractor Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (including design firm Frederick Fisher and Partners Architects), for initial design, cost estimation services, and feasibility analysis for the City Services Building in an amount not to exceed $258,500.", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment C), Council reviewed and provided comments on the feasibility analysis, concept design and financial options for the City Services Building and authorized the design phase for an approximately 50,000 square foot building, with three stories above grade and a basement level. Additionally, Council requested that the project team move forward with the design of the facility and endeavor to meet the Living Building Challenge, internationally the most rigorous and ambitious environmental performance standard for buildings (More information can be found at http://living-future.org). The overall project cost for this option was estimated to be $56,385,130, not including the previous allocations for the feasibility phase.", "On April 28, 2015 (Attachment D), Council authorized the City Manager to execute a contract with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for design services for the City Services Building for a Guaranteed Maximum Price of $7,064,501 and to authorize direct owners costs associated with the design phase in the amount of $540,000. Because this is a design-build project, more consultants participate in the design phase resulting in an integrated design and cost savings in the construction phase.", "Discussion", "Santa Monica\u2019s historic City Hall was completed in 1939, when the city\u2019s population was roughly half its current size and virtually the entire City workforce was located there. The City\u2019s population and scope of local municipal services has expanded significantly in the intervening three-quarters of a century. To create a more cohesive City Hall campus that better serves the public and centralizes staff per the Civic Center Specific Plan, a City Services Building has long been planned to be constructed immediately adjacent to City Hall. It is planned to be approximately 50,000 square feet, three stories plus a basement and would rise to 45 feet above grade. Not only would the new building result in substantial savings by eliminating leased spaces, it would reduce lifecycle resource costs for electricity, water and wastewater resulting in long-term net savings. The City Services Building project advances the Council\u2019s sustainability commitment as worldwide environmental leaders by providing a model of sustainable construction while simultaneously reflecting the community\u2019s goals to preserve City Hall as a historic resource through sensitive building design.", "The project would save the City money over time by eliminating expensive leased spaces housing staff in various locations and relocating 239 staff to a new building immediately adjacent to City Hall, thereby creating a City Hall campus resulting in a more centralized and efficient customer experience. The City currently spends approximately $2 million per fiscal year to lease space to accommodate City staff. Lease rate increases are projected to increase over time by approximately 3% annually, perhaps reaching up to 5% increases in some years. Based on this range, it is anticipated that lease and utility savings of approximately $2.7 - $2.9 million per year (and rising) would be redirected to fund a portion of the debt service for the financing of this construction. The remaining payment of debt service would come from the General Fund and would likely result in a decrease in funds allocated to the capital improvement program.", "By centralizing City administered services and creating a municipal campus, this project would increase staff efficiency and enhance the customer service experience, helping to drive civic engagement and customer satisfaction. The first floor would be publicly accessible and would feature a new one-stop Permit Center, the second and third floors would provide office space to accommodate supporting City staff. Additionally, the first floor of the City Services Building would connect to the south wing of City Hall where a new conference center would provide meeting facilities for the Housing Authority, Rent Control and Human Services Division. These meeting rooms would allow for private consultations. Currently, staff handles very personal matters in hallways and corridors due to a lack of meeting facilities. There would also be new meeting rooms provided within the City Services Building. The second floor would connect to City Hall Room 212 to integrate the two buildings and further staff communication and collaboration. Mechanical systems and storage areas for the new building would be located in the basement; staff would not be housed in the basement. (Refer to Exhibit A \u2013 Building Use and Population and Exhibit B \u2013 100% Schematic Design Booklet.)", "The identity of City Hall as the center of civic government will not change. The primary entrance for the public will be from Main Street through the historic City Hall lobby, through a revitalized and landscaped back courtyard and into the new City Services Building Permit Center on the first floor. A secondary entrance into the City Services Building would be provided at the south end of the building at Olympic Drive, nearest to the Civic Center Parking Structure and the Metro EXPO Light Rail Terminus Station at 4th Street. Customer and employee parking would be located in the Civic Center Parking Structure and the Civic Auditorium Parking Lot.", "Designation as a Local Essential Services Building", "The Building Official for the City of Santa Monica determined that the new City Services Building, which is an addition to the existing 1939 City Hall and owned by the City of Santa Monica, must be a Local Essential Services Building (ESB) in order to match the designation of City Hall. An ESB building is one that is necessary for emergency operations subsequent to a natural or man-made disaster. The cost of constructing the City Services Building to meet ESB standards is approximately $1.9 million of the total project cost. (Refer to Exhibit C \u2013 Local Essential Services Building Requirements.)", "Schematic Design Review", "The design-build team, led by Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company and working with Frederick Fisher Partners Architects, has completed the schematic design phase for the City Services Building to endeavor to meet the Living Building Challenge (LBC) as directed by Council. There are major challenges, including the technical systems needed to meet all of the LBC requirements and to qualify for certification by the International Living Future Institute (ILFI).", "The most challenging and expensive LBC requirements include:", "\u00b7 Energy Petal (to meet net-zero consumption challenge and to generate net-positive energy),", "\u00b7 Water Petal (to meet net-zero consumption challenge and to generate net-positive water), and", "\u00b7 Materials Petal (to find local sources and not use toxic, harmful chemicals).", "These three petals have contributed to an increase in the estimated construction cost of the project but would reduce the long term operating cost of the building over its 150 year projected lifespan through the elimination of ongoing energy and water purchases, and would contribute to increased indoor air quality and occupant health.", "The LBC requirements to reach net-zero impact and compliance with strict materials sourcing are challenges that are in the process of being solved by the multi-disciplinary project team. The building as designed would be one of the most sustainable buildings in North America and one of the first such facilities of its size built by a government agency. The occupant experience, building use, and its maintenance would be able to satisfy the goal to create a comfortable green building that exceeds all current building code standards and models the precept that a building can not only \u201cdo less harm\u201d but can be a net-zero draw on resources or even potentially contribute to its environment. This leadership project would serve as a replicable model for other communities and help pave the way for private NZE and NZW projects in Santa Monica as staff ventures to breakdown regulatory barriers. The State of California will require NZE for residential construction by 2020 and commercial construction by 2030. More rigorous water conservation requirements will also be implemented at the state and local level in coming years.", "The design-build team utilized an integrated design process during schematic design where the environmental and technical aspirations of the project governed the design of the building. Computerized energy models were utilized to determine the technical feasibility of a variety of building envelope designs in order to select the proposed high performance glazing system for the building.", "Achieving NZE does not just depend on selecting the right exterior glazing system for the building. It is a delicate balance of the right building skin which would allow enough light, but not require too much energy use within, and providing enough operable windows of the right size to take advantage of the natural ventilation when the weather is appropriate. Energy budgets have been produced and mechanical and lighting systems have been selected and sized. Multiple calculations regarding plug loads and user equipment needs have been determined.", "The proposed building envelope and skin are anticipated to be able to meet NZE if enough photovoltaic (PV) panels are used to produce adequate energy to run the building.", "Producing enough energy for the building to reach NZE will require that PV panels be installed to cover the entire City Services Building roof and to construct a PV shade structure over the north parking area at City Hall utilized by staff and Council. (Refer to renderings in Exhibit B). Even with these two locations, it is required that additional PV area would be needed to run the electrical systems within the building and the project would utilize something called \u201cscale jumping\u201d in order to create enough energy for the project to reach NZE. Scale jumping refers to building components that are constructed outside of what is considered the official project site as acknowledged by ILFI. This challenge is not insurmountable but would require additional City-leased PV systems on an adjacent location in order to construct sufficient PV to support the building. Proposed scale jumping locations include the roof of City Hall.", "As expected, for water independence, the NZW technologies have been the most technically challenging in the Mediterranean climate of Santa Monica. NZW components proposed in the schematic design include composting toilets in lieu of flushing toilets to reduce water consumption and utilizing a rooftop rainwater collection system and a water polishing system to create potable water. In times of drought, this water production system is proposed to be coupled with a deep brackish water well and desalinization system to produce potable water.", "In order to allow for innovative NZW systems such as composting toilets and rainwater to potable water systems, state, regional and local agencies must agree to allow for their construction, use and maintenance. The project team and staff have been working through challenges together with a number of these agencies in order to promote and coordinate the proposed systems and to encourage the evolution of codes and best practices. This should allow for the emerging technologies and high performance NZW systems to meet health and safety standards and to be approved for use in the City Services Building. These are challenges, but the state and local agencies have been receptive to working toward these advancements. In fact through inter-agency cooperation, the project has the potential to break new ground for the State of California and for the nation. (Refer to Exhibit D \u2013 Cutting Edge Technologies: Agencies and Precedents.)", "To achieve the materials requirement, the building must not contain harmful chemicals published on the ILFI Red List, and in order to do the least amount of harm \u2013 based on material lifecycle assessment, environmental impact and toxicity \u2013 materials should be sourced locally with distance parameters set in place by LBC. The project team is working through these parameters and has identified many of the materials appropriately; however, added project cost can be associated with this LBC requirement.", "Sustainability and Cost Options", "The City Services Building endeavors to provide the most sustainable municipal facility within funding parameters. LBC certification requires truly cutting edge design and construction and requires multiple state, regional and local agencies to allow for the various systems to be constructed and utilized. It should be noted that the City Services Building, in pursuit of LBC certification, would be the first municipal building to achieve this goal and the second building in the world of its size. The Bullitt Center in Seattle, Washington is the only structure of this scale that has met the Living Building Challenge to date.", "As the design-build team endeavored to meet the LBC during the schematic design phase, several required system components were discovered that pushed the budget to exceed the original cost estimate. In addition, current regional market costs and escalation factors for construction have negatively impacted the project budget identified during the feasibility analysis review with Council. The estimated factors for market costs and escalation are 19% between now and the scheduled mid-point of construction. Using this escalation factor should ensure that the current cost estimate can be maintained.", "The Living Building Challenge requires a building to operate within its carrying capacity with no reliance on resources from outside the site boundary. As an Essential Service Building, the CSB is designed for a useful life of 150 years. Modest additional costs to achieve NZE and NZW will create substantial long-term operational savings when considered in total cost of ownership terms. Both energy and water are scarce resources that are anticipated to escalate in cost in the near and long-term future. When evaluated with life-cycle cost analysis, the Living Building Challenge option is likely the more cost-effective approach.", "The Office of Sustainability and the Environment (OSE) is currently developing a Climate Action and Adaptation Plan (CAAP) to direct long-range sustainable planning. City Council has adopted a greenhouse gas reduction goal of 80% below 1990 levels by 2050 and staff is investigating strategies to surpass that goal in order to reach climate neutrality. The City is currently on-track to meet the target of water self-sufficiency by 2020, as outlined in the Sustainable Water Master Plan. Additionally, Council has directed OSE to develop a Water Neutrality ordinance, which would cap city-wide water demand at current levels for the foreseeable future. In recently approved Development Agreements associated with dense, transit-oriented development along the light-rail corridor, City staff has negotiated most of the projects to achieve LEED version 4 Platinum certification, maximize roof area with renewable energy production, be 15% more energy efficient than required by State code, and prohibit the use of potable water for non-potable uses.", "These plans represent a trend in the City of Santa Monica towards aggressive action to mitigate the threats of climate change in a resource-constrained future. To meet these targets, bold actions will be necessary, which is why the Living Building Challenge was selected as the rating system to pursue. A collective, community-wide paradigm shift will be required. Achieving LBC on a mid-size, municipal project would demonstrate what\u2019s possible and stimulate the kind of innovation our future demands.", "Options for moving forward include:", "\u00b7 Option One: endeavor to achieve Living Building Challenge certification", "Total Cost = $74,566,130", "\u00b7 Option Two: LEED Silver V4 certification (below level required of private development)", "Total Original Cost Estimate = $56,875,130", "With a new total project cost estimate of $74,566,130, the bulk of the requested additional cost is for increases in market costs and escalation. Option One would allow the project team to resolve the issues associated with pursuing LBC certification (NZE, NZW, and limited material selection). The funds required for any of the options would require issuance of lease revenue bonds. In order to pursue Option One, that amount would be $66,471,629, for the City Services Building exclusive of the required modifications to the existing City Hall.", "Staff did seek a second cost estimate from Mark G. Anderson Consultants, Inc. (MGAC) to verify that the final cost impact is as close to accurate as possible, and to verify market conditions and escalation rates. MGAC found the remaining $66,471,629 to be an accurate estimate to build the City Services Building project.", "Original Overall Cost Estimate", "New Overall Cost Estimate", "$56,875,130", "(Appropriated budget to date = $8,094,501)", "$74,566,130", "(Appropriated budget to date = $8,094,501)", "Project appropriated budget to date includes:", "\u00b7 On March 27, 2012, Council authorized staff to select a design consultant to provide initial design feasibility analysis and cost estimation services for the City Services Building in an amount not to exceed $500,000 (of which, $490,000 of the appropriation was allotted).", "\u00b7 On April 28, 2015, Council authorized a Guaranteed Maximum Price for design services with design-build contractor in an amount not to exceed $7,064,501 and authorized direct owner costs associated with the design phase in the amount of $540,000.", "\u00b7 Therefore, total appropriated budget to date for the feasibility phase and the design phase is $8,094,501.", "City Hall Tenant Improvements", "As a result of moving the permit counters to the new City Services Building, along with the required relocation of City TV master controls, staff consolidation, exiting requirements, and security upgrades, there is associated tenant improvement work required in the original City Hall. These upgrades are estimated to be $8 million making the total to be funded by lease revenue bonds $74,471,629.", "Lease Revenue Bonds", "The debt service for the Living Building Challenge building and accompanying costs at the existing City Hall would be approximately $5.8 million per year after an initial $8 million equity contribution from General Fund reserves is taken into account. Savings in lease and utility costs for office space would offset a portion of the debt service. Staff factored a 3% annual increase to lease costs over the thirty year period, reflecting a long term rate that generally tracks with price inflation and GDP growth. To provide a range that would factor in the potential that market demand would exceed the supply for office space and thereby drive up the cost of space, staff also calculated annual lease cost increases at an average rate of 5% over 30 years. Using this range, this project would generate lease savings that, along with utility savings, would exceed the cost of annual debt service between FY 2038-39 and FY 2047-48. Initially, debt service and other costs related to building ownership would exceed savings by approximately $3.2 to $3.4 million a year. This cost would steadily decrease until lease savings would equal or exceed the cost of debt service and building maintenance.", "The difference in funding between lease savings and debt service would come from the General Fund CIP allocation annually during this time to accommodate the net cost of debt service. As outlined in the table below, the CIP budget contributions would decline over time until the rent vs. debt service break-even point, at which point the projected cost savings achieved by not renting would be sufficient to cover the debt service payments. The table below shows the projected reductions to the CIP budget under two scenarios, depending on whether it is assumed that existing lease costs would increase by either 3% or 5%. Staff will provide final recommendations to Council at the time of bond issuance.", "Scenario 1 3% Lease Cost Increases", "Scenario 25% Lease Cost Increases", "Average annual debt service payment", "$5.8 million", "$5.8 million", "Rent vs. debt service breakeven year", "FY 2047-48", "FY 2038-39", "CIP budget contribution in year 1 of CSB operation", "$3.4 million", "$3.2 million", "CIP budget contribution in year 10 of CSB operation", "$2.6 million", "$1.7 million", "CIP budget contribution in year 20 of CSB operation", "$1.6 million", "N/A (stops in year 18)", "CIP budget contribution in year 25 of CSB operation", "$0.9 million (stops in year 27)", "N/A (stops in year 18)", "Option One is a cutting-edge building that reflects the community\u2019s commitment to sustainability, and embedded within the design are improvements in how the City delivers customer service and how the City Hall campus and the exchange of ideas can be reimagined for the 21st century. The Living Building Challenge building would exceed current sustainability standards and serve as a regional example and a compelling vision for the future of the built environment in California. It would also foster a path to a NZW future for the City.", "Community Support", "On February 1, 2016, the schematic design for the City Services Building was reviewed by the Architectural Review Board. They unanimously expressed support for the schematic design.", "On February 8, 2016, the schematic design for the City Services Building was reviewed by the Landmarks Commission and they expressed support for the schematic design as presented. The design-build team worked through schematic design using historic preservation guidelines, to insure that state and local landmark status of City Hall is maintained and the eligibility for listing on the National Register of Historic Places is preserved. (Refer to Exhibit E \u2013 Schematic Design Historic Project Review from the Historic Resources Group.)", "On February 22, 2016, the schematic design was reviewed by the Task Force on the Environment and they enthusiastically and unanimously expressed support for the building and its pursuit of Living Building Challenge certification. (Refer to Exhibit F \u2013Task Force on the Environment Motion.)", "Next Steps", "Dependent upon Council action and approval of the recommended action, staff anticipates the following project timeline:", "\u00b7 Design Development    Summer 2016 \u2013 Fall 2016", "\u00b7 Construction Documentation   Fall 2016 \u2013 Summer 2017", "\u00b7 Return to Council for Guaranteed Maximum", "Price for construction authorization and to", "issue lease revenue bonds    Late 2017", "\u00b7 Construction mobilization/site preparation Early 2018", "\u00b7 Construction      Late 2018 \u2013 Spring 2020", "Additionally, upon Council approval of the recommended action, staff would return to Council to amend the Civic Center Specific Plan to allow for the use of the proposed site.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council as specific budget actions are required in the future.", "This project will require the issuance of a lease revenue bond through the City\u2019s Public Financing Authority. While a majority of the debt service covering the bond would be offset by savings in lease expenditures, as noted above, financing will require $3.2 to $3.4 million in funding from the General Fund\u2019s $21 million annual capital improvement program allocation in the first years. The City\u2019s ability to apply the growth of annual revenues to cover debt service rather than rising lease costs over time would decrease reliance on capital funds by $1 million within twelve years, $2 million within twenty-one years, and will reach a break-even point within twenty six years of the first debt payment in the probable case. In the case of higher lease cost and revenue escalation, the reliance on capital funds would decrease by $1 million within seven years, by $2 million within twelve years, and would break-even within 17 years of the first debt payment."]}], [{"Title": "Public Hearing for the City of Santa Monica\u2019s 2015 Urban Water Management Plan", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council:1. Hold a public hearing and receive public comment to be incorporated into the City\u2019s 2015 Urban Water Management Plan (UWMP);2. Adopt Method 1, establishing 123 gallons per capita per day, as the year 2020 target pursuant to SBx7-7 (Water Code Section 10608) as the method for establishing the City\u2019s water usage target;3. Approve the attached Resolution adopting the 2015 UWMP.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Urban Water Management Planning Act (\u201cAct\u201d) codified in California Water Code Sections 10610 through 10657 requires every urban water agency supplying more than 3,000 acre-feet of water annually or serving 3,000 or more connections to prepare and adopt an UWMP every five years. Amendments to the California Water Code require that the UWMP address the agency\u2019s plan to comply with a State mandate to reduce water consumption by 20 percent by the year 2020. The draft UWMP prepared for Santa Monica includes the selection of Method 1 (among four options) as the preferred method for establishing the City\u2019s water usage target based on achievability, sustainability, and continued eligibility for State funding. This is the most stringent option available in the state requirements. Beyond merely meeting the State requirements for preparing an UWMP, the City of Santa Monica continues its proactive approach in managing its water resources through significant policy and practice developments since 2010. These include the City\u2019s Water Shortage Response Plan, Sustainable Water Master Plan, and Groundwater Basin Assessment. All of these reports support and align with the 2015 UWMP.", "Background", "Urban Water Management Plans (UWMP) are prepared by California urban water suppliers to support their long-term resource planning and ensure adequate water supplies are available to meet existing and future water demands. Every urban water supplier that either provides over 3,000 acre-feet of water annually or serves 3,000 or more connections is required to assess the reliability of its water sources over a 20-year planning horizon considering normal, dry, and multiple dry years. This assessment is to be included in the UWMP, which must be prepared every five years and submitted to the Department of Water Resources (DWR). DWR then reviews the submitted plans to ensure completion of the requirements identified in the Urban Water Management Planning (UWMP) Act (\u201cAct\u201d) of 1983 (Division 6 Part 2.6 of the Water Code \u00a710610 - 10656). The required elements of the UWMP include Water Sources and Supplies, Water Quality, Water Demands, Reliability Planning, Conservation Measures, Contingency Planning, and Climate Change.", "In consideration of changes in the reporting format for submission of the 2015 UWMPs, DWR has extended the deadline for submitting the UWMP to July 1, 2016.", "Discussion", "The 2015 Urban Water Management Plan meets the statutory requirements of the Urban Water Management Planning Act of 1983. The plan takes into consideration, and is consistent with, the City\u2019s adopted self-sufficiency goals as outlined in the 2014 Sustainable Water Master Plan and its 2013 Groundwater Assessment report. Both reports are included as attachments to the 2015 UWMP.", "The 2015 UWMP includes a review of the requirements of the Water Conservation Act of 2009, more commonly referred to by its Senate bill reference SBx7-7 (section 10608, California Water Code). This legislation supported then-Governor Schwarzenegger\u2019s call for a statewide 20 percent per capita water use reduction by the year 2020. In addition to requiring water agencies to establish a year 2020 water use target pursuant to SBx7-7, the legislation also created an interim year 2015 target, and the opportunity for a one-time amendment to this target in 2015. Failure to comply with interim and final State targets would make the City ineligible for grants and loans from the State that are necessary to achieve the City\u2019s goal of water self-sufficiency by the year 2020. The City has received as much as $300,000 in recent years for conservation programs.", "SBx7-7 presented four options for determining the 2020 water use target. The options were established in order to avoid undue hardship on water agencies which were already implementing conservation measures for some time, as Santa Monica has. The methods, and their corresponding water use targets, are summarized below.", "\u00b7 Method 1: Straight 20-percent reduction from the baseline period (1996-2005 citywide water consumption). The target corresponding to this method is 123 gallons per capita per day (gpcd) and is the lowest of the options considered.", "\u00b7 Method 2: Indoor water use targeted at 55 gpcd, plus reduction in commercial, industrial, and institutional water use by 10 percent, plus reduction in landscape irrigation amount allowed in the DWR Model Landscape Ordinance (this method applies to agencies which utilize water-budget based rate structures, with comprehensive information regarding building size and landscape plant evapotranspiration rates; this method is not appropriate for Santa Monica).", "\u00b7 Method 3: Reduction of gpcd to 95 percent of the South Coast Hydrologic Region\u2019s average gpcd. The target corresponding to this option is 141 gpcd.", "\u00b7 Method 4: Reduction target calculation based upon estimated savings which would likely result from retrofit of inefficient indoor residential fixtures, plus commercial, industrial, and institutional water use efficiency savings, plus conversions from unmetered to metered connections (indoor water fixture efficiency conversion is near saturation level already in Santa Monica, all connections in the city are metered; this method is not appropriate for Santa Monica).", "At the time the 2010 UWMP was being considered, Council adopted the Method 1 year 2020 target of 123 gpcd. The interim 2015 target for the city was 139 gpcd. In 2015, as a result of intensive conservation efforts driven by implementation of the City\u2019s drought response plan and effective community response, City water consumption was 113 gpcd. Given the continuing drought conditions prevalent in Southern California and the continuation of the City\u2019s drought response plan and extensive water conservation strategies, policies, incentives, and programs, it is reasonable to project that per capita water consumption will remain below the Method 1 target of 123 gpcd. Accordingly, staff recommends that Council reaffirm its SBx7-7 year 2020 target, as previously adopted at 123 gpcd, the most stringent option available in the state requirements.", "Conformance with other City plans", "Santa Monica remains on the forefront of water management issues as evidenced in recent years through its development of important water management strategies detailed in the following reports:", "\u00b7 Conceptual Groundwater Basin Model and Assessment of Available Groundwater Supplies Santa Monica Groundwater Basin, 2013", "\u00b7 Sustainable Water Master Plan, 2014", "\u00b7 City of Santa Monica Water Shortage Response Plan, 2015", "These documents are included as appendices in the 2015 UWMP. Much of the information used in preparing the UWMP was taken from these reports.", "In addition, the City of Santa Monica, in accordance with other stakeholders overlying the Santa Monica Groundwater Basin, is currently in the process of establishing a Groundwater Sustainability Agency in advance of preparing a Groundwater Sustainability Plan for the basin as required by the State\u2019s Sustainable Groundwater Management Act of 2014.", "While the 2015 UWMP meets the requirements of California\u2019s Urban Water Management Act, the City of Santa Monica remains committed to proactively managing its water resources with a focus on sustainability, best management practices, and resiliency.", "Commission Action", "On April 18, 2016, elements of the Draft 2015 UWMP were presented to the Task Force on the Environment.  No action was taken by the Task Force. Comments received at the Task Force meeting and responses have been included in Appendix M of the UWMP. Comments and answers from this Public Hearing will be included as Appendix N in the final document.", "Public Notice", "On March 29, 2016, and April 5, 2016, notice was published in the Santa Monica Daily Press inviting public participation in the preparation of the 2015 UWMP, including staff name and phone number for the public to contact for questions. The notice included the date, time, and location of two public information meetings held on April 5, 2016 and May 3, 2016.", "Public Hearing", "In accordance with state law, this public hearing was noticed on May 10, 2016, and May 17, 2016, in the Santa Monica Daily Press, and copies of the draft UWMP were made available online, at libraries, City Hall, and at the offices of the Water Resources Division.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There are no financial impacts or budget actions resulting from this public hearing. Nevertheless, the adoption of the UWMP, utilizing Method 1 to establish water usage targets, carries with it the following positive economic impacts:", "\u00b7 Certainty in achieving the regulatory threshold to maintain eligibility for State assistance (for example, approximately $300,000 in state assistance was received in 2013 and applied to water conservation programs).", "\u00b7 If State assistance is available, lower revenue may be required from rate payers"]}], [{"Title": "2016 Boards and Commissions Report", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "10. Board and Commission Reports", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and comment on the 2016 Boards & Commissions Video Report (Item 2-B on the agenda), and the attached Written Reports comprised of projects that were completed during the 2015 calendar year; and2. Direct staff to proceed with any modifications to the format of future Boards and Commissions Reports.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends that the City Council review and comment on the 2016 Boards and Commissions Video Report (Item 2-B on the agenda) and the attached Written Reports, and direct staff to proceed with any modifications to the format of future Boards and Commissions reports. It is a requirement, set by resolution, for all Council-appointed boards and commissions to give an annual report to the City Council. Current and past practice has been to present the report in the form of a video at the Annual Boards and Commissions Dinner. This year, the video report was scheduled for and is being presented at the May 24, 2016 City Council meeting to allow for public input and Council direction, if any.", "Background", "Prior to 1999, special joint meetings of the City Council and City Boards and Commissions were scheduled to hear annual reports from each board or commission. It is a requirement for all Council-appointed boards and commissions to give annual reports to the City Council, per Resolution Number 10200 (CCS). The reports were given orally and consisted of projects completed during the previous calendar year. Over time, the annual reports became lengthy and it became logistically difficult to calendar joint meetings.  A more effective and efficient method was needed. For this reason, the Council established the Annual Boards & Commissions Dinner and board/commission reports were presented to Council in video format. The annual video report reduced presentation time to 15-20 minutes, and made the numerous activities and accomplishments easier to understand. The City Council last discussed the format of the annual report at the February 24, 2009 Council meeting; however, no actions to change the format were taken.", "Discussion", "Since 1999, new Council-appointed bodies were created, and temporary task forces and the elected Rent Control Board have been invited to participate in the annual video report and dinner. Although each advisory board\u2019s segment was limited to one minute, the video report has extended to over 30 minutes long. Staff time and expenditures to produce the video has increased due to the reports becoming more complex with multiple filming locations, or special services such as studio time or incorporating outside footage. Ultimately it required more oversight and resources from City Clerk, CityTV staff and staff liaisons.", "In previous years, boards and commissions were responsible for creating their own scripts and concepts and recording sessions took place in various locations throughout the City.  These recording sessions took as much as 1.5 to 2 hours and were scheduled over two to three weeks. To streamline the production process and minimize costs, a new video format following that of the City\u2019s 2014-2015 Annual Report Video and website was produced. Boards and commissions were asked to complete written report forms and a Producer then used that information to write a 30-second script explaining each board/commission\u2019s top accomplishment of 2015. All segments were recorded at CityTV Studio to maintain the same visual format; the work was completed in two days. The run time of this year\u2019s video was condensed to 15 minutes. The supplemental written reports allow boards and commission to provide the City Council and public with more detail on their projects (Attachment A).", "The 2016 Boards and Commissions Video Report was recently presented at the Boards and Commissions Dinner which took place on May 2, 2016. Staff is re-introducing the video at a public City Council meeting to incorporate the community and public comment in the presentation process. After the May 24, 2016 Council meeting, the video report will be available on CityTV\u2019s YouTube Channel where boards and commissions can link to it from their respective websites. Staff welcomes feedback from the City Council, board or commission members and the public on the format of the Boards and Commissions annual reports, and invites the public to any of the City\u2019s 23 boards and commission meetings.", "The following are the Boards, Commissions and other bodies that participated in the 2016 annual video report:", "Boards & Commissions", "Airport Commission", "Architectural Review Board", "Arts Commission", "Building & Fire-Life Safety Commission", "Commission for the Senior Community", "Commissions on the Status of Women", "Disabilities Commission", "Housing Commission", "Landmarks Commission", "Personnel Board", "Planning Commission", "Santa Monica Library Board", "Social Services Commission", "Special City Boards", "Clean Beaches & Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee", "Downtown Santa Monica, Incorporated", "Santa Monica Pier Corporation", "Santa Monica Travel & Tourism (formerly the Convention & Visitors Bureau)", "District Boards", "Los Angeles County West Vector Control District", "Metropolitan Water District", "Task Forces", "Task Force on the Environment", "Urban Forest Task Force", "Elected Board", "Rent Control Board", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Resolution Regarding Participation in Brown Act Meetings By Teleconferencing From Outside Of The Country", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Adopt a resolution recognizing that members of City bodies may participate in meetings by teleconferencing from any geographic location so long as the state requirements for open meetings are met.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As part of its efforts to protect and promote Santa Monica\u2019s robust and transparent public process and to facilitate participation in local government, Council directed staff to prepare a proposed policy statement on the use of teleconferencing to participate in City Council and City board and commission meetings from outside the country. The attached proposed resolution would fulfill that direction. It would clarify Council\u2019s intent that Santa Monica officials serving on those bodies may avail themselves of the full opportunity for teleconferencing afforded by the Ralph M. Brown Act, which allows for teleconferencing, subject to transparency requirements, without geographic limitation. If adopted, the policy embodied in the resolution would make clear that members of City bodies could participate in meetings from outside of the country so long as the Brown Act teleconferencing requirements are met.", "Background", "A member of a City commission expressed her wish to attend and participate in Commission meetings by teleconference from a site outside of the country. Shortly after that, Council members raised the same issue and agendized the matter for Council discussion at its last meeting on May 10, 2016. At that meeting, Council directed staff to return with a proposed policy regarding teleconferencing from other countries.", "Discussion", "When the commissioner initially expressed her wish to participate from abroad, this office expressed concerns. They included, but were not limited to, the fact that the Americans With Disabilities Act (ADA)(which establishes accessibility standards) does not apply in other countries; and time differences may be so substantial as to effectively preclude any public participation from remote sites in other countries. However, a review of the Brown Act and other authority revealed that California law does not expressly prohibit participation from other countries (assuming that The Brown Act\u2019s accessibility and transparency requirements are met).", "Government Code Section 54953 establishes the basic requirement of the Brown Act: \u201c[a]ll meetings of the legislative body of a local agency shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting \u2026.\u201d The section also specifically authorizes conducting meetings by teleconference: \u201cthe legislative body of a local agency may use teleconferencing for the benefit of the public and the legislative body\u2026. in connection with any meeting or proceeding authorized by law\u201d Section 54953(b)(a).", "Section 54953(b) also establishes transparency requirements which must be effectuated \u201cif the legislative body of a local agency elects to use teleconferencing \u2026..\u201d As to cities, these requirements are that: meetings must be conducted so to protect \u201cthe statutory and constitutional rights of the parties or the public\u201d; a quorum of the body must be within the jurisdiction; the location(s) must be identified in the notice and agenda, each location must be accessible to the public; and the public must be allowed to address the body from each location. Additionally, all votes taken during a teleconferenced meeting must be by roll call. 54953(b)(2). Thus, the Brown Act specifically authorizes teleconferencing for the benefit of both the public and the legislative body. And, it includes no language limiting the location of remote sites.", "There is no case law interpreting the provision governing teleconferencing. And, the sole Attorney General Opinion on the subject is not on point. (It concludes that the ADA does not require a city to provide a teleconferencing connection at the residence of a city council or board member who is unable to attend a meeting because of the member\u2019s disability. Opinion No. 00-1210(2001))", "Staff checked on other cities\u2019 approaches to teleconferencing outside the country. One or more city councils have expressly prohibited it. The vast majority appear not to have taken a position.", "Thus, there is no recognized \u201cbest practice\u201d, and the law neither mandates nor prohibits remote participation from outside the country. Moreover, the Brown Act language recognizes local discretion. Section 54953 provides that local legislative bodies \u201cmay use teleconferencing\u201d, and it establishes requirements that apply \u201cif the legislative body of a local agency elects to use teleconferencing\u201d. (Emphasis supplied.) Thus, staff assumes that the issue of teleconferencing from outside the country is properly addressed by local policy.", "In adopting the Brown Act, the legislature declared its intent that the actions of city councils and other local legislative bodies must \u201cbe taken openly and that their deliberations be conducted openly\u201d so that the people \u201cmay retain their sovereignty\u201d and \u201cmay retain control of the instruments they have created.\u201d Section 54950. This basic purpose may be best served by the body meeting in one location within the jurisdiction, which allows each member of the public present at the meeting to witness each and all members of the body working individually and together. However, the authorization for teleconferencing recognized technologic advances and the benefit it provides to members of legislative bodies and to communities by allowing local officials to fulfill their public obligations even when absent from the jurisdiction. See \u201cOpen & Public IV: A Guide to the Ralph M. Brown Act\u201d League of California Cities (2nd ed.2010), p.19. Simply put, teleconferencing facilitates maximum public service by public servants.", "Staff believes that this benefit outweighs any diminution in transparency that may result from the use of teleconferencing. Moreover, as to geographic location, staff believes there is no meaningful distinction, in terms of transparency, between a member of a local legislative body participating from New York or London. In either situation, the likelihood of members of the public wishing to attend at the remote site is small; and, in any event, the Brown Act requirements ensure that public participation will be possible. Moreover, accessibility concerns will be met by the requirement of accessibility to ADA standards, which will apply even though the ADA itself does not apply in other countries. Thus, the rights of the public to participate in person will be protected, and public officials will have a better opportunity to serve the public and fulfill their obligations.", "Alternatives", "The Council could adopt a policy prohibiting teleconferencing from outside of the country. However, as explained above, staff recommends against this approach. Or, Council could adopt the policy with additional limitations, such as limitations on the frequency of a particular official\u2019s participation by teleconferencing. However, staff does not recommend such limitations at this time. Presumably, experience will likely clarify any need for them. Or, Council could adopt the recommended policy for itself and leave to the other bodies the responsibility for adopting their own policies. This approach may warrant consideration because the work of the boards and commissions varies, and the needs of all members of a body to see visual aids, such as models and renderings may vary from body to body.", "Next Steps", "If Council adopts the proposed resolution, staff will notify the City boards and commissions, provide the policy and information about the Brown Act requirements for teleconferencing, and assist City staff to ensure compliance with transparency requirements.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There would be no direct costs resulting from adopting the proposed resolution and policy. A significant increase in teleconferencing would likely impact and increase staff time spent on meetings, particularly as to the City Clerk\u2019s office and Community & Cultural Services. However, the extent of this impact is difficult to predict and probably not significant relative to the size of departmental budgets."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Social Services Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmembers Himmelrich and McKeown that the Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a modification of up to $40,000 to the professional services agreement with Goodwin Simon Strategic Research, to conduct additional resident surveys to gauge support for various potential affordable housing funding strategies, focusing on the possibility of a .5% affordable housing measure as well as combinations with parks and open space.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez, Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmember Davis that the Council allocate $5000 of discretionary funds to the Santa Monica Arts Parents Association, a 501c3 nonprofit, to help underwrite the $20,000 rental fee for Disney Concert Hall for the Santa Monica High School Orchestra\u2019s benefit concert for victims of terrorism. Council had previously allocated $24,000 towards the total cost of $357,000 of the orchestra\u2019s spring Europe tour, which was cancelled after the March 22nd terror attacks in Brussels. An insurance claim has been filed to recover the trip fees and Council\u2019s initial contribution may be recouped in part or in full.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmember Davis that the Council award $7500 of its discretionary funds to the Public Policy Institute of Santa Monica College to assist in covering expenses for its recent Spring Symposium \"Re-Imagine Environmental Justice.\"  The program presented a series of presentations, panel discussions and debates that addressed the issue of global citizenship and advocacy around climate change.  The program notably included intergenerational and gender-related issues in the discussion.  The ambitious program ran a shortfall and the PPI is asking for some assistance in making up that shortfall.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1525998600": [[{"Title": "Proclamation: Public Works Week (May 15 \u2013 May 21, 2016)", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "City Manager's Report:  Buy Local and Green Business Update", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "Proclamation: Older Americans Month", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "Swearing-In of New Santa Monica Fire Department Chief Bill Walker", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Approve Contract for Supplemental Law Enforcement Services", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year contract with the County of Los Angeles Sheriff's Department for supplemental law enforcement services. This recommended award is made as a formal professional services contract pursuant to Section 2.24.075 (c). The first year would be in the amount of $260,000 for a total amount not to exceed $1,300,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This Supplemental Law Enforcement Services Agreement with the County of Los Angeles Sheriff's Department (LASD) would enable the Santa Monica Police Department (SMPD) to utilize law enforcement services from LASD during pre-planned events in Santa Monica. The level of services provided by LASD would be agreed upon in advance of each event. The total costs of these services would not exceed $260,000 during any one-year period, not to exceed $1,300,000 over the term of the agreement.", "Primary ongoing event needs that would utilize these contractual services include, the Pier Corporation's ten week Twilight Concert Series (TCS), and any other large scale events which may require the use of additional services. When these events take place, access to the additional public safety resources available from LASD help to ensure an ongoing high level of police services throughout Santa Monica.", "Background", "The Twilight Concert Series is an annual ten-week concert series at the Santa Monica Pier. As of 2016, TCS will be in its 32nd year and continues to draw large crowds on an annual basis, with attendees sometime approaching thirty thousand. Over the past two years, staff has spent $155,194 for LASD services all pertaining to the Twilight Concert Series, the police department did not spend funds for additional LASD personnel to support their efforts with other large scale events. However, looking forward staff believes there may be a potential need to increase services from LASD personnel.", "On January 14, 2014, Council approved a Framework for TCS that considered the need to take action to ensure the public's safety at the concert series and recommended utilizing mutual aid to access additional public safety resources when events are expected to be especially large. That formal agreement was established with a two year contract approved in Council on May 13, 2014.", "Discussion", "Any large scale event and associated crowd presents law enforcement personnel with significant challenges. The growth in attendance at large events and the increasing amounts of events in Santa Monica, like TCS, creates serious public safety concerns due to the size and dynamics of the crowds - in the case of TCS - both the Pier crowd and the beach crowd are packed into comparably small geographic areas. Major challenges for the Pier audience include circulation issues, blocked public ingress and egress due to crowd size, and limited ability to maneuver to effectively manage the crowds. Challenges for the beach audience include darkness and the lack of any clear walkways with spectators seated blanket to blanket. In addition, the beach experiences numerous violations including alcohol consumption, unlawful smoking, narcotic use, and the presence of glass on the beach. The violations occurring on the beach are numerous, difficult to enforce and respond to due to the density of the crowds condensed on a dark beach without any clear perimeter or walkways that mandates all events are appropriately staffed and have the ability to address emergent situations with the personnel assigned. In the event of an emergency, additional on-duty resources would be required to respond and address the situation at hand. If the event is not appropriately staffed, pulling on-duty resources away from the city would jeopardize the safety of the community. Having the ability to hire LASD personnel and adequately staff any event, allows the police department to patrol the rest of the city without any reduction in service.", "Under the terms of this agreement, when the City reasonably determines the event will likely draw very large crowds (typically a crowd of 20,000 or greater is considered very large at TCS) or is expected to have other challenging public safety issues, the City would be able to utilize this Agreement to incorporate Sheriff's Department resources into the operating staffing plan for the event. The level of resources necessary would be assessed in advance based on the expectations for that event and the crowds expected. Each operational plan will be attached as an Amendment to this Agreement. Over the last two year, the police department has hired, on average, 20 to 24 LASD personnel for the TCS, ranging in cost of $8,000 to $28,000 based on an hourly rate. The cost for public safety resources would be funded with City resources, and would be scalable.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to the County of Los Angeles Sheriff's Department is for an amount not to exceed $1,300,000. Funds for the first year of $260,000 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Police Department. The contract will be charged to account 01304.522850. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of One Fourteen Yard Compressed Natural Gas Dump Truck and One Compressed Natural Gas Stake Bed Truck", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Bid #4239 to Los Angeles Freightliner, a California-based company for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Dump Truck to support the Street Maintenance\u2019s operation; and to Thorson Motor Company, a California-based company for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Stake Bed Truck to support the operations of the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Los Angeles Freightliner for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Dump Truck in the amount not to exceed $219,328; and to issue a purchase order with Thorson Motor Company for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Stake Bed Truck in the amount not to exceed $105,985.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for pothole repair, sidewalk patching, repairing eroded and low areas in the streets and alleyways, and for the City\u2019s refuse and recycling collection. This purchase would replace two dump trucks and one stake bed truck that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In March 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of two Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) fourteen yard cab-over-engine (COE) dump trucks and two CNG COE stake bed trucks with a minimum gross vehicle weight (GVW) of 16,500 pounds. After reviewing the bids received, staff recommends a split bid award as follows: Los Angeles Freightliner as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG dump truck in the amount of $219,328; and Thorson Motor Company as the best bidder for one CNG stake bed truck in the amount of $105,985. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing vehicles powered by CNG.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The existing vehicles have a cost-effective useful life span of ten years. The vehicle that would be replaced by the stake bed was purchased in 2004 and is 12 years old. The first vehicle that would be replaced by the dump truck was purchased in 1999 and is 17 years old. The second vehicle that would be replaced by the dump truck was purchased in 2002 and is 14 years old.", "Stake Bed Truck Purchase", "The stake bed truck that would be purchased through this procurement would be used to support the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division anywhere from five to seven days per week and would be primarily used for the delivery of new refuse, recycling and organics containers, delivery and removal of metal and plastic bins to and from commercial customers, delivery and removal of carts and bins for special events, removal and disposal of special pickups, alley clean-ups, illegal dumps and storm generated debris, such as palm fronds.", "From July 1, 2015 through April 23rd, 2016, staff have received the following requests for which this vehicle would be utilized:", "1,843 requests for cart removal, exchange or replacement.", "3,095 request for special bulk items collection or illegal dump removals.", "247 Government Outreach request for illegal dump removal.", "421 special event cart delivery/removals.", "Los Angeles Freightliner took exception to the minimum GVW of 16,500 pounds and the tilt/dump body in its submittal for the stake beds. Los Angeles Freightliner submitted a bid with a minimum GVW of 14,500 pounds and no tilt/dump body in its submittal for the stake beds which accounts for the cost differential between the two stake bed bids. These exceptions are not acceptable and Freightliner\u2019s bid is considered non-responsive.", "A second stake bed truck for Street and Fleet Services Division will be rebid as a result of the cost of the stake bed bid price compared to the amount which has been accumulated for its replacement. The specifications for this truck are more stringent than needed for the Street Maintenance stake bed truck. The second stake bed originally intended to replace a unit for the Street Signs and Markings section of the Street and Fleet Services Division will not be purchased through this procurement and will have to be rebid after changing the bid specifications.  This will allow us to secure a vehicle at lower cost and provide an opportunity for more dealers to provide bids.", "Example of a CNG stake bed truck", "Dump Truck Purchase", "In light of the cost of the type of dump truck necessary for Street Maintenance operations, only one new larger dump truck would be purchased to replace two existing vehicles. The increase in the cost of production for this type of vehicle over the last 17 years has greatly outpaced the original cost of production for the vehicle being replaced. The dump truck would be used to support the Street and Fleet Services Division\u2019s Street Maintenance operation by hauling loose materials for both concrete and asphalt projects; to haul asphalt grinds from alleys, streets, parking lots, and the SM Airport, as well as other projects requiring asphalt milling. It would also be used to haul large quantities of hot asphalt from the asphalt plant for larger projects outside of the scope and capability of the patch trucks. In addition, the truck would be used to haul broken concrete from sidewalk removal and replacement projects throughout the city to the local dump and would also be used to haul large quantities of miscellaneous materials such as crushed base, crushed rock and dirt, and sand.", "In FY2014-15, 1,740 tons of material, equating to 3,480,000 pounds, was hauled and dumped at the collection facility by a total of five dump trucks in the Street Maintenance operation\u2019s fleet. In the current fiscal year, a total of 1,326 tons of material, or 2,652,000 pounds, has been hauled and dumped at the collection facility so far.", "Example of a CNG dump truck", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In March 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the purchase and delivery of two CNG fourteen yard COE dump trucks and two CNG COE stake bed trucks with a minimum gross vehicle weight (GVW) of 16,500 pounds, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 683 vendors were notified and 17 vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on March 15, 2016, per Attachment A.", "Two CNG fourteen yard COE dump trucks", "Los Angeles Freightliner $219,328 (pricing for one vehicle)", "Two CNG COE stake bed trucks", "Thorson Motor Company $105,985 (pricing for one vehicle)", "Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; one response was received from Transwest Truck Center which stated it did not submit a bid because its sister company, Los Angeles Freightliner, submitted a bid.", "The City purchases alternative fuel vehicles to meet the City\u2019s Sustainable Fleet requirements. Alternative fuel vehicles operate on fuels other than gasoline or diesel in order to reduce greenhouse gas emission and pollution. These vehicles exceed the basic standards all new vehicles must meet to be sold in California and include low emission vehicles (LEVs) and zero emission vehicles (ZEVs). As a result, the majority of the trucks the City purchases cannot be simply purchased off the lot or from a regular dealer. Instead, an unleaded fueled vehicle on the lot must have its engine and fuel components removed and replaced with a CNG system. In some cases, a vehicle may be prebuilt as a CNG vehicle, however, only one brand may offer this option, and then the vehicle must also be California Air Resources Board (CARB) certified for the specific model year. The City has made a commitment to procurement decisions that minimize negative environmental impacts, resulting in a limited number of vendors being able to meet the City\u2019s specifications and environmentally preferable products.", "The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, staff recommends to split the award as follows: Los Angeles Freightliner as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG dump truck in the amount of $219,328 for Street Maintenance and Thorson Motor Center as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG stake bed truck for the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division in the amount of $105,985.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Los Angeles Freightliner for one CNG dump truck is for an amount not to exceed $219,328. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200.", "The purchase order to be awarded to Thorson Motor Company for one CNG stake bed truck is for an amount not to exceed $105,985. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid to BrightView Landscape Development for Construction of the Reed Park Improvements", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Bid #SP2313 to BrightView Landscape Development, Inc. (formerly ValleyCrest Landscape Development, Inc.), a Maryland-based company, for the construction of the Reed Park Improvements project; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with BrightView Landscape Development, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $593,483 (including a 10% contingency);3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Reed Park Improvements Project would provide for the construction of improvements to the northeast quadrant of Reed Park. Staff recommends BrightView Landscape Development, Inc. for the construction of the Reed Park Improvement project in an amount not to exceed $593,483 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On September 9, 2014 (Attachment A), Council approved a professional services agreement with Katherine Spitz Associates, Inc. (KSA) to provide design and preconstruction services for the Reed Park Improvements project. Following execution of the agreement with KSA, the design consultant and City staff initiated a community engagement process for the design of the improved park. The process included an online survey to outreach to the community in December 2014 and two community workshops in January and March 2015. In April 2015, the proposed design concepts were presented to the Disabilities Commission and the Commission for the Senior Community. In June 2015, staff presented the design concepts to the Recreation and Parks Commission. The specific program and amenities for the new park were determined through this community process, and by working with the Commission on the Senior Community, the Disabilities Commission and the Recreation & Parks Commission.", "On August 18, 2015 (Attachment B), an Information Item outlined the proposed Reed Park schematic design plans in advance of proceeding with design development and construction documents.", "Discussion", "The Reed Park Improvements Project consists of a gently curving and slightly elevated decomposed granite pathway (to protect tree roots) linking exercise, picnic, and chess areas with individual seating at strategic locations throughout the park. A defined area of hard surfacing would provide an outdoor performance area adjacent to Miles Playhouse. The interior of the park area will remain as it is presently, an open turf area for free play. Four exercise areas, with equipment designed for use by all ages including older adults, would be distributed along the pathway in order to activate the exercise circuit and enliven the park. Half of the eight exercise features would be universally accessible. All of the proposed equipment is senior-friendly and, combined with the walk around the park on the new pathway, would provide an excellent physical workout.", "Smaller site trees would be transplanted within the park in order to open up the turf area for active recreation. Native and drought-tolerant plant selections would blend with the existing planting palette throughout Reed Park.", "The project was submitted to Building & Safety for permit review on February 2, 2016.", "Contractor Selection", "On March 7, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services of the Reed Park Improvements project, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,960 vendors were notified. 77 vendors downloaded the bid. 3 bids were received and publicly opened on April 7, 2016, per Attachment C.", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "ValleyCrest Landscape Development/ BrightView Landscape Development", "$539,530", "C.S. Legacy Construction, Inc.", "$634,138", "USS Cal Builders", "$688,000", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to delivery, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff from Public Works Department reviewed the qualifications and rated the submittals based on selection criteria including fees, previous experience on similar projects, record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, understanding the project scope, approach to the work requirements, qualifications of proposed staff, and scheduling of project activities. Based on these criteria, BrightView Landscape Development, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "BrightView Landscape Development, Inc. has a vast knowledge of design, construction, horticulture, agronomy and arboriculture. They are now the country\u2019s largest single source landscaping contractor, performing work on thousands of projects worldwide. During the past five years they have completed $2-3 billion dollars\u2019 worth of work in both the U.S. and abroad. References were contacted and respondents reported that the contractor performed well on their projects. The California Contractors State License Board verified that contractor\u2019s license is current and in good standing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to BrightView Landscape Development, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $593,483 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in", "the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019058.589000."]}, {"Title": "Award Construction Contracts for the Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid# SP2311 to J.R. Filanc Construction, a California-based company, for the construction of Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration project;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with J.R. Filanc Construction, in an amount not to exceed $2,025,495 (includes a 15% contingency);3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Anderson-Penna Partners, in an amount not to exceed $214,500 (includes a 10% contingency) for construction management and inspection services for the Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration project;4. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.5. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration Project would harvest urban runoff from an existing Los Angeles County Flood Control District\u2019s storm drain located within the 5th Street public right-of-way near Hollister Avenue. The project would pilot a sustainable strategy to harvest local water resources for non-potable uses such as irrigation and toilet flushing, in lieu of potable water. Los Amigos Park is a location for stormwater harvesting identified under the Measure-V, 5-year Capital Improvement Program.", "Staff recommends J.R. Filanc for the construction of the Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration Project in an amount not to exceed $2,025,495 (includes a 15% contingency). Staff recommends Anderson-Penna to provide construction management services in an amount not to exceed $214,500 (includes a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On January 28, 2014 (Attachment B), Council accepted a grant from the Foundational Actions Funding Program (FAF) of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California (MWD) in the amount of $400,000 for a local runoff harvesting and direct use demonstration project.", "The FAF program distributes funds for technical studies or demonstration projects to enable effective future planning and potential development of alternative sources, such as stormwater, to offset potable water demands. The intent of the grant is to demonstrate the feasibility of harvesting local water resources such as stormwater runoff to decrease potable water use, reduce polluted urban runoff discharge to the receiving water body and protect future water supplies in California. It is anticipated that the project would treat up to 550,000 gallons of stormwater and dry weather runoff annually and make it available for irrigation and indoor toilet flushing.", "On August 26, 2014 (Attachment C), Council awarded a design contract to California Watershed Engineering (CWE) to provide engineering design services, develop construction documents, and provide engineering support during construction for the Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration Project.", "Discussion", "The Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration Project would divert stormwater and dry weather flows from an existing storm drain line running along 5th Street into a 53,500-gallon underground cistern for storage and on-demand delivery of treated urban runoff to the park irrigation system and restrooms for toilet flushing.", "The park parcel is owned by the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (SMMUSD) and is used as an athletic field by the School District during school hours, and managed as a public park by the City for the remainder of the time. The City of Santa Monica and SMMUSD executed an easement agreement on October 12, 2015 that allows for the construction, operation, maintenance and eventual de-commissioning of the stormwater harvesting system. The easement agreement is for 50 years from date of execution.", "The existing 45-inch diameter storm drain on 5th Street, adjacent to Los Amigos Park, collects runoff from a 50-acre upstream watershed. Given the typical annual rainfall and impermeability of this upstream watershed, it is anticipated that about 6 million gallons of runoff and dry-weather flows will be available to harvest. Of that, approximately 550,000 gallons of the combined wet- and dry-weather runoff would be diverted, captured, stored, treated and used annually, based on average monthly flows in the storm drain and the operational capacity of the proposed diversion, storage and treatment system. Excess stormwater not captured by the proposed storage cistern would remain in the existing storm drain line, bypass the proposed diversion structure, and flow as it normally does through the storm drain system.", "Vendor Selection \u2013 Construction", "On November 20, 2015, the City issued a Request for Qualifications (RFQ) for general engineering contractors specializing in civil and mechanical work with experience relevant to the project requirements. The RFQ was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twelve firms responded, per Attachment A. Responses to the RFQ were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works department.", "Evaluation was based on quality and experience of the prime contractor,  contractor\u2019s safety and regulatory compliance record, financial capacity including insurance and bonding, quality control, and experience with State of California prevailing wage requirements including compliance with certified payrolls and other related labor compliance documents.", "On February 1, 2016, the City issued a letter pre-qualifying Cora Constructors, J.R. Filanc Construction Company, PPC Construction, and SSC Construction for construction services for the Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration project with the intention to issue Notices Inviting Bids for the construction contract to the four companies on the pre-qualified list.", "On March 24, 2016, the City transmitted Bid #SP2311 for the Los Amigos Park Stormwater Harvesting and Direct Use Demonstration project, via email, to Cora Constructors, J.R. Filanc Construction Company, PPC Construction, and SSC Construction, the pre-qualified contractors.", "Three bids were received and publicly opened on April 19, 2016. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Base Bid", "Base Bid & Additive Alt. Bid", "J.R. Filanc Construction", "$ 1,761,300", "$ 1,813,300", "PPC Construction", "$ 2,253,668", "$ 2,250,098", "Cora Constructors", "$ 2,402,822", "$ 2,929,822", "SSC Construction declined to submit a bid due to a lack of resources at this time. Staff recommends J.R. Filanc Construction as the best bidder, based on its price, quality of services offered, and experience with similar projects for a total amount not to exceed $2,025,495. This figure includes the $1,761,300 base bid and a 15% contingency of $264,195. J.R. Filanc Construction provided four references for recently completed projects, and a similar number for on-going projects. All references contacted reported that the work performed by J.R. Filanc Construction was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality. The Contractors State License Board also verified that the Contractor and subcontractors\u2019 licenses are current, active, and in good standing.", "Vendor Selection \u2013 Construction Management", "On September 22, 2015 the City published a Request for Proposal for construction management services for this project on the City\u2019s online bidding website. A total of 1674 venders were notified and 124 vendors downloaded the proposal. The City received twenty five proposals that were publicly opened on October 14, 2015. Proposals were reviewed and rated by Public Works staff. Selection criteria included technical competence, staffing capacity, project approach & planning, past performance record, experience in resolving contract disputes, quality control/assurance, cost control/reporting and customer service. The top four firms (Anderson-Penna, Arcadis, CWE, and GK Assoicates) were invited to participate in interviews with staff from Public Works and Planning and Community Development in April 2016.", "Anderson-Penna is recommended as the best proposer to provide construction management and inspection services based on their price, qualifications of staff, competency, extensive knowledge and experience on numerous construction projects in the cities of Anaheim, Long Beach, Rancho Palos Verdes, Santa Monica and Torrance. Services provided by Anderson-Penna would include construction management services, material testing, wage compliance monitoring, and team lead by a Resident Engineer (RE). The RE would be responsible for ensuring the contractor is in compliance with the project plans, specifications, permits, and environmental requirements. Anderson-Penna would provide a full time inspector for daytime work and material testing services.", "Project Schedule", "The construction duration is anticipated to last for approximately six months starting in June 2016 to coincide with the school summer break, and continuing through December 2016. It is anticipated that construction of the storm drain diversion structure, diversion piping, and CDS pre-treatment unit at the intersection of 5th Street and Hollister Avenue would occur first to mitigate construction and traffic impacts once school starts. It is further anticipated that construction of the on-site (underground) storage cistern, treatment system and piping would continue past the start of school and be completed by the end of December 2016. As agreed to by SMMUSD, the northern-half of the Los Amigos Park sports-field, including the baseball field, would be secured and fenced-off during construction, since that portion of the field is not used by the school district. Access to the basketball and tennis courts, as well as the southern-half of the sports-field used by the school district would not be impacted during construction.", "Public Outreach", "Public Works staff attended the June 3, 2015 Field Sports Advisory Council (FSAC) meeting hosted by Community and Cultural Services (CCS) Department staff to present the project, discuss the construction phase impacts, and answer questions on the proposed scheduled, which included starting in summer 2016 and completing construction in December 2016, impacting use of the baseball and soccer fields by the Santa Monica Pony League and AYSO for that duration.", "Additionally, the City and its public outreach sub-consultant, Stephen Groner and Associates (SGA), will conduct up to three community stakeholder events before the start of construction. It is anticipated that one of the events would be integrated into planned Parent Teacher Student Association (PTSA) meeting at the school, and another with an upcoming meeting of the Santa Monica Field Sports Advisory Council.", "At these meetings, SGA would facilitate discussion and provide summary explanations of the project. The City and other stakeholders would also be present to ensure that the technical and policy aspects of the installation are clearly articulated. Additionally, SGA would develop outreach materials such as handouts and presentations for use during the meetings, and for distribution to the community.", "Approximately 3-weeks prior to the start of construction, Public Works staff would prepare and mail a general project construction notice to the surrounding community within a 500-feet radius of the project boundary, and to all interested stakeholders. During construction, Public Works staff will prepare and distribute construction progress notices to coincide with significant phases of the project to keep the community, stakeholders and the School District apprised on the construction.", "California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA)", "On September 29, 2014 a Notice of Exemption (NOE) was filed with the Los Angeles County Clerk\u2019s office by the City\u2019s Planning & Community Development Department providing a Categorical Exemption for the project under Sections 15301(b) and 15061(b)(3) of Article 19 of the California Environmental Quality Act.", "California Coastal Commission De Minimis Waiver", "On December 4, 2015 the California Coastal Commission issued a Notice of Permit Waiver Effectiveness regarding Coastal Development Permit (CDP) Waiver 5-15-1389-W, allowing for development of the project as previously described. The waiver was reported to the Coastal Commission on November 4, 2015 and became effective on that date.", "Division of State Architect", "Construction at schools is under the purview of the Division of State Architect (DSA). The plans were submitted to the DSA, and the DSA has made a determination that the project did not require approvals for Fire, Health, Safety and Accessibility. The DSA requested a letter of approval from the SMMUSD for signage such that students and teachers are not within the vicinity of the operating equipment. The signage is part of the project plans and would be implemented as part of the construction.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The construction contract to be awarded to J.R. Filanc Construction is for an amount not to exceed $2,025,495 (includes a 15% contingency). The contract to be awarded to Anderson-Penna for construction management is for an amount not to exceed $214,500 (includes a 10% contingency).", "Award of the contracts requires the following FY 2015-16 budget actions:", "1. Appropriate $400,000 from account C209138.589000 MWD Grant - Local Runoff Harvest to account C206021.589000 Los Amigos Park Retrofit.", "2. Appropriate $1,070,000 from the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax fund balance to account C066021.589000 Los Amigos Park Retrofit", "These additional appropriations would be added to existing funding to meet the financial needs of the project. The contract to be awarded to J.R. Filanc Construction will be charged to the following", "accounts:", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "C206021.589000", "Los Amigos Park Retrofit - MWD", "$400,000", "C066021.589000", "Los Amigos Park Retrofit", "$1,625,495", "Total", "$2,025,495", "The contract to be awarded to J.R. Filanc Construction will be charged to account C066021.589000 Los Amigos Park Retrofit."]}, {"Title": "Approve Sole Source Agreement for Wastewater Envirosight Camera System Maintenance", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with Haaker Equipment Company, a California-based company, for maintenance and repair of the Wastewater Division's van-mounted Envirosight camera system. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to municipal code Section 2.24.080 and is for a total amount not to exceed $125,000 over a 5-year period ending June 30, 2021, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Wastewater Division uses a van-mounted Envirosight camera system with remote-controlled \"crawler\" units that can be deployed into sewer lines, allowing staff to view and assess the best means of repair for breaks and clogs without expensive excavations. The camera system was purchased from and is maintained by Haaker Equipment Company, the exclusive sales and support partner for Envirosight equipment in Southern California. Since July 2012, $146,675 has been spent through April 2016 under sole source purchase orders with Haaker Equipment Company for Envirosight equipment upgrades and maintenance. As the proposed five-year agreement not to exceed $125,000 added to previous sole source expenditures would exceed $175,000, Council approval is requested to continue maintenance services with Haaker Equipment Company.", "Staff recommends that Council approve a sole source agreement with Haaker Equipment Company to provide for the van-mounted Envirosight camera system maintenance and repair services for a five-year period ending June 30, 2021 in an amount not to exceed $125,000.", "Background", "To assist in maintaining the City's 152 miles of sanitary sewer system pipelines, the Wastewater Division's closed circuit television (CCTV) van is equipped with Envirosight camera equipment purchased from Haaker Equipment Company, the exclusive sales and support partner for all Envirosight equipment in Southern California. This equipment efficiently evaluates sewer line-related maintenance issues including clogs, broken or damaged lines, planned modifications and leaks/overflows. Using this equipment allows staff to visually inspect sewer lines from a safe location without excavation and disruption as well as providing a high degree of accuracy in determining specific repair points. This capability saves on material and labor costs by targeting excavations to the correct areas and identifying repairs that can be completed via trenchless pipe lining or \"top hat\" installation (an internal sleeve placed in lateral connections) instead of complete pipe replacements. The camera system also provides a measure of safety by allowing staff to avoid unnecessary construction work and exposure to the materials in the sewer system environment", "Discussion", "In order to keep the Wastewater Division's Envirosight camera equipment system in good operating condition, staff recommends continuing maintenance and repair services with Haaker Equipment Company for a five-year period in an amount not to exceed $125,000. No further system upgrades are planned, but existing equipment may require replacement due to damage or wear from exposure to the sewer system, broken lines, snags and other hazards. As the total amount of previous sole source expenditures since July 2012 ($146,625 as of April 2016) and the proposed five-year agreement through 2021 for $125,000 will exceed $175,000, Council approval is requested.", "Vendor Selection", "In July 2012, the City purchased a used 2005 Wastewater closed circuit television (CCTV) van with an older model of Envirosight camera. In 2014, the City upgraded to the Envirosight RovverX camera system with two remote control cable-connected crawler units capable of operating in liquid/solid environments to provide visual CCTV images for varying sizes of pipe along with a remote lift, auxiliary light/rear view camera component and camera head. This equipment, exposed to harsh conditions, requires frequent maintenance (air/oil filter and battery changes) and parts replacement (cabling, electronic equipment, hydraulics, wheels and other items). Since 2012, the City has spent $146,625 on Envirosight camera system maintenance and upgrades under sole source purchase order approved under the City Manager\u2019s purchase authority.", "Staff recommends Haaker Equipment Company to provide maintenance and repair of Wastewater's van-mounted Envirosight camera system as an exception to the competitive process basis. A suitable alternate vendor does not exist as Haaker Equipment Company is the exclusive sales and support partner for Envirosight equipment in Southern California, Southern Nevada and parts of Arizona.", "Should the Wastewater Division discontinue use of Envirosight camera equipment, or Haaker Equipment Company no longer has an exclusive arrangement with Envirosight, the maintenance agreement would be terminated.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Haaker Equipment Company is for an amount not to exceed $125,000. Funds of $50,000 are included in the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan in the Public Works Department. The agreement will be charged to account 31661.555010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Application for a California Coastal Commission Local Coastal Program (LCP) Planning Grant For Additional Scope to Develop an Implementation Plan for Certification", "Department": "Strategic Planning", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the application for grant funds in the amount of $175,000 from California Coastal Commission Local Coastal Program (LCP) Planning Grant Program.2. Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply for the grant, accept the grant, if awarded, and accept all grant renewals, if awarded. 3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report, in the event that the grant is awarded.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report seeks authorization to submit an application to the California Coastal Commission (CCC) for a Local Coastal Program (LCP) Planning Grant (Round 3) for an amount of $175,000 to extend the scope of work involved with developing the Implementation Plan portion of the project. Staff is now halfway through the process of preparing the LCP Land Use Plan (LUP), which is anticipated to be forwarded to the Council by April or May 2017. Preparation of an Implementation Plan (IP), also known as a Coastal Zoning Ordinance, will follow this process. Initial research and some preparation of the Implementation Plan is already being undertaken, using funding included in the current grant of $225,000 received from the same Planning Grant program in 2014 (Round 2). Both the LUP and IP must be adopted by Council and certified by the Coastal Commission in order to transfer authority to issue coastal development permits to the City of Santa Monica.", "The Round 2 grant that the City received was initially scoped to complete both the Land Use Plan and the Implementation Plan by May 2017. However, as the project progressed, it became clear that in order to develop an Implementation Plan in the CCC\u2019s preferred format, which is a completely separate zoning ordinance for the coastal area, the scope and budget for the project would need to be increased substantially beyond what was envisioned when the initial grant was requested. In addition, it became evident that completing the Land Use Plan ahead of the Implementation Plan offers advantages in terms of clarifying policy and receiving Commission certification before fully developing the implementing document.", "The requested funding would be used to extend the 0.6 FTE Assistant Planner limited-term, grant funded position for an additional 17 months, until September 28, 2018, the date by which projects under Round 3 grants must be completed, and to engage consultants that specialize in LCP implementation plans.", "Background", "The CCC\u2019s LCP Planning Grant program is available to local jurisdictions within the Coastal Zone, and is offered specifically for the purpose of facilitating planning projects that will achieve certification of an LCP. The application for Round 3 is due May 20, 2016, and must include a Council resolution authorizing the application (Attachment A). There is no requirement for a match in this grant program. However, the City\u2019s application will leverage other resources, including the current $225,000 CCC grant, the $235,000 grant from the Ocean Protection Council to evaluate Sea Level Rise, $20,000 additional scope in the current consultant contract, and in-kind staff time.", "A Local Coastal Program (LCP) as defined by the Coastal Commission is comprised of two components: the Land Use Plan (LUP) and the Implementation Plan (IP). Staff is currently preparing an updated LUP based on present land use and development policies, incorporating relevant specific plans and the Coastal Commission\u2019s requirements in regard to sea- level rise, climate change and access issues. While state law requires internal (horizontal) consistency between General Plan elements, the policies and regulations of the LCP take precedence within the Coastal Zone.", "The City adopted its current LCP/LUP in 1992, but has never adopted an Implementation Plan, with the result that currently all development in the Coastal Zone must also obtain a Coastal Development Permit from the Coastal Commission after all City entitlements are approved.", "The LCP Update project is the first effort of the City since the initial LCP Land Use Plan was certified in 1992. Since then, some substantial changes have occurred in regard to conditions in the Coastal Zone, including the Civic Center development, Pier restoration, many beach improvements, the Expo Light Rail Line and the adoption of the LUCE and other implementation plans. Additionally, the Coastal Commission is particularly interested in ensuring that its new programs and policies, especially those related to climate change and sea-level rise, are incorporated into Local Coastal Programs.", "The City\u2019s current LUP preparation is supported by a Round 2 Coastal Commission Planning Grant in the amount of $225,000 that was awarded in 2014. Since receiving the grant, staff has established a strong working relationship with the CCC staff, and the development of the LUP has progressed. The grant is funding both a 0.6 FTE Assistant Planner limited term position and a professional services agreement with Dudek to assist in updating the City\u2019s Local Coastal Plan. On June 24, 2014, the Council approved a previous resolution for the 2014 grant that was awarded in that round. On October 27, 2015, the Council awarded a contract to Dudek in an amount not to exceed $124,000 (including a $12,000 contingency), to serve as project consultants and assist in preparation of the LCP.", "Since the contract was authorized, two community meetings have been held to discuss both general and specific topics related to planning in the coastal zone and anticipated climate change impacts. In addition, numerous presentations have been made to City commissions, the Pier Board and community groups (residents and businesses). Some of these presentations have been provided jointly with the Downtown Community Plan (DCP) team. Once the DCP is adopted, updated policies and property development standards developed through the DCP process will be incorporated into the new LCP as appropriate for those downtown areas (west of 4th Street) located within the Coastal Zone.", "The Implementation Plan, also known as a Coastal Zoning Ordinance, will regulate the City\u2019s approval of all permits in the coastal zone, including zoning entitlements and Coastal Development Permits (CDP). Once approved, most CDP authority would be transferred to the City of Santa Monica, and projects within the Coastal Zone would be reviewed under the Coastal Zoning Ordinance. The Coastal Commission would retain permanent coastal permit jurisdiction over development proposed on tidelands, submerged lands, and public trust lands, and would also act on appeals that may be filed for projects within a specific area just inland of submerged tide lands. The Coastal Commission also reviews and approves any amendments to previously certified Local Coastal Programs.", "The LCP effort is being carefully coordinated with the Office of Sustainability and the Environment, and is utilizing the results of their study of coastal erosion and shoreline change along the Los Angeles County coastline. That study, being conducted by the non-profit USC Sea Grant, is funded by a $235,000 Ocean Protection Council grant. The study is providing important scientific data and forecasting for Santa Monica and other coastal communities in regard to the vulnerability of property and infrastructure within the coastal zone. The LUP will also incorporate appropriate adaptation strategies emerging from this study.", "Discussion", "Staff is preparing to submit another grant application to the California Coastal Commission to fund additional scope for the development of the Implementation Plan. Initially, it was anticipated that the first ($225,000) grant awarded on November 24, 2014 would cover both project documents. However, as the project progressed, it became clear that in order to develop an Implementation Plan in the CCC\u2019s preferred format, which is a completely separate zoning ordinance for the coastal area, the scope and budget for the project would need to be increased substantially beyond what was envisioned when the initial grant was requested. In addition, it became evident that completing the Land Use Plan ahead of the Implementation Plan offers advantages in terms of clarifying policy and receiving Commission certification before fully developing the implementing document.", "The scope for Santa Monica\u2019s Round 2 (current) grant, which has been discussed with CCC grant authorities, now consists of completion of the LUP by May 2017 along with a 75% complete draft of the implementation plan. The scope of the requested grant would consist of the remaining work required to complete the implementation plan.", "The current grant funds a limited-term, part-time Assistant Planner position, project consultants (Dudek) and a small amount of other project expenses. If this grant request is awarded, it would fund a similar process including in-house staff time and outside consultant expertise. The additional funding would need to be used by September 28, 2018, adding 17 months to the project timeline to develop a complete draft of the coastal zoning ordinance, undertake public review, and bring a final draft to decision makers for adoption.", "While there are no minimum or maximum grant amounts under the Planning Grant program, a total of $3 million is available in this round. Preparation of a Local Coastal Program Amendment is statutorily exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) per CEQA Guidelines section 15265.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The total amount of grant funds requested from the California Coastal Commission (CCC) Local Coastal Program (LCP) is $175,000. If awarded, the grant requires no local match; however, the City\u2019s application will leverage other resources, including the current CCC LCP grant, the Ocean Protection Council (OPC) grant, an additional $20,000 of professional services included in the current contract with Dudek, and in-kind staff time.", "If awarded, staff would establish revenue and appropriate expenditure budgets to reflect use of grant funds. If renewals are awarded, budget changes, including the extension of the limited term position, will be included in subsequent year budgets, contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Adoption of  the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program Resolution that would make Big Blue Bus Eligible for State Funds to Reduce Greenhouse Gas Emissions and Improve Mobility.", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution for the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program that was created by the California State Legislature to provide operating and capital funding for transit agencies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve mobility.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Low Carbon Transit Operations Program (LCTOP) is one of several programs that comprise the Transit, Affordable Housing, and Sustainable Communities Program established by the California Legislature in 2014 via Senate Bill 862. LCTOP was created to provide operating and capital funding assistance for transit agencies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve mobility, with a priority placed on serving disadvantaged communities. As a requirement to qualify for and receive funding through LCTOP, a City Council resolution to adopt the project must be submitted.", "Discussion", "LCTOP funding is distributed through the existing State Transit Assistance (STA) Fund formula. The STA formula has two components, a population share, which is allocated entirely to LA Metro, and a revenue share which is divided amongst the Los Angeles County Municipal Operators and Metro. The California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) is responsible for ensuring that the statutory requirements of the program are met in terms of eligibility, greenhouse gas reduction, disadvantaged community benefit, and other requirements of the law.  The LCTOP provides operating and capital funding assistance for transit agencies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve mobility for the California public with a priority placed on serving disadvantaged communities. LCTOP is an ongoing funding source for Big Blue Bus.", "Big Blue Bus received $131,000 in LCTOP funding in FY14-15, the first year of the program. The State increased annual funding for recipients in the second year, therefore Big Blue Bus is eligible for $387,175 in LCTOP funding for FY16-16.  LCTOP funding may be used for operating expenditures and staff has determined that this year\u2019s funding should be programmed for the additional operational expenditures associated with the increase in operating revenue service hours for new service on  with the Routes 15 (Bundy Station), 16 (Bergamot Station), and 17 (Palms & Sepulveda Stations).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Revenue changes were approved in the FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget."]}, {"Title": "First Modification for the Idaho Avenue Pedestrian Overcrossing Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to contract# 10250 (CCS) in the amount of $400,000 with MCM Construction, Inc., a California-based company, for improvements to Idaho Trail associated with the California Incline Pedestrian Bridge. This will result in an amended contract with a new total amount not to exceed $2,300,000.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In conjunction with the work being done on the California Incline, the City is working to repair and rebuild the California Incline Pedestrian Overcrossing (Overcrossing) and the Idaho Trail (Trail) that scales the bluff from the beach to Palisades Park. The Idaho Trail leading to the pedestrian overcrossing is in poor condition and in need of repair. Staff recommends repairing the Idaho Trail in conjunction with the pedestrian overcrossing. Staff recommends that Council authorize the City Manager to execute a modification to contract CCS #10250 in the amount of $400,000 to rehabilitate the Idaho Trail.", "Background", "On November 10, 2015 (Attachment C), Council approved the inclusion of the Overcrossing Project by modifying MCM\u2019s existing contract for the California Incline Bridge Replacement project. The modification amount approved was $1,900,000. However, modifying the existing MCM contract would have activated federal regulations and required that it meet National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) environmental regulations. Staff was informed by Caltrans Local Assistance that obtaining NEPA approval would require additional studies, environmental reports, and reviews that would likely add nine to twelve months to the project timeline. Therefore, staff recommended and Council approved entering into a separate contract with MCM to alleviate the need to initiate a new and separate Federal NEPA process.", "On February 9, 2016 (Attachment D), Council approved the amendment of Action #2 of Item 3.I on the November 10, 2015 agenda and authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a separate contract in lieu of a first modification to contract #10025 with MCM Construction, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $1,900,000 for construction of the California Incline Pedestrian Overcrossing.", "The Idaho Trail is located along the bluff between the California Incline and Palisades Park and enters the park near Idaho Avenue. The Trail connects Palisades Park to the Idaho Avenue Pedestrian Overcrossing which crosses over the California Incline. The Idaho Trail surface is in poor condition and the lack of protection from bluff erosion and sediment runoff requires frequent maintenance. The Trail is often closed following a rain event. The proposed improvements would create a safer walking surface and would control bluff erosion soil from entering the Trail.", "On April 2, 2014, TY Lin (the structural engineer that designed the California Incline Bridge and Roadway) completed a Structural Assessment Report for the Overcrossing and Trail and this report also recommends improvements to the Trail, which has numerous erosion and drainage maintenance issues.", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment A), Council awarded a construction contract to MCM Construction, Inc. (MCM), in an amount not to exceed $15,690,211 for the construction of the California Incline. On August 25, 2015 (Attachment B), Council awarded a professional services agreement to TY Lin to provide engineering design services for the Overcrossing and Trail Project in an amount not to exceed $411,827. On August 28, 2015 the City processed and filed a CEQA Notice of Exemption completing the CEQA process.", "On November 10, 2015 (Attachment C), Council approved the conceptual layout of the Overcrossing and authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a modification to the existing MCM contract in an amount not to exceed $1,900,000 for the construction of the Overcrossing.", "On February 9, 2016 (Attachment D), Council authorized the City Manager to execute a separate contract with MCM in lieu of a modification.", "Discussion", "The initial costs and budgets prepared for the Idaho Avenue Overcrossing project and Trail were based on renderings, not full design drawings, as part of the expedited process to construct the Overcrossing during the Incline closure. The complexity of certain bridge elements were not fully realized until the design plans were finalized. The heightened complexity directly affected construction means, methods and cost. This meant the original budget of $1,900,000 was sufficient for only the bridge structure. However, because the Trail is an important link between Palisades Park, the Idaho Avenue Pedestrian Overcrossing, and the beach it should be constructed in conjunction with the Overcrossing and California Incline project. Like the Overcrossing, the Trail work requires closure of the California Incline during construction. Taking advantage of the current Incline closure not only facilitates construction, but prevents another closure of the Incline. By moving forward with this modification, the City meets the expectations of the community to deliver in unison the California Incline, Idaho Avenue Pedestrian Overcrossing, and the Idaho Trail.", "The proposed work will completely remodel the existing Idaho Trail. The existing and cracked asphalt concrete walking surface will be replaced with new concrete pavement and the existing lights and light poles will be replaced with LED lighting and new poles. Additionally, new fencing with an erosion control fabric will be installed on the east side of the trail. The costs of this work is approximately $250,000 including a 10% contingency. Site demolition costs for the Trail and Overcrossing will also be included at a cost of $150,000 including a 10% contingency. The demolition cost includes both the Trail and the Overcrossing. Based on discussion with Caltrans Division of Local Assistance early in the design phase of the Overcrossing, staff was under the impression that the demolition cost of the old overcrossing could be attributed to the California Incline project as a change order because portions of the old overcrossing foundation interfered with California Incline improvements. However, in subsequent discussions, Caltrans has advised staff that the demolition of the old overcrossing should not be part of the California Incline contract.", "Contractor Selection", "On October 27, 2014, the City published Bid #SP2059 for the California Incline Bridge Replacement Project. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press and the Los Angeles Times in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City Clerk\u2019s office received five sealed bids, which were publicly opened by the Deputy City Clerk on December 16, 2014.", "The bids were evaluated based on competitive pricing, understanding of the project\u2019s scope, direct experience with similar projects, approach to the work, technical competence, qualifications of the proposed staff, and the ability to meet the project schedule. Staff verified with the Contractors State License Board that MCM Construction\u2019s license is current, active, and in good standing. Staff contacted reference agencies listed by the contractor to ascertain past performance on similar projects. Based on these criteria, staff recommended MCM as the best bidder for the construction of the California Incline Bridge Replacement Project. This recommended action was approved by City Council on January 27, 2015.", "On February 9, 2016, Council authorized the City Manager to execute a separate contract with MCM for the construction of the Idaho Avenue Pedestrian Overcrossing. The choice to utilize MCM for the construction of the Overcrossing and Trail projects without initiating a new competitive bidding process is not normally utilized, but applied in this unusual case due to cost savings, expediency in construction, and overall benefit to the community.", "Bidding the Trail work as a separate project would have several adverse ramifications. First, the work would be delayed until fall 2016, creating a situation in which the California Incline and Idaho Avenue Overcrossing are open, but the Idaho Trail leading to Overcrossing would be closed. This would hinder pedestrian access from Palisades Park to the beach. Second, construction of the Trail requires the contractor to stage equipment on the California Incline, which is currently closed. Delaying the Trail work would require an additional temporary closure of the California Incline. This additional temporary closure would likely add significant traffic control and detour costs to the Trail project and would require the City to coordinate with Caltrans for a new encroachment permit because the south bound left turn on the Pacific Coast Highway would be closed. Obtaining a new encroachment permit could also potentially delay the project beyond fall 2016. Finally, the City would not be able to deliver the Idaho Trail in conjunction with California Incline and Overcrossing as planned.", "Construction Schedule", "The anticipated completion date is July 2, 2016 for both the California Incline and Idaho Avenue Overcrossing projects.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to MCM Construction, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $400,000, for an amended contract total not to exceed $2,300,000. Funds are available in the FY2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following", "accounts:", "C010652.589000  $300,338", "C049096.589000  $  99,662", "TOTAL $400,000"]}, {"Title": "Modification to Contract for Senior Criminalist", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year contract with the County of Los Angeles Sheriff\u2019s Department for services of one Senior Criminalist to perform forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) analysis and services. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d). The first year would be in the amount not to exceed $170,792, for a total amount not to exceed $943,734 (includes a 5% annual contingency) for the term of the contract, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff relies on DNA evidence to solve crimes, secure criminal filings, and make convictions for criminal activity that occurs within Santa Monica. The Santa Monica Police Department\u2019s (SMPD) Forensic Lab is not equipped to conduct DNA analysis, and instead uses the Los Angeles County Crime Lab. A revision to the term of the contract is required to continue services from the County. The contract would be for a five-year term. The first year would be in the amount not to exceed $170,792, for a total amount not to exceed $943,734 over the term of the contract.", "Background", "On April 26, 2016 (Attachment A) Council authorized the City Manager to enter into an agreement with LA County for a Senior Criminalist for one year with options to renew for four additional one-year terms. Since that time, the County has made clear that it will require the City to enter into an agreement for a five-year term, rather than using renewal options to extend the contract. The County will allow the City to terminate the agreement at any time, for any reason, with 60 days\u2019 notice to the County. Staff will evaluate the LA County Senior Criminalist\u2019s services on an annual basis over the course of the five-year term to determine if services should be continued or terminated. Therefore, staff is returning to Council with a recommendation to enter into a five-year term.", "Discussion", "Under the terms of this contract, Los Angeles County will assign one full time Senior Criminalist for SMPD\u2019s Forensic Section. The Criminalist would be responsible for completing cases based on priorities set by SMPD; providing direction and training to SMPD in areas related to sample collection, crime scene investigation, case sampling testing, policy and any other type of information requirements or consultations related to forensic DNA testing and any other forensic science discipline. The contract would also allow for crime scene field response services on an on-call basis by an alternate experienced criminalist in the event the City\u2019s assigned Senior Criminalist is unavailable.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Los Angeles County Sheriff\u2019s Department to furnish and provide a dedicated Senior Criminalist from the County Crime Lab to handle only Santa Monica cases. Competition does not exist since the Los Angeles County Sheriff\u2019s Department is the only entity providing the service.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to the Los Angeles County Sheriff\u2019s Department is for an amount not to exceed $943,734. Funds of $170,792 are available in the FY2016-17 Proposed Budget in the Police Department. The contract will be charged to account 01304.522850. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.#1"]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 4.62 Requiring a Minimum Wage for Employees, Chapter 4.63 Requiring a Living Wage for Hotel Workers, and Chapter 4.65 Requiring a Living Wage for Certain City Contractors", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on April 26, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 4.62 requiring a minimum wage for employees, Chapter 4.63 requiring a living wage for hotel workers, and Chapter 4.65 requiring a living wage for certain City contractors.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance Reaffirming the Decision to Amend the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading an Ordinance to reaffirm the Council's February 23, 2016 decision to amend the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street, changing the zoning from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This proposed ordinance would reaffirm the Council\u2019s decision on February 23, 2016 to amend the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street changing the zoning from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC) and is being presented to Council since case law might support the position that map changes can only occur through ordinance.", "Background", "On February 23, 2016, the Council adopted Resolution No. 10936 (CCS) which amended the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street, changing its zoning from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC). This was the culmination of a process initiated on May 12, 2015, when the Council directed staff to commence the procedure to amend the LUCE (Land Use and Circulation Element) Map designation for this property to a commercial designation and was necessary to ensure consistency between the LUCE Map and the Official Districting Map. A full description of the history leading to the Council\u2019s February action is set forth in the February 23 staff report (Attachment A).", "Discussion", "The City Council amended the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street by resolution. The City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance authorizes the process. However, certain case law provides that a zoning map change can only be undertaken by ordinance. This case law relies on a statutory provision which does not apply to the City since Santa Monica is a charter city and the manner of adopting ordinances and resolutions are considered a municipal affair. However, in an abundance of caution and to eliminate any possible claim of procedural irregularity, this ordinance is presented to Council to reaffirm the Council\u2019s February 23, 2016 decision.", "The underlying rationale for this zone change remains the same. The parcel is currently vacant but has historically been zoned and used commercially. Zoning maps dating back to 1960 show the subject parcel zoned commercially (C4). In 2007, the Planning Commission unanimously approved a hotel annex project for the site that, although never constructed, supported the appropriateness of the parcel for a commercial project. As discussed, Council amended the LUCE Map designation of 1419 19th Street from a Low Density Residential designation to a General Commercial designation when it adopted the new Zoning Ordinance. However, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time. The approved land use designation change is consistent with the commercial zoning in existence at the time for the subject parcel and allows for the continued commercial use of the parcel. The subject amendment to the Official Districting Map will make the zoning of 1419 19th Street consistent with its existing land use designation.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Introduction and First Reading of an Ordinance to Amend the Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of SMMC Article 9) and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6 of SMMC Article 9) Making Minor Clerical Changes, Corrections, and Clarifications", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending the City's Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions making minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications. These amendments fall into the following general categories: spelling, grammar, and punctuation; section references; formatting and organization; clarification; continuity from prior zoning ordinance; internal consistency with existing ordinance; and Council direction.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Since the adoption of a new Zoning Ordinance in July 2015, staff has identified unintentional errors, inconsistencies, or omissions that require minor clerical changes, corrections, or clarifications. These minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5 of SMMC Article 9) and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6 of SMMC Article 9). This report recommends that the City Council amend the City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions making these minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications through the adoption of an ordinance.", "Background", "On June 23, 2015, the City Council adopted a new Zoning Ordinance that became effective on July 24, 2015. Since its adoption, staff has identified unintentional errors, inconsistencies, or omissions that require minor clerical changes, corrections, or clarifications.", "On February 17, 2016, the Planning Commission adopted Resolution of Intention 16-001 (PCS), announcing its intention to consider these minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance. On March 16, 2016, the Commission reviewed the proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications and adopted Resolution 16-002 (PCS), recommending that Council make all of the proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance.", "Discussion", "The proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance. The specific minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications in the Zoning Ordinance are detailed in the attached Proposed Zoning Ordinance (Divisions 1-5) Redline Modifications (Attachment B) along with brief explanations for each minor clerical change, correction, and clarification (Attachment D). The minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications fall into the following general categories:", "Spelling, Grammar, and Punctuation", "These modifications address minor spelling corrections and typos along with minor grammatical corrections.", "Section References", "These modifications fix incorrect section references as well as provide additional section references for clarity and informative purposes.", "Formatting and Organization", "These modifications reformat and reorganize several sections of the Zoning Ordinance to clarify the applicability of standards, correct the grouping of land uses, and eliminate potential confusion between different standards.", "Clarification", "These modifications provide more specificity, context, and information through the addition or elimination of language to clarify various standards and processes. Certain clarifications are also made to ensure consistency with State law.", "Continuity from Prior Zoning Ordinance", "These modifications bring continuity with the prior Zoning Ordinance for standards and processes that were inadvertently left out of the Zoning Ordinance update or incorrectly carried over and were not intended to be changed.", "Internal Consistency within Existing Ordinance", "These modifications correct internal consistencies between processes, standards, and nomenclature within the existing Zoning Ordinance.", "Council Direction", "The City Council has also directed staff to initiate an amendment pertaining to the required market rate bedroom mix for Tier 2 projects. This modification is included in the proposed changes.", "Other Scrivener\u2019s Errors Identified within the Categories Listed Above", "Other minor errors might be identified by staff and the City Council prior to or at the Council hearing. Aside from typographical or clerical errors, any additional proposed corrections will need to be reviewed by the Planning Commission prior to Council review.", "The Planning Commission has begun preliminary identification of policy issues that have arisen since the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance with the anticipation that it will soon commence formal discussion of these issues and consideration of potential Zoning Ordinance changes that may be warranted based on these discussions.", "Land Use and Related Provisions", "Minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications are also proposed for Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions contained in Division 6 of SMMC Article 9 and are detailed in the attached Proposed Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions (Division 6) Redline Modifications (Attachment C) along with brief explanations for each minor clerical change, correction, and clarification (Attachment D). As Division 6 of SMMC Article 9 is not a part of the Zoning Ordinance, the Planning Commission did not review the proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications for this Division. These minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications fall into the same general categories discussed above for the Zoning Ordinance.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications to the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions are categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed changes may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended modifications represent minor clerical changes, corrections, and clarifications that do not affect policy decisions made with the adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.", "Text Amendment Findings", "1. The Ordinance amendments are consistent in principle with the General Plan, in that the amendments do not affect policy decisions made with the City Council\u2019s adoption of the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions and do not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions.", "2. The Ordinance amendments are consistent with the purpose of this Ordinance to promote the growth of the City in an orderly manner and to promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare, in that the amendments maintain the existing policies, standards, and regulations of the Zoning Ordinance and Land Use and Zoning Related Provisions that promote and protect the public health, safety, and general welfare.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Introduction and first reading of an Ordinance adopting Development Agreement 13DEV-008 and General Plan Text Amendment 15ENT-0232 to allow a new 7-story (84 feet), 301,830 square foot mixed-use development project consisting of 35,428 square feet of ground floor commercial area, 24,217 square feet of subterranean commercial area, 249 residential units, and 524 parking spaces within a four-level subterranean parking garage. Additionally, a Zoning Map Amendment 15ENT-0307 is proposed to change the zoning district from M-1 (Industrial Conservation) to MUB (Mixed Use Boulevard) for the rear portion of the property located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard for the development of a 100% Affordable Housing Development in connection with the 500 Broadway project (off-site affordable housing).", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends the City Council:1. Adopt a Resolution certifying the Final Environmental Impact Report prepared for the project in accordance with CEQA;2. Adopt a Resolution adopting a Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program for the project; 3. Adopt a Resolution approving General Plan Text Amendment 15ENT-0232 for the 500 Broadway project; 4. Introduce for first reading an ordinance approving Zoning Map Amendment 15ENT-0307 for a 100% affordable housing project located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard which is the off-site affordable housing for the 500 Broadway project; and,5. Introduce for first reading an ordinance adopting the proposed Development Agreement.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As we look toward adoption of the Downtown Community Plan early next year, this project is one of the last (and the largest) Development Agreements to be processed under the Interim Zoning Ordinance. As such, it reflects a turning point away from project-by-project planning consideration toward a more comprehensive and consistent approach to achieving the community\u2019s goals. This project has been the subject of lengthy and intense scrutiny involving the balancing the provision of both market rate and affordable housing and increasing services to Downtown residents with the addition of a grocery market with concerns about vehicle traffic, infrastructure impacts and the design character of new building.", "The applicant, DK Broadway, LLC, proposes a Development Agreement to allow a new mixed-use building located at 500 Broadway. The project involves the construction of a 7-story (84 feet) building consisting of 301,830 total square feet, including 24,217 square feet of basement area, 35,428 square feet of ground floor commercial space, 249 residential rental units, and 524 parking spaces within a four-level subterranean parking garage. The project site consists of two contiguous parcels with a total of 67,500 square feet located on the southeast corner of Broadway and 5th Street, and extending 450 feet in length along the east side of 5th Street (between Broadway and Colorado Avenue). The site is currently developed with a one-story commercial building and surface parking lot (Fred Segal).", "The site is located in the C3C zoning district and Downtown Core land use designation of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE). Pursuant to the City\u2019s Interim Zoning Ordinance No. 2490 (CCS) (\u201cIZO\u201d), a Development Agreement is required for projects located in the Downtown Core land use designation with proposed buildings exceeding 32 feet in height. Furthermore, the project is subject to the 1984 Land Use and Circulation Element of the general plan until the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan. Project compliance is limited to the LUCE, while other aspects of the project such as height, floor area ratio, setbacks, open space, parking, and other standard zoning requirements would be established by the Development Agreement.", "The applicant requests General Plan Text Amendment 15ENT-0232 that would amend the 1984 LUCE maximum Floor Area Ratio from 3.5 to 4.0 and allow no limitation on the number of stories of any structure containing at least one floor of residential use, so long as the height does not exceed the maximum height in number of feet. No change to the LUCE maximum allowable building height of 84 feet is proposed. The proposed increase in allowable FAR from 3.5 to 4.0 within the Downtown Core area further reinforces the Downtown as the focus of the City, supporting the greatest concentration of activity adjacent to the Bayside District, and in proximity to the Expo light rail terminus station and Colorado Esplanade, consistent with LUCE objectives. The proposed amendment to allow no limitations on the number of stories provides a housing incentive that would allow projects with greater flexibility in achieving allowable floor area. Staff is supportive of these LUCE amendments based on the findings provided in this report.", "The project includes an off-site affordable housing component that includes the dedication of land to Community Corporation of Santa Monica (CCSM), a non-profit housing provider, and the construction of a 100% affordable housing project with 64 residential units located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard. The land dedication would satisfy the City\u2019s Affordable Housing Production Program obligation while the additional land cost exceeding AHPP requirements, and the gap financing and construction of 64 affordable housing units would be provided as a community benefit negotiated in the 500 Broadway development agreement. CCSM is pursuing Low Income Housing Tax Credits (9% or 4% credits) for the 1626 Lincoln project. The off-site location is currently divided into two LUCE and Zoning designations; the approximate front \u00be depth of the property is located in the Mixed-Use Boulevard LUCE designation and Mixed-Use Boulevard Zoning designation. The approximate rear \u00bc depth of the property is located in the Downtown Core LUCE designation and M1 zoning designation. In order to develop the site under the same zoning development standards, Community Corporation of Santa Monica (CCSM) requests a zone change of the rear portion of the parcel currently zoned M1 (Industrial Conservation) to MUB (Mixed-Use Boulevard) to be consistent with the current zoning for the front portion of the parcel. The 1626 Lincoln project will require approval of a Development Review permit, which will be considered by the Planning Commission on May 11, 2016. The order in which these requests are being considered by Council would assist with CCSM\u2019s timeframe to apply for Low Income Housing Tax Credits by June 2016 to assist with financing the 100% affordable housing project.", "The proximity of the project site to the Expo light rail terminus station and the Colorado Esplanade are important considerations. From an urban design perspective and based on the draft DCP, increased density at the proposed site would be appropriate and is supported by the anticipated increase in pedestrian volumes in this transit-adjacent area of the Downtown. The project would provide transit-adjacent housing and neighborhood-serving commercial uses in proximity to light rail and transit opportunities, convenient for residents to use alternate modes of transportation other than private vehicles, and coupled with the project\u2019s Transportation Demand Management Program, would further City goals of increasing transportation choice. Also consistent with mobility goals for the Downtown, the project would widen sidewalks along 5th Street and Broadway that would expand pedestrian capacity and enhance the pedestrian experience adjacent to the project. Consistent with City goals to nurture a complete and long-term Downtown community, the Development Agreement would provide a mix of sizable units, and would also result in the construction of 64 affordable housing units that would expand affordable family housing and help balance the housing mix in the Downtown. For these reasons, in addition to a comprehensive community benefits package, staff recommends approval of the project based on the findings contained in the staff report.", "On October 13, 2015, Council gave direction that certain priority projects could be processed prior to the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan. The 500 Broadway project was identified because it had completed float-up reviews and would provide a significant source of housing in the Downtown. In negotiating the project, staff closely followed the expectations identified in the draft Downtown Specific Plan (February 2014 version) in addition to those in the LUCE, Water Master Plan, Climate Action Plan, and direction from Planning Commission and City Council during the float-up discussions. The proposed project has an overall unit mix of 20% studios, 50% one-bedroom units, 20% two-bedroom units, and 10% three-bedroom units.", "Background", "The project site consists of two contiguous parcels with a total of 67,500 square feet located on the southeast corner of Broadway and 5th Street. The site has 150 feet of frontage along Broadway and 450 feet of frontage along the east side of 5th Street (between Broadway and Colorado Avenue). The site is currently developed with a one-story commercial building and a 92-space surface parking lot (Fred Segal).", "View East on Broadway View North on 5th Street", "View South on 5th Street View West on Broadway", "Area Context", "Surrounding uses along 5th Street, Broadway, and across the 5th Court Alley include commercial retail and office, hotel (future Courtyard Marriott and Hampton Inn and Suites hotels), and residential uses. Across Broadway to the north is a one-story commercial building with a pending Development Agreement application for a 6-story mixed-use project. Existing structures in the area range in building height. The adjacent forthcoming 6-story Hampton Inn and Suites hotel would be 77 feet in height, and all mixed-use residential buildings (4) across the 5th Court Alley on the west side of 6th Street (1522-1548 6th Street) are 5-stories, 60 feet in height. The adjacent office building across the 5th Court Alley (520 Colorado Avenue) is 6-stories, 84 feet in height. The west side of 5th Street is developed with a one-story retail building (420 Broadway, Fred Segal), the 6-story (70\u2019) Silvercrest Senior Housing building, the 5-story (56\u2019) Step-Up on Fifth residential building, and the forthcoming 6-story (76\u2019) Courtyard Marriott hotel. The project site is a half block from the future light rail terminus station at the corner of 4th Street and Colorado Avenue.", "This development agreement application was submitted to the City on August 27, 2013, and has been reviewed consistent with the public process including a community meeting, ARB concept review, Planning Commission and City Council float-up reviews, and Planning Commission formal consideration as summarized in Attachment M.", "Planning Commission Action", "The Planning Commission reviewed this development agreement on March 9, 2016 and voted 6-1 recommending that the City Council certify the Final EIR and approve the project, general plan amendment, LUCE map amendment, and adopt the proposed Development Agreement with the following recommendations:", "1. The Development Agreement should include a provision that prohibits all commercial office use in the project. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and language prohibiting all office uses including Business and Professional, Creative, Medical and Dental, and Walk-in Clientele are prohibited [DA Section 2.5.1(c)(7)].", "2. The project should provide 20 additional long-term bike parking spaces for employees. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and an additional 20 long-term bike parking spaces for a total of 64 spaces are provided in the project as shown on the project plans.", "3. The project should provide at least 3 electric charging stations within the EV ready parking spaces provided for the project. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and 3 electric charging stations within the EV ready parking spaces will be provided in the project as shown on the project plans.", "4. The number of unreserved commercial parking spaces available for public use should be increased from 135 to 145. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and this change has been revised in the Agreement [DA Section 2.8.10(a)].", "5. The commercial parking demand shall be analyzed commencing two years from Certificate of Occupancy to determine whether any additional commercial spaces up to 55 additional spaces (200 in total) may become unreserved spaces available for public use. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and a provision in the Agreement has been added accordingly. [DA Section 2.8.10(b)].", "6. The project shall provide space within the subterranean garage for the storage of energy fuel cells. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and a provision in the Agreement has been added accordingly [DA Section 2.8.21].", "7. The developer should provide a transit subsidy between 25-50% of the cost of a monthly regional transit pass for 1-3 months for new project residents electing not to obtain the resident transportation allowance prescribed in the Agreement. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and proposes a transit subsidy of 25% of the cost of a monthly regional transit pass for 3 months for new project residents electing not to receive a transportation allowance [DA Section 2.8.7(e)(3)(ii)].", "8. The cross court driveway connecting 5th Street and 5th Court Alley shall remain open at all times. Condition No. 7 has been added reflecting this recommendation.", "9. Increase availability of the community room for public use from 2 to 4 times per month. The applicant has agreed to this recommendation, and DA section 2.8.10 has been revised accordingly.", "10. Allow the ARB to have design flexibility in amount of floor area reduction that may result from the Architectural Review Board design review procedures no greater than a 2% reduction in ground floor commercial area and no greater than a 5% in upper residential floor. Staff is supportive of this recommendation. The applicant does not agree to this recommendation however considering the Planning Commission\u2019s comments, has revised their proposal from 2% to 3% specific for the residential floor area only. The applicant expresses concerns with additional reduction in floor area, considering the project\u2019s size has been reduced since float-up review, including reductions in floor area (4.5 to 4.0), and increased ground floor open space. Staff and the applicant have agreed to disagree on this issue and as a result, both proposals are shown in the DA. [DA Section 6.1].", "11. The ARB should pay particular attention to the project\u2019s exterior lighting and how it may affect Project and neighboring uses. Condition No. 2(e) has been added reflecting this recommendation.", "12. The ARB should pay particular attention to ensure that the publicly-accessible open space immediately west of the main residential lobby is usable by the public and contributes to the pedestrian environment of the surrounding publicly accessible open space. Condition No. 2(f) has been added reflecting this recommendation.", "13. The Planning Commission recommended that the City Council should further support the use of SMURRF water for this type of project.", "Project Analysis", "Project Description", "The project is a 7-story building with a maximum height of 84 feet, consisting of 35,428 SF of ground floor commercial space, 24,217 square feet of subterranean commercial space, 249 residential units with 233,600 square feet of residential floor area, and a floor area ratio (FAR) of 4.0. The four-level subterranean parking garage consists of 524 parking spaces, and a total of 29,041 square feet of commercial (24,217 SF) and residential (4,824 SF) area that are excluded from the floor area ratio calculation. The ground floor and subterranean commercial space could include pedestrian-oriented, neighborhood-serving commercial uses including a general market, restaurant, retail establishments, fitness/exercise facility. The development agreement places a leasing priority for at least 15,000 square feet of general market at the ground floor level.", "The project\u2019s residential component consists of 249 residential units with the following unit configuration:", "Unit Type", "Number of Units", "Bedrooms", "Percentage", "Average Sq Ft", "Studio", "49", "0", "19.7%", "573", "1-Bed", "125", "125", "50.2%", "820", "2-Bed", "50", "100", "20.1%", "1,174", "3-Bed", "25", "75", "10.0%", "1,359", "Total", "249", "300", "100%", "982 SF", "\u00a7 Total Project Average Bedroom Factor (300/249) = 1.2", "The proposed unit mix percentages are consistent with Development Agreement priority processing guidelines established by the City Council of 20% maximum studios, minimum 20% two-bedroom units, and minimum 10% three-bedroom units. Further, the average number of bedrooms for all of the market-rate units combined is 1.2, consistent with the 1.2-1.5 unit mix threshold established for Tier 2 projects pursuant to the Zoning code.", "Project Design + Site Planning", "The proposed building design is modern/contemporary. The building is divided into four separate building forms above the podium level (second floor) with landscaped courts in between the structures designed with seat walls for project residents. The upper levels above the podium level consist of residential uses, and are connected by open pedestrian bridges on each floor providing access between the buildings. Separating the building into four sections breaks the overall length and building mass of the entire structure, and allows for adequate light and air passage through the project and separation between residential units. These physical breaks between the buildings also provide light, air, and building mass relief for adjacent office and residential uses across the 5th Court alley. Exterior building materials would consist of smooth limestone plaster, operable and fixed sunshade louvers, board formed concrete, and aluminum frame windows and balcony doors. The four building elements are designed with windows in a variety of sizes and arrangements (horizontally and vertically) on each internal and external elevation, and include private balconies with steel cable or semi-transparent glass railings. To ensure there is adequate privacy between north/south facing residential units, staff has included Condition No. 2 requiring that the ARB pay particular attention to the use and materiality of the privacy louvers/screens.", "5th Street Elevation | Corridor View Between Buildings", "Ground Floor Commercial Uses", "The ground floor commercial space would include pedestrian-oriented, neighborhood-serving commercial uses that may include market, restaurant, and retail establishments. The project includes approximately 34,577 SF of ground floor commercial area (35,428 SF including support areas) divided within two physically separated areas (8,068 SF and 26,509 SF). Although separate tenant spaces may be created to accommodate a variety of commercial uses, the larger of the spaces has been designed to accommodate a general market use. As indicated during concept review, a ground floor market had been commented by the Commission and Council as an important project component as proposed by the applicant. Accordingly, the Development Agreement (Article 2.25) includes a provision that prioritizes a general market use on the ground floor. Specifically, the developer is required to provide a general market on the ground floor, unless unable to secure a tenant after demonstrated good faith attempts for 180 days, and may propose alternate commercial uses, subject to discretion of the Planning Director. The provision also requires the market to participate in the Calfresh program, federally known as the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) that provides debit cards to low-income individuals and families that can be used at markets to purchase food. This would allow the market to be more accessible to low-income individuals and families.", "Pedestrian Orientation + Open Space", "Ground Floor Open Space", "The conceptual ground floor design shown as Figure 1 below has been revised resulting in an increase in the amount of ground floor open space, an improvement in the overall pedestrian realm, and adequate pedestrian space along 5th Street.", "Figure 1: Float-Up Conceptual Ground Floor Plan + Vehicular Access", "Changes to the conceptual ground floor plans include the following:", "1. Reduced Ground Floor Commercial Space: The ground floor commercial space was reduced by approximately 4,000 SF, resulting in reduced floor area, and greater ground floor setbacks/open space.", "2. Additional Ground Floor Setback: Portions of the building frontage have been further recessed 18-24 feet on Broadway and 19-51 feet on 5th Street resulting in additional open space with a minimum unobstructed pedestrian clear zone of 12 feet along both street frontages.", "3. Ground Floor Courtyard: Additional open space (plaza) in between the first two buildings from the street corner has been created on the ground floor and is open above (no projecting podium level above), leading to the recessed centralized residential lobby. Relocating the residential lobby from its previous location allows for increased storefront visibility and improved use of the open space along 5th St.", "4. Building/Cross Court Driveway Corner: The pedestrian orientation at the driveway corner has been improved. The width of the cross court driveway connecting 5th Street and the alley has been reduced, allowing for additional open space for pedestrian circulation, outdoor seating, and short-term bike parking.", "Figure 2: Proposed Ground Floor Plan + Vehicular Access", "The proposed ground floor building design incorporates glazing surfaces with varying setbacks throughout the 5th Street elevation, providing outdoor seating opportunities, adequate sidewalk space for pedestrian circulation, short-term bike parking, and gathering spaces adjacent to the public sidewalk. The ground floor would have a 20 foot floor-to-floor height with transparent glazing, exceeding the minimum draft DCP standard of 18 feet. Pockets of outdoor seating areas are proposed facing 5th Street, with the largest open area identified on the plans as the public plaza at the street corner. The ground floor would include approximately 2,790 SF of outdoor dining area to support restaurant and food serving uses. The ground floor building setback provides additional sidewalk width exceeding the minimum sidewalk width of 15 feet (curb to building) along 5th Street, and 18 feet along Broadway as contemplated in the draft Downtown Community Plan (DCP). More specifically, the ground floor storefronts along 5th Street are generally setback from the curb ranging from 32-37 feet and 45-51 feet at the street corner, and range from 18-24 feet along Broadway, as shown in Figure 2 above. Although structural column, stair/elevator shaft, and light well projections are located within the ground floor open space areas, a minimum unobstructed pedestrian clearance of 12\u2019-0\u201d would be maintained between the existing tree wells and these projections. This clearance would allow for adequate pedestrian circulation around the project\u2019s perimeter along the sidewalk, particularly at these reduced points along the sidewalk. No permanent physical obstructions, including outdoor dining, may be located within this clear pedestrian zone as described in DA Section 2.8.2 and as shown in the Publicly Accessible Open Space plan provided as Exhibit L. To ensure there is adequate space for pedestrian circulation, staff recommends that the ARB pay particular attention to the proposed placement of the building columns on the ground floor along the 5th Street elevation (Condition 2).", "The main residential lobby is located between the first two buildings from the street corner, with a smaller secondary lobby adjacent to the cross court driveway. The primary lobby is also accessible from the rear alley through the short-term residential bike parking area. Short-term bike parking for commercial visitors is spread throughout the ground floor. Resident short-term bike parking is provided adjacent to the main residential lobby, accessible from the rear alley. Along the alley, passenger and commercial loading spaces are provided, and the ground floor is setback two feet from the property line that provides additional alley width to accommodate service and delivery vehicles for improved alley circulation.", "The proposed ground floor open space has increased from the conceptual plans from 5.6% to 20%, consistent with the 20% ground floor open space contemplated in the draft DSP at the time of concept review. As shown in Figure 3 below, the proposed 13,614 SF of ground floor open space includes the setback areas between the building and minimum sidewalk width, provided primarily at the street corner and along 5th Street.", "Figure 3: Ground Floor Open Space Plan", "Additional open space is provided in between the resident short-term bike parking area and the main residential lobby that would primarily be used by residents. The cross court driveway area is not included in the percentage, as recommended by the Commission during concept review. However, it should be noted that there are areas of open space not specifically designed for usable open space (accounting for approximately 3%) that the applicant has included in the ground floor percentage, including the 1,120 SF area provided along the rear alley and the 940 SF landscaped area adjacent to the cross court driveway along the southern property line.", "Resident Open Space and Roof Deck Amenities", "Resident common open space is provided on two second floor courtyards at the podium level consisting of 6,612 SF, and on the roof deck that includes 25,903 SF. Each building form includes resident amenities on the roof deck, collectively consisting of lounge, bbq/dining, dog run, and landscape/garden areas for residents, including a pool and spa. Photovoltaic solar canopies are proposed that would provide shading for residents with additional solar hot water panels provided above the mechanical equipment. Based on a study submitted by the applicant and reviewed by the City\u2019s Sustainability staff, the proposed area of solar panels (100 kilowatt system) would generate sufficient energy to power the project\u2019s common areas. Furthermore, the size of the pool would be limited to 12,000 gallons and would be heated with 100% renewable energy.", "Figure 4: Roof Plan", "Private balconies and patios averaging 50 SF per unit would provide an additional 12,544 SF of private open space. The project provides a total of 58,707 SF of open space or 86.9% of the parcel, including 20% on the ground floor.", "Building Mass + Area Context", "The upper floors above the podium level are divided into four separate building forms with openings in between approximately 27 and 30 feet in average width. Separating the building into four building forms/sections reduces the overall length and upper level building mass of the structure as viewed from the street and rear alley, and allows for adequate light and air passage through the buildings for residents. The building includes angled fa\u00e7ades and varied building planes on each elevation in an alternating pattern between floors, and each building form\u2019s general footprint is shaped differently. In efforts to reduce the upper level massing, parapets have been lowered and upper level units (3 bed units) include larger recessed balconies that provide added visibility and building relief. Each building form includes two fa\u00e7ade types vertically divided: sculptural plaster faces on the north sides and fiber cement board in warm grey with fixed and operable sunshade louvers on the south sides. This fa\u00e7ade treatment is also applied to the alley elevation. The operable sunshade louvers allow the facades to vary in their appearances depending on the natural lighting. These design elements provide added visual interest to each building form that further helps to reduce the perceived building mass on upper floors.", "Figure 5: 5th Street Elevation", "As described earlier in this report, the existing structures in the area range in building height from 56\u2019 to 76\u2019, with the adjacent office building across the 5th Court Alley (520 Colorado Avenue) approximately 84 feet in height. At 7 stories, 84 feet in height, the proposed building would be taller than nearby existing buildings. However in reviewing the project contextually, the proximity of the project site to the Expo light rail station and the Colorado Esplanade are important considerations. From an urban design perspective and based on the draft DCP, increased density at the proposed site would be appropriate and is supported by the anticipated increase in pedestrian volumes in this transit-adjacent area of the downtown.", "Building Differentiation and Rear Elevation Design", "Design comments provided during concept review included that the building forms should be differentiated in building design, and the rear elevation needed further enhancement. Although the overall building forms are similar in concept, each form includes subtle differences in appearance depending on the floor and location facing 5th Street, consisting of angled fa\u00e7ades and varied building planes on each elevation in an alternating patterns. As shown in Figure 6 below, the rear alley has been further enhanced from the conceptual design. In addition to larger windows added throughout the elevation, additional balconies were added on upper floors that improve resident views and private open space. Further, the split fa\u00e7ade design consisting of sculptural plaster and fiber cement board were added throughout that improves the relationship of the alley\u2019s overall appearance with other interior and street facing elevations, providing a more cohesive design.", "Figure 6: Proposed Rear Alley Elevation", "Conceptual Rear Alley Elevation", "Vehicular Parking and Access | Bike Parking", "Vehicle Parking", "The four-level subterranean garage is designed with driveway access from both 5th Street and 5th Court Alley, connected by a \u201ccross court\u201d driveway. The proposed garage provides 524 vehicular parking spaces (and 12 motorcycle spaces on P2 level) for residents, guests, and commercial uses. Approximately 46 of these spaces would be provided in a tandem configuration. Fourteen commercial tandem spaces located on the P2 level would be operated by valet or attendant assist system, and 32 residential tandem spaces would be located on residential parking levels. Thirty-two residential units would have the option to lease two parking spaces in a tandem configuration.", "Both commercial and residential parking levels are accessed by their own separate ramps located off of the cross court driveway, which would remain open at all times. Commercial parking is located on the first and second (P1, P2) subterranean levels, and residential parking is located on the third and fourth (P3, P4) levels. Residential parking spaces would be secured and separated from the commercial parking spaces. Excess commercial parking demand may be accommodated by use of surplus residential parking managed by attendant parking.", "A parking demand analysis was prepared by Gibson Transportation Consulting, concluding that the projected peak parking demands for both the proposed commercial (204 spaces) and residential uses (306 spaces) could be sufficiently satisfied by the proposed parking supply, and the proposed parking is appropriate for the project. The study compared the Zoning Ordinance and draft DCP parking standards, and further developed parking rates applied to a shared parking model to account for the inherent characteristics of a mixed-use development. Furthermore, the study concluded that the proposed number of tandem spaces would not adversely affect project operations. The parking demand study is provided as Attachment K.", "Pursuant to the DA Section 2.8.10, at least 145 commercial parking spaces would be unreserved such that the parking garage would serve the development and also function as a public parking resource for the area. Given the project\u2019s location in the Downtown, maintaining approximately 70% of the project\u2019s commercial parking on the P1 and P2 levels as unreserved commercial parking would be appropriate compared to reserving parking spaces for City use as negotiated in recent Development Agreements that were located at the Downtown\u2019s perimeter. Also, parking would be unbundled for both residential and commercial uses, as outlined in the project\u2019s TDM requirements (DA Section 2.8.7).", "The following table compares the minimum vehicular and bicycle parking requirements of the draft DCP with the proposed project.", "Table 1: Required and Proposed Parking Comparison", "Parking Type", "Draft DCP", "Proposed Project", "Automobile Off-Street Parking", "287 residential", "208 commercial*", "495 total", "319 residential", "205 commercial**", "524 total", "Bicycle Parking (Long Term)", "350 residential", "42 commercial", "392 total", "368 residential", "64 commercial", "432 total", "Bicycle Parking (Short Term)", "35 residential", "63 commercial", "98 total", "37 residential", "75 commercial", "112 total", "Total Bike Parking", "490", "544***", "* Based on 1/300 parking rate on all commercial SF(62,435 SF), per draft DCP parking rates.", "** Exclude 12 proposed motorcycle parking spaces proposed on P2 level. Per ZO,", "12 motorcycle spaces would equate to 3 vehicle spaces, per SMMC Section 9.28.180(G).", "*** Includes 51 cargo bike spaces.", "Bicycle Parking", "Long-term bike parking for both commercial and residential uses, including locker and shower facilities, would be located on the first and second garage levels in a location convenient to access elevators. Short-term bike parking for commercial visitors is spread throughout the ground floor, and conceptually includes 56 spaces within the public right of way (parkway) adjacent to the curb and sidewalk. However, due to competing interests for space in the public right-of-way, and to ensure the appropriate mix of uses within this area, staff will continue to work with the applicant on the appropriate number of bike parking spaces to be located within the parkway area (Condition No. 6), with a total of short-term spaces no less than the minimum required per the draft DCP. Pursuant to the Zoning Ordinance, at least 25% of the required short-term bike parking for properties located in the Downtown are required to be provided on-site, whereas the remainder may be provided within the public right-of-way, subject to Public Works approval.", "Commercial / Resident Loading", "The project includes two loading spaces; a passenger size loading space for residential use and a semi-tractor trailer loading space as required for a general market, and would also support other commercial uses. The semi-tractor trailer loading space is located off of the rear alley adjacent to the cross court driveway and is designed with sliding screen doors along the side of the space (facing the alley) that, when opened, would allow adequate turning maneuvers and improved accessibility into the loading area from both the alley and driveway. Condition No. 5 requires that the sliding screen doors be closed during loading operations to mitigate noise, particularly for residential uses located across the alley.", "1984 LUCE Consistency", "500 Broadway: General Plan Text Amendments to FAR and Number of Stories", "Pursuant to the LUCE and the IZO, the 1984 LUCE and zoning standards remain applicable to Downtown properties until the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan. Accordingly, the project is subject to the 1984 LUCE Downtown Core standards and the C3C Zoning standards from the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (previous ZO). The 1984 LUCE establishes the maximum building height of 84 feet, 6 stories, and 3.5 FAR for the Downtown Core area where the subject site is located. The proposed project is consistent with the allowable building height of 84 feet, however is inconsistent with the number of stories and FAR limitations. The applicant requests to amend the maximum Floor Area Ratio from 3.5 to 4.0 and to add a provision that there shall be no limitation on the number of stories of any structure containing at least one floor of residential use.", "The 1984 LUCE Policy 1.3.6 would be amended as follows:", "\u201cUntil a Third Street Mall and Downtown Core Area Specific Plan is adopted, allow in the Downtown area a maximum of:", "Core Area: 4 stories (56\u2019); 3.0 FAR", "Frame: 4 stories (56\u2019); 2.5 FAR", "And permit by site review up to:", "Core Area: 6 stories (84\u2019); 3.5 4.0 FAR", "Frame: 6 stories (84\u2019); 3.0 FAR", "There shall be no limitation on the number of stories of any structure containing at least one floor of residential uses, so long as the height does not exceed the maximum height in number of feet.\u201d", "The Downtown Core area affected by these amendments includes the area bounded by 2nd Street (east side) to 4th Court between Broadway and Colorado Ave (north side), 5th Street (both sides) between Wilshire Blvd and Colorado Ave (north side), and the south side of Wilshire Blvd between 5th Court and Lincoln Blvd.", "The proposed amendment would be consistent with the goals, objectives, policies, and land uses of the 1984 LUCE. Specifically, the proposed increase in allowable FAR from 3.5 to 4.0 within the Downtown Core area further reinforces the Downtown as the focus of the City, supporting the greatest concentration of activity, consistent with LUCE Objective 1.3. Consistent with this objective, the proposed amendment would allow additional commercial and residential floor area in the Downtown Core area where it would be appropriate adjacent to the Bayside District and be within a transit-adjacent area in proximity to the Expo light rail terminus station and Colorado Esplanade. The proposed amendment to allow no limitations on the number of stories of any structure containing at least one floor of residential uses, so long as the height does not exceed the maximum height in number of feet, provides a housing incentive and would provide projects with greater design flexibility in achieving allowable floor area. The proposed amendments support residential mixed-use development and would result in increased housing opportunities, consistent with Policy 1.3.5 which encourages residential uses in the Downtown on upper floors and neighborhood commercial uses for the Downtown residential community.", "The draft DCP contemplates a 4.0 FAR for the Transit Adjacent district where the project is located, and does not include story limitations for the Downtown. Therefore, the proposed amendments would be consistent with the contemplated draft standards. The DCP, when adopted, would establish the LUCE and zoning development standards for the project site, and would replace the 1984 LUCE standards that are currently applicable to the project, including the proposed General Plan Amendments to FAR and number of stories. Due to the review and consideration of the draft DCP by City Council within the next year, the applicability of the proposed amendments would be limited to the subject project, and any development projects seeking a 4.0 FAR would be subject to Commission and Council review as a Development Agreement per the Interim Zoning Ordinance for the Downtown. . Staff supports the proposed amendments based on consistency with 1984 LUCE objectives and policies for the area and that the amendments are consistent with the contemplated standards in the draft DCP.", "1626 Lincoln Boulevard: Zoning Map Amendment", "To facilitate the 64 units of off-site affordable housing proposed for the 500 Broadway project, the applicant, Community Corporation of Santa Monica, requests a Zoning Map Amendment to change the zoning district from M-1 (Industrial Conservation) to MUB (Mixed Use Boulevard) for the rear portion of the parcel. Currently, the parcel is divided by a Zoning District boundary in which the development standards applicable to each district are applied to the area within the District. The proposed zone change would allow the project to be developed consistently throughout the site according to the Mixed-Use Boulevard development standards. Community Corporation of Santa Monica is developing the site pursuant to a Development Review (DR) Permit 15ENT-0306.", "The 1626 Lincoln Boulevard project requires the following entitlements/approvals:", "- Certification of 500 Broadway Final EIR (PC recommendation, Council", "approval)", "- Development Review Permit 15ENT-0306 (PC approval)", "- Zoning Map Amendment 15ENT-0307 (PC recommendation, Council approval)", "The City has reviewed this off-site affordable housing project concurrently with 500 Broadway, and the project was analyzed as a project alternative in the 500 Broadway Final EIR to a project level of detail. Therefore, the environmental clearance for this project, in accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), will be provided with the certification of the Final EIR. Accordingly, the project\u2019s DR permit is anticipated to be brought forward for the Commission\u2019s consideration on May 11, 2016, provided Council approves the 500 Broadway Development Agreement, the zoning map amendment for 1626 Lincoln Boulevard, and certifies the project\u2019s Final EIR. The order in which these requests are being reviewed by the Commission and Council will assist with CCSM\u2019s timeframe to apply for Low Income Housing Tax Credits to finance the 100% affordable housing project.", "The property located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard is currently divided into two land use and zoning designations; the approximate front \u00be depth of the property (easterly) is located in the Mixed-Use Boulevard LUCE designation and Mixed-Use Boulevard Zoning designation. The approximate rear \u00bc depth of the property (westerly) is located in the Downtown Core LUCE designation and M1 Industrial Conservation Zoning designation. Similar to 500 Broadway, the 1984 LUCE and 1988 Zoning standards remain applicable to downtown properties until the adoption of the Downtown Community Plan. Accordingly, while the front portion of the parcel is subject to the current MUB LUCE and MUB zoning designations, the subject rear portion of the parcel is subject to the 1984 LUCE Downtown Frame standards and the M1 Zoning standards from the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (previous ZO).", "Figure 7:", "Land Use Designation Map: Property divided into Zoning District Map: Property divided into two Land Use Designations: MUB + Dowtown Core two Zoning Districts: MUB + M1", "CCSM requests to change the zoning for the portion of the parcel currently zoned M1 to the MUB zoning district, consistent with the front portion of the property. The proposed Mixed-Use Boulevard zoning district for the subject rear portion of the property would result in development standards that would remain consistent with the underlying 1984 LUCE Downtown Frame requirements. Therefore, the proposed zone change would be consistent with the General Plan. As indicated in the chart below, the 1984 LUCE allows 6 stories, 84 feet in height, and FAR of 3.0. Consistent with these requirements, the proposed MUB zoning district includes no limit on the number of stories, 55 feet in height, and FAR of 2.75. Although the MUB does not limit the number of stories, a project would practically not be able to achieve greater than 6 stories within the maximum height of 55 feet, and is therefore consistent with the 1984 LUCE requirement. Furthermore, the proposed affordable housing project would be required to comply with the MUB zoning development standards.", "Table 2: Development Standards Comparison for 1626 Lincoln", "1984 LUCE Frame", "Draft DCP", "M1 zone", "MUB zone", "Project", "FAR", "3.0", "2.75", "1.0", "2.75", "1.7", "Height", "84\u2019", "60", "30\u2019", "55\u2019", "55\u2019", "Stories", "6", "No Limit", "2", "No Limit", "5", "Below is the draft DCP Downtown District map that identifies the subject property located in the Mixed-Use Boulevard (MUB) district. The draft standards are generally consistent with the existing MUB zoning standards currently applicable to properties along this segment of Lincoln Boulevard. The DCP, when adopted, would replace the existing Mixed-Use Boulevard zoning and land use designation along this portion of Lincoln Boulevard. According to the map in the draft DCP, the subject site will be entirely located within the MUB district, and will not remain divided into multiple districts. The draft map recognizes this existing parcel condition and the parcel\u2019s zoning inconsistency will be addressed. Staff is supportive of the proposed map amendment based on its consistency with the draft DCP.", "Figure 8: Proposed Zone Change", "Draft DCP District Map Proposed Zoning Change", "The affordable housing project is designed based on the entire property being subject to the current Mixed-Use Boulevard zoning standards consisting of a maximum building height of 55 feet and 2.75 FAR allowable for Tier 2 100% affordable housing projects. The underlying M1 development standards currently applicable to the rear portion of the property (per the IZO) would limit development in that particular area to two stories with a maximum building height of 30 feet, and a 1.0 FAR.", "The proposed amendment would be consistent with the goals, objectives, policies, and land uses of the 1984 LUCE. Specifically, the proposed Mixed-Use Boulevard zoning district for the subject rear portion of the property would result in development standards, including building height, number of stories, and floor area ratio, that are consistent with the underlying 1984 LUCE Downtown Frame requirements, and as such, the proposed zoning map amendment would be consistent with the General Plan. In addition, the proposed map amendment is requested in conjunction with a 100% affordable housing development project at the subject property, consistent with LUCE Objective 1.1 which seeks to increase the amount of affordable housing particularly in the Downtown. For these reasons, staff supports the proposed map amendment.", "Draft Downtown Community Plan (DCP) Consistency", "The project is currently subject to the 1984 Downtown Core LUCE standards and would be consistent with the objectives and policies of the 1984 LUCE with the approval of the proposed General Plan Text Amendment related to the allowable number of stories and FAR. The DCP, when adopted, would establish the LUCE and zoning development standards for the project site, and replace the 1984 LUCE standards that are currently applicable to the project, including the proposed General Plan Amendments. The project site is identified in the draft DCP within the Transit Adjacent district. As recommended during float-up review, the design of the project has been modified to be compliant with the draft standards provided in the draft DSP issued in February 2014. Based on the February 2016 draft DCP, certain standards have been revised and new standards have been added.", "The draft DCP includes maximum floor plate ratio, maximum upper level building frontage occupancy, and minimum open space requirements based on small, medium, large, and sites exceeding 100,000 SF building types. As defined, the project would fall under the sites exceeding 100,000 SF building type category. The DCP identifies four sites (table 2A.2) in the Downtown that, given the parcel size and development standards, could potentially produce projects 100,000 SF in size or greater, which does not include the 500 Broadway project. This is based on the anticipation that the timing of the 500 Broadway project would precede the adoption of the DCP.", "Attachment F contains a table that compares the proposed project to the 1984 LUCE and draft DCP standards. Based on the draft DCP standards, the project is consistent with the building height, floor area ratio (FAR), maximum average building height, and maximum unbroken primary fa\u00e7ade length, however is inconsistent with the following standards as further described in Attachment H:", "\u00a7 Floor Plate Ratio", "\u00a7 Upper Level Building Frontage Occupancy", "\u00a7 Open Space", "\u00a7 Pedestrian Level Building Frontage", "Consistent with the draft DCP, increased density at the proposed site, in proximity to the Expo light rail terminus station and the Colorado Esplanade, would be appropriate and is supported by the anticipated increase in pedestrian volumes in this transit-adjacent area of the Downtown. The draft DCP seeks to establish an urban form strategy that places the greatest height and density near the Expo terminus station and adjacent to the I-10 freeway, where there is the most convenient access to high frequency transit, and to reduce the intensity of development at the Downtown\u2019s historic core and at edge transitions to residential neighborhoods in order to preserve existing scale and character.", "The project would provide transit-adjacent housing and neighborhood-serving commercial uses in proximity to light rail and transit opportunities, convenient for residents to use alternate modes of transportation other than private vehicles, and in addition to the project\u2019s Transportation Demand Management Program, would further City goals of increasing transportation choice. Also consistent with mobility goals for the Downtown, the project would widen sidewalks along 5th Street and Broadway that would expand pedestrian capacity and enhance the pedestrian experience adjacent to the project. Consistent with City goals to nurture a complete and long-term Downtown community, the Development Agreement would provide a mix of sizable units, and would also result in the construction of 64 affordable housing units that would expand affordable family housing and help balance the housing mix in the Downtown.", "Housing Element Consistency", "Council previously expressed interest in information from the LUCE monitoring report that would provide some context to the proposed housing project. For the purpose of evaluating the impacts of potential land use changes during the 20-year time horizon of the LUCE, among other factors, the LUCE Final EIR (FEIR) considered residential and non-residential land use changes. The LUCE FEIR analyzed 4,955 residential units. The projections of land use change in the LUCE FEIR are not a cap on development but rather were used to analyze the environmental impact of the General Plan. Table 3 provides information regarding the land use change analyzed in the LUCE FEIR and the proposed project.", "Table 3: Residential Units Completed, Under Construction or Approved Since LUCE Adoption", "Residential Units Completed", "Residential Units", "Under Construction", "Residential Units Approved/", "No Building Permits", "500 Broadway", "1,064", "429", "551", "249", "The 2013-2021 Housing Element incorporates the housing goals from the LUCE, which generally seek to produce more housing in transit accessible locations. The proposed project is located adjacent to the Expo light rail corridor and is within \u00bd  mile of the Downtown terminus station. Santa Monica was allocated 1,674 units in the 2014-2021 Regional Housing Needs Assessment (RHNA) with a quantified objective of 1,371 units. Based on information from the Housing Division, there are 871 units that have been completed or are under construction leaving 500 units remaining to achieve the quantified objective. Table 4 illustrates the remaining quantified objective by income category with information from recently approved housing projects. Approved projects will actually need to be completed projects in order to achieve the quantified objective.", "Table 4: Housing Element Remaining Quantified Objectives", "30% AMI", "50% AMI", "80% AMI", "Moderate", "Above Moderate", "Remaining Quantified Objective", "25", "108", "114", "86", "167", "Recently Approved Housing Projects", "1560 Lincoln Blvd DA (Denny\u2019s)", "--", "10", "10", "--", "80", "1415 5thStDA", "--", "10", "4", "--", "50", "1601 Lincoln Blvd DA (Norms)", "--", "14", "4", "1", "71", "3008 Santa Monica Blvd DR", "--", "4", "--", "--", "22", "500 Broadway DA (PENDING)", "7", "56", "1", "--", "249", "Development Agreement Overview", "A development agreement is a contract between the City and a developer that authorizes the type and amount of development that may occur within a specific period of time. Development agreements provide developers with guaranteed development rights in exchange for community benefits. A development agreement must comply with the General Plan, but can establish different development standards than provided by zoning regulations.", "A development agreement can provide greater latitude to advance local planning policies compared to the Development Review Permit process. While a development agreement is an alternative to the standard development approval process, in practice it is similar to other public review processes where the City Council makes the final decision with the exception that the City Council has more discretion in imposing conditions and requirements on the proposed project since development agreements are negotiated contracts.", "The proposed development agreement is included as Attachment B.", "Community Benefits", "The development agreement includes a negotiated community benefits package that includes a contribution amount of $6.4M excluding affordable housing, summarized in Table 4, with values assigned to each community benefit where possible to monetize the value of the benefit. The total cost of the off-site affordable housing project to the applicant is dependent on the amount of TCAC financing available for the project. As discussed, the cost of the land ($16.3M) more than satisfies AHPP requirements and the additional land cost exceeding AHPP requirements ($8.9M) would be considered community benefit value. Remaining costs to the applicant to complete the project are also considered the community benefit, and based on a monetary value would range between $18-32M depending on the public financing secured by CCSM. Therefore, the total monetized value of the community benefits package would range between $ 33.3M-$ 47.3M, consisting of $6.4M in contributions, $8.9M in additional land cost exceeding AHPP requirements, and $18-32M value of completing the affordable housing project. Community benefits are described in further detail below:", "Off-Site Affordable Housing Through Land Acquisition", "The applicant proposes to satisfy the project\u2019s affordable housing obligation by dedicating land located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard to Community Corporation of Santa Monica (CCSM) for the construction of a 100% affordable housing project with 64 residential units. Pursuant to the City\u2019s Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP) guidelines, the applicant may meet the affordable housing obligation by dedicating land to a non-profit housing provider that must be of a value at least equivalent to the affordable housing obligation, which would be approximately $7.45M based on the current affordable housing fee rate of $31.25/project square footage (238,424 SF x $31.25). The applicant\u2019s estimated land cost of the off-site property located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard would be $16.3M, exceeding the minimum land value, thereby more than satisfying the AHPP obligation. The additional cost of the land would be considered a community benefit. It is anticipated that the project would be constructed concurrently with the 500 Broadway project, and to ensure that the affordable housing project is completed, as outlined in DA Section 2.8.1, 500 Broadway may not obtain its Certificate of Occupancy (C of O) or offer residential units for rent until 1626 Lincoln Blvd has obtained its C of O and offered residential units for rent, with specified exception. The off-site housing project as it relates to community benefit is described later in this report. The Development Review Permit for 1626 Lincoln Boulevard will be heard by the Planning Commission on May 11, 2016.", "In addition to exceeding AHPP requirements, the applicant would also provide additional financing for constructing the 64-unit affordable housing project, and funding on-site resident services annually once the project is completed. CCSM will seek construction financing through the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee (\u201cTCAC\u201d), with remaining financing provided by the applicant. Depending on the amount of public financing secured by CCSM, the applicant estimates total financing (including land costs) of approximately $34-48M. The off-site housing project would consist of 64 affordable units with a unit mix and affordability level consisting of the following:", "Unit Type", "Number of Units", "Bedrooms", "Percentage", "Average Sq Ft", "1-Bed", "29", "29", "45.3%", "500", "2-Bed", "18", "36", "28.1%", "750", "3-Bed", "17", "51", "26.6%", "1,000", "Total", "64", "116", "100%", "750 SF", "\u00a7 29 (45%) 1-Bedroom Units (Ave Size: 500 SF)", "\u00a7 18 (28%) 2-Bedroom Units (Ave Size: 750 SF)", "\u00a7 17 (27%) 3-Bedroom Units (Ave Size: 1,000 SF)", "\u00a7 Affordable Housing Average Bedroom Factor (116/64) = 1.8", "The 100% affordable housing project\u2019s average bedroom factor would be 1.8 bedrooms per unit, exceeding the 500 Broadway project\u2019s overall bedroom factor of 1.2.", "The affordability levels for these units are as follows:", "30% AMI", "40% AMI", "50% AMI", "60% AMI", "80% AMI", "Total", "Three-bed", "2", "15", "17", "Two-bed", "2", "13", "2", "1", "18", "One-bed", "3", "13", "13", "29", "Total", "7", "13", "26", "17", "1", "64", "\u00a7 10% units affordable to 30% income households or lower per TCAC.", "\u00a7 89% units affordable to 60% income households or lower per TCAC.", "\u00a7  1% unit affordable to 80% income households or lower per TCAC (managers unit).", "The off-site 100% affordable housing project would be owned in whole or in part and operated by Community Corporation of Santa Monica. The project includes a considerable percentage of larger two and three bedroom units (55% of the units) intended to accommodate growing families. Accordingly, the project includes extensive open space, play areas and gardens, and communal space that would be utilized for on-site training and activities specifically for project residents. As further detailed in DA Section 2.8.1(a), the applicant would also provide a 100% transportation allowance for residents of the affordable housing project, and wi-fi access for residents at no cost.", "The off-site project would consist of approximately 26% of the total units at the 500 Broadway site as affordable off-site units. This would be a considerable increase in the percentage of affordable housing units provided by a project based on recently approved projects in the downtown that have provided between 20-22% affordable units (on-site). Also, the project would include 3-bedroom units that would expand family living in the Downtown area. Based on the number of affordable units, unit composition, and the family service amenities that would be available for residents, staff is supportive of the project providing the affordable housing units at the proposed off-site location.", "Although the applicant is actively pursuing the off-site affordable housing project, alternatively, in the event that the off-site affordable housing project cannot be achieved, despite the applicant\u2019s good faith efforts, the DA includes a provision where the applicant may elect to provide on-site affordable units instead of providing affordable housing through the land acquisition option. Pursuant to DA Section 2.7.5(b), the applicant would satisfy AHPP requirements by providing 25 on-site units (10%) affordable to 50% income households. Pursuant to 2.8.1(c)(1), twelve additional units affordable to 50% income households would be provided and 20 additional units affordable to 80% income households, for a total of 32 community benefit affordable units. In total, 57 affordable units or 23% of the total 249 residential units would be provided on-site. The affordability levels for the on-site option would be as follows:", "\u00a7 37 (15%) units for 50% income households.", "\u00a7 20 (8%) units for 80% income households.", "\u00a7 57 (23%) total affordable units", "The proposed affordable housing unit mix for the on-site option would consist of the following:", "\u00a7  5 (9%) Studio Units (Ave Size: 500 SF)", "\u00a7 37 (65%) 1-Bedroom Units (Ave Size: 600 SF)", "\u00a7 10 (18%) 2-Bedroom Units (Ave Size: 850 SF)", "\u00a7  5 ( 9%) 3-Bedroom Units (Ave Size: 1,080 SF)", "\u00a7 Affordable Housing Average Bedroom Factor (72/57)= 1.26", "The average affordable housing bedroom factor would be 1.26 bedrooms per unit, consistent with the 500 Broadway project\u2019s overall bedroom factor of 1.2.", "The affordability levels for the total 57 residential units are as follows:", "65% of the affordable units provided to 50% income households: 37units", "\u00a7  5 (8.7%) Studio Units", "\u00a7 25 (44%) 1-Bedroom Units", "\u00a7  5 (8.7%) 2-Bedroom Units", "\u00a7  2 (4%) 3-Bedroom Units", "35% of the affordable units provided to 80% income households: 20 units", "\u00a7 12 (21%) 1-Bedroom Units", "\u00a7  5 (8.7%) 2-Bedroom Units", "\u00a7  3 (5%) 3-Bedroom Units", "The on-site proposal would include 57 of the 249 residential units, or 23% as affordable units. Compared to the off-site 100% affordable housing project, the on-site scenario would provide 7 fewer affordable units, 44 fewer bedrooms, significantly fewer 2- and 3-bedroom units, and a significantly decreased level of affordability overall.", "The monetized community benefit value of providing the 32 affordable housing units on-site would be an estimated $10M value based on the 2014-15 affordable housing unit development cost of $312,609, which represents the City\u2019s average costs to develop a unit of housing affordable to 30%, 50%, 80%, or moderate-income households. The total monetized value under this on-site affordable housing scenario, including contributions would be $16.7M, as provided in Table 5 below.", "In the on-site scenario, the developer would be required to inform local disability advocacy organizations of the availability of the affordable units and the process to be placed on the City\u2019s Affordable Housing waiting list. Within the existing preferences adopted by the City Council in the Administrative Guidelines for the Affordable Housing Production Program, households having at least one member of the household with a physical disability shall have a preference for one-half of the affordable units in the project.", "Enhanced Impact Fees", "The development agreement includes augmented impact fees compared to adopted fees that would otherwise be required by the Municipal Code in addition to negotiated contributions to priorities established in the LUCE. The following summarizes the negotiated contributions:", "\u00b7 Enhanced Transportation Impact Fee", "A monetary contribution of $1,650,000 towards transportation programs. This contribution is a 50% increase above adopted Transportation Impact fees for the incremental development above Tier 1 - an increment of approximately $310,000.", "\u00b7 Enhanced Parks and Recreation Impact Fee", "A monetary contribution of $1,700,000 towards parks and recreation programs. This contribution is a 50% increase above adopted Parks and Recreation fees for the incremental development above Tier 1 - an increment of approximately $385,000.", "\u00b7 Enhanced Affordable Housing Commercial Linkage Fee", "A monetary contribution of $325,000 to fund development of affordable housing units in the City. This contribution is a 50% increase above adopted Affordable Housing Linkage fees for the incremental development above Tier 1- an increment of approximately $42,000.", "\u00b7 Early Childhood Initiatives Contribution", "A monetary contribution of $1,100,000 that would support early childhood initiatives and resident services including but not limited to infant, toddler and pre-school tuition subsidies; family services, family support and parent engagement strategies; home visitation programs; facility and playground improvements; and kindergarten readiness models. The City shall deposit such monies into a separate restricted account to be used exclusively for the early childhood initiatives and resident services as described above through guidelines to be established by the City. First priority for receipt of these monies shall be residents of the affordable housing project located at 1626 Lincoln or agencies who will serve residents of the 1626 Lincoln project. This total contribution would replace the Child Care Linkage Program ordinance requirements for the project.", "\u00b7 Historic Preservation Contribution", "A monetary contribution of $150,000 towards historic preservation programs throughout the City.", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus Contribution", "A monetary contribution of $240,000 towards Big Blue Bus transit improvements in the Downtown.", "\u00b7 Transportation Management Association Contribution", "A monetary contribution of $150,000 towards Transportation Management Association programs.", "Physical Improvements", "The ground floor building setback provides additional sidewalk width exceeding the minimum sidewalk width of 15 feet (curb to building) along 5th Street, and 18 feet along Broadway as contemplated in the draft Downtown Community Plan (DCP). More specifically, the ground floor storefronts along 5th Street are generally setback from the curb ranging from 33-37 feet and 48\u2019 at the street corner, and range from 18-25 feet along Broadway. The proposed 13,614 SF of ground floor open space includes the setback areas between the building that facilitate the 12\u2019-wide clear pedestrian zone and approximately 2,790 SF of outdoor dining area to support restaurant and food serving uses.", "Unreserved Commercial Parking", "The project would provide 145 unreserved commercial parking spaces such that the parking garage would serve the development and also function as a public parking resource for the area. The applicant anticipates at least 60 reserved parking spaces would be needed for potential commercial tenants. As recommended by the Planning Commission, the project\u2019s commercial parking demand should be analyzed commencing two years from Certificate of Occupancy to determine whether any additional commercial spaces up to 55 additional spaces (200 in total) may become unreserved spaces available for public use. The recommendation is based on efforts to maximize the amount of publicly available parking at the site while ensuring that the project\u2019s parking needs are satisfied.", "Draft DCP Action AM3.5A seeks to encourage shared (unreserved) parking and discourage reserved parking, ensuring that shared parking is open to all motorists, regardless of whether they are customers, employees or building tenants, with the same parking prices, restrictions, and privileges as building occupants. Chapter 3.3H of the Draft DCP (Page 132) discusses the need for shared/unreserved parking, seeking public parking opportunities as infill projects occur. The draft DCP anticipates that approximately 800 additional public parking spaces will need to be added to the public network to keep pace with land use changes that opt to participate in an expanded parking in-lieu fee program. The development agreement supports maximizing the amount of publicly available parking for visitors and employees by requiring that:", "\u00b7 All parking be unbundled", "\u00b7 Developer must charge for parking at rates not competitive with comparable transit", "This parking framework provides flexibility for the Developer to efficiently manage the project\u2019s parking to not only serve the project\u2019s demand but also to lease parking spaces to off-site users.", "Unreserved parking at the site would meet the City\u2019s goals to expand the publicly accessible parking supply in the Downtown area, and would also help with reducing vehicular trips further into the downtown area. Specifically, the unreserved spaces would be offered at market rates to commercial customers, all residential guests, and any commercial tenants and their employees, and the general public in need of parking.", "Community Meeting Space", "The project would provide community meeting space available to non-profit or other community organizations at a cost consistent with City-owned facilities, available at least 4 times per month, as shown on the project plans (400 SF minimum space).", "Local Hiring", "The project would include local hiring provisions for construction-related and permanent employment. The Developer and commercial tenants would be required to follow certain steps to ensure that the greatest opportunity for interviewing local residents and employees is provided. All hiring decisions would continue to remain at the discretion of the Developer and commercial tenants.", "Table 5: Summary of Proposed Community Benefits Able To Be Monetized", "Community Benefit", "Value", "Off-Site Affordable Housing Project (Cost to the Developer", "Est.$26.6-$40.6M (less $7.4M land cost satisfying AHPP requirement)", "$34M-$48M total including land costs", "Enhanced TIF", "$1,650,000", "Enhanced Parks and Recreation Fee", "$1,700,000", "Enhanced Affordable Housing", "Commercial Linkage Fee", "$325,000", "Early Childhood Initiative contribution", "$1,100,000", "Historic Preservation contribution", "$150,000", "Big Blue Bus contribution", "$240,000", "Transportation Management Association", "$150,000", "Recycled Water Infrastructure Program", "$900,000", "Treated Urban Runoff distribution main (SMURRF) extension", "$200,000", "Total", "$6,415,000 without affordable housing", "$33.3M-$47.3M including afford. housing", "On-Site Affordable Scenario", "On-Site Affordable Housing (32 Units)", "$312,609 x 32 = $10,003,488", "Contributions", "$6,415,000", "Total", "$6,415,000 without affordable housing", "$16,718,488 including afford. housing", "Transportation Demand Management", "The development agreement includes TDM measures that would reduce vehicular trips and parking demand generated by the proposed project. Measures include, but are not limited to, a transportation information center, average vehicle ridership (AVR) targets, unbundled parking, parking cash-out, transportation allowances for employees and residents equivalent to 100% of the cost of a monthly regional transit pass, a transit subsidy of 25% of the cost of a monthly regional transit pass for 3 months for new project residents, showers and lockers for commercial employees who bike to work, ground level short-term visitor bike parking, long-term resident and commercial bike parking, and active participation in a Transportation Management Association. The TDM plan also includes a formula to calculate an alternative compliance fee should the project not meet its annual AVR target. Further, the plan includes a PM peak hour trip generation monitoring (trip cap) provision that establishes a limit on the project\u2019s PM peak hour trips (308 trips) as indicated in the project\u2019s EIR. The provision requires monitoring of the project\u2019s PM peak hour trip generation and establishes remedies for exceeding the trip generation limit, including working with staff on changes to the TDM plan and penalty fees. The proposed TDM measures are further detailed in Section 2.8.7 of the development agreement.", "Sustainability Elements", "The negotiated sustainability elements are intended to ensure that the project meets the highest levels of sustainability possible for the project. Many elements would likely have long-term benefits for the project\u2019s operations. The following summarizes the project\u2019s sustainability elements:", "LEED Status", "The project will be designed and constructed to achieve a minimum LEED\u00ae for Homes Platinum certification as established by the LEED\u00ae Rating System. The applicant studied the possibility of achieving Platinum certification under the version 4 (v4) rating system and concluded that a lack of clarity regarding compliance with the energy standards and credits still remain. The applicant has discussed v4 certification with the Green Building Council as it relates to the project, and understand that the Council will apply a hybrid of current v3 requirements since v4 standards have not been fully established. Staff acknowledges this lack of clarity regarding compliance with the energy standards. Staff understands that the main differences between version 2009 (v3) and v4 are potentially more efficiency gained in building energy performance and greater transparency in material supply chains but it would be difficult to provide a comparison of whether v4 provides significantly meaningful benefits over version 2009. Considering that the Development Agreement includes energy reduction requirements, including that the building shall use 15% less energy than required by California Energy Code, staff would be supportive of the project achieving certification under v3. As a result, the development agreement includes Platinum certification under the current rating system.", "Solar Infrastructure", "The project would include renewable energy generation including roof-mounted photovoltaic solar panels (100 kilowatt system) above trellis structures sufficient to power all of the common areas, and solar water heating technology that would allow the pool to be heated with 100% renewable energy. Furthermore, the building would be designed to use 15% less energy than required by California Energy Code.", "Consistent with zoning code requirements, the trellis structure projections are subject to Architectural Review Board approval for photovoltaic solar energy systems exceeding 5 feet (not to exceed 14 feet) in height above district height limits.", "Water Conservation", "The project would use non-potable water sources for landscape irrigation and commit to a 30% reduction below CalGreen baseline for interior building water usage. Specific performance standards for all of the interior fixtures, washers, and toilets are outlined in Section 2.8.4 of the development agreement. The applicant provided an estimate of the project\u2019s estimated water usage compared to the historical 5-year average for the existing retail use, which was reviewed by the City\u2019s Sustainability staff. The existing use has a historical average use of 3885 gallons per day (gpd) and the project is estimated to use approximately 13,800 gpd, which is a 41% reduction below CalGreen baseline and 9,915 gpd more than the historical average water use of the existing use. These performance standards would reduce water usage below baseline requirements, however would not completely off-set the project\u2019s new water demand. Council provided direction regarding a potential water neutrality requirement applying to new development on November 24, 2015. Potential approaches to offset water demand from new development were presented including a proposal for how off-sets might be calculated. Based on this concept, the Development Agreement includes a contribution of $900,000 towards recycled water infrastructure program improvements throughout the City. Furthermore, DA Section 2.8.20 requires that the developer extend the existing Treated Urban Runoff (TUR) distribution main (SMURRF water main) to service the project that would allow the use of SMURRF water for landscape irrigation and potentially for future indoor usage as described below. Further, the developer would provide $200,000 to the City to be used for extending the Treated Urban Runoff distribution main from the project site to Santa Monica Boulevard that would assist with extending the availability of SMURRF water into the Downtown area for landscape irrigation and potential alternate uses such as toilet flushing for future projects.", "There have been extensive discussions between the developer, the City, and the LA County Department of Public Health on the use of recycled water and greywater for toilet flushing for this project. On February 16, 2016, the LA County Department of Public Health issued guidelines for alternate water sources for indoor/outdoor non-potable water uses, notably including the use of non-potable water for residential toilet flushing.", "In researching other multi-family residential projects around the country that have installed on-site greywater recycling systems, projects tended to be consistent with the size of the proposed project (250 units), had obtained sizeable grants from a public utility, or were no longer using the greywater system due to maintenance difficulties. In speaking with manufacturers of greywater systems, it appears that the cost of maintenance and regulatory compliance for water quality testing could be substantial. Further, the City is continuing its research on a regulatory framework that would provide appropriate oversight for testing of water quality produced by on-site recycled greywater systems.", "Alternately, according to the City\u2019s Water Resources division, the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF) currently has capacity to provide the proposed project with recycled water for toilet flushing. The City is seeking opportunities to expand the capacity of the SMURRF facility and also extend the availability of SMURRF water into the Downtown area. Based on this available resource, staff pursued extensive research with ongoing discussions with the applicant, City staff, and the LA County Department of Public Health on utilizing SMURRF water for the project\u2019s residential and common area commercial toilet flushing. This arrangement would potentially address the developer\u2019s public health concerns and uncertainties with on-site greywater recycling systems. In comparing the potential options for reducing potable water use in the project, staff determined that in the long-term, a more comprehensive approach to expanding the City\u2019s recycled water capacity may be preferred to individual on-site greywater recycling systems. Expanding the capacity of the SMURRF facility and using SMURRF water is a promising option and would be supportive of the City\u2019s goal to achieve water self-sufficiency.", "For SMURRF water to be utilized at the project site, the Treated Urban Runoff distribution main (SMURRF) along Colorado Avenue would be extended to the project site. The building would also be designed with dual plumbing that would allow the use of potable water during instances where SMURRF water is unavailable. The applicant has expressed concerns with using SMURFF water for indoor toilet flushing, given the lack of precedent and still developing regulatory framework for governmental approvals that are not yet in place authorizing the use of treated urban runoff/recycled water in multi-family residential housing. In working with the applicant, the Development Agreement (Section 2.8.5) includes a two-step approach for the project to utilize SMURRF water for residential toilets and common area toilets in the garage and employee shower/locker room. This approach would include (1) purple pipe installation and (2) SMURRF water usage.", "The provisions outlined in the DA are to ensure that the review of the purple pipe system would not delay the project\u2019s overall building permit timeframe. For the installation of purple pipe, the City shall prepare a public handout, within 30 days after the project\u2019s ARB application submittal, generally describing regulatory procedures for dual plumbing of a building and other regulatory and permitting agencies having the jurisdiction over the installation of the purple piping system in the project. Further, the DA provides that the applicant and the City initiate early discussion on the design of the purple pipe system and that if through the plan check process, that the installation of the purple pipe system is determined to be infeasible that the $900,000 recycled water infrastructure programs contribution negotiated for the project would be increased by $300,000 for a total of $1.2M, in lieu of installing purple pipe (and using SMURRF water for indoor use). However, staff believes that satisfying this initial step as outlined in the DA is achievable.", "Once the purple piping system has been approved and installed within the project, the developer would be required to switch from using potable water in the purple piping system to using SMURRF water when authorized for use. The City is required to obtain necessary regulatory approvals authorizing SMURRF water for indoor toilet use in multi-family residential structures prior to the developer\u2019s obligation to utilize SMURRF water in the project, as outlined in the DA. The LA County Department of Public Health would have regulatory authority over reviewing the use of SMURRF water for indoor toilet flushing in multi-family residential buildings. As such, SMURRF would need to comply with Title 22. SMURRF is currently operated as a Best Management Practice (BMP) because it is a unique facility for treating dry-weather urban runoff that was not specifically contemplated in Title 22, which was intended to address recycled wastewater. As a result, SMURRF currently does not technically meet all Title 22 requirements, and the City is continuing discussions with County and State departments regarding permitting requirements for SMURRF to become a Title 22 permitted facility. Staff believes the timeframe could be 1-2 years depending on the requirements. Until such time when SMURRF water is authorized for indoor use, the project will utilize potable water for indoor toilet flushing.", "Bioswales", "Bioswales are landscape elements that allow for the collection, conveyance, filtration and infiltration of stormwater, in efforts to reduce contaminated stormwater runoff. In addition to satisfying the on-site stormwater requirements for the project, staff and the developer is exploring the feasibility of constructing a bioswale and infiltration system within the public right-of-way/sidewalk along the project\u2019s 5th Street and Broadway property frontage. In discussion with the City\u2019s Public Works Department, it was determined that the project would be responsible for the collection of approximately 1,720 cubic feet of stormwater runoff for percolation beneath 5th Street. However, the surface area (landscaping) needed to collect the desired capacity is limited based on the existing site conditions. Specifically, large existing ficus street trees are spread along 5th Street and Broadway that will be maintained, and include critical root zone radius boundaries where construction activity would either be limited (+/- 22 foot radius) or prohibited (+/-13 foot radius) to ensure preservation. These boundaries result in limited surface areas available in between the existing street trees. The parkway space would also include needs for parking meters, access between curb and sidewalk for people utilizing street parking, and potentially space for short-term bike parking. The overall sidewalk design would need to accommodate a variety of uses and therefore overall space is limited.", "With the many competing interests for space in the public right-of-way, bioswale designs will continue to be explored based on the site\u2019s conditions and evaluated against the function, aesthetics, and management of public streets. These will be guided by the development of a comprehensive streetscape manual, identified as a major action item in the draft DCP. In the event that soil percolation conditions make it impractical for the installation of a bioswale/infiltration system or if the City cannot identify an appropriate location on the project frontage for bioswales, the developer would provide an equitable fee of $205,000 to the City, sufficient to cover the design and construction of a similar system elsewhere in the City.", "Electric Vehicle Parking", "Developer shall in the parking garage provide panel capacity and conduit stubs for installation of electrical outlets designed to allow the simultaneous charging of a minimum number of 208/240 V 40 amp, grounded AC outlets of at least 10 percent (10%) of the total parking spaces (53) as shown on the Project Plans. In addition, the project would provide 3 of the spaces with electric charging equipment, as recommended by the Planning Commission.", "Significant Project Features", "In addition to the negotiated community benefits, there are project features that are otherwise required by the Municipal Code as further outlined in the Development Agreement, including the following:", "Private Developer Cultural Arts Requirement", "The project would provide on-site public art valued at approximately $1.2 M, and the process for approval would be consistent with the Private Developer Cultural Arts Requirement ordinance. The proposed on-site art would be reviewed and approved by the Director of the Community and Cultural Services Department, in coordination with the Arts Commission. This on-site provision would satisfy the Private Developer Cultural Arts Requirement for the project.", "Pending DA Items for Discussion", "Article 6.1: Architectural Review Board Approval", "The project is subject to review and approval by the ARB. This DA provision includes that the ARB cannot require modifications to the building design which negate the fundamental development standards established by this Agreement. Staff\u2019s recommendation prior to the Planning Commission hearing was for reductions in the project floor area limited to no greater than 5% for the entire project, consistent with recently approved Development Agreements. It is not the intent of this provision to facilitate arbitrary reductions in the project\u2019s floor area since the ARB\u2019s purview does not include modifications to the fundamental development standards established by the Agreement including number of stories, number of units, and overall height. Instead, providing the 5% discretion for the ARB provides flexibility to adjust the project design in the course of review of the project\u2019s ARB application.", "The Planning Commission concluded discussions on the provision with a recommendation of a floor area reduction of no greater than a 2% reduction in the ground floor commercial area and no greater than a 5% in upper residential floor. A Commissioner reiterated the intent of the provision to allow the ARB to have flexibility when reviewing the project, and a Commissioner believed the 5% for the upper residential floors could allow for any revisions to the building that may allow for improved variations in designs between the building forms. Another Commissioner commented that the size of the ground floor should be maintained for the potential market tenant. Staff is supportive of the Commission\u2019s recommendation. The applicant does not agree to this recommendation however considering the Planning Commission\u2019s comments, has revised their proposal from 2% to 3% specific for the residential floor area only. The applicant expresses concerns with additional reduction in floor area, considering the project\u2019s size has been reduced since float-up review, including reductions in floor area (4.5 to 4.0), and increased ground floor open space. This is one area where staff and the applicant have agreed to disagreed and as a result, both proposals or shown in the draft development agreement.", "Section 2.8.5(b) \u2013 SMURRF Water Usage", "While the applicant has generally agreed to the installation of purple pipe and using SMURRF water in the project, there are three details regarding the conditions precedent to using SMURRF water for residential and common area toilet flushing that staff and the applicant do not agree upon. The applicant has proposed the following:", "The applicant would like to ensure that if the project is required to use SMURRF water that they would not be unfairly penalized with higher rates than potable water. While the City currently charges lower rates for SMURRF water than potable water, staff could not agree to the applicant\u2019s proposal regarding non-potable water rates in the interest of not committing to potential rate increases in the future. Further, if there are statutory requirements that SMURRF water be sold at rates lower than potable water, the City would be required to comply and the DA provision is unnecessary.", "The applicant is concerned that because the project will be the first multi-family residential project in the City to commit to using SMURRF water for indoor toilet flushing, that there be assurance that any issues have been resolved through a 6-month demonstration project sponsored by the City. Staff believes that issues regarding water quality and safe use of SMURRF water in multi-family residential structures will be required to be demonstrated to the County before authorization for use of SMURRF water in multi-family residential buildings is granted. Therefore, staff does not recommend this provision.", "Similarly, the applicant would like the City to require other multi-family residential projects which have access to SMURRF to also install purple pipe in their projects. If this is done outside of a development agreement context, the City would be required to make local findings to impose a requirement more stringent than State law. There is no guarantee that these findings can be made and therefore, staff does not recommend this provision.", "Economic Analysis", "The City contracted The Natelson Dale Group, Inc. (TNDG) to prepare an economic study of the project consisting of a Value Enhancement Analysis and Fiscal Impact Analysis. The following is a summary of those analyses, which are attached to this report in Attachment I and J.", "Value Enhancement Analysis", "The premise of the value enhancement analysis is that additional building height and floor area above the baseline project would enhance the economic value of the site. For this project, the baseline project was defined as a Tier 1 project with a base height of 32 feet and 2.4 FAR, pursuant to the Interim Zoning Ordinance that requires a Development Agreement for projects exceeding 32 feet in height. To quantify the amount of this value enhancement, TNDG independently prepared a pro forma analyses, and estimated the difference in residual land values (estimated value less estimated construction costs) for the baseline project and the Proposed Project. TNDG estimates that the proposed project would provide a value enhancement of approximately $13.5 million over the value of the existing development. This analysis does not include the $6.4 million in monetary contributions or the value of the off-site affordable housing financing exceeding AHPP requirements.", "Fiscal Impact Analysis", "The project\u2019s fiscal impact to the City was evaluated, and measured in terms of revenue and cost impacts to the City\u2019s General Fund. The fiscal impact is calculated by subtracting the anticipated costs to the City generated by the project from the anticipated revenues (various taxes) generated by the project. On an annually recurring basis, the proposed project would result in annual revenue of approximately $227,365 per year to the City\u2019s General Fund.", "Environmental Analysis", "In accordance with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), an Environmental Impact Report (EIR) was prepared to determine the environmental effects of the proposed 500 Broadway Mixed-Use project, both individually and cumulatively. However, subsequent to the publication of the Draft EIR, the applicant elected to pursue development of a project that is substantively similar to Alternative 4, which was thoroughly described and analyzed in Chapter 5.0, Alternatives, of the EIR. As currently proposed, Alternative 4 would include demolition of the existing commercial building on the 500 Broadway site, and construction of 249 units consisting of 173 studios/one-bedrooms, 51 two-bedrooms, and 25 three-bedrooms with 64,526 square feet of commercial uses. The off-site affordable housing would be located at 1626 Lincoln Boulevard and would include 64 affordable housing units, comprised of 29 one-bedrooms, 16 two-bedrooms, and 17 three-bedrooms within a 55 foot building (FAR 2.75). The total number of units would be 313 units, which is less than the 332 units analyzed for Alternative 4. As analyzed in Chapter 5.0, Alternatives of the EIR, Alternative 4 would result in significant impacts in the areas of transportation/traffic impacts and sewer (cumulative only). The project, that is substantially similar to Alternative 4, is the project that was the basis for development agreement negotiations.", "In accordance with Section 15082 of the CEQA Guidelines, a Notice of Preparation was published on November 20, 2014 for a 30-day comment period which indicated the City\u2019s intent to prepare an EIR for the project. On September 28, 2015, a Notice of Completion and Public Availability was published for the Draft EIR, which commenced a 45-day public comment period. The areas studied in the Draft EIR include:", "\u00b7 Aesthetics/Shade & Shadow Effects", "\u00b7 Air Quality", "\u00b7 Construction Effects", "\u00b7 Cultural Resources and Historic Structures", "\u00b7 Geology and Soils", "\u00b7 Greenhouse Gas Emissions", "\u00b7 Hazards and Hazardous Materials", "\u00b7 Land Use and Planning", "\u00b7 Neighborhood Effects", "\u00b7 Noise", "\u00b7 Population and Housing", "\u00b7 Public Services", "\u00b7 Transportation/Traffic", "\u00b7 Utilities and Service Systems", "The Final EIR, which was published in February 2016, contains all comments and responses to comments received during the comment period as well as minor changes to the Draft EIR.", "The Draft EIR identified mitigation measures in the areas of Construction Effects, Cultural Resources (Archaeological Resources), Geology/Soils, Hazards and Hazardous Materials, Noise (Construction), Public Services (Fire and Police Protection Services), and Transportation/Traffic (Construction) to reduce potential impacts to less than significant levels. To ensure that these measures are properly enacted, a mitigation monitoring program is necessary and will be enforced during the construction and operation of the project, if approved. The proposed mitigation measures are provided in the Final EIR.", "Significant and Unavoidable Impacts", "For the previously proposed project, significant and unavoidable impact was identified in the area of Transportation/Traffic and cumulative impacts to Sewer and Utilities.", "Transportation/Traffic", "Operation of the proposed project would generate up to an estimated 199 net new AM peak hour trips, 308 net new PM peak hour trips, and 355 net new weekend peak hour trips. Although the project is a mixed use development located in the transit-rich Downtown District that also offers opportunities for walking and biking, the project would increase the number of vehicle trips traveling on the surrounding local street network. Based on the City\u2019s significance thresholds for intersections, the project would result in significant traffic impacts at 4 intersections during the Approval Year (2016); impacted intersections would include Palisades Beach Road (PCH) & California Incline (all peak hours), 4th Street & I-10 Eastbound On-ramp (weekend midday peak hour), Lincoln Boulevard & Colorado Avenue (AM peak hour), and Lincoln Boulevard & I-10 Westbound Off-ramp/ Olympic Boulevard (all peak hours). In addition, the proposed project would also create cumulatively considerable impacts at 5 intersections under the Future Year (2025), which includes the 4 intersections listed above and the intersection at Lincoln Boulevard & Santa Monica Boulevard (weekend midday peak hour). No feasible mitigation measures are available to reduce these impacts due to physical and policy constraints. Therefore, the proposed project would result in a significant and unavoidable impact to transportation and traffic.", "Sewer/Utilities", "The project would contribute to potentially significant and unavoidable cumulative impacts to wastewater utilities and infrastructure. Although the existing wastewater utilities would be able to accommodate the proposed project, the project would incrementally contribute to a cumulatively considerable increase from future projects in the City that may exceed the capacity of the sewer lines. Cumulative development may necessitate future upgrades to maintain adequate service capacity for existing and future development. As a result, there would be cumulative significant impacts to the sewer mains and therefore the project\u2019s wastewater flows would be considered a significant impact at the cumulative level. The City is anticipating preparation of a sewer model and completion of a Citywide Sewer Master Plan that would analyze the City\u2019s sewer system and identify any necessary upgrades. If this master plan is completed prior to the issuance of a building permit for the proposed project, Mitigation Measure U-1 would require that the project provide a fair share contribution to upgrade sewer service to the site in efforts to mitigate its impacts on the City\u2019s sewer system.", "Comments on the Draft EIR", "The Draft EIR was available for a 45-day public review period, during which a total of four comment letters were received. Two of the comment letters were from public agencies, one from a general member of the public, and one from the project applicant. The most substantive comment letter was from the project applicant, who provided mostly clarifying comments on the EIR. Responses to all comments received are included in the Final EIR.", "Alternatives Studied", "The EIR studied five alternatives to the originally proposed project, which are intended to reduce the significant environmental impacts of the project.", "\u00b7 Alternative 1 \u2013 No Project", "\u00b7 Alternative 2 \u2013 C3-C (Downtown Overlay) Zoning Compliant Alternative", "\u00b7 Alternative 3 \u2013 Draft Downtown Specific Plan Tier III Compliant Alternative", "\u00b7 Alternative 4 \u2013 Project with Offsite Affordable Housing Alternative", "\u00b7 Alternative 5 \u2013 32 foot Height Alternative", "Alternative 1 \u2013 No Project Alternative", "The No Project Alternative assumes the proposed project is not approved, and that the project site will remain in its current condition. The No Project Alternative would reduce the significant environmental impacts associated with the proposed project. However, the No Project Alternative would not satisfy any of the project objectives, and would not achieve the goals of the LUCE.", "Alternative 2 \u2013 C3-C (Downtown Overlay) Zoning Compliant Alternative", "Alternative 2 (the C3-C Zoning Compliant Alternative) would develop a mixed use project on the site consistent with the project site\u2019s former C3-C Downtown Overlay Zoning District standards. This alternative would reduce impacts through a reduction of the overall height, total floor area, and density of proposed development. Alternative 2 would consist of a 60-foot tall mixed use project totaling 191,696 sf with 52,648 sf of ground floor commercial uses and 139,048 sf of upper floor residential uses for a FAR of 3.5. Commercial uses would include a 37,834 sf grocery store, 12,814 sf of retail, and 2,000 sf of restaurant. Residential uses would include a total of 158 units, with a mix of 32 studios, 79 one-bedrooms, 31 two-bedrooms, and 16 three-bedrooms. This alternative would result in the same number of significantly impacted intersections as the proposed project. Feasible mitigation is not available to address these impacts. This alternative would not meet many of the Project objectives or achieve LUCE consistency and implementation to the same extent.", "Alternative 3 \u2013 Draft Downtown Specific Plan Tier III Compliant Alternative", "Alternative 3 (Draft DSP Tier III Compliant Alternative) would consist of an 84-foot mixed use project totaling 265,977 sf with 61,699 sf of commercial uses and 204,278 sf of upper floor residential uses for a FAR of 4.0. Commercial uses would include 24,850 sf of restaurant, 24,850 sf of retail, and 12,000 sf of fitness center uses. In efforts to study a range of alternatives, a grocery store which is the highest trip generating use in the proposed project, would not be included in Alternative 3. Residential uses would include a total of 232 units, with a mix of 46 studios, 116 one-bedrooms, 47 two-bedrooms, and 23 three-bedrooms. As compared to the proposed project, the total floor area of Alternative 3 would be reduced by 50,679 sf or 16 percent. In terms of the uses, Alternative 3 represents a 17.8 percent reduction in residential floor area and 30 fewer units than the project, and an 11.8 percent decrease in commercial uses. This alternative would meet all the proposed requirements of the Draft DSP, including FAR, building height, floor plate ratios, parking standards, and ground floor open space standards. Under the Draft DSP, the project site lies within the Transit Adjacent Zone, which promotes increased activity near transit to minimize new automobile trips in the City. The Draft DSP permits development of 84 feet in height with a maximum FAR of 4.0 in the Transit Adjacent Zone. This alternative would result in the same number of significantly impacted intersections as the proposed project. Feasible mitigation is not available to address these impacts. Without the grocery store, Alternative 3 would not achieve project objectives to the same extent as the project or meet LUCE policies and goals. This includes the objective to enhance the Downtown through a \u201ccomplete neighborhood\u201d and minimize traffic impacts by providing neighborhood-serving retail uses. If Alternative 3 had a grocery component, however, it would increase auto trips generated, part of the challenging trade-offs involved in Downtown infill development.", "Alternative 4 \u2013 Project with Offsite Affordable Housing Alternative", "The Offsite Affordable Housing Alternative (Alternative 4) assumes development of the proposed project (as proposed at 500 Broadway) plus the provision of offsite affordable housing in the Downtown. Under this alternative, the proposed project\u2019s affordable housing requirements (as determined by the Development Agreement) would be met either fully or partially through the provision of offsite affordable housing units. Accordingly, this alternative assumes that up to 70 multi-family affordable housing units would be developed on up to 2 single lots (approximately 7,500 sf each) or one larger site (approximately 15,000 sf) within the Downtown area only. Limiting the potential location of the offsite affordable units to the Downtown area would ensure that LUCE goals for affordable housing in proximity to transit would be achieved with this alternative. The 500 Broadway project, as currently proposed, is consistent with this project alternative.", "The EIR specifically identifies 1626 Lincoln Boulevard as a site for the off-site affordable housing project, and analyzed this alternative to a project level of detail. This 28,070 sf site is located in the Downtown and currently developed a with a single-story 8,906 sf building for automotive repair and painting uses, including approximately 15 automotive service bays. However, to provide for a conservative traffic analysis, the EIR does not take credit for the trips associated with the existing automotive repair uses.", "Alternative 4 assumed development of the offsite affordable housing development(s) within a multi-story building with ground floor commercial uses and upper level residential uses. The structure(s) would have a height up to 76 feet and 2 to 3 levels of subterranean parking. Under this alternative, the project would develop 70 deed-restricted offsite affordable residential units. The offsite affordable housing would provide a mix of studios, one-bedrooms, two-bedrooms, and three-bedrooms. For purposes of studying the most conservative (greatest) level of impacts, a combination of 49 two-bedroom units and 21 three-bedroom units is assumed for this alternative. Additionally, up to 4,000 sf of ground-floor commercial uses are assumed for the project site. This alternative would result in additional intersection impacts, which include Ocean Avenue & Colorado Boulevard (weekday midday peak for Approval and Future Year conditions), 4th Street & I-10 Eastbound Off-Ramp (PM peak hour for Approval Year and Future Year conditions); and the Lincoln Boulevard & the I-10 Westbound Off-Ramp (AM peak hour and weekend midday peak hour for Future Year Conditions). Feasible mitigation is not available to address these impacts.", "Alternative 5 \u2013 32 foot Height Alternative", "Alternative 5 (the 32-Foot Height Alternative) would consist of a 32-foot tall mixed use project totaling 157,680 sf with 55,924 sf of ground floor commercial uses and 101,756 sf of upper floor residential uses for a FAR of 2.3. Commercial uses would include a 31,317 sf grocery store, 22,929 sf of retail, and 1,678 sf of restaurant. Residential uses would include a total of 105 units, with a mix of 10 studios, 66 one-bedrooms, 25 two-bedrooms, and 4 three-bedrooms. As compared to the proposed project, this alternative would result in 157 fewer units than the project, a 60 percent reduction in residential uses. This alternative would also reduce commercial floor area by 18 percent or 12,169 sf and would not include a mezzanine. This alternative would only partially meet project objectives with reduced provision of affordable housing and lower levels of employment, economic and fiscal benefits and with diminished LUCE consistency.", "Environmentally Superior Alternative", "In general, the environmentally superior alternative as defined by CEQA should minimize adverse impacts to the project site and its surrounding environment. Of the alternatives considered, the \"No Project/No Project Alternative\u201d does not create any new impacts; therefore, it is environmentally superior to a project, which proposes to change existing conditions.", "However, CEQA Guidelines section 15126.6 states that if the environmentally superior alternative is the No Project Alternative, the EIR shall also identify an environmentally superior alternative from among the other alternatives. Therefore, because hazards, cultural resources, traffic, noise, and air quality impacts would be reduced the greatest under the Alternative 5, this alternative is considered to be the environmentally superior alternative over other alternatives that may have fewer impacts in more resource areas. This Alternative, however, would not achieve many of the project objectives. It also raises an inherent shortcoming of conventional CEQA analysis since analysis of where else housing units would be developed goes unaddressed. Just as a \u201cno project\u201d alternative fails to account for the need for additional market and affordable housing in both the local area and the larger region, a down-sized project leaves out the impacts of those units being built elsewhere \u2013 or the social and economic impacts of units not being built at all.", "Statement of Overriding Considerations", "Due to the significant and unavoidable impacts of Alternative 4 (the currently proposed project) with respect to Transportation/Traffic, approval of Alternative 4 will require the City Council to adopt a Statement of Overriding Considerations. The benefits of the Alternative 4 have been discussed earlier in this staff report and have been incorporated into the Council resolution adopting the Statement of Overriding Considerations and Mitigation Monitoring Program should the Council determine that an override is appropriate. With respect to the anticipated Transportation/Traffic impact, the proximity of the project site to the Expo light rail terminus station and the Colorado Esplanade are important considerations. The project would provide transit-adjacent housing and neighborhood-serving commercial uses in proximity to Expo and other transit opportunities, convenient for residents to use alternate modes of transportation. In addition, the development agreement includes a Transportation Demand Management (TDM) Program that is based on increasing transportation choice, a core strategy for the City to achieve the long-term citywide goal of No Net New PM Peak Period Trips. The TDM program requires a transportation allowance be offered to all tenants residents and employees in the project to provide options for commute and non-commute trips. The program also includes a PM-period trip cap and AVR targets with financial penalties for non-compliance. Furthermore, the project includes a comprehensive community benefits package including but not limited to, affordable housing, physical improvements, monetary contributions, and sustainable elements,", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific actions are required in the future. Based on the fiscal impact analysis provided by The Natelson Dale Group, Inc. (TNDG), approval of the proposed project, on an annually recurring basis, would result in revenue of approximately $227,365 per year to the City\u2019s General Fund.", "In addition, the project would provide one-time monetary contributions in an amount of $6.4 million in the form of community benefits that the applicant will be required to provide pursuant to the proposed development agreement:", "\u00a7 Enhanced Transportation Impact fee contribution in the amount of $1,650,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04267.402050.", "\u00a7 Enhanced Parks and Recreation fee contribution in the amount of $1,700,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04501.408710.", "\u00a7 Enhanced Affordable Housing Commercial Linkage fee contribution in the amount of $325,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04264.408690.", "\u00a7 Early Childhood Initiatives contribution in the amount of $1,100,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04262.408760.", "\u00a7 Historic Preservation contribution in the amount of $150,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04266.409240.", "\u00a7 Big Blue Bus contribution in the amount of $240,000 to be deposited in a revenue account 41642.410080.", "\u00a7 Transportation Management Association contribution in the amount of $150,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04267.402840.", "\u00a7 Recycled Water Infrastructure Program contribution in the amount of $1,200,000 to be deposited in revenue account 04226.408750.", "\u00a7 Treated Urban Runoff distribution main (SMURRF) extension contribution in the amount of $200,000 to be deposited in a new special revenue account to be created."]}], [{"Title": "Office Space Lease at 2772 and 2800 Donald Douglass Loop North, and Second Modification to Professional Services Agreement No.10248 (CCS) for Commercial Real Estate Leasing Services for the Santa Monica Airport", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Council 1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Lease with Snapchat, Inc. (Snapchat) for office space located at 2772 and 2800 Donald Douglas Loop North, and 8 hangars, reflecting the general terms and conditions below.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to professional services agreement No.10248 (CCS) in the amount of $744,844 with Corporate Realty Group (\u201cCRG\u201d), a California-based corporation, to provide additional commercial real estate leasing services for the Santa Monica Airport. This will result in a (3) three-year amended agreement expiring on June 30, 2018 for a total amount not to exceed $1,104,834 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with the recently adopted Santa Monica Airport (SMO) Leasing Policy, the City is moving forward with leasing city-owned properties, including those that were formerly the subject of subleases. The City owns the two office buildings located at 2772 and 2800 Donald Douglas Loop North and eight hangars. The combined square footage is as follows: 2772 Donald Douglas has 47,343 and 2800 Donald Douglas has 23,130, for a total of 70,473. The eight hangars are small and total 8,900 square feet. Snapchat is an innovator in the creative space realm, with a specialty in image messaging. The proposed lease agreement with Snapchat is for a period of five years, with an option for an additional five year period. The base rent at full occupancy begins at $3.07 per square foot and includes an annual escalator of 3%.", "A real estate commission fee of $804,834 based on 5% of the value of the total 5-year lease term, would be due to Corporate Realty Group (CRG) for the proposed lease agreement should the lease be executed on July 1, 2016 The commission would exceed the funding currently authorized in CRG\u2019s agreement No. 10248(CCS) with the City. Staff anticipates the use of CRG to negotiate additional lease agreements at the Airport during FY2016-17 and FY2017-18. The anticipated commissions through June 30, 2018 would be in an amount not-to-exceed $1,104,834.", "Background", "On June 9, 2015 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a month-to-month lease with Milstein Adelman LLP for 23,130 square feet on the second and third floors at 2800 Donald Douglas Loop North and a three year lease agreement with Volkswagen Group of America (Volkswagen) for 43,471 square feet of office space and 8,900 square feet of hangar space at 2772 Donald Douglas Loop North. Milstein Adelman LLP vacated the premises in December 2015. Volkswagen gave notice that it will be vacating the premises at 2772 Donald Douglas Loop North on December 31, 2016.", "On February 9, 2016 (Attachment B), the City approved a first modification to increase Agreement No.10248 (CCS) with CRG by $180,000 expiring on June 30, 2016 with two annual renewals of $50,000, for a total agreement amount not to exceed $359,990 to provide assistance to City staff in negotiating leases for properties located at Santa Monica Airport, including brokerage services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.", "Discussion", "In April, 2016 CRG notified staff that it had an offer from Snapchat to lease the subject property. Snapchat is an innovator in the creative space realm, with a specialty in image messaging. Snapchat is currently headquartered in Venice, California. Due to significant growth, Snapchat seeks additional office space in Santa Monica. Snapchat proposes to lease both buildings, with a combined square footage of 70,473 for five years, plus eight small abutting hangars for a period of five years plus one option of five years.", "It should be noted that the subject buildings were and/or are currently occupied by office users, (attorneys and auto designers) hence there is no change in use. Although Snapchat will modify the building with minor interior tenant improvements, Snapchat does not propose to expand the buildings. Accordingly, the proposed project is exempt from CEQA pursuant to CEQA Guidelines Section 15301. Additionally, the proposed project is exempt pursuant to CEQA Guidelines Section 15061(b)(3) in that it can been seen with certainty that the proposed project does not have the potential to significantly impact the environment, since the new and existing uses are largely the same. Snapchat will employ approximately 300 workers on site. Therefore, it should be noted that Snapchat will be subject to the transportation demand management (TDM) requirements of the City in order to address, any transportation and/or parking management issues. Moreover, Snapchat would be required to comply with all city building code regulations, planning standards, and any applicable FAA regulation, as a condition of the lease. Finally, the lease is consistent with the terms of the voter-approved Measure LC passed in 2014 to regulate future use of SMO property.", "At full occupancy, the rent shall be $3.07 per square foot, and includes a 3% annual escalation provision. Annual rent paid by Snapchat to the City will be approximately between $2.9M and $3.2M, depending on the year. The proposed rent reflects a market price. Securing this major tenant helps ensure the Airport Fund\u2019s financial self-sufficiency and allow it to repay its $13M debt obligation to the City.", "Additionally, Snapchat has agreed to spend at least $1.4M in tenant improvements in the two buildings. Any improvements undertaken by Snapchat will revert to the City at the conclusion of the lease term. If Snapchat installs the required tenant improvements, the City will provide a rent credit equal to five months of rent.", "Commencement Date:", "Upon execution of Lease Document", "Term Ends:", "January 31, 2022 or 67 months from the date of lease execution.", "Options", "One five-year option at Fair Market Value", "Base Rental Rate", "Rent and absorption of the premises shall be in accordance with the following schedule (includes a three percent annual increase).", "Execution Date \u2013 December 2016:  $69,390.00 / month or $3.00/SF Modified Gross \u2013 23,130 SF", "January 2017 \u2013 December 2017:  $243,866.90 / month or $3.07SF Modified Gross.", "January 2018 \u2013 December 2018:   $251,182.91 / month or $3.16/SF Modified Gross", "January 2019 \u2013 December 2019: $258,718.39/ month or $3.26 SF Modified Gross", "January 2020 \u2013 December 2020:  $266,479.95/ month or $3.36/SF Modified Gross", "January 2021 \u2013 December 2021:  $274,474.34/ month or $3.46/SF Modified Gross", "January 2022  $282,708.57/ month or $3.56/SF Modified Gross", "Escalations", "3% per year starting January 2018. Parking is not subject to escalators.", "Tenant Improvement Allowance", "Tenant shall receive a rent credit that is equivalent to Five (5) Months\u2019 rent, with one month payable on January of each year, for a total of ($1,402,784.99)", "Parking at full occupancy", "133 parking spaces at $150 per month equals to $19,950 per month.", "Modification to CRG Contract", "Should the proposed lease be approved and executed, the real estate commission fee due to CRG would exceed the current amount authorized in the City\u2019s Agreement No. 10248(CCS). CRG\u2019s real estate commission fee is based on 5 percent of the initial 67 months term. The commission for this proposed lease is estimated to be $804,834.", "Staff anticipates CRG will negotiate additional leases in FY 2016-17 and FY 2017-18. Staff anticipates $150,000 in commissions to be paid in each of the fiscal years.", "Therefore, staff recommends a second modification to increase the professional services agreement with CRG by $744,844 for a total agreement amount not to exceed $1,104,834 expiring on June 30, 2018 for additional commercial lease brokerage and negotiation services for the Santa Monica Airport.", "It should be noted should Snapchat exercise its option to renew for an additional five-year lease at fair market value, the City would have a future commission obligation to CRG. This obligation would be based on 3% of the value of the total lease term for years six through ten.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The recommended lease with Snapchat Inc. will generate an estimated $1,782,225 in Airport revenues for FY2016-17, at account 33431.402120.Revenue increases associated with the new lease agreements will be included in the FY2016-17 Proposed Budget and FY 2017-19 Proposed Biennial Budget.", "The agreement modification to be awarded to CRG is $744,844 for an amended agreement total not to exceed $1,104,834. In addition to the current budget of $259,990, award of the agreement modification requires an appropriation of $844,844 from the Airport Fund to account 33431.555060 in FY 2015-16.", "Prepared by:", "Nelson Hernandez, Senior Advisor to the City Manager"]}], [{"Title": "Public Hearing and Approval of the Proposed FY 2016-17 One-Year Action Plan Allocating Federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and HOME Investment Partnerships Act Program (HOME) Entitlement Grant Funds", "Department": "Human Services (CCS)", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and approve the Proposed FY2016-17 One-Year CDBG and HOME Action Plan (Attachment A). 2. Authorize the City Manager to submit all documents required to receive the City\u2019s annual Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnerships Act (HOME) entitlement grant funds to the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "To receive CDBG and HOME grant funds, the City must submit a Council-approved One-Year Action Plan to HUD prior to May 15, 2016. The Action Plan outlines how the funds will be expended and confirms that the funded activities are consistent with the City\u2019s Five-Year Consolidated Plan adopted by Council on May 12, 2015 (Attachment B). The FY2016-17 One-Year Action Plan proposes goals, activities and specific allocations for $2.2M in CDBG and HOME funds for capital projects, public service programs, tenant-based rental assistance and program administration.", "Additionally, staff proposes the programming of $187,000 in FY2016-17 CDBG and HOME program income to support new and on-going eligible CDBG projects identified in the Proposed FY2016-17 Action Plan. The FY2016-17 entitlement allocations reflect a two percent increase to CDBG and a three percent increase to HOME allocation funding levels from FY2015-16. Specific appropriations of these funds have been included in the Proposed FY2016-17 Exception Based Budget and Proposed FY2016-18 Biennial CIP Budget. The allocations will advance Council-adopted City\u2019s Strategic Goals related to community diversity, mobility and addressing homelessness.", "Background", "On April 10, 2015, the City\u2019s Proposed Consolidated Plan and Action Plan were made available to the public for community review. The goal of the HUD-required Consolidated Plan is to identify community needs, establish housing and community development strategies, and create a set of objectives to guide Federal funding decisions over five fiscal years (FY 2015-16 to FY 2019-20).", "The One-Year Action Plan details goals and activities and proposes allocation of CDBG and HOME funds for FY 2016-17. Each year, the City submits a One-Year Action Plan to HUD that serves as a status report to the Five-Year Consolidated Plan and details the proposed activities to be funded with CDBG and HOME funds in the coming year. Pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.68.050, the City has adopted a public comment process, which requires two public hearings prior to the adoption of a Consolidated Plan and Action Plan. The first public hearing was conducted as part of the Financial Status Update at the January 26, 2016 Council Meeting (Attachment C). This public hearing, on May 10, 2016 will complete this requirement.", "Discussion", "The Proposed FY2016-17 Action Plan details proposed program funding allocations for CDBG and HOME funds to address the high-priority needs identified in the City\u2019s 2015-19 Consolidated Plan and the Council-adopted City Strategic Goals. Santa Monica\u2019s key objectives for the FY2016-17 funding period include:", "Maintaining an inclusive and diverse community", "\u00b7 Expanding housing opportunities for low-income households through an increase in the supply of decent, safe, and affordable housing and rental assistance;", "\u00b7 Focus on assisting persons to develop skill sets and linking these persons to actual jobs once training is complete; and", "\u00b7 Improving accessibility for persons with disabilities and seniors; and completing improvements to infrastructure including broadband for affordable housing buildings serving priority needs populations.", "Taking a leadership role in regional efforts to address homelessness", "\u00b7 Supporting efforts to help homeless or near-homeless Santa Monica residents secure adequate temporary and permanent housing and receive necessary supportive services.", "Establishing a new model for mobility", "\u00b7 Installation of street lighting to enhance safety, promote walking and facilitate access to transit.", "Both funding sources benefit residents with special needs and incomes at or below 80% of area median income (low and moderate income). The City\u2019s total CDBG and HOME entitlement for FY 2016-17 will be $1.5 million, reflecting a two percent increase in program and administrative revenues from FY 2015-16. The City will also program $593,275 in prior year unallocated entitlement funds and an additional $187,000 in anticipated program income resulting from loan repayments based upon affordable housing loans provided using entitlement funds. Program income will be used to support eligible housing activities. The FY 2016-17 funding allocations include:", "\u00b7 CDBG: $1,027,760 in new entitlement funds, $593,275 in prior year unallocated entitlement funds and $87,000 in projected program income funds for capital projects, public service and administration activities. The CDBG entitlement award for FY2016-17 reflects a two percent increase of $17,267 from FY2015-16.", "\u00b7 HOME: $437,086 in new entitlement funds and $100,000 in program income for tenant-based rental assistance and administration. The HOME entitlement award for FY2016-17 reflects a three percent increase of $12,873 from FY2015-16.", "The increase to the CDBG and HOME entitlement programs has resulted in increased funding available to support housing, public facility improvements, and administrative reimbursement. Due to federal spending limitations, a maximum of 15 percent of CDBG expenditures may be allocated to nonprofit organizations for public service support operating grants. As a result of the FY2016-17 entitlement increase, there will be no cuts to public service activities that address and prevent homelessness by providing support services to low-income households, including people experiencing homeless or at high risk of homelessness, people living with disabilities and the frail elderly. This increase also maintains the City\u2019s capacity to fund eligible capital improvement projects moving forward. Any cuts to future allocations would erode the City\u2019s social safety net, and limit capital improvements to low-income areas and public facilities. City staff will continue to monitor HUD\u2019s 2017 Budget and beyond to identify potential impacts to future entitlement allocations.", "Public Outreach", "The Proposed One-Year Action Plan was available for a 30-day public review from April 1, 2016 to April 30, 2016. Staff will incorporate changes based on the public comments and Council discussion of the Action Plan scheduled on May 10th. The Council approved Action Plan must be submitted to HUD no later than May15,2016.", "Public Hearing", "Pursuant to Municipal Code Section 2.68.050, the City has adopted a public comment process which requires two public hearings prior to the adoption of a Consolidated Plan and Action Plan. The public meeting held on January 26, 2016 and this Public Hearing, on May 10, 2016, will satisfy the two meeting requirement to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY2016-17 Action Plan.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Staff projections for these awards have been included in various account numbers as part of the City\u2019s Proposed FY2016-17 Exception Based Budget and FY2016-18 Biennial CIP Budget. HUD\u2019s submission requirements for the CDBG and HOME Action Plan precede the City Council\u2019s approval of the City\u2019s Budget."]}], [{"Title": "Adoption of a Resolution Setting Public Parking Rates", "Department": "Parking Operations (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Adopt the attached resolution establishing new parking rates for the Civic Center parking facilities, restricting permit eligibility to discourage park and ride, and make minor changes to address operational needs, and2) Provide input on the proposed administrative fee increase.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "With Expo operations commencing on May 20, 2016, minor operational measures are recommended to prevent daily park and ride activity. In addition, rates at the Civic Center are recommended to be increased to address high weekday occupancies, which are typically above 90% by noon on weekdays. Staff is also requesting input from the Council on a potential administrative increase of parking rates in the Downtown.", "While the full impact of Expo operations on public parking in the Downtown and Civic Center areas remains to be seen, these measures will address current conditions and forestall daily park and ride activity. Staff plans to monitor parking occupancies over the course of the first year of service to inform a study and broader policy discussion at that time.", "Background", "Parking in Santa Monica is a limited resource, in high demand, and has been the subject of multiple studies and reports over the past decade, which have resulted in a number of changes to parking policies. The Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) provides policy guidance for parking management, including Policy T26.6: \u201cUse parking pricing as a tool to manage congestion.\u201d The LUCE suggests managing parking in Santa Monica as the limited resource it is and ensuring that adequate parking is available for residents, employees, and visitors. It sets a target threshold of 15% parking availability at all times and provides various strategies to employ in achieving this target.", "On and off-street public parking rates were last amended by Council on July 10, 2012 concurrent with the demolition and reconstruction of Parking Structure 6, which included:", "\u2022 Decreasing parking rates at the Civic Center and the Main Library due to the low occupancy and peripheral location to the downtown core", "\u2022 Eliminating the Downtown evening flat rate", "\u2022 Increasing on-street parking meter rates Citywide", "\u2022 Reducing the free period in Downtown structures from 120 to 90 minutes", "These modifications were informed by a parking rate study conducted by Walker Parking Consultants in 2012 (Attachment A). The study recommended \u201cmaking rate changes at least once per year, if not more frequently\u201d (8).", "The February 2016 Draft Downtown Community Plan contains goals and policies to further the Council\u2019s strategic initiative of establishing a new model for mobility, including Policy AM3.6: \u201cUse parking pricing, concentration, and location as tools to manage vehicle congestion in Downtown.\u201d The Plan emphasizes sustainability, safety, and a focus on moving as many people as possible given the space constraints of an urban environment. A key component of this strategy is managing parking through pricing.", "Staff conducted a study session with the Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) Board of Directors on January 27, 2016 and the Planning Commission on April 6, 2016. Feedback from each body is incorporated herein.", "Discussion", "Parking in the Downtown and Civic Center areas is utilized by many various users, including residents, employees, beachgoers, Santa Monica High School (Samohi) staff and students, and short term visitors who come to Santa Monica for City and Court services, dining, shopping, entertainment, business meetings, special events, and the Farmers Market. The full impact of Expo on parking demand will evolve over time as these diverse users have time to incorporate light rail into their travel choices. Some current drivers will switch to Expo, while others may desire to park in the Downtown or Civic Center areas and then ride Expo to other locations in the region, also known as park and ride. Daily park and ride activity is not preferred because it has the potential to add new vehicle trips to Santa Monica streets (assuming that the driver\u2019s commute would otherwise not travel through Santa Monica) while also using a parking space for several hours by someone not working at or patronizing destinations in Santa Monica.", "Staff will evaluate impacts and continuously monitor parking occupancies closely once Expo opens. Staff is submitting a request with the FY 2017-19 biennial budget to fund a comprehensive parking study. Staff is also beginning this process in coordination with DTSM to conduct intercept surveys in the downtown and Civic Center area before Expo operations begin, and will begin utilizing existing monitoring tools. However, in light of the May 20, 2016 inauguration of Expo light rail service, and the increased usage of the Civic Center structure and surface lot, minor operational modifications are necessary to further Council\u2019s strategic initiative to establish a new model for mobility in Santa Monica, and to leverage the significant opportunity that Expo represents. Staff is attempting to balance a \u201cwait and see\u201d approach with a proactive approach by recommending a set of narrow actions to address more immediate operational issues already identified or which are in keeping with Council objectives.", "Downtown Parking Rates", "As supported by adopted City policy, parking price is one of the most effective ways to motivate motorists to consider other transportation modes. Stagnant parking rates, coupled with inflation and historically low gas prices, do little to encourage the consideration\u2014and ultimately the use\u2014of active modes of transportation. The transportation options in Santa Monica have improved greatly since 2012, including the launch of Breeze Bike Share, Big Blue Bus - The Evolution of Blue, the continued build-out of the City\u2019s bike network, the launch of the City\u2019s car share pilot program, and the forthcoming launch of Expo. Maintaining current prices will not leverage the City\u2019s substantial investments in this arena. To maximize the accessibility of the City\u2019s Downtown, reduce auto trips, and leverage the strong investment and commitment the City has made to transit and active modes of transportation, staff is inclined to pursue the administrative rate increases afforded by Section 17 of Resolution 10889. This section authorizes the City Manager to increase or decrease transient (daily) and monthly parking rates based on occupancy, comparable location surveys, and relationship to adjacent parking facilities.", "Downtown public parking rates have remained constant since 2012, while weekday daily maximums at a sampling of privately owned public parking facilities in the neighborhood have increased by an average of 12%. Attachment B contains a map of weekday daily maximum rates in Downtown Santa Monica at publically available parking facilities. If this trend continues, increasing numbers of users could elect to park in City facilities, overburdening them while privately-operated locations become underutilized. This could have the effect of creating the perception that there is a lack of parking inventory, while private facilities go underutilized.", "While this increase can be made administratively, because of the lapse in time since the last increase and the recent turnover of parking staff, staff seeks input from Council to determine whether the increase is appropriate at this time. The proposed fee schedule, which incorporates feedback from DTSM and the Planning Commission is proposed to be adjusted as follows:", "Parking Structures 1 through 9 and Ken Edwards Center", "Transient (25% increase allowed)", "Duration", "Current", "Proposed", "First 90 minutes", "Free", "No change[1]", "Next 60 minutes", "$1", "+$.25 = $1.25", "Each additional 30 minutes", "$1.50", "+$.35[2] = $1.85", "Daily maximum", "$14", "+$3.5 = $17.50", "Monthly (10% increase allowed)", "Type", "Current", "Proposed", "All access", "$160", "+$16 = $176", "Weekday only", "$120", "+$12 = $132", "Weeknights/weekends only", "$75", "+$7.50 = $82.50", "Affordable housing", "$65", "No change[3]", "Parking Structure 10 and Downtown Lots 27-30", "Transient (25% increase allowed)", "Duration", "Current", "Proposed", "Each 30 minutes", "$1", "+$.25 = $1.25", "Daily maximum", "$14", "+$3.50 = $17.50", "Monthly (10% increase allowed)", "Type", "Current", "Proposed", "Weekday only", "$120", "+$12 = $132", "Weeknights/weekends only", "$75", "+$7.50 = $82.50", "Parking rates at the Main Library parking structure and lot are not proposed to be changed at this time as occupancies at this facility are lower than the rest of the Downtown structures and lots. Further, as this facility is located on the eastern edge of downtown, the Draft Downtown Community Plan suggests that rates should be lower in comparison to incentivize patrons to park on the edge of the Downtown neighborhood and walk to their destination. The proposed rate changes might result in increased occupancies at the Library, so staff will monitor the situation closely and make adjustments administratively as conditions require.", "Civic Center Parking Rates", "The first 30 minutes of parking at the Civic Center parking structure and surface lot are free, and each additional hour is $1. The daily maximum is $5, with a $3 daily maximum rate available to those purchasing pre-paid debit cards. When rates were last changed by Council in July 2012, the Civic Center area was perceived by many as disconnected from the rest of Downtown and thus seen as a peripheral parking option to the Downtown core. Now, in addition to preexisting offices, hotels, government offices, and Samohi, the area has a more diverse set of land uses including Tongva Park, restaurants, and multi-family housing. As a result, and combined with inexpensive parking rates, weekday occupancies in the lot and structure are much higher than in the past. While average hourly occupancies in the Civic parking structure in July 2012 were rarely higher than 60%, they were frequently above 80% in July 2015, and currently reach 100% most weekdays. Patterns in the surface lot are similar. It was this low occupancy that resulted in the reduction of the daily maximum to be reduced by 50% from $10 to $5.", "In addition to the parking demand generated by the new land uses in the Civic Center area, the parking facilities are further impacted by the prices charged by nearby privately-owned public parking facilities. Daily maximum parking rates within a short walk of these facilities range from $15 at the Le M\u00e9ridien Delfina to as high as $42 at the Viceroy Hotel. Attachment C includes daily maximum parking rates in the Civic Center area.", "Demand will likely be further impacted by the opening of the Expo station at 4th Street and Colorado Avenue. While prices in the Downtown should discourage park-and-ride activity, $3 to $5 weekday daily maximums in the Civic Center might actively encourage this behavior. As a result, staff recommends aligning rates at the Civic with the current Downtown structures fee schedule, without increasing the free period from the current 30 minutes.", "Civic Center Parking Structure and Surface Lot", "Transient\u2014Weekdays", "Current", "Recommended", "Free period", "30 minutes", "No change", "Payment increments", "Each additional hour is $1", "Next hour is $1, each additional 30 minutes is $1.50", "Daily maximum", "$5 (or $3 for debit card holders)", "$14", "Staff originally considered increasing the free period to 90 minutes so that the fee schedule would be consistent with the Downtown structures. In response to Planning Commission feedback however, staff recommends maintaining the current 30 minutes free period. The following chart provides a comparison of rates a parker would pay for each 30 minute increment Monday through Friday.", "Length of Stay", "Current Rate", "90 minutes free (Original proposal)", "30 minutes free (Recommendation)", "0:30", "Free", "Free", "Free", "1:00", "$1", "Free", "$1", "1:30", "$1", "Free", "$1", "2:00", "$2", "$1", "$2.50", "2:30", "$2", "$1", "$4", "3:00", "$3", "$2.50", "$5.50", "3:30", "$3", "$4", "$7", "4:00", "$4", "$5.50", "$8.50", "4:30", "$4", "$7", "$10", "5:00", "$5", "$8.50", "$11.50", "5:30", "-", "$10", "$13", "6:00", "-", "$11.50", "$14", "6:30", "-", "$13", "-", "7:00", "-", "$14", "-", "Under the current fee schedule, the daily maximum is reached after five hours of parking, compared to seven hours under the original proposal which would have extended the free period to 90 minutes. The staff recommendation is to maintain the current 30 minutes free, which results in the daily maximum being reached at hour six.", "Contrary to weekdays, the Civic Center parking facilities are underused on weekends when the Courthouse, Samohi, and most City offices are closed. To better use the Civic parking resources and further the peripheral parking strategy outlined in the Draft Downtown Community Plan, staff recommends maintaining the $5 daily maximum on weekends. A parker would reach the $5 daily maximum on Saturday or Sunday after four hours under the original proposal with 90 minutes free, with the $5 daily maximum being reached after three hours under the staff recommendation which would maintain the 30 minutes free period.", "Staff recommends raising monthly keycard rates to be consistent with the current Downtown rates (prior to the proposed administrative increase). Based on feedback from the Planning Commission and various stakeholders who expressed that a 146% increase was too high all at once, staff recommends staggering the increase to provide ample notice to customers. If adopted, the first increase of 50% would occur on January 1, 2017. A second increase of 64% would occur on July 1, 2017 to coincide with the new fiscal year. Any new keycard accounts established during this transition would be charged $160 per month.", "Type", "Current", "Original Suggestion", "Recommendation", "All access", "$65", "$160 effective Oct 1, 2016", "$97.50 effective Jan 1, 2017,", "$160 effective July 1, 2017", "Weeknights and weekends only", "$50", "$75 effective Oct 1, 2016", "$75 effective Jan 1, 2017", "While the overall increase is substantial, it is necessary to ensure parking availability in the Civic, in light of the fact that the Civic parking facility is already at capacity during weekdays. Furthermore, continuing to offer a monthly keycard for only $65, while a monthly Metro EZ Transit Pass costs $110, is inconsistent with adopted policy and will not further Council\u2019s strategic initiative to establish a new model for mobility in Santa Monica.", "Monthly Keycards", "Ninety-six percent of the 4,517 keycards issued to the Downtown Structures, Civic, and Library are associated with a business account. The remaining 4% are either area residents or employees purchasing their own keycards. Upon the opening of Expo, even with the recommended rate increases herein, monthly keycards could be appealing to park and ride users. To prevent the use of keycards for park and ride, staff recommends limiting Downtown, Library, and Civic keycard sales to Downtown and Civic Center employers, employees and residents of buildings without on-site parking. Existing keycard holders would be provided with a three month grace period to submit the required proof of current employment or residency before their account would be suspended.", "Staff also recommends assigning downtown keycards to one or two parking structures. Currently, Downtown keycards grant access to Parking Structures 1-6 and 9. However, few users take advantage of the flexibility afforded by this option. For example, in January 2016, 92% of keycards were used in only one location, while another 7% were used in only two locations. By assigning keycards to locations which are underutilized, staff will be able to free up space for transient parkers in parking structures that often have high occupancies, such as Parking Structures 1 and 3. Every effort will be made to assign keycard holders to the structure they are currently utilizing most frequently. Additionally, the attached resolution includes a provision authorizing staff to offer a monthly volume discount of up to 20% for up to one year to accounts of 50 or more keycards to facilitate the distribution of parkers to facilities that are underutilized.", "Parking Rates Resolution", "Additional minor changes have been made to the resolution to address operational needs: to establish clear eligibility boundaries for Main Street Employee permits, to limit parking fee refunds at the Sunday morning Main Street Farmers Market to one per person per day, to clarify that Beach Zone residents with a valid disabled placard are eligible for one free resident permit, and to grant authority to the City Manager or the Assistant Director of the Planning and Community Development Department to authorize the issuance of parking permits to other governmental agencies to use in the course of business as a courtesy.", "Public Outreach", "Staff conducted a study session with the DTSM Board of Directors on January 27, 2016. The Board stressed that they want to maintain the 90 minutes free period, agreed with discouraging park and ride activity by limiting monthly parking sales to those living and working Downtown, and expressed that they would like to see additional dynamic wayfinding signage to direct drivers to available spaces. Additionally, staff participated in a discussion with the Parking, Access and Circulation Committee of the DTSM Board on February 23, 2016. At this meeting, there was a general consensus to increase the daily maximum rate, slightly increase the price of monthlies, and to explore keeping the Main Library parking structure open later, as it currently closes at 11 p.m.", "The Planning Commission held a study session on the proposed changes on April 6, 2016. At that meeting, the Commission expressed agreement with the proposed rate increases, assigning keycards to one or two locations, and keycard eligibility requirements; recommended maintaining the affordable housing keycard rate and not increasing the free parking period at the Civic from 30 to 90 minutes; and suggested phasing in the rate increase for Civic keycards. The Commission also made additional suggestions such as eliminating the free period in all locations, and exploring both congestion pricing and dynamic pricing. Staff will return to the Commission with additional study sessions to discuss topics such as these to inform the broader parking policy and rate study to occur the year after Expo service begins.", "Alternatives", "Aside from the shorter free period, the rate structure recommended for the Civic Center parking facilities is identical to the one currently in place in the Downtown Structures, and thus familiar to users. Alternatively, Council could choose to adopt a disparate rate structure or maintain current rates, the latter of which would not address current overcrowding at the Civic nor further Council\u2019s strategic initiative to establish a new model for mobility.", "Council could choose to implement the Planning Commission\u2019s suggestion to eliminate all free parking periods, however this would be at odds with the desires of the DTSM Board of Directors.", "Council could decide not to implement eligibility requirements for monthly key cards. However, as current holders give up their existing key cards, these cards would be available to individuals on the waiting list who may choose to use them for park and ride.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed parking regulations are not subject to environmental review under the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA). Pursuant to CEQA Guidelines section 15378(b)(4), a \u201cproject\u201d for the purposes of CEQA does not include \u201cthe creation of government funding mechanisms or other government fiscal activities, which do not involve any commitment to any specific project which may result in a potentially significant impact on the environment\u201d or \u201corganization or administrative activities of governments that will not result in direct or indirect physical changes in the environment.\u201d The proposed actions are considered fiscal and operational activities of the City that will not result in physical changes in the environment. Therefore, no CEQA review is required.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Council approval of the recommended changes to the Civic Center parking rates is anticipated to increase parking fee and parking facility tax revenues by $786,500 annually based on current usage patterns adjusted to reflect some attrition resulting from the rate increases. The revised transient rates will be effective June 11, 2016 and the first phase of the revised monthly rates will be effective January 1, 2017.", "The Downtown administrative fee increases are expected to increase parking fee and parking facility tax revenue by approximately $3.4 million annually also based on current usage patterns adjusted to reflect some attrition in transient revenue resulting from the higher rates. It is assumed that any attrition in monthly parking permits will be offset due to high demand. If recommended, these rates would be implemented July 1, 2016.", "The revenue impacts of these changes will be included in the FY 2016-17 Proposed Budget. As noted above, the revenue assumptions are based on current usage patterns adjusted for some attrition. However, with the arrival of Expo as well as other potential changes in mobility patterns, it is possible usage patterns could change significantly from the present. Staff will monitor usage patterns and adjust revenue estimates as necessary as part of the Midyear Budget process."]}, {"Title": "Guidelines for Implementing Article XXII of the City Charter", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution establishing guidelines for Implementation of Article XXII of the City Charter, commonly known as the Oaks Initiative.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting of April 26, 2016, the City Council received and discussed the \u201cReport With Review and Recommendations of Best Practices for the City of Santa Monica\u201d (the Report) prepared by the law firm of Hueston Hennigan LLP. Council had hired the firm to conduct an independent review of the circumstances underlying Riel v. City and of recent complaints alleging violations of Article XXII of the City Charter and to make findings and recommendations as to best practices.", "After hearing an oral presentation by Attorney John C. Hueston and receiving public testimony, the City Council directed staff to implement the recommendations in the Report by, among other things, preparing a resolution for adoption of guidelines for implementation of the Oaks Initiative.", "This staff report and the attached resolution fulfill that direction. The resolution would adopt the draft guidelines (the Draft) prepared by Hueston Hennigan with the addition of introductory information intended to enhance the utility of the guidelines and with minor changes. Attachment 1 to this report is a strikeout version of the Draft showing staff\u2019s additions and proposed minor modifications. Attachment 2 is a \u201cclean\u201d copy of staff\u2019s recommended resolution.", "The proposed changes to the Draft are explained in this report. They are intended to enhance clarity or to eliminate minor typographical errors or omissions in the Draft.  Only one is substantive, and it was was suggested by a member of the public and approved by Council.", "Background", "The circumstances underlying the Riel dispute and subsequent complaints made by residents are set forth, in detail, in the Report. The dispute was acrimonious, and the litigation it spawned was costly to the City and to individuals both financially and otherwise. In the wake of the Riel dispute, residents expressed concerns, including concerns about alleged violations of Article XXII, which prohibits an official from receiving a personal advantage from an individual or entity upon whom the official has conferred a public benefit, thereby prohibiting \u201ckickbacks\u201d. Residents also complained about an alleged violation of City Charter Section 610, which precludes City Council members from interfering with the City Manager\u2019s control of the City\u2019s administrative service.", "In order to obtain an objective assessment and to ensure best practices going forward, the Council engaged Hueston Hennigan. Under the direction of John C. Hueston, that firm investigated by, among other things, conducting 21 interviews, reviewing relevant documents and obtaining information about other jurisdictions' best practices. On April 20th, the City received the report and immediately posted it on the City\u2019s website.", "At the Council meeting of April 26, Mr. Hueston presented the report to the Council and community and explained his findings and recommendations. Among them were these two:", "\u201cThe Oaks Initiative serves important anti-corruption interests in Santa Monica. To the extent that there are enforceability issues, interpretation issues, or legal infirmities with the Oaks Initiative, the law should be clarified or amended by the City Council and City Attorney\u2019s Office.\u201d", "\u201cThe City Attorney should approve clear guidelines for the implementation of the Oaks Initiative and the City Council should pass those guidelines by resolution.\u201d", "In addition, to assist the City in implementing the recommendations, Hueston Hennigan supplied the Draft, as well as proposed amendments to Article XXII. Staff has reviewed the Draft and offers some minor proposed modifications, which are shown on Attachment 1 and explained in this report. The resolutions necessary to place Charter amendments on the ballot will be brought to Council in time for the November election.", "Discussion", "Legal staff concurs fully with the Report\u2019s conclusion that the Oaks Initiative serves important public purposes, that guidelines should be adopted for purposes of clarification, and that the law should be amended to strengthen it by, among other things, addressing legal concerns and thereby promoting its enforceability. These steps would add Santa Monica to the list of cities (several of which are noted in the Report) that have attempted to effectuate the will of the voters by clarifying and modifying initiative measures identical or similar to Article XXII.", "These laws were conceived, drafted and approved for the important purpose of promoting good government. However, like many political reform initiatives, they may run afoul of constitutional constraints, including the First Amendment. (As Council and the community are well aware, the courts have interpreted First Amendment protections so broadly that they often frustrate voters\u2019 attempts to achieve campaign reform and otherwise promote good government.) Thus, as described in the Report, a number of California cities have addressed potential legal issues by working to clarify, strengthen and thereby insulate their local anti-corruption laws. The proposed guidelines would serve that purpose, as would the proposed Charter amendment, which Council will consider in the coming weeks.", "The Draft divides the proposed guidelines into four categories: definitions, requirements of Article XXII, duties of the City, and duties of officials. This report addresses each category separately.", "Definitions: The Draft proposes definitions that would clarify and supplement the basic terminology of Article XXII and thereby facilitate compliance and enforcement.", "Public Official: The prohibition in Article XXII applies to \u201cpublic officials\u201d.  That term is not clearly defined by the law, though inferences as to its meaning and the law\u2019s application may be drawn from the text. However, partly because Article XXII carries criminal sanctions, staff strongly supports clarifying the definition to ensure fair notice.", "As proposed by Hueston Hennigan, the term \u201cpublic official\u201d would be defined to include persons making final approvals on the disposition of public benefits. This would expressly include, but not be limited to: Council members, Commission members, the City Manager and City Manager\u2019s designees, and Department Heads and their designees. The proposed guidelines would expressly exclude those making recommendations, acting within a series of requirement approvals but not making the last approval, persons approving as to form, content, process or execution only, and hearing officers who are not City employees.", "Staff concurs with this approach because it is consistent with the purpose and the language of Article XXII. Staff recommends two minor changes to ensure clarity: adding City board members to the list of \u201cpublic officials\u201d and clarifying the term \u201cdesignees\u201d.", "Also, staff notes that the Council may wish to consider the bright line that the proposed guidelines draw between those who make final approvals and those who make recommendations. In the state context, Government Code Section 1090\u2019s prohibition against self-dealing in contracts applies to those who influence decisions as well as to those who actually make them. And, as a practical reality, though Department Heads and the City Manager ultimately sign off on contracts, they may not be the persons actually deciding to whom contracts (below the Council threshold) should be let. Changing the guidelines to explicitly apply to those who actually make the determination of who should receive a public benefit may be worth considering. That approach may be more in keeping with the purpose of Article XXII than simply applying the prohibition to those who \u201csign off\u201d. On the other hand, limiting the prohibition to final approvals has advantages, including clarity and ease of administration; and it may better insulate Article XXII against legal challenges by narrowing its application. And, the guidelines could be revised, in the future, based on experience.", "\u201cPublic Benefit\u201d: The term \u201cpublic benefit\u201d is defined in Article XXII. The Draft would modify the time period for valuation of benefits and would expressly list exclusions from the definition, and specify valuation methods.", "As to the time period for valuation, the language of Article XXII from Sections 2202 (a) (1) through (4), and (6) and (7) state that the value of benefits is calculated \u201cover any 12 month period\u201d. (Emphasis supplied.) However, the Draft proposes that the 12 month period should \u201crun concurrent with the City\u2019s fiscal calendar.\u201d  Hueston Hennigan\u2019s recommendation is likely proposed to facilitate administration and enforcement. And, staff agrees that it will serve that purpose. Staff simply notes that, the Draft language could result in two different beneficiaries, who received the same total amount from the City, being treated differently. Therefore, Council may wish to consider revising the language, and staff will have alternative wording available at the meeting.", "As to the valuation methodology included in the Draft, staff concurs that it should be included but notes one possible concern: special development approvals are proposed to be valued according to the presumed value as indicated by the applicant. Staff\u2019s concern is that this valuation method may be unreliable. However, given the very low threshold ($25,000 in value) this may not be a problem since virtually all approvals will qualify except for home repairs that, though minor, require a discretionary approval.", "The express exclusions from the term \u201cpublic benefit\u201d, which are listed in the Draft, cover: third-party benefits, loans reasonably certain to be repaid, sponsorships, membership dues or obligations, purchases made with credit cards held by mid-level staffers and used for ongoing minor purchases, which are not aggregated under the purchasing ordinance, licenses that result in income less than $10,000, and public utility trading transactions. Staff concurs with these exclusions. They appear to cover circumstances or transactions that are unlikely to foster corruption and/or are relatively small in number or value.", "Finally, staff notes that the strike outs to this section shown in Attachment 1 also include corrections to an apparent typographical error that omits a provision of Article XXII (which covers receipt of more than $10,000 in cash).", "Personal or Campaign Advantage: The Draft\u2019s definition of this term incorporates and narrows the definition in Article XXII. Specifically, the Draft excludes from the prohibition gifts that are exempted from state reporting requirements by the Fair Political Practices Commission (FPPC) regulations. Staff concurs. The Political Reform Act, which is implemented by the FPPC regulations, serves the same purposes as Article XXII:  forestalling corruption and promoting public trust in government. The Draft also proposes excluding gifts from public agencies and gifts distributed by City. Staff also concurs as to these exclusions, partly because government entities\u2019 \u201cgifts\u201d presumably serve legitimate public purposes.", "The Draft would also limit the definition of campaign contributions to those made after a candidate has declared an intent to run or established an account to run. The explanation supplied in the Draft is that the Article XXII definition is \u201coverly broad as it could encompass campaigns for which a candidate has not yet declared intent to run.\u201d Staff also concurs with this proposal. Narrowing the prohibition is in keeping with the very substantial legal protection that the courts afford to political participation in the form of contributions.", "\u201cPersons or entities receiving public benefits\u201d:  As to this term, the Draft repeats the language of Article XXII with four additions. They would:", "1. include requiring disclosure of real parties in interest;", "2. exclude from the definition governmental entities and agents who do not have more than 10% equity and are not trustees, directors, partners or officers of the recipient entity;", "3. include anyone who acquires a 10% equity interest or becomes a trustee, director, partner or officer of the recipient entity within 12 months of the accrual of the public benefit; and", "4. exclude from the category of recipients that must be disclosed any \u201cperson\u201d or entity that holds an ownership interest in the benefitted entity and is itself an entity.", "Staff agrees with the first two additions. Staff also agrees with the third but notes that it may add significant administrative work since those doing business with the City will need to update their information as changes occur in their organizations, and this information will need to be disbursed. Finally, as to the fourth change, a resident opposed this exclusion on April 26th, and Council concurred. Staff supports this decision for the reasons noted at the meeting: complexities of corporate ownership and control may facilitate obfuscation and frustrate efforts to achieve transparency.", "Requirements of Article XXII: The Draft includes language explaining that Article XXII does not apply to the exercise of a ministerial duty or to the award of any public benefit made because of an emergency. Staff concurs with these recommendations. Article XXII is intended to avert corruptive influences on discretionary actions \u2013 not the ministerial discharge of duties established by law. And, in time of true emergency staff must often act very quickly to promote public health and safety \u2013 a reality reflected in the Municipal Code provisions governing emergency purchases.", "The Draft also highlights that the Article XXII prohibition applies only when a public benefit is conferred and not when it is denied. As noted in the past, this distinction may be legally problematic (because denials to some may benefit others, particularly in the area of land use). But, Article XXII clearly so states, and its plain language may only be changed by the voters. Accordingly, staff also concurs with this recommendation.", "Duties of the City (and Applicants): This section of the Draft effectuates Section 2205 of Article XXII, mandating written notice of the law\u2019s requirements to those applying or competing for public benefits. It also imposes disclosure obligations upon applicants, and it requires transmission of the disclosure \u201cto the City public official/body.\u201d", "Staff suggests two minor changes to the wording of this section. The change in the title would clarify that it imposes obligations on applicants, as well as the City. The language requiring disclosure of real parties in interest is proposed to be relocated from a definition for the sake of clarity and emphasis.", "Duties of Public Officials: This section of the Draft helps clarify the duties of public officials. It functions as an interpretation of Section 2204 of the Charter which requires public officials to diligently monitor their own receipt of personal and campaign advantages and to return them \u201cforthwith, and no later than ten days after receipt\u201d if the receipt is prohibited by Article XXII. Section 2204 also requires public officials to \u201cprovide, upon inquiry by any person\u201d the names of all entities and persons who qualify as public benefit recipients under Article XXII.", "The Draft states that the City has assumed the responsibility for keeping track of actions conferring public benefits. And, indeed, the City has, in the past, assumed that responsibility as to the City Council. Moreover, with this clarification of the definition of \u201cpublic official\u201d, the City will assume the responsibility as to Board and Commission members and City employees who are covered by Article XXII. Implementation will probably require promulgation of an Administrative Instruction from the City Manager providing express directions to City staff on compliance. And, legal staff will assist with training of Board and Commission members who confer \u201cpublic benefits\u201d.", "This section of the Draft also requires \u201cpublic officials\u201d, who are candidates, to keep track of campaign contributions for elective offices for which they have either declared an intent to run or established an account. This language appears to narrow the obligations imposed by Article XXII, Section 2202 (c)(3), which defines a \u201cpersonal or campaign advantage\u201d to include \u201cany campaign contributions for any elective office said official may pursue.\u201d Presumably, this narrowing is proposed to limit the prohibition of Article XXII to situations in which the official is actually running and not merely considering a future run. As such, staff supports the proposed language.", "For the purpose of clarity, staff also proposes a minor modification to the language reflecting the requirement that personal or campaign advantages received in violation of the Oaks be promptly returned. Otherwise, staff concurs with the recommendations in the Draft.", "Next Steps", "Staff will distribute the guidelines as soon as they are adopted and will return to Council in the coming weeks with the resolutions necessary to place amendments to Article XXII on the November ballot.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Adoption of the recommendations made in the report and these guidelines will have financial impacts on the budgets for the Offices of the City Clerk and City Attorney, the Finance Department, and the City Departments that staff boards and commissions which confer public benefits. The amount of those impacts is difficult to predict at this time because each office or department will need to assess staffing changes necessitated by expanding workloads. Staff anticipates that financial impacts will be addressed through the budget process and budget adjustments."]}], [{"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmembers Himmelrich and McKeown that the Council direct staff to explore expanding affordable housing policies to include a local rent-subsidy program to assist low-income Santa Monica residents who currently live in rent-controlled apartments and are severely rent burdened.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez and Councilmember Himmelrich that staff return with proposals for regulation of vacant buildings in Santa Monica, including proposals for registering vacant building, regulating the maintenance of vacant building, and requiring that the owner of building with a valid permit for rehabilitation, repair, or construction of a building complete the rehabilitation, repair, or construction within eighteen months or a specified time certain from the date the permit was issued. Attached is the San Francisco Building Code amendment as an example of desirable amendments and additions.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez, Mayor Pro Tempore Winterer and Councilmember McKeown to allocate $10,000 of Council discretionary funds to Beautify Earth, a 501(c)3 non-profit, to cover two-thirds of the cost of five murals on Pico Boulevard, with the remaining funding to be provided by the Pico Improvement Organization.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown that Council direct staff to prepare a resolution or other policy document clarifying the circumstances under which members of City bodies may participate by teleconference.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1524789000": [[{"Title": "City Manager's Report:  Santa Monica Institute", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "Commendation: Santa Monica High School Girls Varsity Water Polo Team CIF Division 6 Championship", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Approval of Contract for Santa Monica Airport Noise Monitoring System Equipment Upgrade and Maintenance", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 58 to Br\u00fcel & Kj\u00e6r EMS Inc. (B&K), a California-based corporation, to provide an upgrade to Santa Monica Airport\u2019s Noise Monitoring System software, replace six permanent noise monitors, and provide maintenance and support services for the Noise Monitoring System; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Br\u00fcel & Kj\u00e6r EMS Inc. (B&K), in an amount not to exceed $358,400 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options in the amount not to exceed $101,325, with a 2% increase per year, for a total amount not to exceed $776,024 over a five-year period (including a 10% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends an upgrade of the Santa Monica Airport\u2019s (SMO) Noise and Operations Monitoring System (ANOMS) to replace the antiquated hardware and software of the existing system. The ANOMS system\u2019s primary function is to record noise events via the six Noise Monitoring Terminals (NMT) and, using proprietary software, correlate these events with flight track data. This information is used by staff to identify arriving and departing aircraft in order to enforce the City\u2019s Noise Code and Fly Neighborly Program. Additionally, this system provides a public portal where community members can view flight track information and submit complaints of aircraft operations to staff.", "Failure to upgrade the existing ANOMS could result in the breakdown of the system, and consequently the inability of staff to monitor noise events and enforce the City\u2019s Noise Code.", "In October 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals to replace six permanent noise monitors, upgrade the software and provide maintenance and support for the ANOMS system.  After reviewing the proposals received, staff recommends Br\u00fcel & Kj\u00e6r EMS Inc. (B&K) as the best firm to provide these services in an amount not to exceed $776,024 over a five-year period (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "The current noise monitoring system was installed in the early 1990\u2019s by Tracor Applied Sciences, Inc. (now Harris Corporation). On September 5, 2001, Council approved an upgrade to the system (Attachment A). The system consists of six remote noise monitors (microphones) that record noise levels to a centralized computer system. This information is integrated with Radar data (i.e. NextGen data) using propriety software.", "In order to ensure accuracy of the noise readings and integrity of the system, maintenance, which includes calibration of the monitors twice annually, is required. On June 25, 2013, Council approved a second modification of contract No. 9057 (CCS) with Exelis, Inc. (now Harris Corporation) to provide maintenance and support services for the Santa Monica Airport\u2019s noise and operations monitoring system, purchase of flight track data, and to provide public access to flight track data through June 30, 2015, with two one-year options to renew (Attachment B).", "Discussion", "The reliability of the noise monitoring system is critical to enforcing the Noise Code. The existing NMT equipment is subject to regular outages. Parts required to repair the NMTs are difficult to obtain due to their age, resulting in repair delays and system downtime. Moreover, the existing software platform is obsolete and can no longer be maintained or repaired by the vendor. It is paramount to replace the system to avoid potential equipment failure, and avoid the cost and downtime of an emergency repair that might occur at any time.", "While the future configuration and status of Santa Monica Airport is the subject of active litigation the resolution of which remains uncertain, there is an urgent need to replace the current system. While this request to authorize a five year contract, Santa Monica contracts allow the City to end contractual services with a 30 day notice prior to contract expiration. This contract has two major components: the first is the replacement of the system software and hardware, and the second is maintenance and support services.", "Replacement of system software and hardware", "The ANOMS system consists of six remote noise monitor terminals (NMTs) that record and transmit noise event data from arriving and departing aircraft to the associated software. Raw data, in the form of noise events, are gathered from the ANOMS system for processing and correlation with flight track data for graphical presentation, and secured storage. The system would 1) allow staff to correlate noise events with flight tracks to identify Noise Code violations and conduct investigations of aircraft operations to identify aircraft deviations of the Fly Neighborly Program; and 2) provides public access to flight track data through an online public portal which allows the community to view aircraft operations and submit their inquiries with the Airport.  The upgraded system would include new NMTs and upgrade the associated software.", "B&K, would also provide the option of integrating Vector Airport Systems\u2019 (Vector) data.  Vector is the City\u2019s third party vendor responsible in capturing aircraft operations associated with the City\u2019s landing fee program. This data includes images of aircraft that depart SMO. Currently staff uses these images during instances that the aircraft registration numbers of departing aircraft are not displayed via radar data. This allows the staff to identify the registration numbers of aircraft that violate the City\u2019s Noise Code and/or deviate from the recommended Fly Neighborly Procedures. This option would automate this process and alleviate staff\u2019s time. The option would also add a greater level of detail to the information available to the public via the open web portal.", "Service and Maintenance", "Preventative maintenance of noise monitoring equipment and associated software is essential to its reliability. The preventative maintenance program would include bi-annual service visits to each noise monitoring terminal to perform preventative maintenance and calibration as well as on-going customer support for both software and hardware.", "The lead time for the installation and testing of the new system is approximately nine months from contract execution. Staff would exercise the last renewal option with the current vendor Harris Corporation, beginning on July 1, 2016, to continue the maintenance of the existing system to ensure its reliability until the new system becomes operational.", "Vendor Selection", "On October 14, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Noise Management Equipment and Maintenance for the Santa Monica Airport. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 161 vendors were notified and 26 vendors downloaded the RFP. The following three proposals were received on November 25, 2015.", "Proposal", "Cost: Implementation Equipment/ Software", "Cost: 5 Year Maintenance", "Cost: Total", "Br\u00fcel & Kj\u00e6r EMS Inc.", "$208,050", "$438,742", "$646,792", "Harris Corporation", "$220,262", "$550,109", "$770,371", "Casper Airport Solutions, LLC", "$309,160", "$563,162", "$872,322", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of Public Works staff. Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: technical solution, past performance, staffing capability to meet project timeliness, the ability and past experience in assembling a highly qualified team of sub-consultants, description of previous project experiences to show how quality control was achieved for former clients, cost of services, cost control, reporting, and performance within budget allocations.", "Staff recommends B&K as the best qualified firm and lowest bidder to provide an upgrade to Santa Monica Airport\u2019s current Noise Monitoring System software, replace six permanent noise monitors, and provide annual maintenance. B&K demonstrates a clear understanding of the scope of services, has many years of experience in noise management systems and equipment projects (including Burbank Bob Hope Airport, Los Angeles World Airports, and John Wayne Airport), has a highly qualified project team, and offered the lowest, most competitive price. Additionally, staff contacted references and all reported B&K work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner.", "Additionally, B&K provided an option of integrating the landing data (Vector Airport Systems) as part of their submittal.  This option was not part of the RFP nor did it play a factor in the vendor selection.  The integrated data will be available to view by both the public and the staff. Incorporating the landing fee data with the noise management data will reduce staff\u2019s time in identifying aircraft violations and deviations by departing aircraft, as staff will no longer need to cross reference two separate sets of data from two separate sources. Staff recommends adding this option to the contract at anadditional one-time fee of $27,460 for data migration and installation in addition to $6,000 for annual service fee. The service fee would be adjusted annually by 2%.  This option would be for five years at a total cost not to exceed $58,684.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Br\u00fcel & Kj\u00e6r EMS Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $776,024 over a five-year period including a 10% contingency. Funds in the amount of $358,400 are available in the FY2015-16 Capital Improvement Budget in account C339089.58900. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.#1"]}, {"Title": "Authorization to execute Professional Services Agreement for Senior Criminalist", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with the Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department for the services of one Senior Criminalist to perform forensic deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) analysis and services. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (a) and is for a total amount not to exceed $170,792 with four additional one-year renewal options for a total amount not to exceed $943,734 (includes a five percent annual contingency).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff relies on DNA evidence to solve crimes, secure criminal filings, and make convictions for criminal activity that occurs within Santa Monica. The Santa Monica Police Department's (SMPD) Forensic Lab is not equipped to conduct DNA analysis, and instead uses the Los Angeles County Crime Lab.", "The Los Angeles County Crime Lab (County Crime Lab) analyzes DNA in the order it is received from the majority of Los Angeles County's municipal law enforcement agencies. An increased reliance on the County Crime Lab to process this form of evidence created a backlog of unanalyzed evidence. To improve processing times, in December 2014 SMPD began contracting for the services of an assigned Senior Criminalist from the County Crime Lab. The assigned Senior Criminalist handles only cases involving Santa Monica DNA evidence. This began as a six month pilot and was extended to a one year contract. The Senior Criminalist processes and analyzes DNA evidence while also working with staff or all aspects of the forensic response, including field work, crime scene processing, lab work, and courtroom testimony. Staff recommends continuing this program to assign a full-time Los Angeles County Senior Criminalist to SMPD's Forensic Section. The contract would be for a one year period with four additional one year renewal options and total cost would not exceed $943,734.", "Background", "The DNA analytic process is a rapidly evolving technology and as a result DNA evidence has become a critically important investigative tool. On June 24, 2014, Council approved a pilot program to authorize the Santa Monica Police Department to contract with the County Crime Lab for a Senior Criminalist assigned to Santa Monica for a period no longer than one year. On May 12, 2015, Council approved the program to extend for an additional one year period.", "Prior to contracting for an assigned Senior Criminalist, SMPD, in accordance with a long-standing operational agreement with the Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department, utilized the services of the County Crime Lab and its criminalists for crime scene processing. Staff would submit DNA evidence to the County Crime Lab for DNA extraction, analysis, and submission into the State's known offender database. The substantial volume of cases handled by the County Crime Lab resulted in ongoing significant time lags in receiving the analyzed results. Because there was no mechanism to influence the order of evidence processing, detectives would receive evidentiary analysis from the County Crime Lab in the order the evidence was submitted. As a result, there were delays, as much as six months, in the identification of suspects and in solving crimes.", "These delays provided criminals with the opportunity to offend multiple times before they were apprehended. In some cases, it took the County Crime Lab longer to provide DNA analysis results than it would take a suspect to navigate through the criminal justice system. As a result, criminal cases were adjudicated based on lesser charges as there was no ability to bring about more substantial charges due to the absence of the results of the DNA analysis.", "Discussion", "Since the program launched in December 2014, there has been a noticeable and quantifiable enhanced level of efficiency in processing DNA evidence. There have been three primary benchmarks identified to assess the success of the program compared to the previous level of service provided by the County Crime Lab in the traditional evidence submission process used throughout the County. Looking at the calendar year 2014 statistics (pre-implementation) versus 2015 statistics (post-implementation), the following is true:", "Benchmark One: The amount of time that at a DNA sample is pending before being assigned to a criminalist.", "\u00b7 DNA sample pending time was reduced from 16 days to 12.4 days for a 23% decrease.", "Benchmark Two: The average amount of time to analyze a DNA sample once assigned to a criminalist.", "\u00b7 DNA analysis was reduced from an average of 79 days to a 33.6 days for a 58% decrease in analysis time.", "Benchmark Three: The average amount of processing time for a DNA sample, from submission to completion.", "\u00b7 The complete process was reduced from an average of 95 days to 64.5 days for a 32% reduction.", "The above benchmarks for DNA evidence analysis indicate that the City of Santa Monica has benefitted significantly since the launch of the program. In addition to improved processing efficiencies, cases which are deemed a high priority by SMPD are now immediately put into the analysis process without having to compete with other County and City entities. SMPD found having a Senior Criminalist assigned specifically to handle the City's DNA evidence was a valuable asset in the effort to enhance public safety.", "Under the terms of this agreement, Los Angeles County would to assign one full time Senior Criminalist to SMPD's Forensic Section. The Criminalist would be responsible for completing cases based on the priorities set by SMPD. In addition, the Senior Criminalist would provide direction and training to SMPD in areas related to sample collection, crime scene investigation, case sampling testing, policy and any other type of information requirements or consultation related to forensic DNA testing and any other forensic science discipline. The agreement would also allow for crime scene field response services on an on-call basis by alternate experienced criminalists in the event the City's assigned Senior Criminalist is unavailable.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Los Angeles County Sheriff's Department to furnish and provide a dedicated Senior Criminalist from the County Crime Lab to handle only Santa Monica cases. Competition does not exist since the Los Angeles County Sheriff\u2019s Department is the only entity providing the service.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Los Angeles County Sheriff\u2019s Department is for an amount not to exceed $943,734. Funds of $170,792 are available in the FY 2016-17 budget in the Police Department. The contract will be charged to account 01304.522850. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Reject All Bids for the Purchase of Concrete Materials", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Reject all bids for Bid #4232, Furnishing and delivering Portland cement concrete. 2. Direct staff to reissue a bid in order to obtain the best bidder for Furnishing and Delivering Portland cement concrete.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City uses mixed Portland cement concrete for various street maintenance projects. In February 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of mixed Portland cement concrete. One bid was received. Staff recommends rejecting all bids for bid #4232 and reissue a bid in order to obtain the best bidder for the supply of Portland cement concrete.", "Background", "The City utilizes Portland cement concrete to repair sidewalks, alleys, driveways, curbs and gutters, and for various emergency repairs. Portland cement is the most common type of cement and used as a basic ingredient of concrete.  The City\u2019s approximate annual usage of concrete is 421 cubic yards.", "Discussion", "On February 18, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver Portland cement concrete, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 511 vendors were notified, 15 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on March 7, 2016, per Attachment A.", "The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including competitive price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Current costs for Portland cement concrete in FY2015-16 are twenty-percent less expensive than the prices submitted by the sole bidder, who acts as a brokerage house. Staff believes that a greater cost savings may be achieved by establishing a direct agreement with a concrete plant rather than a brokerage house. Staff recommends the Council reject all bids and direct staff to issue a new Notice Inviting Bids in order to obtain the best bidder for this project in accordance with City specifications.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of One Paving Machine", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4222 to Nixon-Egli Equipment Company, a California-based company for the purchase and delivery of one Paving Machine;Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Nixon-Egli Equipment Company for the purchase and delivery of one Paving Machine in the amount not to exceed $191,368.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for pothole repair, sidewalk patching, and repairs to eroded and low areas in the streets and alleyways, as well as, larger scale paving projects. This purchase would replace one paving machine that has reached the end of its cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In March 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of one street paving machine. After reviewing the bids received, staff recommends Nixon-Egli Equipment Company as the lowest and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one paving machine in the amount of $191,368.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The current vehicle was purchased in 2008 and is eight years old. When the vehicle was purchased, the cost effective useful life span was deemed to be ten years. The current unit was taken out of service due to inoperability as a result of extensive use and was therefore recommended for replacement two years early. The City\u2019s current asphalt paving machine in the fleet inventory is used on a full-time schedule by the Asphalt Crew during the paving season from end of March to end of September. Based on industry standards, as well as the level and intensity of usage of the current vehicle, the cost-effective useful life has been decreased from ten years to seven years for this type of equipment.", "This type of equipment is not available in alternative fuel. Street Maintenance received an exemption from the Director of Public Works to purchase a conventionally fueled vehicle as a result of its operational needs and the unavailability of an alternatively fueled vehicle.", "The Public Works Department\u2019s Street Maintenance section utilizes the asphalt paving machine to complete larger scale projects. These larger projects are outside the scope of standard pothole repair work. This paving machine would allow for the repair of surfaces using less asphalt material and fewer employees on the City\u2019s streets, alleyways, and City-owned parking lots.", "Last fiscal year, from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015, the paving machine was used to repave 218,336 square feet of asphalt surfaces. In the current fiscal year, the paving machine has been used to repave 120,114 square feet of asphalt surfaces.", "The paving machine plays an essential role in keeping the Street Maintenance section\u2019s workload on schedule and the community\u2019s right-of-way safe.", "Example of a paving machine", "Vendor Selection", "In March 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver one paving machine in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 678 vendors were notified, 10 vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on March 10, 2016, per Attachment A.", "Company", "Total cost including selected options", "Herrmann Equipment Company", "$216,226", "Nixon-Elgi Equipment Company", "$191,368", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Of the two bids received, Nixon-Egli Equipment Company was 11.5% less expensive than the second bidder, provided a bid that meets specifications, is 14 miles closer to the City than the second bidder. Nixon-Egli also has provided reliable and effective service on other equipment in the city. Based on these criteria, Nixon-Egli Equipment Company, the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Nixon-Egli Equipment Company is for an amount not to exceed $191,368. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget.", "The purchase order will be charged to account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "Award Contract for Homeless Multi-Disciplinary Street Team", "Department": "Human Services (CCS)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 71 to Ocean Park Community Center (OPCC), a California-based nonprofit organization, to develop and operate a Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team. 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with OPCC in an amount not to exceed $600,000 for a one-year period.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Assertive case management is a best practice model designed to do \u201cwhatever it takes\u201d to effectively engage the complex needs of chronically homeless individuals. The Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team would provide field-based medical and behavioral health treatment to an initial cohort of 20-25 unsheltered adults who have been identified as the highest utilizers of City emergency services. The Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team would complement existing services while piloting an enhanced response to address the changing profile of Santa Monica\u2019s homeless population.", "Through a competitive bid process, one proposal was received. Staff is recommending awarding the project to OPCC to implement and operate the Multidisciplinary Street Team as a proof-of-concept at a cost of $600,000", "Background", "Homelessness has long been identified as an area of concern in Santa Monica. For decades, the City has invested in creative solutions to address this complex issue. Guided by the Action Plan to Address Homelessness, housing and services have been prioritized to the most vulnerable, visible, and chronically homeless individuals in the community. In addition, the City has promoted a \u201cwhatever it takes\u201d approach, which emphasizes flexible delivery of services in a way that reaches people wherever they are. The traditional forms of street outreach have evolved from simple engagement by peers or advocates into sophisticated and medically/clinically trained teams that can provide field-based assessments and treatments.", "One example of this, Street Medicine, is a rapidly evolving best practice, which delivers quality medical care directly to people living on the streets through mobile services. Popularized by the work of Pennsylvania-based Dr. Jim Withers in the early 1990\u2019s, Street Medicine delivers compassionate, accessible, and cost-effective treatment to individuals who otherwise cannot or do not receive care until they are admitted to emergency rooms and hospitals. Street Medicine programs throughout the country have expanded to include mental health and substance abuse interventions in addition to physical healthcare to meet homeless patients\u2019 complex needs while reducing repeat emergency room visits.", "In 2004, the City formed the Chronic Homeless Project (CHP), which prioritizes intensive field-based services to a group of individuals who have been homeless in Santa Monica for a period of years, who are the most visible in the community and may be high users of police, paramedic and emergency room resources. The CHP approach incorporates the knowledge and expertise of dozens of interagency partners in order to meet the complex behavioral and medical needs of the City\u2019s identified priority population.", "Another program that has yielded successful results is the Integrated Mobile Health Team (IMHT), an innovative treatment model combining the efforts of the County Department of Mental Health, OPCC, Venice Family Clinic, and St. Joseph Center. IMHT focuses on placing vulnerable individuals in housing first, then surrounding them with the supportive services necessary to promote wellbeing and housing retention. A multidisciplinary staff provides mental health, physical health, and substance abuse services in the streets and in the client\u2019s home. Since it began in Santa Monica in 2012, the IMHT program has permanently housed dozens of the City\u2019s most vulnerable chronically homeless individuals.", "Discussion", "On August 23, 2015 (Attachment A), the City Council convened a special Council meeting and identified the City\u2019s five top priority Strategic Goals from a broader list developed by the citywide leadership team. One of the emerging Strategic Goals was taking a leadership role in regional efforts to address homelessness.", "On October 27, 2015 (Attachment B), staff recommended appropriating $5.1 million of one-time General Fund savings for projects that will produce measurable results in support of Council\u2019s Strategic Goals. Council approved a one-time allocation of $600,000 to implement a Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team. This team would build upon the successful assertive case management model utilized by the CHP Team and the comprehensive medical and behavioral health approach used by IMHT to address the changing characteristics of the homeless community in the City.", "The City\u2019s local initiatives and regional partnerships have successfully housed many of the individuals identified as \u201cSanta Monica Priority\u201d as defined by the Action Plan to Address Homelessness, and helped reduce homelessness overall by 20% since 2009. However, data from the 2016 Homeless Count continues a trend of increasing unsheltered, or street homelessness, and describes a changing profile of Santa Monica\u2019s homeless population, which is comprised of people who have been homeless for long periods of time, but who are newly arrived in Santa Monica. In a recent survey of 133 homeless individuals, 62% report having been homeless for more than one year. The majority, 55%, report being in Santa Monica for less than one year. In addition, nearly half (44%) of survey respondents said they do not receive services from any of the local agencies, despite a high prevalence of self-reported mental illness, substance use, and medical problems. This small sample supports data collected by the Police and Fire Departments, which indicate a disproportionate number of calls for service among homeless individuals, including 2706 homeless distress responses by the Fire Department last year", "One-time funds of $600,000 would support one year of operation for a caseload of 20-25 individuals. The caseload would be developed through an interactive process incorporating data from Police, Fire, and local hospital emergency departments to identify the 20-25 highest utilizers of public services. As a proof-of-concept project, there would be a focus on reducing public service costs among the City\u2019s highest utilizers as demonstrated by reductions in the number of Police and Fire contacts by these individuals, as well as reduced visits to emergency rooms. Documentation and tracking of these and other positive outcomes that reduce the impacts of homelessness would demonstrate a need for on-going funding, which could be a City/County joint commitment at a similar funding level on an annual basis.", "The team would operate five days a week from 7:30am to at least 5:00pm. Daily case conferencing would allow the team to effectively develop and modify treatment plans. The interdisciplinary staff would consist of a licensed Program Manager, Physician Assistant, Substance Abuse Clinician, Clinical Case Manager, Housing Case Manager, Psychiatrist, Peer Advocate, and Program Evaluator. The team would provide street-based medical and behavioral health evaluations and treatment, transporting clients to clinic-based services when necessary. The team would integrate services with the agency\u2019s existing programs and resources to enhance treatment and housing options. Collaboration with Police, Fire, and Human Services Division (HSD) would allow the team to strategically engage clients who have declined traditional services. The team would be required to achieve and track outcomes including:", "\u00b7 Number of police contacts before/after engagement by the street team", "\u00b7 Number of emergency department visits before/after engagement by the street team", "\u00b7 Referrals to clinic-based medical, mental health, and substance abuse treatment", "\u00b7 Placements in emergency/transitional/permanent housing", "Results from the one-year pilot would inform future program and funding decisions, including whether to make an ongoing commitment to this service, either as a city or in partnership with other public agencies such as the City and/or County of Los Angeles.", "Vendor Selection", "On February 12, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for a Homeless Multidisciplinary Street Team. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding system in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. FY2015-19 Human Services Grants Program (HSGP) grantee agencies and the Westside Coalition were notified via e-mail. Nine prospective vendors downloaded and viewed the RFP. One proposal was received. HSD staff contacted vendors that did not elect to submit a proposal. Four of the vendors responded, and all indicated that they did not feel like the scope of work was a good fit for their resources, including two that are City-funded agencies.", "The proposal, from OPCC, was reviewed by staff from HSD, the Police Department, the Fire Department, and the Library. The proposal was reviewed for competence, qualification/expertise, staffing capacity, and cost effectiveness. The staff reviewers found that OPCC has extensive experience providing integrated field-based homeless services through their IMHT, Multidisciplinary Integrated Team (MIT), and the Department of Health Services C3 initiative in Skid Row and recommends that they be selected for these reasons.", "OPCC currently receives $1,620,928 annually through the Human Services Grants Program (HSGP) to operate all of the City\u2019s single-adult emergency housing beds through four shelter locations (Daybreak, Safe Haven, Turning Point and SAMOSHEL), as well as the City\u2019s only drop in center for homeless individuals (Access Center) and the City\u2019s primary domestic violence shelter and services (Sojourn and Westside Domestic Violence Network). They are well equipped to manage additional City funds, as well as leverage these existing City and non-City funded resources to support the efforts of the new Multidisciplinary Team.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to OPCC is $600,000 in one time funds. One-time funds of $600,000 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget at account SO015401.589000."]}, {"Title": "Contract Modification to Add Funds for Homeless Management Information System Support", "Department": "Human Services (CCS)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to professional services agreement #2948 in the amount of $175,000 with Alexandria Consulting, a Florida-based company, to continue Homeless Management Information System (HMIS) administration, technical support and a data needs assessment through June 30, 2017. This will result in a three-year amended agreement, with one remaining one-year option to renew, with a new total amount not to exceed $409,925 over a four-year period with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) requires all programs that receive HUD homeless funding to collect participant data using an approved Homeless Management Information System (HMIS). The City\u2019s specialized data base requires knowledgeable personnel to manage the system, provide technical support to users and create custom reports. Since November 2014, these activities have been carried out by a consulting firm, Alexandria Consulting, selected through a competitive bid process. Staff recommends continuing this relationship, and is requesting Council authorization to exercise the first of two one-year options to renew, as well as add additional funding to the contract not-to-exceed amount in order to cover current and potential future activities should the City choose to exercise the one remaining  one-year option to renew.", "Background", "In order for the City to comply with HUD requirements, Community and Cultural Services (CCS), in partnership with the Information Systems Department, implemented the ServicePoint HMIS software system in 2008. The HMIS collects HUD-required data elements such as demographic information, household configuration, income history, health information, and housing status. In addition, the system is configured to store and track participant enrollment in programs, case planning goals, outcomes, referrals and service utilization. HMIS provides a holistic profile of each individual\u2019s progress across all participating programs in a centralized system which allows for both client-specific and aggregate reporting across program, agency and system levels. Currently, the City\u2019s HMIS has over 250 licensed users representing dozens of programs operated by six City-funded non-profits.", "CCS issued a Request for Proposals in August 2014 to secure a contractor to provide HMIS technical support, data integration and conduct a data needs assessment for the division. In November 2014, Alexandria Consulting was awarded professional agreement #2948 in the amount of $79,925 through June 30, 2015 to provide technical support and system administration for the City\u2019s HMIS as well as begin an assessment of data needs for the Human Services Division (HSD). Since contract execution, Alexandria has successfully completed several key projects and has developed positive relationships with the City-funded agencies using HMIS. On May 27, 2015 (Attachment A), Council authorized a first modification to the agreement to continue this partnership through FY15-16, with additional funds comprised of $80,000 for an additional year of technical support and $75,000 for the implementation of data assessment activities for a new total amount not to exceed $234,925, with two one-year renewal options. Staff is requesting authorization to fund the two one-year renewal options in this report.", "Discussion", "The Alexandria team has provided responsive and accurate support to over 250 HMIS front-line users, agency administrators and City staff to manage day-to-day HMIS activity. They have performed their duties to expectation, at a cost that is appropriate for the level of work provided. During this period, Alexandria was asked to perform additional technical assistance work on behalf of non-homeless HSGP funded programs, including Youth Resource Team and Hospitality Training Academy, developing customized intake, assessments and reports within HMIS and providing specialized training for the new system users. These additional services, while within the scope of the original contract, are projected to result in an additional cost of $15,000 for this contract year. In addition, HSD wishes to extend their relationship with Alexandria to continue to provide the direct technical assistance for HMIS, which would require an additional $80,000 annually for up to two years. This would result in a modification of $175,000 for a new not to exceed amount of $409,925. Exercising the first one-year option to renew would allow continuity for projects that are already in progress that will continue into FY16-17, such as the integration of data with the Los Angeles Homeless Services Authority, and provide stability for HMIS users.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On August 25, 2014, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for HMIS technical support, system administration and a data needs assessment for HSD. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The on-line system notified 776 registered vendors of the opportunity, including 526 vendors registered to the City of Santa Monica and an additional 250 vendors registered under other communities. Of those notified, 49 downloaded the RFP. Four proposals were received. One was deemed to be a conflict of interest by HSD and the City Attorney\u2019s Office. The three remaining proposals were reviewed by staff from HSD and ISD, as well as by HMIS agency administrators from key non-profit agencies. Proposals were reviewed for technical competence, qualification/expertise, staffing capacity, and cost effectiveness. Alexandria Consulting was selected based on its specific expertise of the City\u2019s software (ServicePoint), its extensive and intimate knowledge of HUD data standards and data integration requirements across multiple HMIS products, and the cost effectiveness of its proposal.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Alexandria Consulting is $175,000 for an amended agreement total not to exceed $409,925. Funds are available in the FY2015-16 budget in the Community and Cultural Services Department. The agreement will be charged to account 012628.544390. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Construction Contract for Beach Parking Lot 4S Access Improvements and Paving", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid# SP2426 to Sully-Miller Contracting Company, a California-based company, for the Beach Parking Lot 4S Access Improvements and Paving project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Sully-Miller Contracting Company, in an amount not to exceed $776,704 (including a 10% contingency).3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This project would re-pave the southern-half of Beach Parking Lot 4S, located adjacent to Ocean Avenue between Strand Street and Wadsworth Avenue, and implement access and circulation improvements to reduce pedestrian, bicycle and vehicle conflicts. The project would also provide bicyclists with a visibly improved route connecting Ocean Avenue to the Beach Trail.", "Staff recommends that Sully-Miller Contracting Company complete the paving, striping, circulation and signage improvements for Beach Parking Lot 4S in an amount not to exceed $776,704 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "The Civil Engineering Division completed a survey of City-owned surface parking lots in December 2011. Beach Parking Lot 4S was identified as a high priority project because of its deteriorated condition.", "On May 22, 2012 (Attachment A), City Council approved a first modification to Contract No. 9481 (CCS) with Excel Paving Company to resurface the northern-half of Beach Parking Lot 4S and improve striping and signage for the Beach Trail. This work was completed in 2012-13. Paving of the southern-half was deferred to accommodate construction of the new restroom at 2400 Ocean Front Walk, located at the southern-end of Lot 4S.", "Discussion", "As part of the construction of the new restroom at 2400 Ocean Front Walk, modifications were made to the Beach Trail connection adjacent to the new restroom. Community members raised safety concerns about the changes and highlighted the pedestrian/bicycle/automobile conflicts that occur in this section of Lot 4S. Staff from Community and Cultural Services, Planning and Community Development, Public Works, Risk Management, and City Attorney\u2019s office met several times on site to review the modifications and made suggestions for some changes.", "Staff worked with Alta Planning + Design on the Beach Trail improvement project in 2012-13 and asked the firm to review the modifications to the Beach Trail connection and make recommendations. As part of that review, it became apparent that there were several points of conflict in this section of Lot 4S, including the pedestrian/bicycle/automobile conflicts at the entry and exit at Hollister Avenue, the entry and exit to the short-term parking area, and the location of the traffic aisle nearest to the Beach Trail connection.", "Staff recommended hiring Alta Planning + Design on a sole source basis to address these circulation issues and to incorporate permanent solutions in the parking lot repair project that was on hold pending the completion of the 2400 Ocean Front Walk restrooms. After a very comprehensive concept development and analysis process, Alta Planning + Design recommended the following improvements:", "\u00b7 Adding an uphill bike lane and downhill sharrows.", "\u00b7 Creating a large shared promenade/plaza for bicycles and pedestrians that is separated from vehicles for safer access to and from the bike path.", "\u00b7 Expanding the short-term parking to include this entire section of the lot, eliminating obstacles (bollard and spikes) and confusion about where to enter and exit.", "\u00b7 Moving the vehicle exit lane away from the bike path connection and using paint and trees to create visual cues to turn onto the exit driveway.", "\u00b7 Removing the northwest planter from the bike path connection and adding a concrete apron.", "\u00b7 Adding 2 new pay machines in the long term lot.", "These improvements, which have been incorporated into the project, were presented to the Ocean Park Association on March 9, 2015 and were favorably received.", "Contractor Selection", "On March 14, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver Beach Parking Lot 4S Access Improvements and Paving, in accordance with the City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,410 vendors were notified, and 48 vendors downloaded the bid. Seven (7) bids were received and publicly opened on April 4, 2016.", "Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Base Bid", "Base Bid &", "Additive Alt. Bid", "Sully-Miller Contracting", "$ 706,094", "$ 736,894", "Commercial Paving & Coating", "$ 731,049", "$ 738,837", "All American Asphalt", "$ 756,000", "$ 756,000", "Shawnan", "$ 759,000", "$ 803,000", "Western Paving & Coating", "$ 799,592", "$ 817,192", "KTB Construction", "$ 868,239", "$ 899,523", "Excel Paving (dba PALP)", "$ 873,523", "$ 881,223", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC2.24.072, including competitive price, quality of work and experience with similar projects.", "Sully-Miller is recommended as the best and lowest bidder for a total amount not to exceed $776,704. This figure includes the $706,094 base bid and a 10% contingency of $70,610. Sully-Miller provided over twenty references for recently completed projects, and a similar number for on-going projects. Staff contacted references for five representative projects from the cities of Torrance, Long Beach, West Hollywood, Cerritos, and La Mirada. All references reported that the work performed by Sully-Miller was completed in a timely and cost-effective manner while maintaining consistent quality.", "In 2013 and 2015 Sully-Miller successfully completed the Lincoln Boulevard Resurfacing Project, and the Annual Paving Project respectively, for the City of Santa Monica. Both project were completed on time and under budget with excellent quality and no significant issues.", "The Contractors State License Board verified that the Contractor and subcontractors\u2019 licenses are current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, Sully-Miller Contracting is recommended as the best bidder for Beach Parking Lot 4S Access Improvements and Paving, in accordance with City scope of work.", "Construction Schedule", "Construction is anticipated to begin in May 2016 and be completed by July 2016. The project includes phasing that was developed in coordination with Parking Operations and Beach Administration staff to ensure the public will continue to enjoy access to the parking lot and Perry\u2019s Beach Caf\u00e9 during construction, by implementing the necessary improvements in four phases over a period of two months.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Sully-Miller Contracting is for an amount not to exceed $776,704 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital", "Improvement Program budget in account C110649.589000."]}, {"Title": "Award Agreement for Commercial Driver Medical Testing Services", "Department": "Human Resources Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Request for Proposal (RFP) #61 to the Southern California Permanente Medical Group, a California-based company, for commercial driver medical testing services; and 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an Agreement with Southern California Permanente Medical Group in an amount not to exceed $250,000 over a five-year period with future funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recently solicited proposals from local medical providers for commercial driver medical testing services. These exams are necessary to ensure the City\u2019s commercial drivers (e.g., Motor Coach Operators, Heavy Equipment Operators, etc.) meet the medical standards of the United States Department of Transportation for operating a commercial vehicle. Southern California Permanente Medical Group (Kaiser Permanente) provided the only response to the proposal. In light of this, staff verified the RFP was distributed to qualified firms and sought feedback on the limited response. This effort satisfied staff that reissuing the RFP would not attract additional proposals. Staff subsequently confirmed Kaiser Permanente\u2019s submittal met the requirements of the RFP and offered competitive pricing. As such, staff recommends the City pursue a five-year contract with Kaiser Permanente for an amount not to exceed $250,000. Funding for the agreement is contained in the Workers\u2019 Compensation Self-Insurance Fund which is financed with contributions from all City Departments.", "Background", "The City employs over 400 commercial drivers in a variety of jobs ranging from bus drivers to sanitation truck operators and street sweepers. These drivers must be medically certified (at employer\u2019s expense) to operate a commercial vehicle at the time of license issuance and every two years thereafter for as long as the positions require a Commercial Driver License. Westchester Medical Group (Westchester) has performed these exams on the City\u2019s behalf since 2009 as our primary Occupational Medical Testing Program (OMTP) provider.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s OMTP covers commercial driver medical testing, as well as pre-employment physicals, drug and alcohol screening, vaccinations, and other safety-related testing. In the spring of 2015, the City solicited proposals for OMTP provider services and subsequently awarded a new five-year contract to Westchester on July 14, 2015. During the selection process, Human Resources received feedback from City department representatives on the need to find a second medical provider closer to Santa Monica to perform commercial driver medical exams. Westchester\u2019s medical facility, while only ten miles away (El Segundo, CA), can take over an hour in each direction to access during peak commute times. Most departments are able to mitigate traffic delays of this nature by scheduling OMTP testing during non-peak commute windows. This presents challenges, however, for City operations like the Big Blue Bus (BBB) and the Resource Recovery and Recycling (RRR) Division of the Public Works Department. Both have limited scheduling flexibility and employ large numbers of commercial drivers. These factors, coupled with the frequency of testing (i.e., at least every two years), require BBB and RRR to regularly schedule commercial driver medical exams during peak commute windows and incur the resulting overtime costs and/or lost productivity. These arguments persuaded Human Resources to issue a follow-up OMTP RFP for commercial driver medical testing services only.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On October 29, 2015, the City issued an RFP for commercial driver fitness medical testing services. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 145 vendors were notified of the RFP, eight downloaded the RFP, and one firm responded.", "Upon receiving only a single bid, staff verified the RFP was distributed to qualified firms and surveyed vendors for feedback. No vendors responded to the survey, but based on the proposal\u2019s distribution, staff was satisfied that reissuing the RFP would not attract additional responses. Staff subsequently verified that Kaiser Permanente met the minimum requirements contained in the RFP. Specifically, they possess the requisite experience to perform commercial driver medical exams and come highly recommended by their references. Further, the facility designated to carry out the exams is located in the Culver City/Marina Del Rey area (roughly three miles closer than Westchester\u2019s facility) and comes with free, on-site parking. Finally, Kaiser Permanente\u2019s exam fees are competitively priced relative to Westchester (i.e., its fee schedule is flat throughout the five-year contract period and less costly than fees charged by Westchester). Also, as an added benefit, the City has the option of using any of the 18 Kaiser \u201cOn the Job\u201d facilities in southern California for the exams. This may create opportunities for departments to schedule exams on the way to or from work.", "Consequently, staff recommends the City pursue a five-year agreement with Kaiser Permanente for a total amount not to exceed $250,000. Once the contract is in place, City departments subject to commercial driver medical testing requirements would have the option of using Kaiser Permanente or Westchester for these exams. Westchester will continue to serve as the City\u2019s primary OMTP provider, and handle all commercial driver medical testing required as part of pre-employment physicals.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Southern California Permanente Medical Group (Kaiser Permanente) is for an amount not to exceed $250,000. Funds of $8,500 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Finance Department. The agreement will be charged to account 59235.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Approval of Pacific Park Pyrotechnic Display on May 26, 2016", "Department": "Pier Management, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Pacific Park's proposed fireworks display in conjunction with its 20th anniversary celebration and new Ferris Wheel Lighting scheme presentation.", "Body": ["Executive SummaryOn May 26, 2016 Pacific Park will celebrate its 20th Anniversary on the Santa Monica Pier and debut a new Ferris wheel lighting scheme. To celebrate this occasion, Pacific Park requests authorization to use theatrical-type fireworks to enhance the grand reveal of its new Ferris Wheel lighting scheme. The City\u2019s Administrative Instructions on Community events (Section II-4-4) states that fireworks are not permitted as part of an event unless prior City Council authorization is obtained. Staff recommends that City Council approve Pacific Park\u2019s request for the use of fireworks as part of its celebration.", "DiscussionOn May 26, 2016, Pacific Park located on the Santa Monica Pier, is celebrating its 20th Anniversary. In conjunction with this milestone, a new lighting scheme for the Ferris Wheel will be revealed. Pacific Park is requesting to support this reveal with a press conference that includes a 3 to 5-minute fireworks (pyrotechnics) display. The press conference will be limited to VIP (50 to 75 invites) and press only. This is not to be a public invite event and will not be advertised as such. Neighbors however are notified as part of the City event permit process. The fireworks display will be small scale theatrical-type pyrotechnics often seen during large music concerts and sporting events and will be staged from the Pier within Pacific Park.  The press conference and wheel reveal is scheduled from 8:00 p.m. to 8:30 p.m.", "City Staff including the Santa Monica Fire and Police Departments are evaluating all aspects of the proposed event. Fire Department and Police Department staffing levels will be consistent with the hazards present and will adjust based on gathered intelligence. Pacific Park will be funding all public safety overtime costs.", "Financial Impacts & Budget ActionsThere is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of this recommended action. If approved Pacific Park would pay all related costs including Police and Fire deployment.", "Prepared by: Elana Buegoff, Sr. Development Analyst"]}, {"Title": "First Modification for the Parking Structure Condition Assessment, Testing, Analysis and Repair Services for Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10.", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10148 (CCS) in the amount of $198,950 (including a 15% contingency) with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc., a California-based company, for the development of construction documentation for Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10 and for the development of a detailed structural engineering assessment involving testing, analysis and construction documentation for repairs at Parking Structure 1. This will result in a one year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $354,950 (including a 15% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City\u2019s parking structures are a vital asset, and their continued operation and functionality are an essential service provided by the City. A key component in assuring this service is the development of a systematic and robust maintenance and repair plan for structures that have shown or have the potential of experiencing degrees of structural distress that could cause future impacts and long term safety and functionality issues. The City identified parking structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10 as candidates for assessment and analysis. Other parking structures such as 1, 3, 6, 7, 8, and Civic Center are not included in the assessment and analysis for various reasons. Alternate uses are being considered for parking structure 1 and 3, while parking structure 7 and 8 are maintained by Macerich Company at Santa Monica mall. Parking structure 6 and Civic Center are new structures.", "Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. (the Consultant) has provided the City with condition assessments, evaluations and preliminary costs of repairs for each of these structures. With the scope of repairs identified, the Consultant has provided the City with a cost to develop construction documentation for these repairs.", "On March 8, 2016, concrete spalls fell from the second floor slab in Parking Structure 1. An initial investigation of the floor slab necessitated the installation of temporary slab supports and requires an immediate structural engineering assessment involving testing, analysis, and construction documentation for permanent repairs.", "Staff recommends that Council approve a first modification in an amount not to exceed $198,950 to professional services agreement with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc., to develop construction documentation for repair of parking structures 2, 4, 5, 9, and 10 and additional engineering assessment, testing, analysis and construction documentation for repairs at parking structure 1 in an amount not to exceed $354,950 (includes a 15% contingency).", "Background", "Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10", "The original parking structures 2, 4 and 5 were constructed in the 1960s. Parking structures 4 and 5 were originally built as five-story structures with the upper four-story additions completed later in the 1970s and 1980s, respectively. Parking structures 2, 4 and 5 were seismically upgraded in 2010, 2009 and 2005, as these structures experienced some degree of damage after the 1994 Northridge earthquake. Parking structure 9, built in 2001, and parking structure 10, built in the 1980s, were built as three and two-level structures, with housing constructed on top of each.", "In 2009, severe concrete spalling occurred at one of the downtown parking structures prompting the City to inspect all City owned parking structures. Multiple spalling locations were identified and subsequently repaired. Additionally, many slabs depicted various types of cracking which over time, may result in moisture intrusion and cause long term corrosion in the structural slabs.", "On July 28, 2015, the City Council authorized executing a professional services agreement with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $156,000 (including a 15% contingency) to conduct engineering assessment, testing, analysis and repair for Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9, and 10, per Attachment A. Initially, Parking Structure 1 was not considered for engineering assessment, testing, analysis, and repair because of the City\u2019s intention to redevelop the parcel for an alternative use.", "Discussion", "On October 9, 2015, the City and Consultant entered into a professional services agreement. As part of the original scope of work in the RFP, the City suggested a four-phase approach to the project which consisted of the following:", "Phase 1 - Condition Assessment Survey and Chemical and Physical Testing Program - including document review, field assessment and development of a testing program.", "Phase 2 - Laboratory Testing and Inspections \u2013 included field testing and laboratory analysis.", "Phase 3 - Evaluation Report and Recommendations \u2013 included compiling field data and prioritizing final repair and maintenance programs on a high, medium and low scale. Also included cost estimates for the repairs.", "Phase 4 - Construction Documents, Construction Engineering, Administration & Closeout", "During the RFP process, it was determined that a realistic scope and cost proposal for phase 4 could not be determined with accuracy without first preparing the final repair and maintenance program scope developed in phase 3. Currently, Phases 1 through 3 have been performed by the Consultant which provides a clear understanding of the additional required time and effort needed to develop and complete construction documentation as part of Phase 4.", "Parking Structure 1 Structural Issues", "Parking Structure 1 is located at 1234 4th Street and is a 5-story parking structure built in 1968. On March 8, 2016, two large pieces of concrete fell from the bottom of the second level slab and onto the City of Santa Monica Promenade Maintenance Office, located on the ground level of Parking Structure 1.", "Staff directed the Consultant to assess the situation immediately.", "During the visual assessment, the Consultant noticed structural deficiencies in the concrete slab just above the Promenade Maintenance office. Due to the severity of the deficiencies near the office, the Consultant recommended installation of emergency temporary shoring of the second level slab in the affected area in order to safely stabilize the area, per Attachment B.", "After a preliminary evaluation of the entire structure, the Consultant noted that Parking Structure 1 is in \u201cfair\u201d condition with localized areas in \u201cpoor\u201d or \u201cfailed\u201d conditions. The following recommendations were developed by the Consultant in order to completely assess the condition of the structure and determine the extent of the damage and develop an effective repair strategy:", "\u00b7 Detailed structural assessment and analysis of the entire structure.", "\u00b7 Develop and implement a repair program for immediate and high priority items in order to stabilize the structure and keep it in operation.", "\u00b7 Implement a long term maintenance plan for the structure.", "Because of the immediate attention needed to evaluate and rectify these issues, staff recommends adding this additional scope and fee as part of the first modification to professional services agreement #10148 with Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc.", "Consultant Selection", "On April 8, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposal (RFP) #SP2373 for Parking Structure Condition Assessment, Testing, Analysis and Repair Services for Parking Structures 2, 4, 5, 9 and 10. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Eight firms responded. Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. ranked highest among the eight firms. Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience on numerous projects similar in nature.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Walter P. Moore and Associates, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $198,950 (includes a 15% contingency) for an amended agreement total not to exceed $354,950 (includes a 15% contingency). Funds in the amount of $198,950 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program. The agreement modification will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account Number", "Description", "Amount", "C019053.589000", "Parking Structure Seal", "$88,964", "M019054.589000", "Maintenance for Parking Structures and Lots", "$109,986", "TOTAL", "$198,950", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District Annual Reports", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council receive and approve the Annual Reports for Fiscal Years 2013-14, 2014-15, and 2015-16 as filed by the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District\u2019s Annual Report is prepared in accordance with the California state law. The attached Annual Reports summarize the District\u2019s programs and activities for Fiscal Years 2013-14, 2014-15, and 2015-16, and include components such as Fiscal Year budgets, summaries of revenue collections, notification of assessment increases, and Santa Monica Travel and Tourism\u2019s StrategicPlan.", "Background", "In California, Tourism Marketing Districts are formed pursuant to the Property and Business Improvement District Law of 1994. The law allows for the creation of special benefit assessment districts whereby businesses assess themselves in order to raise funds within a specific geographic area to achieve a variety of objectives including stabilizing funding for tourism promotion, increasing the City\u2019s transient occupancy tax revenues, and remaining competitive by growing market share of visitors. At its meeting on December 11, 2012, the City Council adopted a resolution of formation to establish the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District (SMTMD) which includes existing and future lodging businesses within Santa Monica. The SMTMD was initiated by Santa Monica hotels and Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT), formerly known as the Santa Monica Convention and Visitors Bureau. The goal of the SMTMD is to develop Santa Monica as a brand, promote the City as a tourism destination, and increase overnight lodging stays in Santa Monica through marketing and tourism promotionefforts. The Management District Plan provides a list of the 31 lodging businesses assessed under the SMTMD (Attachment D).", "Implementation of the SMTMD assessments began on January 1, 2013, and will continue for five years through December 31, 2017. The City is responsible for collection of the assessments on a monthly basis, at the same time and in the same manner as transient occupancy taxes are collected, from each lodging business located in the boundaries of the assessment district. In its first year, the SMTMD was estimated to generate approximately $3,129,000. From the assessments, the City retains an administrative fee of $16,500 to cover the City\u2019s costs associated with monthly collection and transmittal of SMTMD assessments to SMTT. The administrative fee is subject to an annual increase of five percent.", "Unlike other business assessment districts within the City, an Annual Report for the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District is required to be reviewed and approved by Council. In response to an inquiry, staff identified that the Annual Reports had not been presented to Council. The Annual Reports are prospective and provide estimates of expenses and assessments for the upcoming fiscal year of the Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District. Since the two previous Annual Reports had not been presented to Council, they are included with this report for Council approval. The Annual Reports have been presented and approved by the Board of Santa Monica Travel and Tourism in accordance with the adopted SMTMD Management District Plan.", "Discussion", "Under State law, SMTMD is required to prepare an annual report for each fiscal year, except the first year, for which assessments are levied. In particular, Streets and Highways Code Section 36650 specifies that Annual Reports provide the following information:", "\u00b7 The improvements, maintenance, and activities to be provided for that fiscal year.", "\u00b7 An estimate of the cost of providing the improvements, maintenance, and activities for that fiscal year.", "\u00b7 The estimated amount of any surplus or deficit of revenues to be carried over from a previous fiscal year.", "\u00b7 The estimated amount of any contributions to be made from sources other than assessments levied pursuant to this part.", "\u00b7 The method and basis of levying the assessment in sufficient detail to allow each real property or business owner, as appropriate, to estimate the amount of the assessment to be levied against his or her property or business for that fiscal year.", "\u00b7 Any proposed changes to the boundaries of the tourism marketing district or to any benefit zones or classification within the district.", "Since its inception, SMTMD funds have been invested to enhance business development programs to broaden international target markets of the United Kingdom, Australia, Brazil, France, and Germany, domestic markets in California, and national markets in North America. Additional investment in public relations media has also expanded international circulation of brand recognition to grow Santa Monica as a destination. Additional information on key goals and achievements of the SMTMD are provided in the attached Annual Reports.", "The operating budget for the SMTMD fluctuates with market conditions and room night sales and is adjusted annually to reflect estimated revenues and expenditures. TMDassessments are based on estimates that take into account the previous year\u2019s assessment collections, hotel occupancy projections, and other factors in the hotelindustry. Specifically, SMTT uses the aggregate average annual available and occupied rooms, resulting occupancy levels, average daily room rate, and REVPAR (revenue per available room) to structure the estimated assessment revenues for each reporting year. The following overview summarizes the programs funded with SMTMD assessments and the balance of information required in the Streets and Highways Code Section 36650:", "SMTMD Reporting Years", "FY 2013-14", "FY 2014-15", "FY 2015-16", "Revenues", "Estimated TMD Assessments", "3,634,621", "4,270,580", "3,990,436*", "Programs", "Travel Industry Sales", "751,428", "922,139", "1,374,646", "Marketing", "1,628,000", "1,997,854", "1,323,693", "Visitor Services", "50,000", "50,000", "99,937", "Total Cost of Programs", "2,429,428", "2,969,993", "2,798,276", "General and Administrative Services", "363,462", "427,058", "330,885", "Salaries and Benefits", "660,000", "660,000", "611,753", "Contingency Fund", "181,731", "213,529", "199,522", "Fixed Asset", "50,000", "Total Expenses", "3,634,621", "4,270,580", "3,990,436", "Estimated Carry-Over from Previous Fiscal Year", "233,269", "260,405", "130,359", "Estimated In-Kind Contributions", "267,000", "277,000", "275,000", "* These estimates are prepared in two-year increments. As actuals are received, budgets are adjusted to accommodate changes, if needed. For example, the TMD Assessment estimates for FY 15-16 were lowered due to differences in actual receipts.", "During the reporting period, the assessment fees were increased incrementally by $0.25 per year in accordance with the adopted SMTMD Management District Plan:", "Assessment Fee Based on Hotel Average Daily Rates", "Year", "$100 - $199.99", "$200 - $300", "Over $300", "2012-13", "$2.00", "$3.00", "$4.00", "2013-14", "$2.25", "$3.25", "$4.25", "2014-15", "$2.50", "$3.50", "$4.50", "2015-16", "$2.75", "$3.75", "$4.75", "2016-17", "$3.00", "$4.00", "$5.00", "The assessments are fixed-rate fees based on the lodging businesses\u2019 average daily rates, per occupied room per night, from the previous year\u2019s performance.  Categorization reports from PKF and CBRE Hotels include complete lists of all hotels levied under the various tiers. The categorization reports are provided in each AnnualReport.", "As stipulated in Section 33650, the City Council may approve a report as filed by the SMTMD or may modify any particular section contained in an annual report and approve it as modified. However, Council shall not approve a change in the basis and method of levying assessments that would impair an authorized or executed contract to be paid from the revenues derived from the levy of assessments. Since there were no proposed changes in the boundaries or assessment formulas in the reporting years for FY 2013-14, FY 2014-15, and FY 2015-16, Council is recommended to approve the reports as filed by the SMTMD.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The Santa Monica Tourism Marketing District is self-supporting and there is no budget or fiscal impact resulting from the approval of the SMTMD\u2019s Annual Reports for FiscalYear 2013-14, 2014-15, and 2015-16.", "5"]}, {"Title": "Contract Modification for The Annual Paving Project FY2014-2015", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Construction Contract No. 10161 (CCS) in the amount of $240,000 with All American Asphalt, Inc., a California-based company, to provide additional services and repair additional sidewalks. This would result in a new contract amount not to exceed $1,640,300 (includes a 10% contingency). 2. Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report. 3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On August 25, 2015, City Council awarded All American Asphalt a construction contract in the amount of $1,400,300 for the Annual Paving Project FY2014-2015. The project scope included paving, slurry sealing, striping, new curbs and gutters, and repairs to sidewalks on various City streets. A limited quantity of sidewalks were included in the contract because the City-wide sidewalk inspections were not completed prior to advertising and awarding the original contract.", "Staff recommends a first modification in the amount of $240,000 to the existing contract 10161 (CCS), for a total not to exceed amount of $1,640,300, with All American Asphalt, Inc., the City\u2019s contractor for the Annual Paving Project, to perform additional work. Additional scope includes increasing sidewalk repairs citywide by 10,000 square feet, repairing 3,200 square feet of decorative sidewalk in Downtown Santa Monica, and installing 29 ADA compliant landing pads for new bus stops as part of Expo Line Bus Stop Implementation Project.", "Background", "On August 25, 2015, Council approved Construction Contract No. 10161 (CCS) in an amount not to exceed $1,400,300 with All American Asphalt, Inc. for the Annual Paving Project, per Attachment A.", "On September 29, 2015, Council approved professional services agreement No. 10162 (CCS) with Civil Source to provide survey, design, implementation, community outreach, and construction oversight services for the Expo Line Bus Stop Implementation project, per Attachment B.", "Discussion", "Subsequent to Council award of the contract with All American Asphalt, Public Works staff completed sidewalk inspections and issued a list of sidewalk locations citywide in need of repair. The original contract only included 1,000 square feet of sidewalk repairs where 10,000 square feet are actually in need of urgent repair. This would reconstruct a large majority of Level 1 and Level 2 uplifts in the northeast and northwest quadrants of the City currently ramped with asphalt. Staff has worked with the contractor to negotiate a unit price lower than the bid price to complete this additional quantity.", "In November 2014, the City applied for a Rubberized Pavement grant with the State of California, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery (CalRecycle). A grant in the amount of $90,160 was awarded in March 2015.Grant revenues of $90,160 have been included in the FY 2016-17 budget plan. This grant allows the City to be reimbursed for using crumb rubber in our annual paving project. Crumb rubber is derived from California tires and diverts additional tires from ending up in California landfills. Grant funds must be used by April 2017 or they will lapse.", "Vendor Selection", "On November 2, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for the repairs of the Downtown Santa Monica Transit Mall decorative sidewalks in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1380 vendors were notified, 17 vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received by City Clerk on November 19, 2015, but deemed non-responsive. One bid was received after the bid closing date and therefore rejected and the other bid was non-responsive since the contractor did not possess the required contractor\u2019s license. Staff is recommending adding repairs of the Downtown Santa Monica Transit Mall decorative sidewalks to the first modification with All American Asphalt, as small projects, in general, do not attract the most competitive pricing. In addition, adding this scope to All American Asphalt would expedite completion of the repairs. Staff negotiated with All American Asphalt and received a very competitive proposal. When comparing the proposal with cost estimates received from the two bidders that were deemed non-responsive, the proposal from All American Asphalt is significantly lower and would realize significant savings to the City.", "The Big Blue Bus requested construction assistance for the route and service changes associated with the Big Blue Bus Expo Integration Study. Due to time constraints, 19 bus stop improvements were constructed with the assistance of All American Asphalt. Twenty more bus stop improvements are proposed and are to be completed by June 2016 by All American Asphalt. Improvements to each stop entails ADA concrete landings and improving adjacent sidewalks to the latest ADA requirements.", "The original contract did not allow for the installation of Bus Landing Pads or the repair of the decorative sidewalk in Downtown.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach prior to and during construction of this project will be provided by the City\u2019s construction management consultant as part of the construction management effort. The outreach process would consist of public notifications on the scope of the project, potential impacts, schedule, and periodic project updates.", "Properties impacted by the project would receive two construction notices. The first general notice will be mailed to properties immediately adjacent to the construction area two weeks prior to the start of construction. A second three-day notice will be subsequently hand-delivered to each adjacent property with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts and contact information. The notices will be prepared by Public Works staff and distributed by the contractor. Updates regarding the project will be provided on the City\u2019s website and various social media channels.", "Construction Schedule", "Work is anticipated to begin in early May 2016 and be completed in late June 2016.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The first contract modification to be awarded to All American Asphalt, Inc. is $240,000 for an amended contract total not to exceed $1,640,300. In addition to funds of $149,840 available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget, award of the contract requires an appropriation of $90,160 to account number M200152.589800 to reflect use of the CalRecycle Rubberized Pavement grant funds.", "The contract modification will be charged to the following accounts:", "Account No. Description       FY15-16", "C410114.589000 Bus Stop Amenities   $80,000", "M010152.589000 Annual Street Resurfacing and Sidewalk Repair   $69,840", "M200152.589800  CalRecycle Rubberized Asphalt Grant  $90,160", "Total    $ 240,000"]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 70209 for a 6-Unit (5-market rate units and 1-moderate income level affordable unit) Condominium Project at 3214 Highland Avenue", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution Final Tract Map No. 70209 for a 6-unit condominium project located at 3214 Highland Avenue.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for the following condominium project. The Vesting Tentative Tract Map was approved by the Planning Commission on August 19, 2009.", "PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER UNITS", "No. 70209 3214 Highland Avenue CH Highland, LLC  6", "Discussion", "A Vesting Tentative Tract Map application was submitted to the City Planning Division on March 17, 2008, to create six residential condominium air parcels (5-market rate units and 1-moderate income level affordable unit) on one land lot as part of an attached two-story multi-family development in the OP-2 (Ocean Park Low Density Residential District) of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended). Both the Vesting Tentative Map (VTTM #70209) and Design Compatibility Permit (08DCP-001) were approved by the Planning Commission at its August 19, 2009 meeting. Since that time the DCP has expired; however, the Vesting Tentative Tract Map has remained valid under State Legislation (AB116) with regards to subdivision maps expiration dates. A new Design Compatibility Permit (DCP) was not required for the project as a DCP is no longer required under current Code.  The applicant has agreed that the project will be reviewed in accordance with the City\u2019s current Zoning Ordinance.", "After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Vesting Tentative Tract Map for the above project on August 19, 2009. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision would have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map approved by the Planning Commission. Pursuant to SMMC Chapter 6.76, the developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium facilities tax of $6,000 prior to issuance of building permit. Additionally, the project is subject to the City's Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP) which requires the proposed 6-unit condominium development to provide twenty (20) percent of the units affordable to moderate income households on-site or 1.2 units. As such, the applicant will provide one 2-bedroom moderate income unit on-site (SMMC Section 9.56.050). In addition, the developer is required to pay an affordable housing fee equal to the fractional affordable housing unit of 0.2 times the City\u2019s affordable housing unit development cost to satisfy the requirements of the AHPP (SMMC Section 9.56.070). The fee will be calculated prior to payment, based on the affordable housing unit development cost resolution in effect at the time the affordable housing fee is paid to the City. The fee must be paid in full prior to the City granting any approval for the occupancy of the project, but no earlier than at the time of building permit issuance.", "The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer\u2019s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements assessed for this map. Lastly, the City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Construction Contract for Main Street Traffic Signal Modifications", "Department": "Parking Operations (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SMTS110 to Comet Electric, Inc., a California-based company, for the Main Street Traffic Signal Modification Project; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with Comet Electric, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $276,045 (including 10% contingency).3.  Authorize the Director of Planning and Community Development to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Existing street light poles along the Main Street corridor have outlived their design life and are showing signs of deterioration which poses a potential risk to public safety. In 2014 the City surveyed 164 existing street light poles along Main Street between Colorado Avenue and Marine Street to determine which ones have become deficient and require replacement. Based on the field observations and engineering judgment, a total of 78 poles are recommended for replacement.", "This project would replace 16 street light poles along Main Street at the signalized intersections of Hill Street and Bicknell Avenue. The project would also replace the signal indications, pedestrian indications and luminaires, with energy saving LED equipment.", "Comet Electric, Inc. is recommended for the construction of the project at a cost not to exceed $276,045.", "Discussion", "In May 2014, City staff procured Kimley-Horn and Associates (KHA) to study 164 existing street light poles along Main Street between Colorado Avenue and Marine Street to determine which ones have become deficient and require replacement. The study was a visual inspection of street light poles showing obvious deficiencies from various causes, and which pose a potential hazard to the public. The vast majority of poles are a reinforced concrete type that is no longer manufactured, and whose 25 year design life has been surpassed. KHA conducted field observations of the existing light pole structures to evaluate the following:", "\u00b7 Existing deformations/deflections among the light pole structures", "\u00b7 Existing cracks or other deficiencies among the existing light pole structures", "\u00b7 Existing appurtenances attached to the structures", "\u00b7 Recommendations for light pole structure replacement", "\u00b7 Recommendations for remedial modifications of the existing light pole structures", "\u00b7 Recommendations for no replacement of light pole structures", "The study recommends replacement of 78 poles along Main Street, an effort that would entail extensive planning and coordination with the Street Lighting group, Public Works, and the Main Street Business Improvement Association. The first phase of replacement identified 16 reinforced concrete poles at two signalized intersections to be upgraded. Upgrades will also include energy saving LED equipment such as signal indications, pedestrian indications and luminaire. Bicycle and vehicle video detection sensors would also be added at the intersections.", "The light poles along Main Street support a system of tensioned overhead decorative string lights which are maintained by the Main Street Business Improvement Association. The string light system is connected to the poles to be replaced by this project. City staff will coordinate closely with the Main Street Business Improvement Association in the removal, storage, and re-installation of the overhead decorative lighting system.", "Contractor Selection", "On March 1, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for traffic signal modification construction services. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Twenty-seven vendors downloaded the bid. The City Clerk\u2019s office received two sealed bids, which were publicly opened by the Deputy City Clerk on March 17, 2016. The bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "Comet Electric, Inc", "$250,950", "L.A. Traffic Signal Transportation, Inc.", "$297,800", "Engineer\u2019s Estimate", "$260,000", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City scope of work. Other criteria considered for contractor selection included consistent accuracy in bidding, the number of traffic signal installation projects recently completed, and positive reference responses. Based on these criteria, Comet Electric, Inc, the lowest bidder is recommended as the best bidder for the traffic signal modifications in accordance with City scope of work.", "Staff contacted the reference agencies and all respondents reported that Comet Electric, Inc.\u2019s work was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. The Center for Contract Compliance verified that Comet Electric, Inc. is in good standing and capable of handling labor compliance issues. The State Contractors' License Board confirmed that Comet Electric, Inc.\u2019s license is current, active, and in good standing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract be awarded to Comet Electric, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $276,045. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:", "C017085.589000  $224,272.83", "C040407.589000 $51,772.17", "TOTAL  $276,045.00"]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 73815 for 30 Residential Condominium Units and One Commercial Condominium Unit at 2300 Wilshire Blvd.", "Department": "Planning Commission Agenda (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution approving Final Tract Map No. 73815 to allow a 31-unit condominium airspace subdivision consisting of 30 residential condominium units and one ground floor commercial condominium unit, at 2300 Wilshire Blvd.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for the following condominium project. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on April 18, 2012.", "PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER UNITS", "No. 73815 2300 Wilshire Blvd. East Pacific Properties, LLC  31", "Discussion", "A Vesting Tentative Map application was submitted to the City Planning Division on November 28, 2006, along with Development Review Permit (DRP) and Design Compatibility Permit (DCP) applications to construct a three-story, mixed-use development with 22,283 square feet of ground floor commercial retail area, 2,700 square feet of restaurant space, and 30 market-rate residential condominium units on a property located in the C6 (Boulevard Commercial) zoning district of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended). The applications, including the Vesting Tentative Map, were approved by the Planning Commission on April 18, 2012. The approvals for the DRP and DCP requests had an expiration date of May 3, 2013, which were subsequently administratively extended for one year. Upon the Planning Commission\u2019s consideration on August 27, 2014, the DRP and DCP approvals were further extended to coincide with the expiration of the Vesting Tentative Map on April 29, 2016.", "The subdivision associated with the approved Vesting Tentative Map proposes a 31-unit condominium airspace subdivision consisting of thirty (30) residential condominium units and one (1) ground floor commercial condominium unit. The action of the Planning Commission approving the Vesting Tentative Map was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map approved by the Planning Commission. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium facilities tax of $1,000 per planned salable unit, pursuant to Chapter 6.76 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, prior to issuance of building permit. Additionally, the developer has chosen to pay an in-lieu fee to satisfy the requirements of the Affordable Housing Protection Plan (AHPP). The current AHPP rate for condominiums is of $36.51/sf for a total fee of $1,272,994.17 for 34,867 square feet of residential area. The AHPP fee shall be paid prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy.", "The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. There are associated off-site improvements related to the development of the project; however, the City Engineer\u2019s office indicates that there are no specific off-site public improvements required for the approval of this map. Lastly, the City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Authorization to execute an agreement with the Annenberg Foundation for a grant in the amount of $70,000 for the Annenberg Community Beach House", "Department": "Cultural Affairs (CCS)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant in the amount of $70,000 from the Annenberg Foundation to support visitor service, guest experience and facility improvements at the Annenberg Community Beach House. 2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Annenberg Community Beach House (Beach House) has been awarded a $70,000 grant from the Annenberg Foundation. Funds must be used by the end of the grant period, March 31, 2021. No local match is required. The grant is to enhance the visitor experience at the Beach House. It will fund a new shade structure at the playground and other amenities.", "Discussion", "In 2014, in honor of the 5th anniversary of the Beach House and the 25th anniversary of the Annenberg Foundation, the Foundation awarded the City a grant in the amount of $160,000 that included funding for the purchase of an additional swing set and an additional shade structure for the Beach House playground. $164,000 was budgeted in the FY 2014-16 CIP for the Beach House playground improvements (Beach Playground Enhancement Project C119070.589000). Construction bids came in higher than expected due to additional structural requirements for the shade structure.", "The Annenberg Foundation was made aware of the increase in construction costs and at the direction of trustee Gregory Weingarten, generously awarded the City an additional $70,000 grant. In addition to providing $35,000 to cover the increased cost for the shade structure, the remaining grant funds would support future projects that enhance the visitor experience.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $70,000 grant from the Annenberg Foundation to support the visitor experience enhancements at the Beach House requires the following FY 2015-16 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20523.403610 in the amount of $70,000;", "2. Appropriate the following expenditures to reflect receipt of the Facility Improvement Fund grant: $35,000 at account C209070.589000 and $35,000 at account 20523.577420."]}, {"Title": "Design Contract Modification for Transportation and Parking Services (TAPS) Center Project at Parking Structure No. 5", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #10044 (CCS) in the amount of $81,601 with Studio Jantzen Corporation, a California-based company, for additional design services for the Transportation and Parking Services (TAPS) Center Project at Parking Structure No. 5. This will result in a 5-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $334,299, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is constructing a Transit and Parking Services Center to provide a one-stop shop for parking and transit-related business. Studio Jantzen was selected to provide design services for the project. A modification to Studio Jantzen\u2019s professional services agreement would provide additional ground level tenant improvement design services for the Transit and Parking Services (TAPS) Center Tenant Improvement Project at Parking Structure No. 5, located at 1440 4th Street. The originally proposed scope of work has changed during the project team\u2019s structural assessment which necessitated design revisions, specifically additional facade design, survey services, design changes, and extensive grading changes. The agreement modification to be awarded to Studio Jantzen is $81,601, for a 5-year amended agreement total not to exceed $334,299.", "Background", "On March 24, 2015, the City Council authorized executing a professional services agreement with Studio Jantzen in an amount not to exceed $252,698. Studio Jantzen commenced design work on June 25, 2015 and both the schematic and design development phases for the tenant improvement scope of work are complete. The initial project scope of work included public counters and offices for Big Blue Bus and Transit & Parking Services, new public restrooms, improving the facility entrance, and improving the pedestrian experience. The Transit and Parking Services (TAPS) Center Project would provide public services and facilities within close proximity to the Expo Light Rail Terminus Station.", "On October 13, 2015, the facade design was presented to Downtown Santa Monica, Inc. (DTSM) to collect their review and input. DTSM requested additional facade work including a public art element to enliven the space during evening hours.", "In January 2016, the facade design was presented to the Architectural Review Board and the direction was to better address the existing art work by Cliff Garten. Studio Jantzen redesigned the facade/public art elements and presented the update to ARB in April 2016.", "Discussion", "Originally designed and constructed in 1969, Parking Structure No. 5 was not built for ground level occupied space. In the 1980\u2019s it was retrofitted to have multiple retail tenants occupy the ground level. The TAPS Project requires the parking structure to be adapted and built out in new ways to satisfy its future tenant requirements, to provide enhanced public amenities like restrooms and an improved pedestrian experience while meeting all applicable codes and ordinances.", "Vendor Selection", "On November 29, 2014, the City issued a Request for Proposals for design and engineer services. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 81 vendors were notified, 61 vendors downloaded the RFP. Eight firms responded.", "Vendor", "Cosini Stark,", "Gwynne Pugh Urban Studio", "Howard Lak Architects", "IDS Group Inc.", "Main Street Architects + Planners, Inc.", "Michael Folonis Architects", "RM Architecture", "Studio Jantzen", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works Department. The prelimary evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: proposal completeness, relevant experience, and firm location to the project site.", "Staff then interviewed the top four architectural firms. Based on this criteria and criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, staff recommends Studio Jantzen as the best qualified firm to provide the design services based on relevant experience, project approach, strength of the project team, quality of the design portfolio, and proposed cost.", "The current scope of work would require the removal of all existing walls and floor slabs. The originally proposed scope of work has changed during the project team\u2019s structural assessment which necessitated design revisions.", "To better address the pedestrian experience, and to eliminate the existing dark recessed access to the ground floor spaces, the facade was pushed out to the sidewalk. Head height clearances between the floor slab and above structural beams have required extensive surveying to identify all areas where clearances do not exist and to assure that the space would meet building codes; numerous ramps and stairs have been added to create the floor level changes required to meet building codes. The facade relocation has created issues in regards to waterproofing and structural connections that require additional detailing. Coordination of interior floor heights and sidewalk elevations have necessitated more survey work. Costs for survey services, design changes, extensive grading changes and facade treatments have exceeded initial estimates and therefore require this modification.", "Next Steps", "On April 18, 2016, the revised facade was presented and approved by the ARB. The construction document phase and plan check submittal will take place by mid-Summer 2016. Construction is estimated to start in Fall 2016 with completion in Summer 2017.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Studio Jantzen is $81,601, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $334,299. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget. The agreement modification will be charged to account C040162.589000. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Planning and Community Development Department Reorganization", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": "Director Donna Peter", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Adopt a resolution of the City of Santa Monica establishing new classifications and salary rates for various listed positions (Attachment A) and approve the position and classification changes (Attachment B) to reorganize the Planning and Community Development Department in the amount of $50,947 in FY2015\u201116; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "To better align Planning and Community Development staffing with Council priorities and more effectively manage operations related to mobility, parking, and urban design, staff proposes a strategic reorganization of the Planning and Community Development. Staff is proposing budget adjustments to strengthen capacity for mobility planning, urban design and parking operations. The reorganization includes a net increase of 2.0 Full-Time Equivalent (FTE) positions at a cost of $50,947 ($42,864 for staff and $8,083 for one\u2011time set-up costs) in FY 2015-16.", "Background", "The mission of the Planning and Community Development Department is to create a better community for Santa Monica\u2019s residents, workforce and visitors. With the engagement of the citizenry, the Department strives to enhance the character of Santa Monica, conserve neighborhoods, expand mobility options and ensure the safety of the built environment. Last August 23, the City Council adopted five Strategic Goals, including creating a new model of mobility.", "The Planning and Community Development Department is currently budgeted for 121 staff positions, distributed between the following seven divisions:", "\u00b7 Administration", "\u00b7 Planning", "\u00b7 Strategic and Transportation Planning", "\u00b7 Transportation Engineering and Management", "\u00b7 Parking Operations", "\u00b7 Building and Safety", "\u00b7 Code Enforcement", "On January 26, 2016 (Attachment C), Council approved FY 2015-16 midyear expenditure and revenue budget adjustments and staffing changes, including the transfer of four long-range planning staff from the Strategic and Transportation Planning division to the Planning division to facilitate the creation of a Mobility Division.", "Discussion", "Given the current workload of the department and the length of time needed to implement staffing changes, it is necessary to request the changes listed below in advance of the upcoming budget process. If approved, three of the positions can be filled before July 1, 2016. Offset by the deletion of 2.0 FTE vacant positions, staff is requesting the addition of 4.0 FTE positions, a net increase of 2.0 FTE; and an increase to the salary of 1.0 FTE existing vacant position as outlined below:", "Position", "Division", "Change", "City Urban Designer", "Administration", "Add 1.0 FTE", "Special Projects and Communications Administrator", "Administration", "Delete 1.0 FTE (vacant)", "Principal Transportation Planner", "Mobility", "Add 1.0 FTE", "Staff Assistant III", "Mobility", "Add 1.0 FTE", "Administrative Analyst", "Planning", "Add 1.0 FTE", "City Planning Division Assistant", "Planning", "Delete 1.0 FTE (vacant)", "Parking Manager", "Parking Operations", "Salary adjustment", "The proposed reorganization seeks to 1) create a Mobility division to ensure focus on creating a new model for mobility, which includes the addition of 2.0 FTE positions, 2) create a new City Urban Designer position to ensure focus on the integration of buildings, streets, landscaping, whole neighborhoods, districts, and public spaces to ensure functionality, connectivity, diversity, aesthetics, and sustainability.", "Mobility Division", "At its August 23, 2015 meeting, Council established as one of its strategic goals for the City creating \u201ca new model for mobility.\u201d In pursuit of achieving that goal, staff is moving forward with the creation of a new Mobility Division. The strategic planning responsibilities of the existing Strategic and Transportation Planning would move to the Planning Division, including the Downtown Community Plan, Local Coastal Plan, Memorial Park Plan, Land Use and Circulation Element, and other specific and area plans. On January 26, 2016, Council approved the transfer of four long-range planning staff from the Strategic and Transportation Planning (STP) division to the Planning division as the first step in the creation of a Mobility Division.", "To continue the transformation of the new division, staff is recommending that the Strategic and Transportation Planning division be renamed the \u201cMobility\u201d division. The division would be responsible for:", "\u00b7 Development of mobility policies such as the Pedestrian Action Plan and Bike Action Plan", "\u00b7 Circulation studies", "\u00b7 Safe Routes to School", "\u00b7 Compliance with the California Complete Streets Act", "\u00b7 Implementation and compliance with the City\u2019s Transportation Demand Management Ordinance, including management of the Transportation Management Organization (TMO).", "\u00b7 Management of shared use mobility options such as Bike Share, Car Share, Taxicabs, and other shared modes.", "\u00b7 Preferential Parking", "\u00b7 Streetscape conceptual design", "To ensure focus on mobility priorities, staff is also recommending the addition of 1.0 FTE Principal Transportation Planner to provide additional capacity for neighborhood circulation studies, curb space allocation assessments, Downtown Community Plan Mobility Implementation Actions section, the Gateway Master Plan, and grant writing to fund mobility projects. It will also oversee taxicab, other vehicle for hire policies, as well as the management of the Santa Monica Travel and Tourism Shuttle program contract, all of which are currently managed directly by the Assistant Director of PCD. Professional services to support these functions will also be included as part of the FY 2016-17 exception based budget.", "The addition of 1.0 FTE Staff Assistant III for the Mobility division is being recommended to provide administrative support to the various new mobility and transportation demand management programs.", "The addition of 1.0 FTE Administrative Analyst for the Planning Division is also recommended to provide assistance with the division budget, tracking of data used for benchmarking purposes, and with report writing.", "City Urban Designer", "Santa Monica sets a high bar of expectations for how we plan and execute public spaces and shape private development. The City\u2019s development review process currently includes architectural design review through the Architectural Review Board (ARB). The ARB is charged with preserving culturally important buildings and structures and ensuring that projects are well designed. Staff is recommending the creation of 1.0 FTE City Urban Designer position, reporting directly to the Director of Planning and Community Development, who would focus on the integration of buildings, streets, landscaping, whole neighborhoods, districts, and public spaces to ensure functionality, connectivity, diversity, aesthetics, and sustainability.", "The City Urban Designer would work to improve private development urban design outcomes and how private projects interact with public spaces; coordinate citywide, neighborhood and district place-making efforts; and shape the way public spaces contribute to community vitality and quality of life. This position would work across City departments and across multiple disciplinary subjects including landscape architecture, urban planning, building architecture, traffic and civil engineering, and urban economics, drawing on the many strands of place-making, social equity, and economic vitality. The cost of the position would be offset by the deletion of 1.0 FTE vacant Special Projects and Communication Administrator position.", "Parking Manager", "A 1.0 FTE Parking Manager position is currently budgeted in the biennial FY2015-17 budget as part of the transfer of the unit from Finance to PCD, however, this position has remained vacant. Staff is requesting that the Parking Manager salary be adjusted to more closely reflect salary rates for comparable positions in the region.", "Traffic Management", "Staff recommends changing the name of the Transportation Engineering and Management division to the Traffic Management division to more accurately reflect the role of the division. The Department has begun the recruitment process for a new City Traffic Engineer, and anticipates hiring before the end of the fiscal year. This division will work collaboratively with the Mobility Division to support the Council\u2019s Strategic Goal of creating a new model of mobility.", "Summary of Position Changes", "The staffing changes include a net increase of 2.0 position for FY 2015-16, all in the General Fund. Position changes include: Addition of 1.0 FTE Principal Transportation Planner, addition of 1.0 FTE City Urban Designer, addition of 1.0 FTE Administrative Analyst, addition of 1.0 FTE Staff Assistant III, deletion of 1.0 FTE City Planning Division Assistant, and deletion of 1.0 FTE Special Projects and Communication Administrator. The 1.0FTE Parking Manager salary would be adjusted to align with equivalent positions in the labor market.", "Any final changes related to other necessary adjustments to complete the reorganization would be included in the exception based budget.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Staffing adjustments to reflect the reorganization of the Planning and Community Development Department include a net increase of 2.0 FTE positions in FY 2015-16. The reorganization requires an appropriation of $50,947 for two months of staffing and one-time costs (furniture, computer, and phone) in FY 2015-16 and $264,670 for annual operating costs in FY 2016-17 in the Planning and Community Development Department.  Staff will include the FY 2016-17 costs in the Proposed FY 2016-17 Budget that will be presented to Council on May 24, 2016."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapters 4.36 and 8.100 Relating to Mitigating Impacts to Tenants During Construction and Tenant Relocation Assistance", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on April 12, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapters 4.46 and 8.100 relating to mitigating impacts to tenants during construction and tenant relocation assistance.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Updating Chapter 8.106 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code Related to Solar Energy Systems and Flashing Installation Requirements", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on October 27, 2015, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Chapter 8.106 relating to solar energy systems and flashing installation requirements.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Modifications to the Minimum Wage Ordinance", "Department": "Finance Department", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1) Introduce for first reading the attached ordinance amending Chapters 4.62 and 4.63 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code requiring a minimum wage for employees with a phased approach to reach $15 per hour by 2020 for most businesses, and a living wage for hotel workers to reach parity with the City of Los Angeles hotel wage on July 1, 2017 for hotels;2) Receive initial staff analysis of California Senate Bill No. 3 [Minimum wage; in-home supportive services; paid sick days] setting a minimum wage increase for the State of California; and3) Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As part of its actions approving a minimum wage ordinance on January 12, 2016 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to form an ad-hoc working group of business, labor, and community members to address certain issues within the ordinance identified by Council as requiring further discussion and clarification. The Minimum Wage Working Group has completed its meetings and recommended changes to the ordinance responding to this direction, which staff presented in an Information Item on March 31, 2016 (Attachment B). Staff recommends that Council introduce an ordinance reflecting the Working Group\u2019s recommendations in the areas of service charges, sick leave, enforcement, wage schedules, and hotel hardship waiver procedure.", "On April 4, 2016, Governor Jerry Brown signed into law a minimum wage increase schedule for the State of California, reaching $15 per hour approximately two years behind the Santa Monica ordinance, on a slightly different schedule, with the option to pause wage increases based on economic or State budget conditions. The first increase is scheduled for January 1, 2017. Staff does not anticipate material changes to Santa Monica\u2019s ordinance implementation related to the state law, but will continue to assess its impact for Santa Monica and other cities in the region with minimum wage laws.", "Background", "Santa Monica\u2019s City Council adopted an ordinance setting a minimum wage in Santa Monica on January 12, 2016. The ordinance reflects input and feedback from Santa Monica businesses, workers, advocacy groups, and the community, in addition to subject matter research and expert recommendations. It includes a hotel living wage and provisions relating to service charges, seasonal or first-time workers, paid sick leave, and enforcement, many of which are unique to Santa Monica and reflect the process of engaging with and incorporating feedback from stakeholders.", "Testimony at the January 12th meeting affirmed community support for a Santa Monica minimum wage. Representatives of businesses, workers, advocacy groups, and the broader community also drew attention to elements of the ordinance that could benefit from clarification or modification. To meet the primary goal of adopting the minimum wage and in recognition of stakeholder contributions to the process of developing the proposed ordinance, Council adopted the ordinance. To address outstanding concerns, and in light of how recently the law was adopted and its potentially significant impact on affected parties, Council authorized the City Manager to appoint an ad-hoc working group that would meet in public and develop recommendations on issues that Council identified as warranting further discussion and clarification. The Working Group unanimously approved a set of recommendations to modify Santa Monica\u2019s minimum wage law, which staff presented to Council in an Information Item on March 31, 2016.", "Discussion", "This report briefly reviews the Working Group process, presents its recommendations, and summarizes the related changes in the amended ordinance (Attachment C). It also presents State minimum wage law provisions and a preliminary discussion of potential implications for Santa Monica.", "Working Group", "Following Council direction at the January 12th, 2016 meeting, the City Manager established an ad-hoc Working Group. The charge of the Working Group was to review issues identified by Council and to recommend changes to strengthen the ordinance or make it clearer through revised provisions. The Working Group included business, labor, and community representatives: five voting and three ex-officio members. The Working Group met three times in February. In accordance with the Brown Act, staff posted Working Group agendas through the City Clerk\u2019s Office, and posted agendas, minutes, shared documents, meeting recordings, and public correspondence on a Minimum Wage Working Group website (Attachment E), accessible through http://www.smgov.net/minimumwage. Through discussion and a give-and-take process during which business and labor representatives negotiated for common ground, the Working Group unanimously approved recommendations to amend the minimum wage ordinance. The discussion below describes each issue and recommendation in greater detail, including a summary of the Working Group\u2019s discussion for each topic. A more comprehensive account of the Working Group\u2019s discussions is available in the meeting minutes and audio recordings, which can be found on the Minimum Wage Working Group website.", "Issues and Recommendations", "At its January 12, 2016 meeting, Council identified five provisions of the ordinance for the Working Group to evaluate and consider, including service charges, sick leave, first-time worker exception, education and enforcement, and the mechanics of wage level alignment and the hotel hardship waiver.", "Service charges", "Provisions in adopted ordinance", "The service charge and surcharge provisions in the adopted ordinance include requirements for employers to follow, if they elect to use service charges or other surcharges at their businesses. The ordinance provisions are focused on employee protection and transparency to consumers drawing largely from language proposed by Unite Here Local 11, the Restaurant Opportunities Center (ROC), and the CLEAN Car Wash campaign. Some key aspects of these provisions are:", "\u00b7 Service charge proceeds must go to employees who generally provide the service", "\u00b7 Employees are eligible to receive service charge proceeds unless they have a primarily managerial or supervisory role", "\u00b7 Employers must disclose service charge distribution to all employees", "\u00b7 Other surcharges are allowed as long as clearly described and used as stated; healthcare surcharges must be used entirely on employee healthcare or otherwise spent on the employee", "\u00b7 Businesses must clearly describe any charges and their use to customers", "\u00b7 Protections are put in place for employees who currently receive service charge proceeds for banquets and catering services, room service, and porterage service", "Council direction", "Council\u2019s desire for potential refinements responded to testimony about potential abuses related to the use of surcharges, with particular concerns for the definition and implementation of healthcare surcharges. Council also asked the Working Group to review and confirm transparency requirements and consider clarifying operational differences between hotel and restaurant service charges. Council direction included:", "\u00b7 Consider differentiating between hotel and non-hotel in service charges, especially in 4.62.040(2)(A)-(C) (banquets and catering, porterage, and room service)", "\u00b7 Consider Alternative 2 (Unite Here, ROC, CLEAN Car Wash recommendation) as presented to Council in the January 12, 2016 staff report", "\u00b7 Ensure strong transparency for employers and consumers (make sure customers are aware of any service charges / surcharges before purchasing meal / hotel accommodation)", "\u00b7 Add supervisor definition, if necessary", "Discussion", "Working Group members discussed each point, including the State\u2019s supervisor definition, and reviewed typical employee duties or roles that do not fall cleanly in these categories, the complexity of managing funds collected to provide for employee healthcare, and lessons from healthcare surcharge litigation in San Francisco.", "Recommendations", "Working Group members approved recommendations that clarify which service charge provisions apply to hotels only, and that incorporate healthcare and benefits surcharges into the service charge definition and provide narrow guidelines for their collection and use. Changes are included in the recommended ordinance, and are detailed below:", "\u00b7 Specify that the provisions in Sections 4.62.040(2)(A)-(C) for banquets and catering, porterage, and room service, apply to hotels only", "\u00b7 Include \u201chealthcare surcharge\u201d and \u201cbenefits surcharge\u201d in the service charge definition and use", "\u00b7 Remove regulations for other surcharges", "\u00b7 Add directions for use of healthcare surcharges to Section 4.62.040(a)(1) to ensure related revenue is transparent to employees and under employees\u2019 control", "\u00b7 Replace \u201cwages\u201d with \u201cwages and other compensation required by this Chapter\u201d in the description of how to distribute service charges", "Comments", "Working Group members agreed on the importance of transparency requirements. The group determined that the ordinance language requiring businesses to provide clear and obvious notice of any service charges and their use meets transparency needs.", "Staff actions / commitments", "As the Working Group recommended, the City Attorney, in coordination with Working Group member Jeremy Blasi, developed amended language for Section 4.62.040 to reflect the Working Group\u2019s agreed-upon recommendations. This language is included in the revised ordinance.", "Within the first year of implementation, staff will solicit feedback on how employers and employees are using surcharges to assess need for additional changes or clarification.", "Seasonal/First-Time Workers", "Provision in adopted ordinance", "The adopted ordinance language builds on a State law provision for first-time workers. It differs in providing for a longer timeframe in which first-time workers could be paid less than the minimum wage, to accommodate employers with full-time summer or part-time longer term seasonal workers. The existing provision provides for:", "\u00b7 Exception at 85% of minimum wage for the first 480 hours or six months, whichever is sooner, for employees working in an occupation or activity for the first time (480 hours=6 months @ 20 hours, 3 months @ 40 hours).", "Council direction", "Council responded to testimony about a potential negative impact on youth\u2019s ability to earn the same wage as other employees, and the possibility for increased job turnover in youth or first-time worker positions. Council asked the Working Group to:", "\u00b7 Review potential impacts on youth employment", "\u00b7 Review potential for increased job turnover", "\u00b7 If no seasonal exemption is proposed, consider impacts to the businesses and the City's goals for Pier affordability", "Discussion", "Working Group members reviewed seasonal or first-time worker provisions in other cities, and discussed youth financial obligations, the importance of youth employment and providing equal pay for equal work, and potential for greater employee turnover due to the ordinance provision. They also considered costs associated with training first-time workers, creating pathways to employment for first-time workers, the ambiguity of the \u201clearner\u201d definition, and the benefits of Santa Monica aligning with established State law and with the City of Los Angeles ordinance on the issue.", "Recommendations", "Working Group members recommended modifying the adopted ordinance to match the State learner provision: 85% of the minimum wage for the first 160 hours of work in an activity in which the employee has no similar or related experience. The exemption is narrow, matches the State and the City of Emeryville, and is not age specific.", "Comments", "Regarding the potential impact on youth employment, job turnover, or pier affordability, the group felt that there was not sufficient data to draw any reliable conclusions, but that these would be areas to monitor going forward.", "Staff actions / commitments", "Staff committed to work with the State to clarify \u201csimilar or related experience\u201d. If this research yields insufficient information, staff could promulgate administrative regulations clarifying use of the provision. Staff further agreed to include information related to this area, including information gathered from the State, as a part of frequently asked questions or a similar guide to accompany the minimum wage ordinance.", "Sick Leave", "Provision in adopted ordinance", "The adopted ordinance provides for sick leave in excess of State law, and matches State conditions for use. It provides that:", "\u00b7 Employees accrue 1 hour for every 30 hours worked (same as State). Accrual cap is 72 hours (9 days) for businesses with 26 or more employees; and 40 hours (5 days) for smaller businesses.", "\u00b7 Accrued time can be used for sick leave only; employees can carry over hours up to the accrual cap; the ability to cash out sick leave is not required.", "Council direction", "Council responded to business owner and worker advocacy concerns regarding the increase in sick days and potential issues with use. Council asked the Working Group to:", "\u00b7 Review proposals for phasing in days (9 days / 5 days depending on size of business), or establishing 6 days for all businesses", "\u00b7 Consider logistics issues for businesses (i.e. use of accrued sick leave before ending employment)", "\u00b7 Ensure strong worker protections for use of sick leave", "Discussion", "The group discussed logistics related to sick leave administration and the impact on businesses of the increases required in the ordinance, including potential for employee abuse of sick days. The group also discussed how larger and smaller businesses differ in their ability to provide sick leave.", "Recommendations", "The Working Group recommended phasing in the required sick leave over two years, with a January instead of July start date, to provide businesses additional time to adjust operations and conduct workforce planning in consideration of increased sick leave amounts. Their recommendation would phase in sick days as follows:", "\u00b7 January 1, 2017: 4 days (small businesses); 5 days (large businesses)", "\u00b7 January 1, 2018: 5 days (small businesses); 9 days (large businesses)", "The group also recommended removing a provision stating that employers can require employees to provide reasonable notification of an absence (4.62.025(g)), given that State guidelines for use of sick leave address the issue.", "Comments", "Working Group members considered the logistics issues discussed at the Council meeting, including the potential that an employee could choose to take up to nine sick days upon giving notice, which would create significant difficulties for employers. While employers agreed that this and similar issues may occur, and labor advocates expressed willingness to work with employers on these issues, group consensus was that State labor regulations govern use of sick leave, and any efforts Santa Monica might make would not supersede these or change employer requirements.", "Staff actions / commitments", "In addition to the Working Group recommendations, staff recommends the following minor adjustments to clarify the ordinance provisions and align sick leave requirements with State law. These are the following:", "\u00b7 Modify language to show that accrual of paid sick days begins upon the hire date (the provision that employees cannot use sick leave until the 90th day of employment would be unchanged).", "\u00b7 Insert language clarifying that sick leave can be carried over to the next calendar or fiscal year, as is the case in San Francisco and Oakland.", "Education and enforcement", "Provision in adopted ordinance", "The adopted ordinance requires businesses to post minimum wage law requirements and retain payroll and other records; provides for fines, administrative citations, and criminal penalties; gives employees private right of action and recovery of attorneys\u2019 fees and costs, and includes retaliation protection. These provisions are common among other minimum wage ordinances, and are among those that the UCLA Labor Center and other worker advocacy groups recommend.", "Council direction", "Council\u2019s direction regarding enforcement reflected worker and labor requests that enforcement provisions be comprehensive; and responded to business testimony about excessive penalties. Council also asked the group to consider outreach and education practices that could assist staff in the law\u2019s implementation. Council asked the Working Group to:", "\u00b7 Ensure enforcement provisions for grievances adequately protect workers", "\u00b7 Ensure record keeping requirements apply to all areas of the ordinance", "\u00b7 Review the penalty accrual provisions (e.g. daily vs. by pay period); and review San Francisco\u2019s waiver provision", "\u00b7 Suggest best practices for outreach to employees and employers", "Discussion", "The Working Group discussed reasons for and potential unintended consequences of the ordinance enforcement provisions, focusing on retaliation and penalty guidelines. Members balanced the need for strong deterrents against retaliation, wage theft, and other violations with the potential for unfounded and costly lawsuits incentivized by high penalty limits. Members also considered the interpretation of compensation and non-wage benefits in the context of adjustments employers are prohibited from making to fund the wage increase. The group discussed the type of employer activity that would reasonably constitute a valid wage claim, and ways to decrease the chance that smaller misdemeanor penalties escalate into extreme situations that might force businesses to close. The group also discussed some best practices for outreach and education, including reference to San Francisco as a model.", "Recommendations", "Working Group members agreed on adjustments to provide flexibility in penalty assessments, the need to better differentiate regular operational adjustments from unlawful compensation or other benefit reductions, and the alignment of the Santa Monica ordinance with Los Angeles and San Francisco for length of rebuttable presumption period (the time during which a negative employment action is presumed to be retaliatory). Specifically, the recommendations would:", "\u00b7 Reduce the rebuttable presumption period from 180 to 90 days (matching San Francisco and Los Angeles)", "\u00b7 More closely define unlawful practices to those changes made to directly fund required wages and benefits", "\u00b7 In civil penalties, provide for fines of \u201cup to\u201d $100, and provide the option to treble penalties in the case of willful violations rather than a requirement to do so.", "Staff actions / commitments", "Staff will review the ordinance in one year, as has been done for some other new City ordinances, to assess need for further adjustments. Staff committed to further researching San Francisco education and enforcement practices, including working with community-based organizations, and will follow these recommendations to the extent that they are practicable and useful in Santa Monica\u2019s context. Staff will coordinate with State and other regional partners on education and enforcement where feasible and beneficial.", "Other Topics", "Provisions in adopted ordinance", "Wage Rates", "The adopted ordinance proposes two new wage rates which differ from each other (the minimum wage and hotel living wage), and, because of timing, from the City of Los Angeles hotel workers wage. Apart from this ordinance, the City\u2019s living wage (applied to certain City contractors) is also different than the City\u2019s general minimum wage and hotel rates. The adopted ordinance provides for:", "\u00b7 General minimum wage at $15 per hour by 2020, increasing by the consumer price index starting in 2022", "\u00b7 Hotel wage at $15.37 per hour by 2017, increasing by the consumer price index starting in 2018 (one year behind Los Angeles)", "The living wage for City contractors with annual agreements greater than $52,400 (in Chapter 4.26 of the municipal code) will be $15.87 per hour in FY 2016-17, and increases annually by the consumer price index (CPI).", "Hotel hardship waiver provision", "The ordinance provides for a one-year waiver upon approval for hotels that 1) would need to cut staff by more than 20% to avoid bankruptcy and/or shut down OR 2) would need to cut hours by more than 30% to avoid bankruptcy and/or shut down. In this provision, the Finance Director would grant a waiver based on expert external review of the applying hotel\u2019s financial records. The hotel or hotel workers could appeal the decision to a hearing examiner.", "Council direction", "To avoid confusion and in response to concern about hotel worker parity with Los Angeles, Council requested a review of options for streamlining wage rates. Council also requested that the Working Group consider ways to make the hotel hardship waiver process more transparent. Direction was to:", "\u00b7 Align various wage rates (general minimum wage, hotel wage, City living wage, LA hotels) over time", "\u00b7 Discuss potential to incorporate public hearing or worker testimony into hotel hardship process, without requiring hotel to share private financial information.", "Discussion", "The group discussed timing of the Santa Monica hotel wage increase and opportunities for matching Los Angeles. They discussed the hardship waiver process, including the type of analysis and review necessary to make the determination required by the ordinance.", "Recommendations.", "The Working Group recommended amending the ordinance to match the Los Angeles hotel wage, which will be $15.37 per hour plus an inflation measure, on July 1, 2017, and to align Santa Monica\u2019s living wage for City contractors with the hotel wage on July 1, 2018.", "The group recommended that the ordinance require a hotel applying for a waiver to notify its employees by posting a notification of the hotel\u2019s application in an area accessible to all employees. This would afford workers the opportunity to be heard in the City\u2019s regular administrative hearing process.", "Staff actions / commitments", "Staff will assess when and by what method it makes the most sense to adjust the living wage applied to City contractors based on inflation measures in the next two years.", "The Working Group unanimously approved the recommendations above.", "State of California Minimum Wage Bill", "Governor Jerry Brown signed Senate Bill No. 3 (Minimum wage; in-home supportive services; paid sick days) into law on April 4, 2016.", "Major provisions", "The law requires incremental minimum wage increases to $15 per hour, and extends the State sick leave provision to in-home supportive services (IHSS) workers, following the schedule below:", "Year*", "Wage Rate**", "Sick Leave", "Large Businesses", "(26 or more employees)", "Small Businesses", "(25 or fewer employees)", "IHSS Workers", "2017", "$10.50", "$10.00", "2018", "$11.00", "$10.50", "8 hours", "2019", "$12.00", "$11.00", "2020", "$13.00", "$12.00", "***16 hours", "2021", "$14.00", "$13.00", "2022", "$15.00", "$14.00", "***24 hours", "2023", "$15.00", "$15.00", "*Wage rates are effective January 1st of each year. Sick leave hours are effective July 1st.", "**The wage rate progression depends on annual assessment of economic and budget conditions described below.", "***Sick leave thresholds beyond the initial 8 hour requirement are linked to the large business wage rate thresholds ($13 per hour and $15 per hour) rather than the year.", "Following the minimum wage reaching its final target of $15 per hour in the schedule for large and small businesses, the wage will increase annually by the lesser of 3.5% or the July-June CPI inflation measure.", "The law provides the Governor an option to pause increases in this schedule if he or she determines that either economic or budget conditions demonstrate that the State cannot support the next scheduled increase. The Governor will indicate his or her decision on the next year\u2019s wage increase by September 1 prior to the planned increase, and would make this decision by proclamation. The Governor can pause increases a maximum of two times. Thus, the latest that the State minimum wage would reach $15 per hour is 2025 for large and 2026 for smaller businesses.", "Economic conditions", "The Governor may choose to suspend the next scheduled increase if either A) or B) is met AND C) is met.", "Budget condition", "The Governor may choose to suspend the next scheduled increase if the State General Fund would be in a deficit in either the current or either of the two following fiscal years (defined as a negative balance in the Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties that exceeds 1 percent of total state General Fund revenue and transfers).", "Implications for Santa Monica", "When overlapping labor laws exist, employers must abide by the most generous and most protective. Santa Monica\u2019s general minimum wage rate for large and small businesses and for hotels will be more generous than those required by the State law; thus this law does not change circumstances materially for Santa Monica businesses or workers. There is one exemption that will be less important for affected organizations because of the higher State law:", "\u00b7 Transitional worker exemption. The ordinance provides for below minimum wage payments for employers that provide transitional jobs for the hardest to employ during the first 18 months of the employee\u2019s work in the transitional job. This exemption would still be valid, but will provide less relief for the transitional employer.", "Santa Monica employers should also be aware of one area where State minimum wage law requirements are more generous than those prescribed in the local law:", "\u00b7 IHSS sick leave requirements. Affected providers in Santa Monica must abide by the State law requiring sick days, although these employers are exempt from the local sick leave and minimum wage requirements.", "Regional implications and actions", "Los Angeles City and County staff are reviewing the State law to determine how if at all it will impact their respective minimum wage laws. Staff will continue to coordinate with Los Angeles City and County, and other area cities with local minimum wage ordinances, and communicate any response to City Council.", "Alternatives", "Council could choose not to adopt the Working Group\u2019s recommendations. This would result in moving forward with the ordinance as adopted on January 12th, 2016.", "The recommended changes represent significant thought and research from Working Group members, and reflect compromises to provide workable solutions for some difficult and contentious issues. Staff believes that the proposed changes make the ordinance stronger and clearer, and recommends that Council adopt the ordinance with the recommended amendments.", "Next Steps", "If Council adopts the amended ordinance, the law would proceed to second reading and go into effect after 30 days. Staff would then continue with activities related to its implementation.", "Communication, Outreach and Education, Enforcement", "Staff has continued to update relevant information on the City\u2019s minimum wage webpage at http://www.smgov.net/minimumwage (Attachment D), and responds to minimum wage questions. Internally, staff has prepared a communications plan building on existing business and community networks and resources; communications activity would increase with Council\u2019s action on proposed amendments. Staff is also coordinating with Los Angeles County on communication and outreach efforts, to maximize existing resources and provide a consistent regional message.", "Staff is continuing discussion with the Los Angeles County Department of Consumer and Business Affairs (DCBA) Wage Enforcement Program (WEP) to provide enforcement services for Santa Monica, and will return to Council with a partnership proposal before the end of the fiscal year.", "In the January 12, 2016 report, staff proposed an initial budget of $80,000 to fund the City\u2019s communication, outreach and education activities, including grants to Community Based Organizations (CBOs), but did not formally request the budget at that time. Staff requests an appropriation of $80,000 to fund these activities, based on the amount that San Francisco appropriates for CBO contracts annually.", "Reporting", "As the Working Group requested, and as Council and the City Manager suggested at the January 12th, 2016 adoption, staff will review the ordinance in one year\u2019s time, and will report to Council on lessons learned.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Approving a budget for communication, outreach and education efforts requires the following FY 2015-16 appropriation:", "01221.555060 $80,000", "The amount includes one-time costs for communication, outreach, and education efforts associated with the new minimum wage law. It is likely that staff will require an ongoing annual amount for the services. Staff will request the budget at a later time with better information about ongoing program needs."]}, {"Title": "Adoption of an Emergency Interim Ordinance to Authorize the Issuance of Additional Temporary Use Permits for Temporary Sidewalk Sales Undertaken in Conjunction with a City Public Street Event by Business Improvement Districts and Areas and by Businesses Located within a Seven Hundred Fifty Foot Radius of the City Event and Waiving the Filing Fee for Temporary Use Permits that Will Be Exercised During the City Public Street Event by These Entities", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Adopt the attached emergency interim ordinance authorizing the issuance of additional Temporary Use Permits for temporary sidewalk sales undertaken in conjunction with and contemporaneous with a City public street event by business improvement districts and areas and by businesses located within a 750-foot radius of the City event; and 2) Waive the filing fee for Temporary Use Permits that will be exercised in conjunction with and contemporaneous with the City public street event by these entities.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On June 5, 2016, the City will celebrate the arrival of the Expo Line Phase Two by undertaking a City-produced Open Streets event (called \u201cCoast\u201d) to celebrate mobility, culture, and sustainability. The City is working closely with local businesses and neighborhood and community partners who have expressed the desire to undertake activities such as sidewalk and food/beverage sales in conjunction with the event.", "The City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance authorizes Temporary Use Permits (TUPs) for sidewalk sales. However, businesses are limited to four such events, except sidewalk sales located on the public right of way are limited to two events within any 12-month period, and Business Improvement Districts are limited to two such events within any 12-month period. In establishing these numerical limitations, the City did not contemplate this type of City-produced Coast event and its opportunities for business participation. Certain Business Improvement Districts will already reach this numerical limitation based on sidewalk sales events that have already been undertaken or will be undertaken apart from this City event.", "In order to minimize the impacts that this public Coast event will have on businesses located within or near the event and to enable these businesses to undertake activities in conjunction with the event, it is necessary for the Council to enact this emergency interim ordinance to expand the frequency that temporary use permits may be obtained for sidewalk sales when these additional sales are undertaken in conjunction with a City-produced public street event and to waive the filing fee for temporary use permits sought in conjunction with this event.", "Background", "On March 2, 2016, the City Council was presented with an information item regarding the planned festivities to mark the official opening of Expo Line Phase Two. In addition to supporting Metro\u2019s ribbon cutting ceremony by hosting activities at each of the new Santa Monica stations on opening day, the City is also planning a series of community-oriented events to help welcome Expo to the City including a City-produced Open Streets (Coast) event on June 4, 2016. City Public Street Events are authorized pursuant to Administrative Instruction II-4-4 of the City\u2019s Community Events Law.", "The one-day Coast event will allow pedestrian and bicycle access to streets free of automobiles with activity hubs along the route and will extend approximate 2.5 miles encompassing portions of Main Street, Colorado Avenue, and Ocean Avenue. The event will focus on sustainable mobility, celebrate the arrival of Expo, and capitalize on the completion of the Colorado Esplanade while weaving art, culture, and environmental learning opportunities throughout.", "The City is working closely with local businesses and neighborhood and community partners to ensure favorable and mutually beneficial outcomes from the Coast event. Businesses located along and close to the Coast event depend on street access and accessibility to public parking for their employees and customers, and businesses located on the streets encompassed within this event or within close proximity to the event have both expressed concern about the impact the event will have on their businesses given the significant reduction in automobile traffic that will be allowed and the fact that certain streets and public parking lots in the area will become wholly inaccessible to vehicles. These businesses have also expressed the desire to undertake activities such as sidewalk and food/beverage sales in conjunction with the event.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance authorizes Temporary Use Permits for sidewalk sales. However, pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 9.31.370(B)(2)(d), businesses are limited to four such events within any 12-month period, except sidewalk sales located on the public right of way are limited to two events within any 12-month period. The Zoning Ordinance also authorizes Business Improvements Districts and Areas to undertake a maximum of two sidewalk sales located on the public right of way within any 12-month period. In establishing these numerical limitations, the City did not contemplate this type of City-produced Coast event and its associated impacts and opportunities for business participation. Certain Business Improvements Districts will already reach this numerical limitation based on sidewalk sales events that have already been undertaken or will be undertaken apart from this City event. The City\u2019s Zoning Ordinance also authorizes TUPs for fairs or festivals or similar compatible temporary uses.", "In order to minimize the impacts that this Coast event will have on businesses located within or near the event and to enable these businesses to undertake activities in conjunction with the event, it is necessary for the Council to enact this emergency interim ordinance to expand the frequency that TUPs may be obtained for sidewalk sales when these additional sales are undertaken in conjunction with a City-produced public street event and to waive the filing fee for TUPs sought in conjunction with this event. The current filing fee for a TUP application is $1,395.00. These Council actions could not have been undertaken at an earlier time because the process of planning for this Coast event and defining its parameters and potential impacts had not been completed.", "As proposed in the Interim Ordinance, the issuance of a TUP for a sidewalk sale by a Business Improvement District or Area that is geographically located, in whole or in part, within the parameters of a City Public Street Event authorized pursuant to Administrative Instruction II-4-4 of the City\u2019s Community Events Law or by any business not within business improvement districts and areas but located within a 750 foot radius of the City Public Street Event and that will be exercised contemporaneous with and in conjunction with the City Public Street Event would not count towards the TUP numerical limitation established in SMMC Section 9.31.370(B)(2)(d). In addition, no filing fee would be required for any TUP sought by a Business Improvement District or Area that is geographically located within the parameters of a City Public Street Event authorized pursuant to Administrative Instruction II-4-4 or by any business not within business improvement districts and areas but located within a 750 foot radius of the City Public Street Event and that will be exercised contemporaneous with and in conjunction with the City Public Street Event. This Emergency Interim Ordinance will be immediately effectively and shall be of no further force or effect sixty days after its adoption, unless prior to that date, after a public hearing, noticed pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 9.37.050, the City Council, by majority vote, extends this interim ordinance", "Adoption of the Emergency Interim Ordinance would minimize any potential adverse impacts to businesses created by the Coast event and allow for increased community and business participation in this unique, one-day event.", "Environmental Analysis", "The proposed interim ordinance is categorically exempt from the provisions of California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) pursuant to 15061(b)(3) of the State Implementation Guidelines (common sense exemption). Based on the evidence in the record, it can be seen with certainty that there is no possibility that the proposed interim ordinance may have a significant effect on the environment. The recommended interim ordinance represents a minor and temporary change and does not substantively alter the standards and regulations within the Zoning Ordinance. Therefore, no further environmental review under CEQA is required.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Review and Comment on Outside Advisor John Hueston's Report with Review and Recommendations of Best Practices for the City of Santa Monica", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends Council review and comment on the \u201cReport with Review and Recommendation of Best Practices for the City of Santa Monica\u201d from the outside advisor, John Hueston, with his findings of city practices as they relate to accountability, transparency, responsiveness, and the highest ideals of public service, and recommendations based on local government best practices.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On November 10, 2015, in support of Santa Monica\u2019s commitment to good governance practices, Council selected John Hueston of Hueston Hennigan, LLP to serve as an outside advisor to conduct a review of local government best practices in the wake of resident concerns about the Elizabeth Riel matter and enforcement of the Oaks Initiative. The outside advisor has completed an independent review of city practices and how they align with best practices for accountability, transparency, responsiveness in Charter cities, and the highest ideals of public service. Mr. Hueston\u2019s \u201cReport with Review and Recommendation of Best Practices for the City of Santa Monica\u201d is submitted for Council\u2019s review and consideration of its recommendations (Attachment A).", "Background", "On September 29, 2015, Council directed the City Manager to seek proposals from outside advisors to conduct an independent and balanced review of City practices and how they align with good governance principles of accountability, transparency, responsiveness, and the highest ideals of public service (Attachment B). Staff solicited proposals from seven firms; six proposals were received. On November 10, 2015, Council reviewed the six proposals and selected John Hueston of Hueston Hennigan, LLP to serve as an outside advisor (Attachment C). Mr. Hueston was selected based on his experience, expertise, and relative cost. Council also asked the City Manager to work with Mr. Hueston to develop a scope of work for his efforts. On December 15, 2015, Council approved a scope of work for Mr. Hueston\u2019s independent review and asked him to return to Council with his findings and recommendations (Attachment D).", "Discussion", "Mr. Hueston has completed his independent review of city practices and how they align with best practices for accountability, transparency, responsiveness, and the highest ideals of public service. His findings and recommendations are documented in his report entitled \u201cReport with Review and Recommendation of Best Practices for the City of Santa Monica\u201d. The full report, including all attachments, can be found on the City\u2019s website at http://www.smgov.net/Departments/CMO/IndependentReview.aspx", "The report makes a number of detailed recommendations for improving or clarifying best practices which the Council may direct staff to implement or further study, including consideration of a ballot measure to strengthen and clarify the Oaks Initiative.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Naming Buffer Park and Consideration of Renaming Stewart Street Park", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council consider the Recreation and Parks Commission's recommendation to select Gandara Park as the official name for Buffer Park and to not recommend any change to Stewart Street Park at this time.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Construction has begun on a 2.35 acre park on Exposition Boulevard between Stewart Street and Dorchester Avenue. Community outreach was conducted during the month of October 2014 to solicit formal name recommendations for this park, which has been nicknamed Buffer Park. The Recreation and Parks Commission considered survey results and public comment at its November 20, 2014 meeting and recommended two potential names for Council\u2019s consideration: Gandara Park and Heroes Park. Council considered these recommendations on January 26, 2016 and noted that public comment and input received prior to the meeting was primarily divided between two names: Gandara Park and George Ishihara Memorial Park. Council directed staff to return to the Recreation and Parks Commission to review the Commission\u2019s name recommendations for Buffer Park and to consider renaming Stewart Street Park. The Recreation and Parks Commission again reviewed name suggestions for Buffer Park and considered renaming Stewart Street Park at their March 17, 2016 meeting.  Following public input and considerable discussion, the Commission approved a motion recommending that Council continue to consider Gandara Park as the official name for Buffer Park. In a separate motion the Commission recommended Heroes Park or Citizens Park as two possible alternative names for Buffer Park and did not make any recommendations for renaming Stewart Street Park at this time.", "Background", "Council adopted a policy for naming City-owned land, buildings and facilities on July 9, 2002 (Attachment A) which established formal guidelines and a procedure for considering appropriate names (see Attachment B for a summary of these guidelines). As required by policy, Council seeks recommendations from \u201crelated advisory bodies such as the Recreation and Parks Commission, the Library Board and the Landmarks Commission.\u201d Council then makes its determination at a regularly scheduled meeting at which staff, representatives of advisory bodies and civic organizations, and the general public may offer testimony. Since the Recreation and Parks Commission has purview over parks, it is appropriate that the Council consider the Commission\u2019s suggestions for park names.", "Buffer Park is a new 2.35 acre park that is currently being built on Exposition Boulevard. Stewart Street Park is a 3.8 acre park that opened in 1975 on the site of a former landfill. The park\u2019s name is respective of its location at 1819 Stewart Street (near the intersection of Exposition Boulevard). Stewart Street predates the park by more than 50 years. An ordinance dedicating and naming Stewart Street was signed on May 16, 1921 (Attachment C). City records do not conclusively identify the origin of the street name but a probable theory is that it was named in honor of William F. Stewart, a United States Senator from Nevada. Stewart was a business partner of City founder, John P. Jones, who was also a Senator from Nevada. In 1874, the two invested in silver mines together and had hoped to build a railroad from the mines in Inyo County to Santa Monica (Attachment D). Another theory is that Stewart Street could have been named in honor of Edwin Stewart, a long-time resident and prominent businessman involved in local real estate who first arrived in Santa Monica in 1919 and later served on the City\u2019s Planning Board (Attachment E). While Stewart Street was likely named in honor of an individual, it should be noted that Stewart Street Park was not named for an individual but rather in reference to its location on Stewart Street.", "Discussion", "Public Outreach", "Several community outreach strategies were employed in 2014 to generate possible names for Buffer Park. Staff met with the Pico Neighborhood Association, launched a survey and hosted a table at the Pico Farmers\u2019 Market, and sent email campaigns to those on the Buffer Park interest list.", "The community submitted a total of 135 diverse park name suggestions. The most commonly suggested names are listed below (see Attachment F for a complete list of names submitted).", "\u00b7 Toypurina Park (16 submissions)", "\u00b7 Exposition Park (or similar variation; 9 submissions)", "\u00b7 George Ishihara Memorial Park (or similar variation; 6 submissions)", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Park (5 submissions)", "\u00b7 People\u2019s Park (4 submissions)", "\u00b7 Hachi Park (3 submissions)", "\u00b7 Nisei Park (3 submissions)", "\u00b7 Vida Park (3 submissions)", "Subsequent to the survey closing, a few community members sent emails to the Recreation and Parks Commission recommending another name, Gandara Park. Additional information regarding each of the aforementioned suggested names is available in Attachment G.", "In an effort to engage the community beyond the survey, outreach has continued throughout the naming process. Prior to each public hearing related to the naming of Buffer Park, email notifications were sent to subscribers of the park\u2019s interest list including those who completed a naming survey and provided an email address. Lastly, a public notice was sent the week of March 7, 2016 to all current residents and business and property owners within a quarter-mile of Stewart Street Park to inform them that renaming the park, along with the naming of Buffer Park, would be considered at the March 17, 2016 Recreation and Parks Commission meeting and the April 26, 2016 Council meeting.", "Commission and Council Action", "The Recreation and Parks Commission initially considered the full list of Buffer Park name recommendations at its meeting on November 20, 2014 (Attachment H). Following public comment and discussion, the Commission approved a motion to recommend to Council the consideration of two potential names for the park currently known as Buffer Park: Gandara Park and Heroes Park.", "The name Gandara Park was recommended by the Recreation and Parks Commission to memorialize and honor Private Joe Gandara, a Santa Monica native who was fatally wounded by enemy fire in World War II at the age of 20. Although hailed a war hero, he was passed over for awards and medals at the time of his death due to his Hispanic heritage. In March 2014, Private Joe Gandara was posthumously awarded the Medal of Honor by President Obama in recognition of his heroism and valor. Private Gandara\u2019s niece, Miriam Adams, has formally expressed her support for naming Buffer Park in honor of her uncle (see Attachment I). As an alternative to Gandara Park, the Recreation and Parks Commission recommended considering the name Heroes Park to honor all Santa Monica military service-members, war heroes, and veterans with the possibility of certain areas of the park being named in honor of individuals (e.g. Private Gandara and George Ishihara).", "On January 26, 2016, Council considered the Recreation and Parks Commission\u2019s name recommendations for Buffer Park on January 26, 2016 (Attachment J) and noted that public comment provided at the meeting and written correspondence received prior to the meeting were primarily divided between two names: Gandara Park and George Ishihara Memorial Park. Based on the close proximity of Buffer Park to Stewart Street Park, Councilmembers discussed the possibility of naming Buffer Park in honor of George Ishihara and renaming Stewart Street Park in honor of Private Gandara. Since the renaming of Stewart Street Park was not noticed on the January 26, 2016 meeting agenda, Council deferred selecting a name for Buffer Park and directed staff to return to the Recreation and Parks Commission for a public hearing to consider the Commission\u2019s previous name recommendations for the park and to also consider renaming Stewart Street Park (Attachment K).", "Per Council\u2019s direction, on March 17, 2016 the Recreation and Parks Commission considered options for naming Buffer Park and also considered renaming Stewart Street Park (Attachment L). Following public input and a thorough discussion, the Commission approved a motion to recommend Gandara Park as the official name for Buffer Park for Council consideration and to maintain the existing name of Stewart Street Park. The Commission also recommended Heroes Park and Citizens Park as alternative names for Buffer Park for Council to consider. In adopting this motion, Commissioners expressed that these alternative names would be to honor all community heroes rather than a single person.", "Alternatives", "Council could select a name for Buffer Park that is different from those recommended by the Recreation and Parks Commission and could decide to rename Stewart Street Park with a name selection of their choosing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2016.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Recommendation to accept Rebecca Lantry's resignation from the Commission on the Status of Women and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1523579400": [[{"Title": "Proclamation recognizing Municipal Clerks Week", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}, {"Title": "City Manager's Report: Santa Monica Public Library's Reading--2-Go Program", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Professional Services Agreement for Electronic Plan Check Management System, ProjectDox Upgrade", "Department": "Information Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Professional Services Agreement with Avolve Software, an Arizona-based company, for implementation and integration services to upgrade the Electronic Plan Check Management System, ProjectDox. This recommended award is made as an exception to the competitive bidding process pursuant to Section 2.24.080 (d) and is for a total amount not to exceed $158,672, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and 2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City uses Avolve Software\u2019s Electronic Plan Check Management System, ProjectDox, to enable the public, design professionals, and architects to upload and track their electronic plan submittals through the City\u2019s plan check process. Using ProjectDox, staff can then review and comment on submitted plans, compare original submittals against subsequent submittals, and approve the plans online. The current version of ProjectDox runs on obsolete technology that Avolve Software no longer supports and does not integrate with the City\u2019s new Land Based Management System, Accela Automation (AA). An upgrade to the current version of ProjectDox is required to prevent future system failure, which would disable electronic plan check processing. The upgrade would also allow the City to receive critical system updates, vendor support, and enable the integration of ProjectDox with AA. Staff recommends executing a sole source professional services agreement with Avolve Software for upgrade, implementation, and integration services for ProjectDox. The total cost of the upgrade is $593,349, including $158,672 for the professional services agreement with Avolve Software, $351,676 for the infrastructure build-out and server licensing, and $83,001 for the first year contribution towards the Computer Equipment Replacement Program (CERP) for future server replacement.", "Background", "In 1989, the City implemented the permitting software system, Permits Plus, to manage the increasing demand for permitting services related to building construction and improvements. As the technology infrastructure to support permitting services grew over the years, the City did not have a system to efficiently manage the plan check process. In order to enhance City services related to plan check processing, improve efficiencies, and promote environmentally sustainable practices, the City sought to purchase an electronic plan check submittal and review system that would integrate with Permits Plus.", "In July 2009, the City released the Request for Proposals (RFP) to purchase an Electronic Plan Check Management System. Avolve Software was the only respondent. Avolve Software\u2019s ProjectDox was selected based on price; the quality of the software product; the ability, capacity, and skill of the vendor to provide an Electronic Plan Check Management System; and the vendor\u2019s client base, which included agencies with comparable system requirements and services.", "On November 10, 2009 (Attachment A), Council authorized an agreement with Avolve Software in the amount of $298,000 to implement and maintain ProjectDox, an Electronic Plan Check Management System that allows the public and staff to submit, review, and manage plans electronically. The agreement with Avolve Software included software implementation, one-time licensing, maintenance, and technical support over a three-year period.", "On July 13, 2011, the City and Avolve Software modified the agreement to include maintenance support of the integration between the permitting system, Permits Plus, and ProjectDox at no additional cost.", "On June 11, 2013 (Attachment B), Council approved a second modification of the agreement with Avolve Software in the amount of $77,868 to cover maintenance and support for an additional two years, extending the term to September 7, 2015.", "On August 25, 2015 (Attachment C), Council approved the modification of the agreement with Avolve Software in the amount of $225,380 to provide maintenance and support for an additional five years, extending the term to September 7, 2020. The remaining terms of this maintenance agreement are still valid and will be applied to the upgraded version of ProjectDox.", "On September 18, 2015, Avolve Software notified staff that certain components of the City\u2019s version of ProjectDox had become obsolete and would no longer be maintained or supported. Users have encountered an increasing number of technical issues that cannot be resolved without temporary workarounds, since the City\u2019s version no longer receives critical updates. Therefore, ProjectDox\u2019s imminent failure is likely without an upgrade.", "Discussion", "An upgrade to the current version of ProjectDox would ensure the continued performance of electronic plan checks. Both the community and staff use ProjectDox to submit, review, and process building and construction plans electronically. Using ProjectDox has eliminated the need to submit and review paper plans, reduced travel time and costs for community users, and improved departmental coordination in processing plans.", "The City\u2019s current version of ProjectDox uses obsolete technology and is, therefore, becoming cumbersome to maintain and has become unreliable. Moreover, the current version does not integrate with the new Land Based Management System, Accela Automation, which replaced Permits Plus in December 2014. The lack of integration requires staff to perform redundant data entry in both ProjectDox and Accela Automation. Implementing an upgraded version of ProjectDox would resolve existing system issues on a permanent basis, mitigate the risk of future system failure through the use of supported technologies, enable integration with the current Land Based Management System, and enable features that increase productivity and mobility, such as using mobile applications in the field. Staff would manage Avolve Software, which is responsible for configuring and installing ProjectDox on the City\u2019s server environment. Staff would be responsible for the daily system administration of ProjectDox post-implementation and for escalating technical issues to Avolve Software as needed.", "The system would be installed and hosted on the City\u2019s server environment. The upgraded version of ProjectDox is more robust than the current version and requires significant improvements to the existing server infrastructure. To support the upgraded system, the City would implement enhanced server technology that includes an advanced operating system and a robust database engine to ensure functionality and seamless deployment. This self-hosted solution would require $351,676 in one-time funds to build the server infrastructure and purchase related server licensing fees. Ongoing server licensing and future hardware replacement costs would be in an annual amount of $83,001. During the FY2015-16 mid-year budget process, Council approved a budget appropriation of $320,215 to pay for hosting the software on Avolve Software\u2019s cloud environment. At the time, staff proposed using Avolve Software\u2019s hosted (cloud based) software model; however, upon further review of the system\u2019s infrastructure needs, staff identified long-term cost savings associated with hosting the system internally. Staff would purchase hardware as needed, returning to Council for approval as appropriate.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In July 2009, the City published the Request for Proposals (RFP) for an Electronic Plan Check Management System in accordance with City specifications. The RFP was posted in the Santa Monica Daily Press. The City received one proposal on August 10, 2009. A selection committee comprised of staff from the Information Systems Department, Planning and Community Development Department, and Public Works Department evaluated the proposal and found that Avolve Software was a responsive bidder. Avolve Software offered viable pricing and provided similar systems and services to other municipalities, including the State of Idaho, the City of Lancaster (CA), the City of Santa Clarita (CA), and the City of Miami (FL).", "On September 18, 2015, Avolve Software ceased support and maintenance of the City\u2019s version of ProjectDox due to the obsolescence of certain technical components. Staff anticipated this termination of vendor support and began to review Electronic Plan Check Management Systems. Staff reviewed the only two competitive Electronic Plan Check Management Systems that integrate with the City\u2019s Land Based Management System, Accela Automation, and determined that these systems currently lack the functionality of processing and tracking plans through multiple reviews. Staff found that the upgraded version of Avolve Software\u2019s ProjectDox was the only system that provided the essential functionalities to review and approve plan checks within a user-friendly interface as well as the integration with Accela Automation.", "The City has invested considerable time in training staff and the public to use the ProjectDox system and in developing the processes and systems integration to provide seamless service delivery. Implementing a different system at this time would result in delays in the plan check process and costs to the City that would negatively impact customer service and disrupt the City\u2019s ability to provide an environmentally friendly and efficient plan submittal and review process. Moreover, the current version of ProjectDox requires an urgent upgrade due to its obsolescence and limited vendor support. Avolve Software\u2019s responsiveness and familiarity with the City\u2019s process would allow a smooth transition to the upgraded system.", "Staff recommends Avolve Software to provide the Electronic Plan Check Management System upgrade, implementation and integration services on a sole source basis. The advanced technology and features that Avolve Software has developed for its ProjectDox system are only supported and can only be maintained by Avolve Software. Therefore, this sole source purchase is necessary to ensure uninterrupted service continuity and integration of the ProjectDox system, as specified in SMMC 2.24.080 (d) Competition does not exist because only one vendor possesses the unique ability or capability to meet the particular requirements of the solicitation, such as a good or service that is copyrighted, patented or otherwise only available from one license holder.", "The City Manager approved a Justification for Working with an Arizona Based Company on April 7, 2011, since Avolve Software is the only authorized vendor able to support and maintain ProjectDox and is headquartered in Arizona.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The total cost of the system upgrade is $593,349, including $158,672 for the Avolve contract related to the upgrade services, $351,676 for the infrastructure build-out and server licensing, and $83,001 for the first year contribution towards the Computer Equipment Replacement Program (CERP) for future server replacement.", "The agreement to be awarded to Avolve Software is for an amount not to exceed $158,672. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C018008.589000.", "The transfer of funds in the amount of $434,676 to the Information Technology Replacement Services Fund for infrastructure build-out, server licensing, and first year CERP contribution requires the following FY2015-16 budget changes:", "\u00b7 Transfer $227,600 to account IS010003.589000 from accounts 01321.533580 ($176,057), S010210.589000 ($50,000), and C018008.589000 ($1,543);", "\u00b7 Appropriate $207,076 to account IS010003.589000; and", "\u00b7 Increase revenue budget of $434,676 at 55243.402660 to reflect receipt of the funds.", "The transfer of funds to the Information Technology Replacement Services Fund for the second year CERP contribution will be included in the Proposed FY 2016-17 Budget. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Contract for Community Sustainability Programs", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #63 to Community Partners, a California-based company for the development and outreach of Santa Monica\u2019s Community Sustainability Programs;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Community Partners, in an amount not to exceed$250,000 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options in the amount of $250,000, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $1,250,000 over a five year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "For over twenty years, the City of Santa Monica has provided Community Sustainability Programs to facilitate the adoption of sustainable practices in the community and to engage diverse stakeholders to meet the goals set forth in the Santa Monica Sustainable City Plan. In November 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP) #63 inviting individuals and consulting firms to propose their services to develop Community Sustainability Programs. After reviewing the two proposals received, staff recommends Community Partners for its services in an amount not to exceed $250,000 for one year, with four additional one-year renewal options in the amount of $250,000, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $1,250,000 over a five year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. Community Partners is a duly registered public charity, exempt from Federal Income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) and 509(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.", "Background", "In September 1994, City Council adopted the Santa Monica Sustainable City Program which set long-term internal and city-wide goals for sustainability. In February 2003, City Council adopted an updated and expanded version of the program called the Sustainable City Plan. The Sustainable City Plan was updated again in 2006 and 2012 and now addresses 9 main goal areas: 1) Resource Conservation, (2) Environmental and Public Health, (3) Transportation, (4) Economic Development, (5) Open Space and Land Use, (6) Housing, (7) Community Education and Civic Participation, (8) Human Dignity, and (9) Arts and Culture.", "Since 2001, based on evaluations of the City\u2019s progress in achieving the goals established in the Sustainable City Program and Plan, the City contracted with Sustainable Works, a project of Community Partners, to provide services for residential, student and business greening programs, funded a Community Sustainability Liaison, and partnered on both a green business certification program and the annual Sustainable Quality Awards. These programs were designed to educate community stakeholders and engage them in actions that provided meaningful results.", "In November 2015, The City invited proposals from qualified persons or firms interested in providing these Community Sustainability Programs. The goal was to ensure that both historic and new programs delivered in Santa Monica are representative of the most innovative, results oriented, community engaging programs available. These programs should facilitate the adoption of sustainable practices in the community and engage diverse stakeholders to meet the goals set forth in the Sustainable City Plan.", "Discussion", "The Santa Monica Community Sustainability Programs would continue to consist of projects and services for residents, students and businesses. The consultant would be responsible for managing existing programs, developing new programs, producing program materials, convening relevant stakeholder groups, and engaging diverse community members in order to continue to achieve the goals established in the Sustainable City Plan.", "The development of the Community Sustainability Programs will achieve the following objectives and goals:", "1. Design and implement free business greening program for at least 30 businesses annually, coordinate the Green Business Certification Program, and coordinate the Sustainable Quality Awards.", "2. Design and implement a free student greening program for at least 350 students annually at the community college and/or high school level, including a robust volunteering program for participants.", "3. Design and implement a free community sustainability program that includes, but is not limited to, management of the annual Sustainable Santa Monica Poster Contest, and produce Sustainable Santa Monica Film screenings at least 4 times per year.", "4. Identify and implement innovative community engagement opportunities for stakeholders to implement sustainable practices, including coordinating Santa Monica specific events within larger regional, state, and national community engagement campaigns.", "5. Provide technical and policy support to the City of Santa Monica Office of Sustainability and the Environment.", "Contractor Selection", "In November 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals (RFP) #63 inviting individuals and consulting firms to propose their services to develop the City of Santa Monica\u2019s Community Sustainability Programs. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site. 702 vendors were notified and 71 prospective vendors downloaded the RFP. Two vendors responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Office of Sustainability and the Environment and the Housing and Economic Development Department. Three Squares, Inc. and Sustainable Works submitted proposals. The evaluation process was based on the proposed consultants\u2019 1) experience, 2) outreach materials and documents, 3) staff and project teams, 4) budget proposal, 5) program innovation and creativity, and 6) references and proximity to Santa Monica. Three Squares, Inc. had a final score of 81%. Sustainable Works had a final score of 91%. Additional discussions and reference checks followed.", "Staff recommends Sustainable Works, a project of Community Partners, as the most qualified firm to undertake this project. Community Partners serves as the fiscal sponsor for Sustainable Works and is a duly registered public charity, exempt from Federal Income taxation under Section 501\u00a9(3) and 509(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code. Sustainable Works, located in Santa Monica, is recommended based on the team\u2019s demonstrated expertise in civic engagement, community outreach, event activities, and familiarity with the Santa Monica community. The lead members of the team have been involved in designing and implementing projects and programs in both Santa Monica and the Southern California region since 1998 and have maintained a working contract with the City of Santa Monica since 2001.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Community Partners is for an amount not to exceed $1,250,000. Funds of $250,000 are included in the FY 2016-17 budget plan in the City Manager\u2019s Office. The contract will be charged to account 01226.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of One Compressed Natural Gas Asphalt Patch Truck", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award Bid #4221 to Los Angeles Freightliner, a California-based company for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Asphalt Patch Truck;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Los Angeles Freightliner for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Asphalt Patch Truck in an amount not to exceed $294,164, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for pothole repair, sidewalk patching, and repair to eroded and low areas in the streets and alleyways. This purchase would replace one asphalt patch truck that has reached the end of its cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In February 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Asphalt Patch Truck. After reviewing the one bid and \u201cNo Bid Forms\u201d received, staff recommends Los Angeles Freightliner as the sole and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG Asphalt Patch Truck in the amount of $294,164. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing a vehicle powered by CNG.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The existing vehicle has a cost-effective useful life span of ten years. The current vehicle was purchased in 2005 and is 11 years old.", "An asphalt truck is a specialized piece of equipment designed specifically for mobile patching. The cab and chassis are standard except for the CNG engine, but the back, or box, is designed specifically for the transport and placement of asphalt for potholes, sidewalk patching, and some overlays. They are manufactured by a small number of companies throughout the country and there are very few local companies that can provide this type of equipment, especially with a California Air Resources Board (CARB) certified CNG engine.", "The Public Works Department\u2019s Street Maintenance section utilizes the asphalt patch truck to repair potholes, to perform sidewalk patching, and repair eroded and low areas in the street and alleyways. It is also used to repair areas where tree roots have lifted paved areas along curb lanes. Hot patching of uplifted sidewalks and the repair of potholes in the street and alleys in a timely manner helps keep the community\u2019s right-of-way safe.", "The asphalt patch truck is extremely important in keeping the Street Maintenance section\u2019s workload on schedule and the community\u2019s right-of-way safe. Since July 1, 2015 to date, 732 pothole repairs were performed with an additional 7,123 square feet of general asphalt repair; for a total of 26,177 square feet of repairs. The patch truck also assists with hot-patch repairs. 1,563 hot-patches have been completed year to date.", "Example of a CNG Asphalt Patch Truck", "Vendor Selection", "In February 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver one CNG Asphalt Patch Truck, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 541 vendors were notified and 10 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on February 25, 2016 per Attachment A. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; two \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms were received from Nixon-Egli Equipment Company and Reynolds Buick. Nixon-Egli did not bid as a primary bidder because they are the subcontractor in Los Angeles Freightliner\u2019s bid. Reynolds Buick stated they are unable to supply the goods specified because they do not have a chassis that meets the specifications.", "The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, staff recommends Los Angeles Freightliner as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG Asphalt Patch Truck in the amount of $294,164.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Los Angeles Freightliner is for an amount not to exceed $294,164. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "2016 Federal and State Legislative Agendas", "Department": "City Council", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the attached 2016 federal and state legislative agendas detailing policy positions which reflect the City\u2019s historic legislative priorities, Council-adopted policies, and the City\u2019s five strategic goals.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In 2015 Council was presented with a proposed federal legislative agenda for consideration and approval, which included broad statements of support or opposition to programs, policies, or concepts. Additionally, for many years the Council has taken positions on proposed state and federal legislation of interest to Santa Monica both when presented by staff in packages or on a case-by case basis.", "For 2016, staff is taking a slightly different approach and presenting Council with comprehensive federal and state legislative agendas that will guide the City\u2019s legislative actions throughout the year and create additional transparency for the City\u2019s legislative advocacy work. These legislative priorities were drafted based on Council\u2019s previously stated positions which are detailed in the attached compendium, the City\u2019s five strategic goals (Local Control of the Santa Monica Airport, An Affordable and Diverse Community, Mobility, Addressing Homelessness, and Learn and Thrive) and are responsive to bills introduced this legislative session.", "Background", "The City\u2019s federal lobbyist (The Ferguson Group), whose current contract was approved on June 11, 2013, in collaboration with senior City staff, has annually developed a federal legislative agenda, which details the City\u2019s historic and emerging legislative priorities and advocacy strategies to achieve the City\u2019s defined goals and forward-thinking objectives (Attachment A). Additionally, City staff, in consultation with the City\u2019s State lobbyist (Shaw/Yoder/Antwih), whose current contract was also approved on June 11, 2013, have analyzed and tracked individual pieces of legislation of interest to Santa Monica because of the City\u2019s location, economy, programs, policies, or other experiences. In the past, bills were often brought before the Council individually or in packages for Council consideration to support or oppose the proposed legislation.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s federal and state lobbyists work to further the City\u2019s legislative objectives in Congress, the State Legislature, and before state and federal agencies. They monitor legislation, appropriation opportunities, and liaise with elected officials and their staffs. Both firms, working in collaboration with senior staff, have developed proposed legislative agendas to guide the City\u2019s legislative advocacy throughout the year. Having legislative platforms at both the federal and state level that capture City policies and goals will create additional transparency and enable staff to quickly weigh in on matters of legislative importance.", "These agendas articulate past actions on specific bills and established City policies in general terms as well as propose positions based on current legislation, adopted Council policies and aspirations, and the City\u2019s five strategic goals (Local Control of the Santa Monica Airport, An Affordable and Diverse Community, Mobility, Addressing Homelessness, and Learn and Thrive). Adoption of the agendas would be a public statement by the Council of its legislative priorities. This action, combined with the existing authority to act in concurrence with the League of CA Cities\u2019 position, which was approved by Council on August 25, 2015, would allow staff to act quickly on legislative items of particular concern to Santa Monica.", "The City\u2019s proposed 2016 federal legislative agenda (Attachment B) reflects past Council action and positions on federal legislation and policies and programs as well as current and emerging issues of importance to the City. The federal legislative agenda addresses the following policy areas:", "\u00b7 Education", "\u00b7 Energy/Environment", "\u00b7 Homelessness", "\u00b7 Housing/Economic Development", "\u00b7 Parks and Recreation", "\u00b7 Police and Fire", "\u00b7 Taxes", "\u00b7 Telecommunications", "\u00b7 Transportation", "\u00b7 Waste and Wastewater Infrastructure", "\u00b7 Workforce Investment Act/Jobs", "The City\u2019s proposed 2016 state legislative agenda (Attachment C) was compiled from the Council\u2019s historic actions and positions on specific bills as detailed in the City\u2019s legislative compendium (Attachment D). The compendium is indexed to the proposed legislative agenda; historic actions informed the proposed policy statements. In addition, staff has reviewed bills introduced into the 2016-2017 legislative session for local impact and congruence with Council-adopted strategic goals and City programs, policies, and strategies and incorporated pending relevant legislation into proposed positions for the following topics:", "\u00b7 Airport", "\u00b7 Arts and Culture", "\u00b7 Data", "\u00b7 Civil Liberties", "\u00b7 Civic Engagement", "\u00b7 Coastal Issues", "\u00b7 Consumer Protection", "\u00b7 Economic Development", "\u00b7 Education", "\u00b7 Employment and Wages", "\u00b7 Financial Sustainability", "\u00b7 Health", "\u00b7 Homelessness", "\u00b7 Housing", "\u00b7 Land Use", "\u00b7 Mobility", "\u00b7 Parks and Open Space", "\u00b7 Public Libraries", "\u00b7 Public Safety", "\u00b7 Rent Control", "\u00b7 Sustainability", "\u00b7 Telecommunications", "\u00b7 Utilities", "\u00b7 Youth", "The policy positions are generally broad and address many issues likely to be of concern to the City. Staff and consultants will consistently monitor and analyze state legislation to determine possible local impacts and strategize about the type and timing of advocacy efforts. Action will be based on the positions the Council adopts, guidance from subject-matter experts and the League of California Cities, and local context.", "However, it is possible that an issue may arise that is not addressed in the platforms. The platforms can be amended by Council as emerging priorities or legislation arise that warrant immediate consideration and action.", "The City\u2019s actions on individual bills, usually in the form of a letter from the Mayor, are available on line at <smgov.net/council> and selecting Legislative Positions <http://www.smgov.net/Departments/Council/nodate.aspx?id=51755>. Actions taken based on the federal and state legislative agenda would be archived on this page, as would the adopted legislative agendas.", "Next Steps", "The Ferguson Group and Shaw/Yoder/Antwih will continue to actively monitor legislation and engage on the City\u2019s behalf to effect change in line with the Council\u2019s adopted legislative platforms. Staff will continue to work with both firms to prepare letters to bill authors, co-sponsors, and members of relevant committees to communicate the City\u2019s position on said legislation. Staff will return to Council in 2017 with that year\u2019s proposed legislative agendas for Council\u2019s consideration.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Memorandum of Understanding with Metro for Production and Airing of \"Metro Motion\"", "Department": "City Manager's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to enter into a one year Memorandum of Understanding to partner with Metro for CityTV production and airing of \u201cMetro Motion\u201d, a mobility related series, with an option to renew for one additional year. Shows are produced quarterly at a cost of $7,500 per episode, equating to $30,000 per year.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff requests Council authorization for the City Manager to enter into a one year Memorandum of Understanding with Metro to partner with CityTV to produce and air \u201cMetro Motion\u201d a television series focusing on transportation. Four shows are produced per year at an annual cost of $30,000, with reimbursement to the City by Metro.", "Background", "Santa Monica CityTV and Metro have partnered to produce a program for Metro, \u201cMetro Motion\u201d, for more than a decade. \u201cMetro Motion\u201d is a half-hour series covering a wide range of transportation issues, while encouraging viewers to use public transit. The series gives viewers a closer look at new projects, offers a better understanding of the many Metro programs and services, and airs on CityTV, channel 16 as well as approximately 50 government access stations across the Los Angeles region and on Metro\u2019s YouTube channel.", "Discussion", "\u201cMetro Motion\u201d is a valuable outreach tool for Metro, particularly at this time, when Metro is working to convey their messages to the public, and there are many achievements to celebrate. This collaborative working relationship between CityTV and Metro is especially important with the Expo Light Rail to Santa Monica poised to open in May 2016. Metro desires to produce one episode of \u201cMetro Motion\u201d per quarter with CityTV. This effort is in support of mobility, one of Council\u2019s approved strategic goals.", "The Office of Communications seeks to formalize the relationship with Metro by entering into a Memorandum of Understanding outlining responsibilities and costs associated with the work performed by CityTV. Production of \u201cMetro Motion\u201d involves use of the CityTV studio and equipment, City staff and City contractors, at an annual cost of $30,000 for four episodes per year. The $7,500 cost per episode is outlined below.", "Service", "Flat Rate", "Breakdown", "Producer Fee", "$ 800", "Flat Rate", "Director Fee", "$ 200", "Flat Rate", "Writer Fee", "$ 360", "Flat Rate", "Shoot Days", "$ 2,800", "$400 per day, 7 days", "Reporter Fee", "$ 2,000", "Per package, 5 total", "Show Host Fee", "$ 400", "Per host", "Editing Fee", "$ 940", "$40/hour, 24 hours", "$ 7,500", "TOTAL", "Metro would reimburse the City for the $7,500 in costs associated with the production of each Metro Motion episode. Staff anticipates two Metro Motion shows would be produced during the remainder of FY 2015-16 with a total revenue of $15,000, and four episodes would be produced during FY 2016-17 with a total revenue of $30,000.", "Next Steps", "The Office of Communications is working with the Finance Department to establish a comprehensive rate schedule for CityTV to expand its services to provide production services for other organizations; the rates will be included in the master fee resolution presented to Council with the FY 2016-17 proposed budget. In addition, the Office of Communications will participate in the fee study to be conducted by the Finance Department during FY 2016-17 and will modify fees as appropriate for FY 2017-18.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The production of quarterly \u201cMetro Motion\u201d shows will generate revenues of $15,000 for the remainder FY 2015-16 and $30,000 for FY 2016-17, which will be deposited in account #01207.405200."]}, {"Title": "Negotiate and Execute Professional Service Agreement for the Edison Language Academy Safe Routes to School Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:Award RFP# SP2395 to Alta Planning and Design, a California-based company, to provide engineering design services for the Edison Language Academy State Safe Routes to School (SR2S) Project.Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Alta Planning and Design, a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $102,914 (includes all optional tasks).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Edison Language Academy State Safe Routes to School Project is a safe routes to school effort, and one of the phases of the overall Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) Final Concept Plan adopted by City Council in February 2014. The project places an emphasis on safety and multi-modal connectivity to aid students in walking and biking to and from Edison Language Academy, located at 2402 Virginia Avenue between Pico Boulevard (south), 10 Freeway (north), Cloverfield Boulevard (west), and Stewart Street (east). The project encompasses a non-linear segment that has turns and various crossings at high volume streets such as Cloverfield Boulevard and 20th Street, and on Stewart and Delaware Streets. Improving the visibility of pedestrians, signage, pavement markings and way finding are critical to this segment to increase active transportation and improve safety, both goals of the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), the Bike Action Plan, and the Pedestrian Action Plan. Street crossings would be enhanced by decreasing crossing distances and implementing crosswalk markings. Staff recommends Alta Planning and Design to provide engineering design services to design and construct curb extensions, a median refuge island, way finding signage and pavement markings in the vicinity of Edison Language Academy in an amount not to exceed $102,914.", "Background", "The 2010 Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) expresses the community\u2019s shared vision for livable neighborhoods, and for streets designed for all people. The greenway concept is one of the plan\u2019s 12 Transportation Principles, which states that street design follows from place to function, meaning streets are designed and managed to support the places and neighborhoods they serve and to balance the needs of everyone that travels along them. Neighborhood Greenways are one example of low stress active transportation corridors intended to help implement livable streets. The Bike Action Plan instated goals to increase bicycling and making it fun, convenient and comfortable for everyone.", "The Edison Language Academy State Safe Routes to School Project was awarded State Safe Routes to School Grant funding though the State Highway Account in an amount of $369,700 for design and construction in June 2012. The grant request was to design and construct a safe routes to school neighborhood greenway in the vicinity of Edison Language Academy. Implementation features consist of curb extensions, a median refuge island, way finding signage and pavement markings. Since 2012, the City has been obtaining necessary clearances from the California Department of Transportation, completing internal scheduling, and undertaking contractor procurement procedures.", "The Safe Routes to School initiative is an international movement that aims to increase the number of children who walk or bicycle to school by funding projects that remove the barriers that currently prevent them from doing so.Those barriers include lack of infrastructure, safety concerns, lack of programs that promote walking and bicycling through education/encouragement programs aimed at children, parents, and the community.", "In February 2014, Council adopted the Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) Final Concept Plan, as shown in Attachments A and B. This plan describes the community\u2019s vision for a Neighborhood Greenway through the Pico Neighborhood in Santa Monica, from the Bergamot area to the beach. The document outlines the process and proposes design criteria and implementation strategies for the MANGo route. The origin for the MANGo concept was the Bike Action Plan which proposed low stress active transportation corridors called Neighborhood Greenways which are intended to create a livable street environment. The project is supported by the City\u2019s LUCE adopted in 2010 and the recently adopted Pedestrian Action Plan.", "Detailed existing conditions and suggested improvements for streets and intersections along the Greenway are shown in Attachment C. In addition to the Greenway improvements, a traffic study would be performed to determine the feasibility of eliminating vehicular left turning and north-south through movements at the intersection of Pico Boulevard and 30th Street. If warranted, implementation of a median refuge diverter near the centerline of Pico Boulevard would allow cyclists and potentially pedestrians to cross Pico Boulevard in two steps, increasing comfortable opportunities to cross safely.", "Discussion", "Edison Language Academy is located in the Pico neighborhood between the Santa Monica Freeway and Pico Boulevard. The majority of the corridor traverses a densely used area that is home to some 22,500 residents. Students and staff walking and biking to school face numerous obstacles to access the school. The major challenges to school access include navigating the high-volume streets that surround the Edison Language Academy campus, and making pedestrians visible when crossing the street given the prevalence of on-street parking. Stewart St., Virginia Ave. and Kansas Ave. are the current bike and walking routes. However, unless originating from the immediate neighborhood, travelers must navigate the larger streets bordering the campus including Cloverfield Boulevard to the west and Pico Boulevard to the south. Street traffic on Stewart and Delaware streets create an additional barrier to access. Students and families have limited options to get to school and are forced to use routes that are not optimal for walking and biking.", "The final design process would utilize a range of treatments and studies in order to establish bicycle and pedestrian connections, and manage vehicle activity near the school site. Major program components would include the following:", "\u00b7 Shared lane striping to alert drivers that the road is also for bicycle users.", "\u00b7 Curb extensions and Median Refuge to minimize crossing distances, and visually reduce road widths which encourage motorists to reduce speeds.", "\u00b7 New Crosswalk striping.", "\u00b7 Traffic study to determine the feasibility of implementing a new median refuge near the centerline of Pico Boulevard at the intersection of Pico Boulevard and 30th Street/Dorchester Street which will facilitate pedestrian and bicycle crossing while reducing vehicle cut-through on neighborhood streets.", "\u00b7 Educational and Outreach Programs instructing users on the proper use of the facilities, as well educating motorists on passenger loading procedures and ways to improve traffic circulation.", "Next Steps", "Alta Planning and Design would prepare up to two schematic designs of the corridor which would subsequently be used for public outreach. Once vetted, the design would be presented to City Council for final approval. After a schematic design is approved by City Council, final design would commence.", "Consultant Selection", "On July 1, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposal to obtain design engineering services for the Edison Language Academy SR2S Project. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 1,025 vendors were notified, 50 vendors downloaded the RFP. On July 29, 2015, two proposals from Alta Planning and Design and from Engineering Resources of Southern California, Inc. were received. Staff conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; two \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms were received from Nishkian Chamberlain, Inc. and Transpo Group. Nishkian Chamberlain, Inc. did not bid because the services identified were not conducive with the consulting services they provide. Transpo Group did not bid because they could not secure the appropriate teaming partner for the project.", "A selection committee consisting of staff from the Civil Engineering Division and the Strategic and Transportation Planning Division reviewed the proposals. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, as well as selection criteria following Caltrans Local Assistance Procedures Manual (LAPM) guidelines which included understanding of the project\u2019s scope, direct experience on similar projects, qualifications of the proposed staff, capability of developing innovative or advanced techniques, familiarity with state and federal procedures, financial responsibility, and demonstrated technical ability.", "On August 18, 2015, the selection committee concluded the evaluation and recommended Alta Planning and Design to provide design engineering services for this project. Alta Planning and Design demonstrated extensive knowledge and experience by successfully completing similar capital improvement projects in the cities of Santa Monica, Long Beach, San Diego, Santa Clarita, and Berkeley. Alta Planning and Design also demonstrated through past projects its ability to offer experienced design teams that can complete project designs in an expeditious manner and at competitive hourly rates. Staff recommends Alta Planning and Design as the best qualified firm to provide design engineering services for the Edison Language Academy State Safe Routes to School (SR2S) Project.", "Caltrans Local Assistance Procedures Manual guidelines do not consider cost in the evaluation process. Since this project is funded by Caltrans, staff followed the LAPM guidelines and finalized cost negotiations by February 2016, six months after bid award.", "Tentative Schedule", "The design phase would be completed in seven months. The construction phase is expected to start in spring of 2017 for a duration of four months. The expected scope of work for Alta Planning and Design would include, but not be limited to, the following:", "\u00b7 Project Management", "\u00b7 Schematic Design", "\u00b7 Topographic Survey", "\u00b7 Traffic Study", "\u00b7 Design and Construction Plans and Specifications", "\u00b7 Opinion of Construction Cost", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The professional services agreement to be awarded to Alta Planning and Design is for an amount not to exceed $102,914.", "Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget and in the FY 2015-16 Planning and Community Development Department in the following accounts:", "Account No. Description FY15-16", "C209102.589000 Edison Language Academy Safe Routes  $ 41,100", "C014073.589000 Bicycle Project Ready & Match  $ 4,600", "01267.555061 LUCE Measuring & Monitoring  $ 47,214", "Total        $92,914", "Awarding the professional services agreement requires the appropriation of $10,000 in TDA Article III Bicycle and Pedestrian Funds to account C209102.589100, Edison Language Academy Safe Routes \u2013 TDA. This appropriation will be more than offset by a budget reduction of $135,120 from account C209099.589100, Citywide Signal Detection \u2013 TDA, as that budgeted grant match will not be needed until FY 2018-19 and will be budgeted at that time."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Authorizing the Library Director to Request Affiliation With the Southern California Library Cooperative", "Department": "Library Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution authorizing the Library Director to request affiliation with and waiver from deadlines of the Southern California Library Cooperative (SCLC) in order to be reinstated as a full member under the California Library Services Act (CLSA).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Santa Monica Public Library (SMPL) has the opportunity to participate in Southern California Library Cooperative (SCLC) which is the local consortium of library systems supported by the California State Library in accordance with the California Library Services Act (CLSA). It is a valuable source for professional development and resource sharing for its 38 member libraries.", "In July 2013, when the Santa Monica Public Library implemented a non-resident fee, it was disqualified from full membership in SCLC because it no longer participated in the Universal Borrowing provision of CLSA, which extends loan service to residents of all other California public library jurisdictions.", "Background", "In 1969 SMPL first became a member of the Metropolitan Library System, which was the precursor to the SCLC system.", "Resolution No. 3769 was adopted by Santa Monica City Council on August 13, 1968 authorizing the Librarian of the Santa Monica Public Library to make application to the California State Librarian and to the Metropolitan Library System to permit Santa Monica Public Library to become a part of such system; and approving and adopting the plan of service of said Metropolitan Library System (MLS).", "MLS underwent several evolutions since 1969, and one of those was the transition to SCLC in 2009. SMPL remained a full member until the adoption of a non-resident fee in July 2013 disqualified SMPL from full membership in SCLC because it no longer participated in the Universal Borrowing provision of CLSA.", "The non-resident fee was adopted as part of the FY 2013-15 Biennial Budget to help offset projected budget shortfalls. However, revenues were 60% less than originally anticipated and continued to decrease in FY 2015-16.", "The non-resident fee was an issue that came up frequently during the Library\u2019s strategic planning process. Local organizations including the Library Board, the Innovation Technology Task Force and the Friends of the Library Board overwhelmingly advocated for dropping the fee. On December 10, 2015 the Library Board passed a motion to eliminate the non-resident library card fee and sustain the Library\u2019s budget at current levels.", "On January 26, 2016 City Council voted to eliminate the $25 non-resident library card fee effective February 1, 2016 (Attachment A).", "Discussion", "The elimination of the non-resident fee enables SMPL to rejoin SCLC as a full member. By becoming a full member SMPL will benefit in professional development and resource sharing.", "SCLC is a consortium of 38 independent city, county and special district public libraries located in Los Angeles and Ventura counties. Member libraries agree to comply with CLSA in providing library service to the residents of all participating jurisdictions. SCLC provides member libraries with a resource-sharing network and a means for enhancing the level and diversity of resources available to library users, while reducing duplication of effort. SCLC members extend, on an equal basis, loan privileges to residents of other member libraries. The System's delivery service links members for quick transfer of materials and enhanced sharing of resources.", "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution authorizing the Library Director to request affiliation with and waiver from deadlines of the Southern California Library Cooperative (SCLC) in order to be reinstated as a full member under the California Library Services Act (CLSA).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Purchase Order Increase for Big Belly/Smart Belly Dual Compactors", "Department": "Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve a change order to purchase order #24836 OF in the amount of $45,700 with Waxie Sanitary Supply, a California-based company, for purchase and delivery of seven additional Big Belly/Smart Belly dual recycle bins/trash compactors. This would result in a new three-year revised purchase order total not to exceed $391,400.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City currently has a purchase order with Waxie Sanitary Supply to provide Big Belly/Smart Belly dual recycle bins/trash compactors at high foot traffic areas in the amount not to exceed $345,700 for a three-year term expiring in December 2016. Staff is requesting an increase to the existing purchase order in the amount of $45,700 for seven additional Big Belly/Smart Belly compactors to be purchased with funds received from CalRecycle to aid in beverage container recycling for a new three-year total not to exceed $391,400.", "Background", "On December 17, 2013 Council awarded Bid #4103 to Waxie Sanitary Supply, for the purchase of Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactors to replace the concrete pedestrian litter containers located at high foot traffic areas near the business districts and bus stops (Attachment A).", "On May 27, 2014 Council amended the purchase order to Waxie Sanitary Supply by $45,700 for the purchase and placement of seven additional dual compactors that would be installed at high traffic bus stops as part of the Bus Shelter Improvement Project (Attachment B).", "Discussion", "There are over 400 concrete refuse containers in the pedestrian right-of-way to handle high foot traffic areas near the business districts and bus stops. These open top refuse containers are gradually being replaced by the new solar powered dual compactor enclosed system, which allows for both refuse and recycling to be collected separately. Each dual compactor communicates via SMS to a cloud-based web application called CLEAN. The CLEAN management dashboard captures real-time data on bin capacity, operational status and waste diversion. This provides staff with the management tools needed for efficient route scheduling and collection. The service frequencies at the Big Belly stations have decreased from daily services to 3 times per week and 34 percent of the waste has been diverted from the landfills.", "To date over 60 of these new compactors have been installed throughout the City including Main Street, Montana Avenue, Santa Monica Pier, Ocean Avenue and various other locations. Staff plans to use these additional compactors to complete the replacement of containers on Lincoln Boulevard.", "Annually, CalRecycle distributes funds to cities to implement new or enhance existing programs to provide convenient beverage container recycling opportunities in various locations. Eligible activities include litter prevention and cleanup where the waste stream includes beverage containers that would be recycled as well as public education promoting beverage container recycling. This year the City received a supplemental payment of $31,294 from the Beverage Container Curbside Program and $24,450 from the City/County Payment Program for a total amount of $55,744. Resource Recovery & Recycling proposes to use $45,700 to purchase seven additional Big Belly/Smart Belly compactors and use the remaining funds for recycling education.", "Vendor Selection", "In September 2013, the City issued a Bid for the purchase of Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactors. Only one bid was received. The price of the new Big Belly/Smart Belly dual compactors was compared against the price paid for the 13 compactors installed on Main Street in early 2013, and the pricing was found to be comparable. Since 2013, the price for these dual stations has only increased by 3 percent.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order modification to be awarded to Waxie Sanitary Supply is for $45,700, for an amended purchase order total of $391,400 over the three-year term. Funds are available in the FY2015-16 budget in the Public Works Department. The purchase order will be charged to account 27441.566640 (State Recycling Program)."]}, {"Title": "New and Amended Housing Programs: Housing Opportunity Utilizing SubsidyEnhancements (HOUSE), and Revisions to the Affordable Housing ProductionProgram Administrative Guidelines", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the proposed Housing Opportunities Utilizing Subsidy Enhancements (HOUSE) pilot program parameters outlined in Attachment A to expand and sustain opportunities for households with housing vouchers; and2. Approve the revised Administrative Guidelines to the Affordable Housing Production Program, as redlined in Attachment B.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Affordable housing opportunities for tenants with housing subsidy vouchers are very limited in the current housing market, due to the significant gap between voucher payment standards and market rents. As part of a \u201cjump start\u201d program associated with the Council-approved Strategic Goal of Maintaining an Inclusive and Diverse Community, staff proposes a pilot program to incentivize new owner participation and maintain existing owner participation in voucher programs. Key elements of the proposed HOUSE (Housing Opportunities Utilizing Subsidy Enhancements) pilot program include a signing bonus, loss mitigation measure, liaison services, and targeted outreach. Staff also proposes minor revisions to the Administrative Guidelines of the Affordable Housing Production Program to clarify protocols regarding eligibility, rent increases, and waitlist management.", "Background", "At its retreat in August 2015, Council identified Maintaining an Inclusive and Diverse Community as a top strategic goal and specified that affordable housing is a critical component of that priority. At its August 25, 2015 study session (Attachment C) regarding affordable housing, Council discussed the current state of affordable housing in Santa Monica and considered opportunities to increase affordable housing opportunities. The proposed HOUSE program and the existing Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP) are both discussed in this report.", "Participants issued housing vouchers are experiencing significant barriers to finding owners willing to accept the voucher rent levels established by federal Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD), which are well below market rents. Forexample, the Housing Authority payment standard (i.e., monthly rent limit) for a one\u2011bedroom apartment under the voucher program is $1,352 and recent data indicates that the median market rent for a one-bedroom apartment in Santa Monica ranges from $1,900 to $2,850 (based on data from the Rent Control Board and WestsideRentals). At its October 27, 2015 meeting (Attachment D), Council approved a FY2015-16 budget allocation of $250,000 to develop a pilot program to incentivize property owners to rent to households with vouchers. The proposed program is intended to encourage greater owner participation in voucher programs through participation-based financial incentives, loss-mitigation assurances, and enhanced communications and outreach.", "Concurrently, staff has submitted a request to HUD for an increase in the maximum payment standard for Santa Monica vouchers, to be more competitive with market rents. The request has received support from Congress member Ted Lieu, who is advocating on behalf of the City. While it is uncertain whether HUD will approve an increase in the payment standard, it is unlikely that, even with an increase, vouchers would be fully competitive in the Santa Monica market. Therefore, staff recommends the pursuit of additional tools that could increase voucher utilization, such as the proposed HOUSE program.", "Furthermore, declining voucher utilization negatively affects the Housing Authority\u2019s annual budget allocation, based upon HUD protocols. The annual budget allocation is based on the number of vouchers under lease during the prior period. From 2012 through 2015, voucher utilization has progressively declined from 1,018 to 945, which represents a loss of 73 vouchers that would house 73 families for an entire year. Eachdeclining voucher utilization period is followed by a subsequently reduced annual budget allocation. The situation slowly erodes the voucher programs\u2019 capacity and results in fewer households that can be assisted.", "The AHPP requires market-rate multifamily housing developers to either include affordable housing within their developments or pay fees toward the development of affordable housing. Over 1,000 deed-restricted, affordable apartments located on 133 properties have been completed under the AHPP (and previous inclusionary housing programs), which represents 24 percent of the City\u2019s deed-restricted affordable housing stock.  Based on experience administering the AHPP, staff has identified discrete areas within the AHPP Administrative Guidelines that would benefit from clarification.", "Discussion", "To address affordable housing programmatic challenges, staff recommends that Council approve the HOUSE pilot program to incentivize owners to participate in housing voucher programs, as well as adopt revisions to the AHPP Administrative Guidelines.", "Owner Incentive Program", "Housing Authority voucher programs are critical in the continuum of Santa Monica\u2019s affordable housing options. Voucher programs serve extremely low-income households, including elderly and disabled households, with incomes below 30 percent of the area median income (e.g., $17,950 for a 1-person household).  As a result of state-mandated vacancy decontrol of rent-controlled apartments and continually increasing market rents in Santa Monica, the reach of the voucher programs has become more and morelimited. Housing Authority data indicate that only seven percent of program participants reside in housing not subject to rent limits (i.e., deed-restricted and rent-controlled housing). The situation reflects the large gap between the voucher payment standard and current market rents, leaving no economic incentive for the private housing market to participate in the voucher programs. Existing tenants with vouchers are protected from arbitrary evictions based upon Measure RR, adopted in 2010 by Santa Monica voters. However, landlords often leave the voucher program as apartments become vacant.", "Additionally, the housing market is very competitive as owners have numerous applicants competing for a vacant apartment. To narrow the applicant pool, owners conduct credit checks and review rental history to assess credit-worthiness. Voucher program participants are extremely low-income or very low-income households who might have experienced a past financial emergency, resulting in an undesirable credit score or rental history. Such incidents act as a barrier to obtaining decent, safe and affordable housing.", "Finally, the households served by voucher programs include veterans, seniors, formerly homeless persons, and persons living with disabilities. A portion of this population struggles with living independently and benefits from social services. Targeted social services support not only the tenants, but the owners as well, by providing specialized assistance which enables tenants to remain in the community.", "Theproposed HOUSE Program would implement strategies to recruit and retain owners to participate in voucher programs. The proposed components would include: 1) Signing Bonus; 2) Loss Mitigation; and 3) Liaison and Outreach. Program components are summarized below and the parameters of the proposed HOUSE Program are provided in Attachment A.", "o objective - incentivize and increase owner participation in housing voucher programs; leverage unused federal voucher funds equal to approximately $12,000 annually; match voucher holders with unsubsidized apartments;", "o method - provide $5,000 to the first 45 property owners of non-deed-restricted, rent-controlled apartments who lease a vacant apartment to a household with a housing voucher; the $5,000 amount is intended to approximate the one-year gap between the payment standard and the average rent-controlled, one-bedroom rent;", "o eligibility \u2013 new voucher participants only; limited to rent-controlled apartments without deed restrictions (i.e. apartments not subject to property-specific covenants which restricts rent levels); not eligible if new voucher holders are moving from deed-restricted or rent-controlled apartments;", "o estimated budget - $225,000", "o objective - provide assurance to property owners of non-deed-restricted, rent\u2011controlled apartments who ease credit standards to accommodate tenants; prioritize involuntarily displaced Santa Monica tenants, and veterans, seniors, formerly homeless persons, persons living with disabilities, and families; couple loss mitigation assurance with signing bonus as an enhanced incentive;", "o method - reimburse a maximum of $4,000 per apartment for actual rent loss due to household hardship or default in rent, applicable attorney fees, and excess wear and tear; documentation would be required regarding the actual rent loss and the cost associated with restoring the components which incurred excessive wear and tear; would be offered on discretionary basis until all funds are reserved, and funds would only be accessed once the tenant\u2019s security deposit is exhausted;", "o estimated budget - $36,000", "o objective \u2013 provide support to help stabilize and prevent eviction for tenants with special needs, including elderly, persons living with disabilities, and formerly homeless; inform and educate existing and prospective owners about the opportunities associated with the voucher programs and the HOUSE Program;", "o method \u2013 dedicated staff to respond and resolve owner concerns, including assistance from a Licensed Clinical Social Worker (LCSW) under contract with the Housing Authority to connect tenants with government and social service agencies; estimated staff time of 18 hours per week, as well as 8-10 hours per week for LCSW; targeted outreach and marketing to individual owners and owner organizations, and faith-based organizations, including brochures, flyers, and newsletters; would also include occasional owner-appreciation events;", "o estimated budget - $89,000 ($50,000 for staff and $39,000 for LCSW).", "The $350,000 overall budget of the proposed HOUSE Program includes $100,000 of discretionary funds reallocated from FY 2013-14 to FY2015-16 and budgeted by Council on June 23, 2015 (Attachment E), for use toward loss mitigation measures, and $250,000 budgeted by Council on October 27, 2015, for owner incentives. Therecommendations above include estimated budget amounts for the various components of the proposed HOUSE Program.  The pilot program may require flexibility during implementation to shift resources to more successful elements of the HOUSE Program. As a result, staff requests flexibility over line-item budgets, though the allocated budget of $350,000 would not be exceeded. Additionally, the Housing Commission recommended a quarterly status report, which staff proposes to prepare in the form of an Information Item.", "Proposed Revisions to AHPP Guidelines", "Staff proposes amendments to Section 7 of the AHPP Administrative Guidelines, which", "provides guidance regarding eligibility, rent increase limitations, and waitlist management. Staff proposes minor \u2018clean-up\u2019 of existing language throughout the Guidelines to reflect Council-approved revisions to the AHPP in 2013, as well as specific stylistic changes. The proposed revisions to the Guidelines are provided as Attachment B in redline format.", "During the course of AHPP compliance monitoring, issues have arisen regarding tenanteligibility. One issue involves clarification that the affordable residence must be the household\u2019s sole residence. Another involves clarification that ineligible occupants include employees associated with the owner, including the property management firm, except when State law requires on-site staff. Staff also recommends that when the rent being charged is below the deed-restricted rent limit, rent increases shall be restricted to five percent annually.", "Staff also recommends a change to the waitlist protocol in Section 7(C) (2). The current protocol indicates that the waitlist will be re-opened when the number of households in any income category decreases below 300; staff recommends that the language be eliminated for consistency with a new waitlist approach involving a substantially reduced and more active waitlist. Additionally, the language in Section 7(D) (1) regarding rules for increases in household income is simplified and reformatted, without substantive changes.", "Commission Action", "At its February 11, 2016 meeting, the Housing Commission voted to support the proposed revisions to the AHPP\u2019s Administrative Guidelines, with minor modifications. Staff has incorporated the suggested modifications into the proposed Guidelines attached to this report.", "On February 18, 2016, staff presented the proposed HOUSE Program to the Housing Commission, with the same components as proposed in this report but with different estimated budget allocations. The Commission voted to support the Program, with the stipulation that the proposed Program include metrics of success (see page 3 of Attachment A), and that staff provide quarterly status reports to the Commission.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The cost of the proposed HOUSE Program would not exceed $350,000. Budget authority was approved by Council on October 27, 2015 and the Fiscal Year 2015-16 appropriation of $250,000 is available in account SO015203.589000. Additional budget authority of $100,000 from discretionary funds for loss mitigation measures was approved by Council on June 23, 2015 and the Fiscal Year 2015-16 appropriation is available in account 01201.579001. There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action regarding revisions to the AHPP Administrative Guidelines.", "7"]}, {"Title": "Award of Design Services for Clean Beaches Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1.  Award RFP#2356 to Tetra Tech, Inc., a California-based company to provide engineering design services for the Clean Beaches Project;2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with Tetra Tech, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $614,556 (including a 10% contingency);", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The State Water Resources Control Board (SWRCB) awarded the City of Santa Monica a grant from the Clean Beaches Initiative Grant Program for the implementation of the Clean Beaches Project. The project would improve beach water quality by reducing the volume of storm water discharges to the ocean at the Pier and Pico-Kenter outfalls. The local match would be funded by the City\u2019s Measure V, Clean Beaches and Oceans Parcel Tax Fund. Staff recommends Tetra Tech, Inc. as the best bidder to provide engineering design services for the Clean Beaches project in an amount not to exceed $614,556 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On January 27, 2015, the Council authorized staff to apply for and, if awarded, accept grant funds from the State Water Resources Control Board\u2019s (SWRCB) Clean Beaches Initiative (CBI) Grant Program. Subsequently, the grant was awarded to implement the Clean Beaches Project for the Pier and Pico Watersheds (the Project).", "Discussion", "The objective of this project is to improve Santa Monica beach water quality by increasing the diversion and storage capacity at the Santa Monica Pier and Pico-Kenter storm drain outfalls. The Project would divert storm water runoff from the Pier drainage basin generated by an 85th percentile, from each 24-hour storm event. The project would also divert up to 80,000 gallons of runoff per storm event at the Pico-Kenter outfall. Diverted runoff would then be treated at the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF) and distributed for non-potable uses, or be discharged to the sanitary sewer. This project proposes storm drain diversion and runoff storage systems at two separate storm drain outfalls, the Santa Monica Pier and the Pico-Kenter storm drain outfalls.", "At the Santa Monica Pier storm drain outfall, the project would build a flow diversion structure to direct storm water / dry weather flows from the 106-acre Pier drainage basin into new subgrade modular holding tanks to store approximately one million six hundred thousand (1,600,000) gallons of runoff and connect piping and necessary appurtenances to transfer and meter the runoff from the capture tanks to the SMURRF and/or the sanitary sewer.", "Discharge of captured storm runoff from the tank to the sanitary sewer would occur only when a second storm event is anticipated 72 hours after the prior storm event. The tank would become available to capture the runoff of the second storm event. This would ensure the system\u2019s compliance with the Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System (MS4) discharge permit.", "At the Pico-Kenter storm drain outfall, the project would build new modular capture tanks to harvest eighty thousand (80,000) gallons of the \u201cfirst flush\u201d of each storm water runoff for treatment at the SMURRF. The diverted runoff would be measured with a new flow meter and screened by a new catch basin screen to reduce trash content in the runoff. The project would also provide a portable pump to drain the post-storm event pond that forms downstream of the outfall.", "Staff has completed the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) categorical exemption process. The public outreach component is published via the project website on www.smgov.net/cleanbeaches.", "The design phase would be completed in eight to twelve months. The construction phase would take six to eight months and is expected to start in the spring of 2017.", "Consultant Selection", "On January 14, 2016, the City issued a Request for Proposals to obtain engineering design services for the Clean Beaches Project. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. There were 1,070 vendors notified, 56 vendors downloaded the RFP. Four firms (California Watershed Engineering, Inc., MNS Engineers, MWH Americas, Tetra Tech) responded.", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Water Resources and Civil Engineering. In accordance with SMMC 2.24.073, evaluation criteria included experience, references, work plans, project team, and cost. All four firms were invited to a final interview to further assess each team\u2019s qualifications. The City also requested a final cost proposal for the final scope of work from each firm.", "Firm", "Amount", "MNS Engineers", "$911,609", "MWH, Americas", "$711,799", "California Watershed Engineering, Inc.", "$587,895", "Tetra Tech", "$558,687", "Tetra Tech, Inc. was rated highest based on their extensive experience providing engineering and design services for similar projects for City of Los Angeles, Lakewood, Signal Hill and Long Beach, references, project team, and competitive pricing. Staff recommends Tetra Tech, Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide engineering design services for the Clean Beaches Project.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The Project is funded by the State Water Resource Control Board\u2019s (SWRCB) Clean Beaches Initiative Grant Program and the City\u2019s Clean Beaches and Oceans Parcel Tax (Measure V). The professional services agreement to be awarded to Tetra Tech, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $614,556 (includes a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:", "C209069.589000 Clean Beach Project - Pier & Pico-Kenter  $226,840", "C069069.589000 Clean Beach Project - Pier & Pico-Kenter  $387,716", "Total  $614,556"]}, {"Title": "Big Blue Bus Fuel and Wash Design Modification", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement No. 10019 (CCS), in the amount of $112,419 (includes a 10% contingency) with RNL Interplan, Inc., a California-based company, for design services to expand the Big Blue Bus CNG fueling system. This will result in a three year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $229,701, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Big Blue Bus (BBB) is undertaking the Fuel and Wash Upgrade Project to replace existing wash equipment that has reached the end of its cost effective life. On January 27, 2015, Council authorized staff to execute Professional Services Agreement No. 10019 with RNL Interplan, Inc. to provide design services for this project in an amount not to exceed $117,282. Since the original request, the BBB has expanded its bus fleet as part of the BBB \u201clast mile\u201d plan to better integrate BBB routes with Metro\u2019s Expo Light Rail and increase ridership. The expansion of the BBB fleet necessitates a modification to the agreement to revise the BBB fueling system to accommodate another pump and fueling lane to be able to fuel the fleet within required timeframes. The modification is in an amount not to exceed $112,419, and for a new total amount not to exceed $229,701.", "Background", "The existing Big Blue Bus (BBB) fuel and wash apparatus was installed in 2002. The facility is open seven days a week and services approximately 165 buses per night. The wash apparatus has reached the end of its cost effective useful life and the BBB is undertaking the Fuel and Wash Upgrade project to replace the existing bus wash apparatus including all brushes, motors, mechanisms, rollers, pumps, holding tanks and filters.", "The existing Liquefied-Compressed Natural Gas (LCNG) system at BBB has been evolving since it was placed into service. Originally built to fuel Liquefied Natural Gas (LNG) buses and Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) service vehicles, the system included two 30,000 gallon LNG tanks, two offload pumps, two submergible LNG pumps, two LNG dispensers, multiple valves, sensors, lines and miscellaneous hardware.", "In 2009, BBB transitioned from purchasing LNG buses to CNG buses. The first ten CNG powered buses were delivered in 2010. As a result of the transition to CNG buses, it was necessary to expand the capacity to convert LNG to CNG. In 2011 the LCNG system underwent major upgrades including the installation of two CNG compressor pump skids, two warming towers, three additional CNG storage tanks, new odorant injection system, two transit type dispensers, two 3600 PSI type dispensers and all support valves, sensors, piping and miscellaneous hardware.", "In 2013, BBB retired its last diesel buses and migrated to a completely all natural gas fleet. The current fleet is comprised of 125 CNG powered transit buses and 75 LNG powered transit buses for a total of 200 buses. This shift to natural gas has resulted in the fueling system operating at full capacity during nightly bus wash and fueling operations. It is anticipated that by the year 2019, BBB will expand its bus fleet to 225 buses, in addition to the busses recently added. The BBB \u201clast mile\u201d plan, which is launching in coordination with the opening of Metro\u2019s Expo Light Rail Project, creates the urgency to provide sufficient fueling for the expanding City bus fleet.", "Discussion", "Vendor Selection", "On October 8, 2014, the City published an RFP for design services to upgrade the BBB fuel and wash building in order to modernize the existing bus wash apparatus including all brushes, and components as well as to replace finishes in office spaces and restrooms. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 52 prospective firms downloaded the RFP and five firms attended a non-mandatory pre-proposal job walk. Two proposals were received and publicly opened on November 12, 2014.", "City staff from Public Works and the Big Blue Bus evaluated proposals based on criteria listed in the RFP including price, experience, qualifications, and references. Staff selected RNL Interplan, Inc. as the best qualified firm. RNL Interplan, Inc. has broad experience in similar projects including design of the Norwalk Transportation & Public Services Facility and design of the Chula Vista Corporate Yard. Additionally, RNL Interplan, Inc. offers specific expertise relevant to this project due to their experience designing the BBB Maintenance Yard Master Plan and original Fuel and Wash Facility.", "On January 27, 2015, Council authorized staff to execute a professional services agreement to provide design services for the BBB Fuel and Wash Upgrade Project with RNL Interplan, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $117,282.", "In response to the expanding of bus fleet and the need for increased fueling capacity, it is now necessary to increase the LNG to CNG conversion and dispensing capability.", "Because RNL Interplan, the firm that designed the original fuel and wash facility, is contracted for work on the facility\u2019s upgrades, staff recommends moving forward and adding the fueling station scope of work at the same facility to this highly qualified firm, and to modifying the existing agreement to provide these additional services given the urgency for BBB to keep up with their fueling requirements for busses coming online to accommodate the Expo Light Rail opening. The modification amount is not to exceed $112,419 (includes a 10% contingency) for a new total amount not to exceed $229,701. The scope of work includes two additional LNG to CNG compressor apparatus to increase fueling capabilities sufficient for the new fleet, one additional CNG dispenser and by-pass fueling lane, an odorant injection system and all associated components and hardware.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to RNL Interplan, Inc. is $112,419, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $229,701. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account in account C410826.589000."]}, {"Title": "Amend Purchase Order for Water Supplies and Repair Parts", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve a change order to purchase order #25333-OF in the amount of $150,000 with S&J Supply Co, Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of water supplies and repair parts for the City\u2019s Water Resources Division. This would result in a revised purchase order total not to exceed $947,492, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City\u2019s Water Resources Division is responsible for the operation and maintenance of the City\u2019s water systems. On June 9, 2015, Council awarded Bid #4187 to S&J Supply Co, Inc. for purchase of water supplies and repair parts in an amount not to exceed $250,500 for one year with two additional one-year renewal options for a total amount not to exceed $797,492 over a three-year period. Fiscal Year 2015-16 expenditures have been higher than expected, including a $25,000 valve for an urgent water main system repair at Broadway & 17th and approximately $40,000 in pump purchases to prepare for El Ni\u00f1o storms. In order to purchase sufficient maintenance supplies to adequately maintain the City's potable water distribution system, staff is requesting a bid award increase of $50,000 per year over the next three years ($150,000 total) for a new total bid award amount of $947,492 through June 2018.", "Background", "On June 9, 2015, Council awarded bid #4187 to S&J Supply Co, Inc. (S&J) for purchase of water supplies and repair parts to maintain the City's potable water distribution system in an amount not to exceed $250,500 for one year with two additional one-year renewal options at an annual increase of six percent, for a total amount not to exceed $797,492 through June 30, 2018. S&J is the City's primary supplier of water main, hydrant and meter box parts, valves, tools and related maintenance equipment. As of March 2016, FY 2015-16 expenditures and orders with S&J were $230,531 including approximately $40,000 in pump purchases to prepare for potential flooding issues due to the forecast of El Ni\u00f1o storms and a $25,000 Clow valve assembly ordered in March for Broadway & 17th.", "Discussion", "In order to continue maintaining the City's potable water distribution system, staff recommends increasing the FY 2015-16 bid award amount by $50,000 to $300,500 to cover anticipated expenditures through June 2016. By approving this increase, staff would be able to purchase needed parts to repair or prevent water leaks, add or modify service lines and replace inoperable or damaged valves and meter boxes through the end of FY 2015-16. Without these purchases, staff would not be able to maintain the water system properly, potentially resulting in poor customer service, loss of potable water, and reduced revenue.", "Based on an analysis of past expenditures and consideration of future maintenance needs, staff also recommends increasing the bid award amount for FY 2016-17 and FY 2017-18 by $50,000 for each year for a three-year total not to exceed $947,492. Over the past three fiscal years, staff purchased the following amounts of water supplies and parts from S&J:", "FY 2014-15 - $252,111", "FY 2013-14 - $282,840", "FY 2012-13 - $261,346", "The original bid award was based on an annual expenditure of a not to exceed amount of $250,500. Expenditures in the last three years have been up to $32,340 higher than the base amount with expenditures projected up to $50,000 higher this fiscal year due to urgent main water repairs. Given the City\u2019s aging water infrastructure, the oftentimes unpredictable nature of maintenance and repair costs, an underestimated not to exceed amount at bid award, and the potential of future Clow valve incidents, staff anticipates the additional $50,000 requested per year would be sufficient to cover water system maintenance needs and respond to urgent repairs through June 2018, including six percent annual renewal option price increases.", "Vendor Selection", "On June 9, 2015, Council awarded Bid #4187 to S&J for purchase of water supplies and parts primarily based on S&J having the lowest pricing for a sampling of 63 types of commonly purchased items. Of the three bids received, S&J was 23% less expensive than the next best bidder. Based on the bid pricing, it is projected that S&J would be able to provide the best pricing on water supplies and repair part items purchased through June 2018.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order modification to be awarded to S&J Supply Co, Inc. is $150,000 for an amended purchase order total not to exceed $947,492. Funds in the amount of $300,500 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Public Works Department. The purchase order will be charged to account 25671.544010. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 66834 for an 8-Unit Condominium Project at 2323 28th Street.", "Department": "City Planning (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution approving Final Tract Map No. 66834, for an 8-unit condominium project located at 2323 28th Street.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for the following condominium project. The Tentative Tract Map was approved by the Planning Commission on August 19, 2009.", "TRACT MAP   ADDRESS  SUBDIVIDER  UNITS", "66834    2323 28th Street  28th Street Partners, LLC  8", "Discussion", "A Tentative Tract Map application was submitted to the City Planning Division on August 19, 2009 to allow the subdivision of two parcels into eight residential condominium airspace parcels as part of an attached two-story multi-family development in the R-2 (Low Density Multiple Residential District) of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended). A Design Compatibility Permit (DCP) was not required for the project because the site is located within the R-2 zoning district, and according to Section 9.04.20.15.020 of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended), a DCP shall not be required for condominiums in the R2, R3, and R4 districts. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Tentative Tract Map for the above project on August 19, 2009. In conjunction with the Tentative Tract Map, the Planning Commission elected to adopt Resolution 08-009 (PCS) adopting the attached Initial Study/ Mitigated Negative Declaration. The Commission also approved the Mitigation Monitoring Program to address potential project-related environmental impacts. This finding was based on the determination that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. Since that time the architect has had to make several revisions to the proposed design and, the project was approved the by Architectural Review Board on June 1, 2015.", "The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Tract Map approved by the Planning Commission. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium facilities tax of $8,000 prior to issuance of building permit. Additionally, Pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Chapter 9.56, the project is subject to the City's Affordable Housing Production Program which requires the proposed 8-unit condominium development to provide 20 percent of the units affordable to moderate income households on-site or 1.6 units. As such, the applicant will provide one, two-bedroom moderate income unit on-site (SMMC Section 9.56.050(a). In addition, pursuant to SMMC Section 9.56.050(d), the applicant is required to pay an affordable housing fee equal to the fractional affordable housing unit of 0.6 times the City's affordable housing unit development cost (SMMC Section 9.56.070(a)(4). The fee will be calculated prior to payment, based on the affordable housing unit development cost resolution in effect at the time the affordable housing fee is paid to the City (SMMC Section 9.56.070(c). The fee must be paid in full prior to the City granting any approval for the occupancy of the project, but no earlier than at the time of building permit issuance.", "The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer's office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer's office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements assessed for this map. Lastly, the City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Modification of Contract with Licensed Clinical Social Worker to Support Affordable Housing Programs", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to execute a second modification to Contract #2687, in an amount not to exceed $60,800, with Ms.DorothyBerndt, a California-based Licensed Clinical Social Worker, to provide clinical support for affordable housing program participants. This will result in a four-year amended contract with a new total amount not to exceed $140,800.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Housing Division engages a licensed clinical social worker (LCSW) to assess clinical service needs of senior, formerly homeless, and disabled households and others at risk of losing their affordable housing due to unmet service needs. Theproposed second modification would increase the contract by $60,800 to a new total amount not to exceed of $140,800. The proposed funding amount reflects a combination of ongoing services and an expansion of the existing service level to serve more residents.", "Background", "A one-year contract with Ms. Berndt was executed on July 1, 2013 in the amount of $20,000, after a Request for Qualifications was conducted. The contract originally targeted clinical services to formerly homeless persons living with disabilities who were participating in the Continuum of Care housing voucher program. The first modification to the contract was executed on July 1, 2014, increasing the contract by $60,000 and providing a three-year extension through June 30, 2017. During the last two years, LCSW services were expanded to assist a broader group of residents, with the goal of housing retention. Recipients of LCSW services now include participants in Section 8, HOME, and inclusionary housing programs, as well as tenants in City-owned housing.", "Discussion", "With the support of the LCSW, the City can provide an appropriate breadth of assistance to affordable housing program participants. The LCSW is deployed by staff to conduct in-home assessments, connect households to appropriate services for treatment and intervention, and provide technical training and support for service providers and staff. Many households who are marginally stabilized in the community would likely become homeless or require high-cost services without the LCSW support. Contracting for the service is the most cost-efficient way to work with the target populations.", "Ms. Berndt has extensive knowledge of supportive housing programs, including over 11years of experience working with City staff, service providers for seniors, SantaMonica\u2019s Homeless Court and Homeless Liaison Police Team, the County Department of Mental Health, and most importantly, housing program participants. Ms.Berndt\u2019s approach is unique and provides clinical services in non-clinical settings, usually as home-visit assessments. Clinical services are a pivotal component to the success of supportive housing programs and homeless initiatives in general, and crucial to stabilizing program participants at risk of losing their affordable housing. Psychosocial assessments and interventions completed by Ms. Berndt determine appropriate referrals to mental health, substance abuse, and medical treatment service providers. Ms. Berndt contributes to the exceptional level of service that both federally subsidized program participants and federal evaluators have come to expect from Santa Monica.", "Ms. Berndt has a long-term relationship with many residents who need intervention andassistance. Ms. Berndt has provided assistance for a variety of situations, such as homes that do not pass inspection due to substandard housekeeping (e.g., hoarding) or behavior that is disruptive to neighbors. Ms.Berndt\u2019s coordination with service providers also supports property owners, who, in lieu of evicting tenants, outreach to the City for help based on positive experiences and outcomes with Ms. Berndt. Theproposed second contract modification provides additional funds of $60,800 through the end of the existing contract term date of June30, 2017, to serve disabled, elderly, and formerly homeless households and those at risk of losing their affordable housing. Staff anticipates undertaking a competitive selection process once the existing contract expires.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In May 2009, a Request for Qualifications to provide LCSW services was issued and posted on the City website. Staff received and reviewed two responses from LCSW applicants and rated each on qualifications, project understanding, experience, price, and references. Ms. Berndt was recommended as the most qualified applicant to support the services of the Housing Division.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The proposed contract modification is for $60,800, for a new contract total of $140,800. Funds in the amount of $60,800 are included in the FY2015\u201116 budget at account 01264.555060."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 72572 for a 3-Unit Condominium Project at 2913 10th Street.", "Department": "Planning Commission Agenda (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution approving Final Tract Map No. 72572.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for the following condominium project. The Vesting Tentative Parcel Map was approved by the Planning Commission on April 30, 2014.", "PARCEL MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER UNITS", "No. 72572 2913 10th Street Gary Pokoik  3", "Discussion", "A Vesting Tentative Map application was submitted to the City Planning Division on December 24, 2013, to create three residential condominium air parcels on one land lot as part of an attached two-story multi-family development in the R-2 (Low Density Multiple Residential District) of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended). A Design Compatibility Permit (DCP) was not required for the project because the site is located within the R-2 zoning district, and according to Section 9.04.20.15.020 of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance (as amended), a DCP shall not be required for condominiums in the R2, R3, and R4 districts. After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved the Tentative Parcel Map for the above project on April 30, 2014. In the intervening two years since Planning Commission approval, the applicant has obtained project approval from the Architectural Review Board and has steadily proceeded through the plan check process. Approval of the Final Map is one of the final items required prior to the issuance of building permits. The Planning Commission\u2019s approval of the Tentative Parcel Map was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations, and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map approved by the Planning Commission. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium facilities tax of $3,000 prior to issuance of building permit. Additionally, the developer has chosen to pay an in-lieu fee to satisfy the requirements of the Affordable Housing Protection Plan (AHPP). The current AHPP rate for condominiums is of $36.51/sf for a total fee of $230,670.18 for a 6,318 square foot project to be paid prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy.", "The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act and local ordinances. The City Engineer\u2019s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements assessed for this map. Lastly, the City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Construction Contract for the I-10 Freeway Signs Replacement Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2304 to Peterson-Chase Construction, Inc., a California-based company for the I-10 Freeway Signs Replacement Project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Peterson-Chase Construction, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $597,355 (including a 15% contingency). 3. Award Proposal #SP1982 to Anderson Penna, Inc., a California-based company for construction management services. 4. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Anderson Penna, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $97,506 (including a 10% contingency).5. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The I-10 Freeway Signs Replacement Project would replace signage along the State of California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) highway and arterial surface streets within the City of Santa Monica limits. Improved signage would prevent last minute weaving at ramps, improve lane assignments, and reduce congestion through efficient lane utilization. Wherever possible, the existing sign structure or truss would be re-used.", "In November 2015 the City solicited bids for construction services. After reviewing the five bids received, staff recommendsPeterson-Chase Construction Inc. for the construction of the Project in an amount not to exceed $597,355 (including a 15% contingency).In September 2015 the City requested Requests for Proposal for construction management services, including construction monitoring and documentation. Staff recommends Anderson Penna Inc. to provide construction management services in an amount not to exceed $97,506 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "In January 2011, City staff met with Caltrans District 7 regarding the I-10 Freeway Signs Replacement Project. Caltrans advised that they would not be able to provide funding for these improvements. The City would need to be the project lead, while Caltrans would provide oversight to the design and would be required to approve all construction documents and permits. Preliminary funding for the project was included in the city\u2019s adopted FY 2011-12 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget. Since that time, staff has utilized the preliminary funding to complete planning and design work, and was recently able to obtain Caltrans approval and permitting for construction. Staff recommends utilizing broader traffic mitigation funds currently included in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget to fund construction of the Caltrans approved I-10 Freeway signs.", "Discussion", "The signage along the Santa Monica Freeway (I-10) both westbound and eastbound, as well as other Caltrans \u201cfacilities\u201d within the City limits has been found to be deficient by City and Caltrans staff. At certain locations the deficient signage leads to incorrect lane use by vehicles exiting or entering the freeway. This incorrect lane use then leads to traffic congestion, on both I-10 and City streets. The City received permit approval from the California Department of Transportation in April 2015 with an extension in November 2015.", "The proposed new signs are standard Caltrans signs with arrows and text and will replace the existing signs. The signs were designed by RBF Consulting firm. The project would improve signage at the following locations:", "\u00b7 Westbound Santa Monica Freeway (I-10) at 14th Street Overcrossing", "\u00b7 Westbound Santa Monica Freeway (I-10) at 11th Street Overcrossing", "\u00b7 Westbound Santa Monica Freeway (I-10) at Lincoln Boulevard Overcrossing", "\u00b7 Westbound Santa Monica Freeway (I-10) at Centinela Avenue/ Pico Boulevard Exit", "\u00b7 Southbound Lincoln Boulevard between Colorado Avenue and I-10 On-Ramp", "\u00b7 Southbound Pacific Coast Highway (CA-1) at 1550 Parking Lot entrance", "\u00b7 Southbound Pacific Coast Highway (CA-1) between Montana Avenue Pedestrian Overcrossing and California Incline", "\u00b7 Eastbound Santa Monica Freeway (I-10) approaching Centinela Avenue/ Pico Boulevard Exit", "Construction is anticipated to begin in September 2016 and be completed by December 2016. Signage fabrication is anticipated to take three months.", "Vendor Selection - Construction", "On November 27, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services for the I-10 Freeway Signs Replacement Project. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provision. 1670 vendors were notified and 43 vendors downloaded the bid. Five bids were received and publicly opened on December 17, 2015. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "Peterson-Chase Construction", "$519,439.80", "Statewide Traffic Safety", "$521,266.54", "O\u2019Donnell Construction", "$558,858.20", "Powell Constructors, INC.", "$591,270.00", "Coral Construction Company", "$662,727.00", "Bids were evaluated based on criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including pricing, understanding of the project scope, direct experience with similar projects, approach to the work, technical competence, qualifications of the proposed staff, and the ability to meet the project schedule. Staff contacted reference agencies listed by the contractor to ascertain past performance on similar projects, including Caltrans Districts 4, 7, and 12. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that Peterson-Chase Construction and its subcontractors\u2019 licenses are current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, Peterson-Chase Construction, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for construction services of the I-10 Freeway Signs Replacement Project.", "Vendor Selection \u2013 Construction Management", "On September 22, 2015 the City published a Request for Proposal for construction management services for this Project on the City\u2019s online bidding website. A total of 1674 venders were notified and 124 vendors downloaded the proposal. The City received twenty five proposals that were publicly opened on October 14, 2015. Proposals were reviewed and rated by Public Works staff. Selection criteria included price, competency, qualifications of proposed staff, and technical ability. The top four firms (MNS Engineers, Civil Source, Anderson-Penna, Psomas Engineering) were invited to participate in interviews with staff from Public Works and Planning and Community Development in January 2016.", "Anderson Penna Inc. is recommended as the best proposer to provide construction management and inspection services based on their price, qualifications of staff, competency, extensive knowledge and experience on numerous construction projects in the cities of Long Beach, Carson, Manhattan Beach, and Huntington Beach. Services provided by Anderson Penna Inc. would include construction management services, material testing, wage compliance monitoring, and team lead by a Resident Engineer (RE). The RE would be responsible for ensuring the contractor is in compliance with the project plans, specifications, permits, and environmental requirements. Anderson Penna Inc. would provide a full time inspector for night work and material testing services.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach during construction of this project would be provided by the City and by Anderson Penna Inc., the City\u2019s construction management consultant. Letters would be distributed to all impacted properties in the City. Motorists on the freeway would be notified via Changeable Message Signs (CMS) deployed at least one week in advance. Notifications will also be posted on social media and in local newspapers.", "Traffic Impacts and Access", "To mitigate traffic impacts and daytime access, an after-hours permitwould be obtained by the contractor for work where access and traffic must be maintained during business hours, contingent on satisfying notification requirements per Santa Monica Municipal Code 4.12.110, which requires notification to persons occupying property within a perimeter of 500 feet of the proposed construction activity.Working hours will be at night between the hours of 9:00 PM and 5:00 AM. An after-hours permit will be needed for this project.", "During certain times when large-sized signs are being hoisted over the freeway lanes and/or City Streets, partial and possibly full closure of the I-10 freeway, Lincoln Boulevard, and Southbound Pacific Coast Highway (CA-1) may be necessary to ensure safety of motorists and workers. Said closures would be kept to a minimum with plenty of advance notice to reduce congestion on the freeway and City streets.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Peterson-Chase Construction, Inc.is for an amount not to exceed $597,355 (including a 15% contingency). The contract to be awarded to Anderson Penna Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $97,506 (including a 10% contingency).", "Funds in the amount of $694,861 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C017024.589000."]}, {"Title": "Reject Bid for the Purchase of Twenty-Three Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Reject Bids for Bid #4235 for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 3-Wheel Electric Vehicles;2. Direct staff to negotiate a Sole Source agreement with Municipal Maintenance Equipment in order to obtain quantity discount pricing for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 3-Wheel Electric Vehicles.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for parking enforcement and traffic control duties. This purchase would replace 23 vehicles that have reached the end of their useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In February 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles, or equal. After reviewing all submittals received, staff recommends rejecting all bids in order to attempt to obtain quantity discount pricing through a Sole Source agreement with Municipal Maintenance Equipment.", "Discussion", "In February 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver 23 Westward Industries GO-4 Electric Vehicles, or equal, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 604 vendors were notified and 13 vendors downloaded the bid.", "One bid was received and publicly opened on February 25, 2016, per Attachment A. Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; out of the 13 vendors that downloaded the bid, only one response was received in the form of a \u201cNo Bid\u201d form from Alvarez Electric Motors, which stated they are unable to supply the goods specified because they do not meet the specifications. Their vehicle uses absorbed glass mat batteries, not lithium ion, has a 40 to 50 mile range, not 65 to 75 miles, has four wheels, not three, and is not capable of towing. Lithium ion batteries are industry standard, have a longer life span, are lighter, and have a lower maintenance cost. Traffic Service Officers are out in the field the entire day and have multiple shifts, which could utilize the same vehicle around the clock. The longer battery range allows the operation to continue working without the need to charge the vehicle in between shifts.", "After receiving only one bid and one \u201cNo Bid\u201d, staff conducted additional outreach, contacting the City of Pacific Grove, City of Manhattan Beach, City & County of Denver, City of Santa Barbara, City of Las Vegas, City of Minneapolis, and City of Portland. These cities reported they had purchased regular fuel and/or electric vehicles and also received single bids after conducting a competitive process. Therefore, staff does not believe going out to bid again would result in additional bids being received.", "Staff recommends rejecting the sole bid received and proposes to negotiate a Sole Source agreement with Municipal Maintenance Equipment which would include quantity discount pricing.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Housing Authority Draft Administrative and Annual Plans", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "1. Approve the Housing Authority\u2019s Draft Fiscal Year 2016-17 Administrative Plan and Annual Plan provided in Attachments A and B, respectively; and 2. Authorize the submission of the Administrative and Annual Plans to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Housing Authority Draft Administrative Plan reflects federally mandated changes, as well as proposed local discretionary revisions, based on the Housing Authority\u2019s operational experience. The proposed discretionary revisions are primarily clarifications of existing policy to promote procedural consistency in such areas as required documentation, household composition, income determinations, and housing quality standards. The proposed Annual Plan for FY 2016-2017 provides information regarding the Housing Authority\u2019s strategies for the coming year. Both are required to be approved by Council prior to their submittal to the federal government.", "Background", "The U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) provides federal funds to the Santa Monica Housing Authority (HA) to administer rental assistance programs for approximately 1,300 very low- and low-income households. The HA administers programs which are governed by HUD regulations and policies and has local jurisdiction authority over discretionary policies. The Administrative and Annual Plans establish policies and procedures to administer the HA\u2019s rental subsidy programs in a manner consistent with HUD requirements in the context of federal laws and regulations. HUD expects Housing Authorities to develop policies and procedures that are consistent with mandatory regulations while making clear the optional or discretionary policies the HA has adopted. HUD\u2019s direction under 24 Code of Federal Regulations 982.54, requires the HA to make policy choices that provide guidance to staff, the public, and program applicants and participants. If local policies conflict with HUD regulations, HUD regulations take precedence.", "The Administrative Plan (Plan) is not a strategic or planning document, rather an operations manual of policies and procedures. Its purpose varies among different constituencies:", "\u00b7 It informs the Housing Commission regarding the policies of the HA on all aspects of program operations.", "\u00b7 It serves as a policy and procedures manual for staff to adhere to uniformly and consistently in its daily work.", "\u00b7 It provides the standard by which the participants and the public can determine if program applicants and participants are being treated equitably.", "\u00b7 It notifies HUD of the policies the HA has adopted in conformity with the Regulations.", "The context of the Plan begins with Congress which enacts the laws that govern the programs. HUD prepares regulations and notices to interpret, clarify, and define the laws. The HA then develops policies and procedures consistent with the regulations and compiles the policies in the Plan.", "HUD expects the HA to revise the Plans as needed to comply with changes in HUD regulations and statutes. Since April 2015, when the Administrative Plan was last revised (see Attachment C), there have been changes in the regulations governing the Section 8 Program, as well as several statutory changes. The Annual Plan provides a brief update on the HA\u2019s progress in achieving the Five-Year Plan goals and objectives.", "Discussion", "The draft Administrative Plan\u2019s policies reflect changes in mandated federal (HUD) requirements and regulations, as well as the HA\u2019s operational experience. The draft Plan includes a citation of the Code of Federal Registry imbedded within each policy. Highlights of key proposed discretionary revisions to the Plan for Fiscal Year 2016-17 are presented in Attachment D and include policies which:", "1. Add instructions for tenant households who want to communicate general complaints to the Housing Authority.", "2. Add language to clarify and increase consistency with regard to denial of reasonable accommodations when a nexus between the requested accommodation and the disability has not been established.", "3. Deny the addition of a live-in aide if the proposed live-in aide would have been ineligible for the program at initial admission.", "4. Clarify that the approval of a live-in aide will not increase the household voucher size, unless by reasonable accommodation.", "5. Clarify that arrest records for drug-related or violent criminal activity will be considered based on the previous five years only, except that if arrest records indicate a pattern of ongoing criminal activity, the cumulative records over a longer period may be considered.", "6. Add language to clarify and increase consistency with regard to citizenship verification requirements for all households.", "7. Clarify instructions for Waitlist Applicants for reporting changes in circumstances, such as income and mailing address.", "8. Add language for Waitlist Preferences and Selection:", "a. Establishing a preference (within tiers) for families with minor children (under 18 years old) who are enrolled in Santa Monica schools.", "b. Establishing the highest preference for involuntarily displaced households which have experienced an actual loss of housing.", "9. Clarify the procedure for reducing voucher size when household size decreases to a level below one person per bedroom.", "10. Clarify the determination of temporary income versus annual income for applicant and participant households.", "11. Conform to Housing Quality Standards criteria which focus solely on health and safety conditions.", "12. Add language to incorporate Santa Monica laws pertaining to just-cause eviction protections.", "13. Add language allowing renegotiation of repayments based on demonstrated hardship.", "The draft Annual Plan for FY 2016-2017 includes a mission statement, goals and objectives, capital fund information, housing needs statement, and additional information describing the Housing Authority\u2019s High Performer status.", "The draft Administrative and Annual Plans have been presented to the Housing Commission, Commission for the Senior Community, Social Services Commission, Disability Commission, and the Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles (LAFLA). The draft Plans were available for public comment on the City\u2019s website for 45 days ending March7, 2016. The only public comment received was from LAFLA, whose comments focused on owner repairs, determining income, and extending allowable time periods for obtaining housing. General feedback from all of the Commissions was supportive of the proposed changes. Thecomments received and responses are provided in AttachmentE and are also included as an attachment to the draft Administrative Plan. HUD must approve the final Plans no later than 75 days after the Plans are submitted.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Introduction and first reading of an ordinance amending Chapters 4.36 and 8.100 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code clarifying various aspects of temporary and permanent tenant relocation benefits", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Introduce for first reading the attached proposed ordinance amending Chapters 4.36 and 8.100 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code clarifying various aspects of the temporary and permanent tenant relocation provisions; and2. Provide direction on Council\u2019s intent for the creation of a new Temporary Relocation Coordinator versus a Housing Crisis First Responder team.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its January 26, 2016 meeting, Council directed staff to explore and propose specifics for establishing a Housing Crisis First Responder team to respond to housing emergencies. As a result of meetings to review the current framework for addressing tenant issues, staff determined that various provisions of Chapters 4.36 and 8.100 related to permanent and temporary relocation benefits for tenants and responsibilities of landlords required clarification to assist with administration of the law and with enforcement. The proposed ordinance attempts to provide this clarification. In order to address Council\u2019s specific direction regarding the creation of a Housing Crisis First Responder team, staff seeks additional guidance from Council and direction on the potential creation of a new Temporary Relocation Coordinator in lieu of a Housing Crisis First Responder Team.", "Background", "At its August 26, 2015 meeting, staff was directed to focus on maintaining an inclusive and diverse community as a strategic goal of the Council. Addressing temporary and permanent relocation issues, including those created during construction or the performance of basic maintenance is central to this goal.", "At its January 26, 2016 meeting, Council directed staff as part of the FY 2016/17 exception based budget process to explore and propose specifics for establishing a Housing Crisis First Responder team to respond to housing emergencies.", "At its January 12, 2016 meeting, Council directed staff to support statewide legislation to amend the Ellis Act to require landlords to give one year\u2019s notice to all tenants of the termination of their tenancies under the Act and to notify tenants of an intent to re-offer the property for rent.", "At its January 13, 2015 meeting (Attachment A) the Council adopted an ordinance amending the City\u2019s Tenant Harassment Ordinance (THO) to expand protections to tenants, by modifying the state-of-mind requirement, clarifying the scope of certain prohibited conduct, and increasing penalties. The ordinance modified the required state of mind for violations of the THO from \u201cmalice\u201d to \u201cbad faith\u201d, clarified the scope of prohibited conduct as to improper entries into units and invasions of privacy, increased the maximum potential civil penalty for violations to $10,000, and increase civil penalties for violations committed against senior or disabled tenants. The ordinance also added new notice and reporting requirements for owners who engage in buyout negotiations with tenants.", "At its January 14, 2014 meeting (Attachment B), Council adopted an ordinance amending Section 4.36.085 and 4.36.090 prohibiting agreements that limit tenants from engaging in public processes.", "At its December 13, 2011 meeting, Council adopted an ordinance amending the Chapter 4.36 and 4.56 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) to increase permanent relocation benefits; change eligibility requirements for relocation enhancements; extend tenant harassment protections to all tenants covered by just cause eviction rules; and correct certain code section references. Preceding the adoption of this ordinance, a number of public meetings were held with Council regarding tenant relocation benefits and tenant harassment. For reference the following two staff reports are attached from meetings held on September 13, 2011 (Attachment C) and December 6, 2011 (Attachment D).", "At its June 12, 2007 meeting Council adopted an ordinance clarifying and amending the City\u2019s relocation law by requiring that permanent benefit amounts be updated annually and by making various changes to the temporary relocation law. These changes, among other things, established deadlines for benefit payments, established per diem limits on benefits to be set by Council resolution, required the Building Officer to provide notice to landlords and tenants of their obligations, provided a right of appeal for landlords and tenants, exempted landlords from the obligation to pay benefits to a tenant who was entirely or primarily responsible for causing the condition necessitating the relocation, and modified the remedies for violations. For reference the following two staff reports are attached from meetings held on May 8, 2007 (Attachment E) and May 24, 2007 (Attachment F)", "At its October 23, 2007 meeting (Attachment G) Council adopted an ordinance clarifying that periodic increases to the amount of permanent relocation benefits that are effective on or before the date a tenant actually vacates a rental housing unit, are payable to the tenant even when certain filings or proceedings related to the relocation predated the effective date of the increase. Thus, for example, when the amounts of permanent relocation benefits increase on July 1 of a given year, a tenant who vacates on July 15 of that year is entitled to the new amount, even if the landlord is completing an Ellis Act eviction that was begun prior to the effective date of the increase.", "At its October 9, 2007 meeting (Attachment H) Council adopted an ordinance amending the City\u2019s tenant harassment law, by requiring that a tenant first prevail in an unlawful detainer action before a landlord could be liable for bringing a wrongful action to recover possession of the rental housing unit.", "In response to a change in State law, at its July 13, 2004 meeting (Attachment I) Council adopted an ordinance extending relocation benefits to all residents displaced by Ellis Act evictions, irrespective of household income. The City\u2019s Relocation Assistance Ordinance (Chapter 4.36 of the Municipal Code) originally required relocation assistance for all tenants whose units were withdrawn from the rental market under Government Code Sections 7060 et seq. (the \u201cEllis Act\u201d). In Channing v. City of Berkeley (1992) 11 Cal App.4th 88, the California Court of Appeal interpreted Government Code Section 7060.1(c) to restrict local authority on Ellis relocation benefits to lower income households. In response to the Channing decision, Council amended the Relocation Assistance Ordinance to limit Ellis relocation benefits to lower income households. Effective January 2004, the California Legislature amended Government Code Section 7060.1(c) to broaden local authority on Ellis relocation benefits to all tenants regardless of income which rendered moot the Court of Appeal\u2019s holding in Channing.", "Discussion", "Tenant related issues can range from the straightforward where one agency may be involved and the concerns are addressed quickly by a responsive landlord, to the very complex in nature involving multiple agencies and resistant landlords. In the case of complex cases where tenant related cases cross departmental and divisional lines, the multiple agencies work together on an ad hoc basis to coordinate efforts, as well as with non-city non-profit organizations, such as the Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles.", "This staff report is specific to questions of habitability of a residential housing unit and is focused on recommendations to address issues related to this topic, particularly as it relates to temporary relocation benefits, which can be on an emergency basis.", "To clarify the various roles and to assist with the discussion of this topic, following is a summary of the various agencies that are involved in tenant related issues. These groups coordinate on an ad hoc bases when necessary.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Rent Control Board and Agency - Administers the Rent Control law with the goal of controlling residential rents, preserving rental housing, encouraging maintenance, and ensuring rental-property owners a fair return.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Department of Housing and Economic Development Housing Division - Responsible for preserving existing affordable housing in Santa Monica and creating new housing opportunities for residents with low and moderate incomes. The division administers the Housing and Urban Development\u2019s Housing Choice Voucher Program (i.e. Section 8).", "\u00b7 Santa Monica City Attorney\u2019s Office Consumer Protection Division - Responsible for enforcing the Tenant Harassment Ordinance (THO) and assists tenants and property owners with understanding their rights and responsibilities, while encouraging cooperation.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Department of Planning and Community Development Code Enforcement Division - The Code Enforcement Division is responsible for responding to complaints regarding habitability, enforcing relocation orders, and issuing Notice of Violations and citations.", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Department of Planning and Community Development \u2013 Building and Safety Division - The Building Officer is responsible for determining if a unit is habitable, issuing temporary relocation orders when warranted, and administering the means and methods[1] requirements when construction work will be performed to determine and mitigate impacts on tenants.", "\u00b7 Los Angeles County Health Department (LACHD) - Responsible for enforcing the California Health and Safety Code, inspects apartments for health code violations such as cockroaches and rodents, and lack of maintenance. Investigates complaints regarding general sanitation, nuisance problems, and excessive dust, lead-based paints, asbestos, and mold conditions.", "\u00b7 Outside Non-profit tenant serving organizations such as the Legal Aid Foundation of Los Angeles \u2013 Advocates for tenants through eviction defense and advises tenants regarding housing issues.", "\u00b7 American Red Cross - Provides emergency temporary assistance to individuals and families (not limited to tenants) who are displaced by natural and man-made disasters, including home fires, wildfires, earthquakes, floods, hazardous materials spills, transportation accidents, and other emergencies. Assistance may include shelter, food, clothing, toiletry items, clean-up items, medical and mental health support, and referrals to organizations that help with long-term needs.", "In considering Council\u2019s request to consider the formation of a Housing Crisis First Responder team, staff has reviewed the various and diverse aspects of tenant related issues which are handled by the multiple government and non-profit agencies outlined above. Staff also convened meetings with representatives of a number of City departments, including Building and Safety, Code Enforcement, Human Services, Housing and Economic Development and Rent Control Agency staff to conduct an after action assessment of the response to the fire, subsequent relocation of tenants, and the Ellising of the building at 1605 Ocean Front Walk.", "As part of staff\u2019s efforts to address Council direction, staff recommends amendments to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Chapters 4.36\u2013Tenant Relocation Assistant and 8.100\u2013Tenant Protection During Construction to clarify existing language regarding temporary and permanent tenant relocation assistance requirements (Attachment J). These changes are specific to issues related to temporary relocation due to habitability (including construction related) and permanent relocation related to when tenants are being permanently displaced from their homes. Both provisions are currently enforced by the Planning and Community Development Department via the Building and Safety Division and the Code Enforcement Division. As noted earlier in this report, when tenant issues beyond habitability and relocation arise, Building and Safety and Code Enforcement staff coordinate with other agencies as needed. Staff also seeks additional guidance and direction from Council on the creation of a Housing Crisis First Responder team.", "The report also outlines administrative changes to be implemented by these divisions to ensure greater education of tenants and landlords regarding the requirements of tenant protections and noticing during construction.", "Since January 1, 2015 to March 2016, there have been 46 cases related to habitability with 17 requiring relocation. These cases may or may not have included other issues that would have been enforced by Rent Control, such as rent adjustments, or tenant harassment claims handled by the City Attorney\u2019s Office. In some cases tenants were represented by legal counsel, such as LAFLA. Since this report is focused on habitability and tenant relocation specifically, other tenant issues are not addressed in this report. The main conditions that triggered the need for relocation were major construction and lack of gas/heat. There have been two fires that resulted in relocation. In most cases, landlords address issues timely without the need to cite or issue an order, however, there have been cases where landlords have been resistant to paying relocation or have disputed the requirement to pay relocation.", "Proposed Changes to Local Law", "During staff\u2019s review, and considering recent relocations, staff determined that the laws related to tenant relocation and tenant protections during construction needed clarification and improvement. Accordingly, staff recommends the following amendments:", "Definitions", "1. Add definition for \u201cComparable Housing\u201d to combine the two separate definitions that currently exist.", "2. Add definitions of \u201cpermanent relocation\u201d and \u201ctemporary relocation\u201d, to outline clearly the conditions that require relocation, and clarify when either type of relocation is required, which will allow clarification that temporary relocation is required until such time tenancy is terminated as defined by State law. These definitions will ensure that in such cases when a tenant is displaced during an Ellis waiting period, the landlord is required to provide temporary relocation until such time the waiting period is over, and that the tenant is then entitled to permanent relocation at the end of that waiting period.", "3. Modify the definition of \u201cRental Housing Unit\u201d to include all dwelling units registered with the City\u2019s Rent Control Board, but exclude all units that are neither permitted by the City nor lawfully registered with the Rent Control Board.", "Remedies, Appeals, and Penalties", "1. Clarify the availability of permanent relocation benefits to tenants who are displaced from illegal rental housing units that have no building and safety approval and are not lawfully registered with the Rent Control Board. Staff is proposing that at least one affected tenant must have resided continuously within that unit for the past 12 months to be eligible for the benefit, in order to ensure that residency has been established and to deter abuse of the relocation process.", "2. Add language clarifying that failing to provide relocation assistance would make the landlord subject to injunctive relief as well as be liable in a civil action.", "3. Add language clarifying that failing to comply with a relocation order issued by the Building Officer is an infraction with a fine not to exceed $250 or misdemeanor with a fine not greater than five hundred dollars. Existing law allows for misdemeanor fines to be up to $1,000 which is in conflict with City Charter Section 620, which limits misdemeanor penalties to $500.", "4. Double administrative citation fines associated with the failure by the landlord to obtain permits to comply with housing, health, building or safety laws that then require the relocation of a tenant. For example, if a landlord installs a heating system without a permit and the system fails requiring the relocation of a tenant, any fines for performing work without a permit would be double the amount established by resolution of the Council. The current fine for work without permit is $500. If the conditions of this provision are met, the fine would be fine $1000.", "5. Making failure to comply with a relocation order a strict liability offense, which means that the City Prosecutor would not be required to prove criminal intent to obtain a conviction.", "6. Require landlords convicted of violating tenant relocation requirements reimburse the City for all investigative costs.", "7. Add language clarifying that if the landlord fails or refuses to provide relocation benefits, and the City chooses to pay such benefits to the tenants in the landlord\u2019s place, the City will have the right to seek reimbursement of these expenses, plus any administrative fees for doing so.", "8. Transfer the hearing of appeals from the Building and Fire Life-Safety Commission to a City Hearing Examiner to expedite the appeal process. Clarify that relocation orders are not stayed during an appeal, unless done so by the Building Officer or the Hearing Examiner. If the landlord wins their appeal and the Building Officer refused to stay the relocation order, the City would be responsible for reimbursing the landlord for any relocation expenses paid. This provision is intended to ensure that the tenant is housed immediately without any delays due to an appeal.", "9. Strike the conditions outlined in the code to determine habitability and instead rely on State Health and Safety Code Section 17920.3 to guide the Building Officer\u2019s determination regarding habitability. This ensures a consistent application of habitability requirements.", "Landlord Responsibilities and Options", "1. Increase the landlord\u2019s responsibility to cooperate with the Building Officer to ensure tenant can be notified of any relocation order that is issued, make a good faith effort to monitor the necessity of the tenant\u2019s continued relocation and provide tenants with advance notice of any changes to the anticipated relocation period.", "2. Provide the option to the landlord to provide a \u201cper diem\u201d when relocation is required for 30 days or more in lieu of \u201ccomparable housing\u201d, require that the landlord pay a per diem until such time comparable housing is secured, and not allow the landlord to switch from comparable housing to per diems once comparable housing is provided.", "3. Clarifying that the time period the landlord has to pay temporary relocation benefits is 24 hours from when the conditions requiring temporary relocation are triggered. This will ensure that any delays from when the conditions began to when staff is made aware of the conditions and able to issue any necessary orders do not delay the amounts due to the tenant for the actual periods the conditions requiring relocation existed. This will discourage landlords from delaying repairs, particularly during the time it may take staff to complete its investigation.", "4. Allow for the landlord to request early termination of temporary relocation by the Building Officer if the tenant\u2019s behavior causes their removal or eviction, for cause, from his/her temporary housing accommodations to ensure that the landlord is not made responsible for the personal conduct of a tenant.", "5. Clarify that relocation benefits are not required if a tenant refuses to vacate the property in response to a relocation order, since unless a building is deemed unsafe to enter (e.g. yellow or red tag) and the tenant is ordered to vacate, a tenant may not be forced to leave.", "6. Clarify the exemptions to the requirement to pay relocation to include acts that are caused by conditions outside of the property such as a terrorist attack, accident, criminal activity, public utility failure, or conditions created by an adjacent building. However, staff also recommends the addition of language making any person, other than the landlord, who causes tenant relocation, be responsible to provide temporary relocation. This provision addresses those circumstances where an incident substantially initiated outside of the property, such as a vehicle crashing into a building, renders a living unit uninhabitable, the responsible party can be held accountable for the relocation benefits.", "7. Increase the posting and notification requirements of the landlord related to construction activities in buildings with tenants to ensure that tenants are aware of the expected impacts and timeframe for construction projects and contact information for who to call to report issues.", "8. Increase the landlords responsibility to monitor conditions and notify the city when changes to the project or the occupancy of units changes and submit updated means and methods documentation to ensure that the Building Officer is able to update mitigation requirements and/or order relocation if necessary.", "9. When applying for a permit, requiring the landlord to provide a complete description of all construction related projects at the property that would commence concurrent with or immediately after the proposed project. This provision is intended to require a landlord to disclose the full scope of a project to ensure that staff is able to assess the potential impacts related to the full scope of a project instead of just one aspect of it.", "10. Extend joint liability to a licensed contractor serving as the agent of the landlord for any violation of the means and methods requirements to ensure that the contractor, who frequently has a more direct impact on tenants is motivated to comply.", "Housing Crisis First Responder Team", "Based on the information available to staff currently, staff does not specifically recommend the creation of a new team at this time, but instead would recommend the creation of a Tenant Relocation Coordinator position for permanent and temporary relocation issues that would report into either the Building and Safety Division or the Code Enforcement Division. This is due mostly because multiple agencies and non-profits handle various aspects of tenant related issues, all of whom bring vastly different focus, skills, and expertise related to tenant issues beyond temporary or permanent relocation. These various groups currently coordinate as needed depending on the individual circumstances of each case; however, a full time position which coordinates the execution of these various resources, as well as monitor construction projects where tenants are living to ensure tenants are protected during the construction process, may meet Council\u2019s policy objectives while limiting the fiscal expenditures associated with the creation of a new team.", "Staff seeks guidance from Council on whether the proposed Tenant Relocation Coordinator, outlined further below, meets the Council\u2019s concerns, and/or what types of direct support to landlords/tenants Council would expect staff to provide that is above and beyond current policies. For example, currently in the event of a natural disaster or accident such as a fire, the Red Cross currently provides short term emergency housing to individuals as it did in the 1605 Ocean Front Walk. Staff secured relocation for the tenants following the relocation provided by the Red Cross, since the landlord was unwilling at the time. Is it Council\u2019s intent to have city staff respond to these emergencies, along with the Police and Fire departments, and actively find and/or provide housing for displaced tenants in lieu of the Red Cross?", "Tenant Relocation Coordinator", "The Tenant Relocation Coordinator position, which is recommended by staff in lieu of a new multi-disciplinary team, would serve as a central contact and facilitator for tenants when they are displaced or going to be displaced from their home, ensuring enforcement of Chapters 4.36\u2013Tenant Relocation Assistant and 8.100\u2013Tenant Protection During Construction as well as ensuring that displaced tenants needs are being considered. The position would assess each individual circumstance, respond to emergencies after hours on an on-call basis, coordinate with other agencies as needed, and educate tenants regarding resources available based on the tenant\u2019s issues, such as Rent Control, the City Attorney\u2019s Office, Housing, the Los Angles Legal Foundation of Los Angeles, and emergency personnel, as well as actively assist tenants with engaging those resources. The position would also, as needed, engage the Santa Monica Human Services division and/or the Los Angeles County Department of Social Services as needed.", "The position would coordinate with the City Attorney\u2019s Office, Rent Control, and Housing to proactively educate landlords and tenants regarding their rights and obligations related to habitability, construction requirements, and relocation. The position would track all construction projects where tenants live, monitoring means and method approvals and project scope of work to ensure that projects are within the scope of work approved by the Building Officer, making referrals to Code Enforcement and Building and Safety as necessary to address non-compliance as a proactive measure to mitigate potential impacts on tenants. This position would also work with all involved enforcement agencies to prepare referrals to the City Attorney\u2019s Office for prosecution and would liaise between the City Attorney\u2019s office and the various enforcement agencies to ensure successful prosecution of such cases.", "This new position would allow for greater review and tracking of construction projects that impact tenants and greater proactive coordination of the various agencies when a tenant is displaced. Staff would continue to evaluate and bring back additional recommendations for staffing or resources if needed.", "Administrative Procedural Changes and Budget", "Staff has changed its procedures to issue relocation orders in all cases where a unit is found to be uninhabitable, even when the landlord relocates the tenant without the need for an order, to ensure that the City has initiated its enforcement steps early in the process. This procedure will no longer be necessary should Council adopt the proposed ordinance. Staff also plans to increase administrative penalties, which can be issued by Code Enforcement staff, for failing to provide relocation benefits from $500 to $1000 and creating a new $1000 administrative penalty for failing to submit an updated means and methods plan when there are changes to the scope of work for a project where tenants reside.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. If Council directs staff to add the new Tenant Relocation Coordinator, staff will include this request with the Fiscal Year 16/17 exception based budget."]}], [{"Title": "Review of City Noise Ordinance and Related Enforcement Policies and Practices", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Make no changes to the existing noise ordinance, since existing law would likely withstand a constitutional challenge and provides enforcement staff with the tools necessary to enforce noise related violations; 2. Direct staff to compile Administrative Instructions which would provide further guidance for law enforcement officers in the field.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its December 15, 2015 meeting, Council directed staff to review how the recently amended noise ordinance is being enforced in commercial areas and to consider how it might be further refined to avoid having it interfere with activities protected by the First Amendment. Broadly, staff believes that the existing ordinance is sufficient to enforce noise, considering constitutional constraints. Eliminating noise enforcement in commercial districts would severely undermine the Police Department\u2019s ability to respond to complaints. Therefore, staff recommends that Council direct staff to compile Administrative Instructions to provide greater guidance to law enforcement officers in the field.", "Background", "At its December 15, 2015 meeting, Council directed staff to review how the recently amended noise ordinance is being enforced in commercial areas and to consider how it might be further refined to avoid having it interfere with activities protected by the First Amendment, particularly demonstrations/protests.", "At its February 24, 2015 meeting (Attachment A), Council adopted an ordinance amending Chapter 4.12 of the Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) to add general prohibitions against noise that is unreasonably disruptive to persons of normal sensitivity and to clarify that the general prohibition, but not the specific decibel limits, would apply to activities in or on public streets, parks, and other public property. Prior to these modifications, the noise ordinance only contained decibel limitations which were applied to three different Noise Zones, including public streets and sidewalks.", "Although the amendments retained the decibel levels that had previously existed, the code amendments altered the exemptions so that the decibel limits would not apply to activities on public property, including streets and parks. This was intended to eliminate the issue of whether the decibel limits unlawfully interfere with the exercise of First Amendment rights in public forums.", "Instead, local law now only regulates noise in public spaces by the general prohibition on excessive noise, which prohibits noise that would \u201cunreasonably disturb the peace, quiet and comfort of persons of normal sensitivity\u201d and noise that is \u201cso harsh or prolonged or unnatural or unusual in [its] use, time or place as to cause physical discomfort to any persons of normal sensitivity\u2026\u201d. Such general prohibitions have been adopted in other cities and upheld by the courts. Of course, in addition to local law, state law, such as California Penal Code Section 415, also regulates noise on public (and private) properties.", "The local law changes discussed above also incorporated guidance from the courts cautioning against conferring too much unguided discretion on law enforcement personnel, by providing objective criteria for enforcement considerations, such as: the volume, intensity and duration of the noise, the distance from which the noise can be heard, and time of day or night the noise occurs. The changes also provided for a new prohibition on any person from interfering with or resisting efforts by law enforcement personnel to enforce the City\u2019s noise laws, and allows for the handling of violations of the noise ordinance by either infraction or misdemeanor, in addition to an administrative citation by non-sworn officers such as Code Enforcement personnel.", "At its February 24, 2004 meeting (Attachment B) Council updated and substantially revised the noise ordinance, with a particular focus on residential neighborhoods and affording greater protections to residents living in proximity to industrial and commercial uses.", "Discussion", "Political speech in traditional public forums, such as streets and parks, is afforded a very high level of First Amendment protection, and blanket prohibitions of such speech are generally unconstitutional. However, the First Amendment to the United States Constitution allows reasonable regulations on sound amplification and other loud noise, such as:", "\u00b7 Reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions on such speech are permissible if they are content-neutral, narrowly tailored to serve substantial government interests, and leave ample alternative ways for the speech to occur.", "\u00b7 Speech or expressive conduct can be restricted because of its relationship to unlawful conduct, such as disorderly conduct or trespass.", "The First Amendment, in some instances, permits the government to impose a permit requirement for those wishing to engage in expressive activities that are content-neutral on public property, such as streets, sidewalks, and parks. Any such permit scheme controlling the time, place, and manner of speech must not be based on the content of the message, must be narrowly tailored to serve a significant governmental interest, and must leave open ample alternatives for communication. The City currently imposes such a permit on street performers in very limited areas of the City, where congestion is most acute. The City\u2019s community events law also imposes permitting requirements for larger events. However, small free speech gatherings, such as demonstrations or protests involving less than 75 persons, are generally not subject to local permitting requirements.", "Courts have also upheld governmental regulations and actions that limit unreasonable noise based on the government's broad powers to protect citizens from extremely disruptive conduct. Additionally courts are particularly likely to uphold governmental actions which protect individuals against extremely disruptive and unwelcomed noise and  are unable to easily escape from such noise (e.g., extremely loud demonstrations in residential areas late in the evening).", "However, governmental free-speech regulations of traditional public forums, such as streets, sidewalks or parks, must generally be content and speaker neutral. In other words, the government may not single out particular subjects or speakers for favored or disfavored treatment. The Supreme Court has interpreted the first amendment as creating a \"...profound national commitment to the principle that debate on public issues should be uninhibited, robust and wide-open...\"[1]", "Noise violations are enforced by both the City\u2019s Police Department and the Code Enforcement Division; however, sworn police officers take the lead on incidents that involve larger public safety concerns, such as protests/demonstrations. Based on Council\u2019s direction, this staff report focuses primarily on the enforcement of noise related to protests.", "Police officers face difficult constitutional and operational issues when tasked with the dual responsibility of maintaining public order and protecting the First Amendment rights of protestors and marchers. The Santa Monica Police Department is charged with safeguarding the public during a demonstration which extends to individuals who are exercising their right to free speech under the First Amendment of the United States Constitution. Eliminating noise enforcement in commercial districts would severely undermine the Police Department\u2019s ability to respond to complaints considering most protests occur in commercial districts.", "The Police Department responded to 44 calls for service in 2015 regarding disturbances involving a protest. All of the calls for service have occurred in areas deemed commercial. These include hospitals, business districts, hotel properties and places of worship. In all but two of these calls, no law enforcement action was taken. As long as the demonstrator(s) observe reasonable time, place and manner restrictions Santa Monica police personnel will not intervene unless there is a clear and present danger of civil unrest, immediate threat to public safety, unreasonable disturbance or the acceptance of a lawful citizen\u2019s arrest.", "Due to the considerable challenges in balancing the rights of both the protesters and other members of the public, it is crucial for police officers to be able to assess the specific circumstances of each protest and make decisions accordingly. The Police Department\u2019s Planning and Intelligence Unit has enjoyed great success in collaborating with protest group organizers, contacting them prior to the event to ensure the group is able to safely exercise its right to protest without imposing on the safety or rights of others. This proactive communication practice has resulted in the successful completion of several highly volatile protest topics where public safety and the safety of the protestors was a primary concern. In a recent incident where protesters were detained temporarily, the circumstances resulting in the temporary detention of protesters was triggered by the physical conduct of the protesters, not just the noise that was being generated (no individual was formally booked or jailed). Santa Monica Police Department and Code Enforcement staff will be available at the City Council meeting to discuss enforcement.", "Staff recommends making no changes to the existing noise ordinance, since existing law would likely withstand a constitutional challenge and provides enforcement staff with the tools necessary to enforce noise related violations. Local law authorizes the City\u2019s Community Noise Officer to adopt regulations to guide the enforcement and implementation of the Noise Ordinance. Staff recommends that Council direct staff to compile such regulations which would provide further guidance for law enforcement officers in the field.", "Alternatives", "Council could direct staff to modify the noise ordinance to exempt \u201cpredominantly commercial\u201d districts from all local noise regulations. In such a case, staff seeks further input and direction from Council on defining \u201cpredominantly commercial\u201d districts. Commercial districts within the City are often mixed with residential units. Additionally, commercial districts often contain many noise sensitive uses, such as day care centers, elderly care facilities, hotels and hospitals.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Disposition of Mountain View Mobile Home Park", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve a one-time, temporary lot-line encroachment exemption for eight existing households, which impact eleven existing vacant spaces; and2. Authorize staff to issue a request for proposals from affordable housing organizations to acquire Mountain View Mobile Home Park and operate the property as affordable housing.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Mountain View Mobile Home Park is currently owned by the City, with property management contracted to a management company. Recognizing that the City as an owner of residential property is not consistent with the core mission of funding affordable housing rehabilitation and development, staff recommends solicitation of proposals from affordable housing organizations to acquire and operate Mountain View Mobile Home Park as affordable housing. The proposals must preserve affordability, optimize housing opportunities, and operate the property for the benefit of current and future low- and moderate-income households.", "Mountain View Mobile Home Park has the capacity to house 105 tenant households in designated \u201clots\u201d. Currently, eight households occupy more than one designated space because the lots were established long after the park was created. Staff recommends approving a one-time, temporary lot-line encroachment exemption for the eight households to protect and preserve their current homes.", "Background", "Mountain View Mobile Home Park (Park) was built in the 1940\u2019s and privately owned until purchased by the City in 2000 (Attachment A) to preserve the property as an affordable mobile home park for low- and moderate-income households. Restricted housing trust funds were used to acquire the property, requiring the recordation of an affordability covenant (i.e., deed restriction) establishing income eligibility requirements for future occupants. The Park is also subject to the Rent Control law, which limits rent increases and provides eviction protections for the residents. When purchased, the Park had failing infrastructure, roads not designed for emergency access, inadequate drainage with seasonal flooding, and homes that did not meet required minimum separation standards. To address these issues, the City focused attention on reconfiguring the Park and investing in safety and infrastructure improvements.", "In 2002 (Attachment B), the Santa Monica Rent Control Board approved the City\u2019s request to remove 36 vacant home sites to accommodate the reconfiguration of roadways for emergency vehicle access and establish definitive lot lines for individual home sites to conform to statewide standards. On August 16, 2006 (Attachment C), the Planning Commission approved the reconfiguration, and lot lines were established for 105 permanent home sites. Thereconfiguration required realignment or relocation of homes throughout the Park. The reconfiguration did not require all residents to relocate their homes, move ancillary structures, or limit yard areas to align with the established lot lines, resulting in the current encroachments of eight households.", "During 2008 and 2009, the City spent approximately $5 million on infrastructure improvements, including undergrounding electrical, telephone, and cable TV lines, installation of new natural gas, potable water, sanitary sewer, and street lighting systems, and construction of new curbs, gutters, and roadway pavement surfaces (Attachment D). After completing the improvements, 20 City-owned mobile homes at the Park were replaced with new manufactured homes in 2011 and 2012 at a cost of approximately $3 million (Attachment E). Additionally, nine residents participated in the Council-adopted financing program for Park residents (Attachment F), resulting in new manufactured homes installed during 2012 and 2013 at a cost of approximately $1.5million. Finally, staff coordinated the relocation of 12 residents displaced from Village Trailer Park (VTP) into the Park from 2014 to 2015, along with the installation of new manufactured homes paid for by the VTP developer.", "Lot Line Encroachment", "The minimum setback required by the State between homes is at least six feet with each home located at least three feet from the lot line or street. Non-conforming occupancies encroach into adjacent, vacant home sites, narrowing the usable building footprint and resulting in unusable home sites. Currently, eight households have encroachments into 11 adjacent, vacant home sites. Residents of the eight households own their homes and have lived and remained at the same locations in the Park fordecades. Many of the eight households have expressed concern that the lot lines established by the City are not consistent with the area they have occupied for decades. Though one or more adjacent sites are effectively unusable, the eight households pay rent for one home site.", "Disposition", "At its December 11, 2012 meeting (Attachment G), Council directed staff to explore disposition of all City-owned properties managed by the Housing Division, including Mountain View Mobile Home Park. Pursuant to Council direction, the City has disposed of most properties managed by the Housing Division, with the Park as one of the final disposition opportunities. Owning and operating the Park requires significant staff resources, including property management company selection and oversight, preparing and monitoring property budgets and expenditures, assisting with resolving tenant issues, and conferring with the City Attorney\u2019s Office regarding landlord / tenant legal matters. Transitioning the Park to non-City ownership would allow staff to focus more directly on its core mission of increasing affordable housing opportunities, while preserving the Park as affordable housing.", "Discussion", "The City\u2019s affordable housing priorities strongly support preservation of existing affordable housing and protection of tenant rights. Consistent with those priorities, staff recommends that an affordable housing organization be identified to own and operate the Park. A change in ownership would not affect tenancies, as the Park is subject to the Rent Control law, which provides eviction protections. Existing affordability covenants require the Park to be operated as affordable housing for low- and moderate-income households through 2062. Additional covenants associated with transfer of the Park could include deeper income targeting, longer deed-restriction terms, and an option for the City to repurchase the Park for $1 prior to the expiration of affordability covenants.", "Encroachments of homes onto adjacent lots resulted from the establishment of measurable lot lines in conjunction with achieving safety standards in the Park. Lotlines in the Park prior to the safety improvements were not documented and areunavailable. Currently, eight home sites effectively occupy more than one lot. Giventhe age of some of the homes, several may not structurally withstand relocation. Moreover,some homes are too large to fit on one home site.  Therefore, staff proposes a one-time, temporary encroachment exemption that would be voided with major alterations to the home, or when the existing tenants terminate residency at the Park. Additionally, staff proposes that the exemption be non-transferable. One consideration related to the exemption is that affordable housing opportunities on the eleven affected lots will be delayed, potentially for decades. In addition, the financial feasibility for a new owner-operator would be impacted by the reduction in potential rental income.", "The recommended actions regarding encroachment exemption and Park disposition were presented to the Housing Commission on March 17, 2016 (Attachment H). TheCommission generally supported the recommended concept and the Commission\u2019s specific concerns and recommendations have been incorporated into this report. Several members of the Park attended the Commission meeting and supported the recommended encroachment exemption. Park residents in attendance expressed mixed support for transitioning the Park to a new entity, with some valuing the security they feel with the City as owner. With Council authorization to seek proposals, staff would share a draft request for proposals (RFP) at a public Housing Commission meeting, as well as at a meeting with Park residents, to ensure opportunity for input from all stakeholders. Prior to staff preparing a recommendation for Council regarding the selection of a new owner-operator, staff would solicit feedback from the Housing Commission.", "Request for Proposals", "If Council directs staff to proceed with the recommended approaches, staff would issue an RFP targeted to affordable housing organizations with appropriate experience to own and operate affordable housing and mobile home parks. The RFP would seek proposals to acquire the property, install new, sustainable manufactured homes on vacant home sites (currently vacant and as sites become available), and operate the Park as affordable housing for the benefit of low- and moderate-income households. The RFP would be evaluated on:", "\u2022 thoroughness, completeness, and responsiveness;", "\u2022 financial feasibility of the proposal;", "\u2022 approach to managing and operating the properties;", "\u2022 financial capacity of the organization;.", "\u2022 demonstrated experience and capacity in owning and operating affordable housing and mobile home parks;", "\u2022 approach to customer service in a multi-cultural and multi-lingual community;", "\u2022 demonstrated knowledge and compliance with regulatory safety compliance requirements; and", "\u2022 commitment to local hiring practices.", "Alternatives", "An alternative to transferring the Park to non-City ownership would be a ground lease to an owner-operator rather transferring ownership. A ground lease could achieve City goals of transferring operations of the Park to a qualified affordable housing provider while retaining City ownership. However, a ground lease may not provide the same degree of arms-length independence from property management responsibilities that a transfer of ownership would provide. A ground lease could negatively impact the ability to access traditional financing for the Park should the need arise. Another approach would be for Council to provide alternate direction relating to the encroachment issue and the disposition of the Park.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action involving a Request for Proposals. No budget action is necessary as a result of the approval of the encroachment exemption for the eight households, as the City\u2019s financial impact would remain the annual loss of approximately $41,000 in potential rent revenue.", "5"]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2016.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Arts Commission for a term ending on 06/30/2018.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Recommendation to accept Jacqueline Kalish's resignation from the Social Services Commission and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember McKeown that the Council, in furtherance of adopted policies contained in \u2018Creative Capital,\u2019 allocate from the Council\u2019s contingency account $30,000 to match and augment funds already being raised by the 18th Street Arts Center, a 501c3 charitable organization serving Santa Monica since 1988, to help create a sustainable business plan for improvements to the existing 18th Street Arts Center campus in Santa Monica.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Councilmember Davis that staff investigate strategies including, if necessary, amendments to current ordinances to curtail for-profit physical training activities on streets and sidewalks in the area near the 4th Street steps and on street and sidewalks adjacent to the 4th Street median strip or parkway.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1521765000": [[{"Title": "City Manager's Report:  Downtown Construction Update", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items"}], [{"Title": "Construction Contract for Santa Monica Utility Undergrounding, Excavation and Construction Services", "Department": "Information Services Department, Broadband", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #UUC1004 to VCI Construction, LLC, a California based company, for utility undergrounding, excavation, and construction services related to the City\u2019s fiber optic network;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a construction contract with VCI Construction, LLC in an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and, 3. Authorize the Chief Information Officer to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work as required within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is required to complete excavation, undergrounding, and installation of fiber optic utilities for CityNet broadband customers within 90 days to meet telecommunication industry standards. The City also requires fiber optic construction to city facilities periodically for the City\u2019s internal network and City Wi-Fi installations. Upon review of prior bidding procedures, construction rates, and project duration times, staff identified an opportunity to expedite installation and obtain more competitive rates by selecting one vendor to manage the multi-phased fiber optic project rather than bidding each minor scope of work separately. The recommended contract amount would allow for the City to request the contractor to apply its proposed billing rates to several installations requiring construction on an as-needed basis, and to respond for emergency repair work. Staff recommends VCI Construction, LLC to provide construction services related to City fiber optic customers and for installations to City facilities in an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years.", "Background", "The City of Santa Monica initiated construction on a City-owned Municipal Fiber Network in 2002, for delivering voice, video, and data communications to City facilities. In 2006, the municipal network began offering dark fiber to businesses located in Santa Monica, and in 2010 launched a lit fiber service offering for Santa Monica businesses under the network\u2019s new trademark CityNet. The City continues to extend the network regularly, for connecting new and existing City facilities, redundant network routes for network reliability, connection of new City assets to the network, including conduit and fiber installation during scheduled street maintenance, and for required maintenance on the existing fiber optic infrastructure. City operation infrastructure projects accounted for over $200,000 in the current Fiscal Year 2015-16. In addition, the City constructs approximately 15 fiber routes annually for new CityNet customers, with a construction cost typically ranging from $15,000 \u2013 $20,000 depending upon the scope of work. All CityNet customer installations have contractual obligations to complete utility undergrounding and excavation for installation of fiber optic services, within 90 days of contract execution. This installation schedule ensures the City meets telecommunication industry standards.", "Historically, the City competitively bid each installation project separately. Because the minor scope of work averaged approximately $40,000, the City and its customers did not receive the economies of scale or elevated project priority status for prompt construction completion that a larger contract would obtain. In December 2011, the City bid the fiber network construction work as a multi-phased project. On April 10, 2012 (Attachment A), Council approved award of the bid in the amount of $200,000 to VCI Construction, Inc. As a result, the City realized an average cost reduction of 50%, expedited construction installations, and enhanced project management on multiple small-scale installations due to the aggregate contract. Subsequent to exhaustion of contract authority for the initial contract to VCI Construction, Inc., the City bid the fiber construction work again in December 2012 as a multi-phased project. On April 9, 2013 (Attachment B), Council approved award of the bid in the amount of $400,000 to KDC, Inc. dba Dynalectric.", "Discussion", "The City issued a new Request for Bids on January 21, 2016, after scheduled construction work exhausted 100% of remaining contract authority on the KDC, Inc. dba Dynalectric contract. Once again, the new Request for Bid aimed to establish a competitive rate structure for new fiber optic customer installations, within a five year period that yielded expedited installation, prompt updates and efficient project coordination.", "Vendor Selection", "On January 21, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide utility undergrounding, excavation, and construction services as required by the Information Systems Department in accordance with City scope of work. The bid requirements included an engineering drawing representing an average construction work order for the City\u2019s fiber optic installations. Bidders were required to apply their rates to the engineering drawing specifications and submit their bid. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press on January 21, 2016 and January 28, 2016 in accordance with City Charter and Municipal code provisions. 1,285 vendors were notified and 43 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. The City Clerk\u2019s Office received two formal bids that were publicly opened by the City Clerk on February 25, 2016. The bid results are as follows (reflects average fiber optic construction work order):", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "VCI Construction, LLC.", "$ 12,285.00", "KDC Inc., dba Dynalectric", "$ 28,086.00", "A selection committee of Information Systems Department and Public Works Department staff reviewed the proposals. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, ability, skill and capacity of the bidder to perform the service promptly, within the time specified, without delay or interference, and compliance with City scope of work. VCI Construction, LLC (VCI) has demonstrated the ability to complete similar undergrounding, excavation, conduit and fiber optic cable installation work for municipal fiber optic network projects in Southern California, on a larger scale and scope of work up to $11,400,000 in cost, for a project requiring installation of fiber optic infrastructure to 700 commercial and residential properties. VCI has demonstrated a qualified onsite project management, related project experience, adherence to project schedules, emphasis on safety, and was the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, VCI Construction, LLC is recommended as the best bidder to provide Utility Undergrounding and Excavation services in accordance with City scope of work.", "VCI Construction, LLC has completed utility undergrounding projects for several Southern California municipalities and private telecommunication providers, including Sprint Communications, City of Riverside, and the City of Rancho Mirage. All referral agencies reported the firm\u2019s work was of the highest standard, completed according to engineering specifications, within estimated project timeline and budget, in a safe manner, and that employees were respectful and courteous to the public. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that VCI Construction, LLC Contractor\u2019s license is current, active, and in good standing.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach for this project would continue to be provided by Information Systems staff, consisting of public notifications to adjacent property owners, tenants, and surrounding community on the project scope, potential impacts, and schedule. Staff would continue to provide updates and contact information for inquiries during construction.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to VCI Construction, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $1,500,000 over five years. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Information Systems Department. The contract will be charged to accounts 01248.555010 and M55000614.589000. Future funding is contingent upon Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Refuse Disposal & Recycling Facilities and Processors", "Department": "Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize purchase orders to be issued to the following California-based companies: Commerce Refuse-To-Energy Facility, Southeast Resource Recovery Facility; USA Waste of California Facilities: Agromin Organics Recycling and Downtown Diversion; Texas-based company: Chiquita Canyon Landfill; and Arizona-based company: Sunshine Canyon Landfill, to provide ongoing landfill and recycling services. The annual amount over the next five years will not exceed $6,352,500 per year.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The use of the proposed landfill, transformation, and recycling facilities are major components of a complex system of facilities that handle and dispose of waste generated from residences, businesses and other sources in Santa Monica. Since disposal sites are regulated to accept up to a maximum amount of tonnage daily, the City must have several sites available to accept its solid waste materials on any given day. In addition, as the City continues to encourage waste diversion and recycling activities, provisions need to be made for continued organic and construction and demolition processing options, and for future alternative technologies. Staff recommends that purchase orders be issued to the facilities listed above to provide an ongoing mix of landfill, transformation, composting, and recycling services to the City over a five-year period at a total cost not to exceed $6,352,500 annually. The amount of each purchase order would be determined by materials generated and facility availability to process those materials.", "Background", "Prior to June 2011, Resource Recovery and Recycling (RRR) would issue annual purchase orders to landfills, waste-to-energy facilities and recycling processors as required for the disposal and processing of the solid waste stream collected and delivered to the City\u2019s Transfer Station.", "On June 28, 2011, Council approved the issuance of purchase orders to Commerce Refuse-To-Energy Facility, Southeast Resource Recovery Facility, Community Recycling, Puente Hills Landfill, Chiquita Canyon Landfill; and Sunshine Canyon Landfill for a five year period (Attachment A).", "In November 2012, Resource Recovery & Recycling was advised by Community Recycling that it would no longer be able to accept the City\u2019s organics waste due to permitting restrictions. After a competitive process, Agromin Organics Recycling Facility and USA Waste of California were selected and added to the authorized list of approved processing facilities on June 25, 2013 (Attachment B).", "The following is the amount of tons delivered to each facility in calendar year 2015:", "Chiquita Canyon Landfill 53,234.71", "Sunshine Canyon Landfill 6,109.66", "Commerce Refuse-To-Energy 6,926.28", "Southeast Resource Recovery Facility 6,091.41", "USA Waste of California d/b/a Agromin Organics 12,934.99", "Recology Los Angeles 1,618.90", "USA Waste of California d/b/a Downtown Diversion 1,354.27", "Total * 88,270.22", "*The total does not include recycling tonnage processed by the City contractor Allan Company.", "Discussion", "These landfill and recycling facilities are a major component to a complex system of facilities that handle and dispose of waste and commodities generated from residences, businesses and other sources in Santa Monica. As the City moves towards zero waste, continued efforts need to be made to protect the health, welfare and safety of its citizens by addressing disposal needs.", "Since 2011, some of the changes in solid waste processing and handling include:", "\u00b7 December 2011 - Closure of the City\u2019s Transfer Station", "\u00b7 July 2012 - All businesses generating 4 cubic yards of waste per week, and multi-family complexes of 5 units or more must have a recycling program in place. Cities are also required to implement a plan that includes education, outreach, and monitoring of its recycling programs per AB 341, which was enacted in October 2011.", "\u00b7 November 2012 - Community Recycling advises the City that due to permitting restrictions, it would no longer be able to accept the City\u2019s organics waste.", "\u00b7 June 2013 - Agromin Organics Recycling Facility is selected to process the City\u2019s organic waste, which includes residential green/food waste, commercial food waste and street sweeping debris", "\u00b7 October 2013 - Closure of the Puente Hills Landfill", "\u00b7 May 2014 - Council adopted the Zero Waste Strategic Operations Plan", "\u00b7 March 2015 - Community Recycling merged with Recology. Recology assumes the processing of the City\u2019s construction and demolition materials. Recology raised the construction and demolition debris tipping fees in August becoming too cost prohibitive to continue to use this facility.", "\u00b7 September 2015 - Downtown Diversion is selected to process the City\u2019s construction & demolition debris.", "\u00b7 April 2016 - All jurisdictions are required to implement an organic waste recycling program for businesses that generate 8 cubic yards of organic waste per week per AB1826, enacted in September 2014. Included in the legislation is outreach, education and monitoring of the organics waste program.", "More changes are expected over the next five years as the City moves towards diverting material from the waste stream, increasing recycling and composting activities, and planning for a wet/dry collection system. The City will need to remain flexible and open to new ideas and technologies in order to meet these new challenges.", "Vendor Selection", "There are seven active landfill facilities in Los Angeles County. Of the seven facilities, three can only be used for trash collected in the City of Los Angeles, and two are located in the Palmdale/Lancaster area, which makes use of these locations problematic due to hauling distance and cost. The City currently uses the remaining two landfill facilities: Chiquita Canyon and Sunshine Canyon.", "Chiquita Canyon Landfill in Castaic, owned and operated by Waste Connections, Inc. (corporate headquarters is located in Texas), is the City\u2019s first option for disposal. However, its operating permit is due to expire in 2019. In 2011, Waste Connections resubmitted an application to request an expansion of the waste footprint and an increase in the permitted daily disposal. The application is currently in environmental review.", "Sunshine Canyon Landfill in Sylmar, owned by Republic Services Inc. (corporate headquarters is located in Phoenix, Arizona), is the City\u2019s second option for disposal. Sunshine Canyon is recommended for its proximity to Santa Monica and freeway accessibility. This facility is actually closer to Santa Monica than Chiquita Canyon; however, the City\u2019s policy regarding Arizona-based companies would only authorize utilization if Chiquita Canyon is not available. If these landfills were no longer available for use, the City may need to consider using the Palmdale/Lancaster Landfills or exporting waste to privately-owned facilities in other counties such as Orange, San Bernardino, Riverside and Ventura County.", "Presently there are two transformation facilities (Commerce and SERRF) that use waste to produce energy operated by Los Angeles County Sanitation. CalRecycle authorizes the City to receive up to 10% diversion credit for use of the waste-to-energy facilities.", "A main component of the Zero Waste Strategic Operations Plan is to increase organics waste participation and processing at sites other than landfills. With the enactment of AB 1826, which requires all jurisdictions to implement an organic waste recycling program for businesses generating 8 cubic yards of organic waste per week, finding the right partner is crucial. There are limited composting facilities in Los Angeles County and none that could accept food soiled paper that is accepted in the City\u2019s green recycling containers. USA Waste of California and the Agromin Organics Recycling Compost Facility located in Ventura County would be able to meet the City\u2019s requirements.", "Additionally, the Zero Waste Strategic Operations Plan recommends use of alternative disposal technologies. The Agromin Organics Recycling Compost Facility is expected to open an anaerobic digestion facility. An anaerobic digestion facility refers to a facility that biologically decomposes organic matter with little or no oxygen in a fully enclosed structure to produce biogas, liquid fertilizer and compost. As an alternative CR&R Waste and Recycling Services continues construction of an anaerobic digestion facility at their Material Recovery Facility and transfer station in Perris, CA. The facility is expected to be partially operational in 2016. Anaerobic digestion is a recommended alternative technology identified in the City\u2019s Zero Waste Strategic Operations Plan. Efforts to use this type of organics processing will be on-going in the next five years, depending upon availability.", "Santa Monica embraces the new \u201cinverted\u201d solid waste management paradigm, which reverses the hierarchy, by regarding landfills and transformation facilities to be final disposal sites, only after all other efforts have been exhausted. Therefore, staff continues to research and investigate the feasibility of working with Los Angeles County, other jurisdictions and private partners on identifying alternative disposal options.", "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the purchase orders with the identified vendors including Sunshine Canyon Landfill, operated by the Arizona-based company Republic Services Inc., as the disposal option if Chiquita Canyon Landfill is not available. These facilities are recommended because they are the most cost effective and efficient means for the City to provide resource recovery and waste disposal services.", "Currently, the gate rate at the landfills is increasing annually between 5 to 10 percent and the use of the refuse-to-energy facilities will add a 25-percent premium to the cost of disposal. The cost to redirect construction & demolition waste from the landfills comes at a higher premium with annual increases between 15 to 20 percent. The cost for combining the organics waste, green waste, food waste and street sweeping debris, increased the facility rate by 55 percent. Based upon the identified trending facility rate increases staff is requesting a not to exceed amount of $6,352,500 per year in anticipation of the cost increase and use of more progressive processing technologies. As the City begins to approach the annual not to exceed amount a rate study will need to be performed to analysis the financial impacts.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The combined total amount of the purchase orders to be issued in FY2016-17 is $4,235,000 as follows:", "Chiquita Canyon Landfill $1,500,000", "USA Waste of California d/b/a Agromin Organics $1,250,000", "Commerce Refuse-To-Energy $600,000", "Sunshine Canyon Landfill $350,000", "Southeast Resource Recovery Facility $285,000", "USA Waste of California d/b/a Downtown Diversion $250,000", "Funds are included in the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan in the Public Works Department. The purchase orders will be charged to account 27441.555070 Recycling/Disposal Fees. Budget authority for subsequent years will be requested at each biennial budget cycle for Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Approval of the updated Santa Monica Local Hazard Mitigation Plan", "Department": "Office of Emergency Management", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached updated All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan that outlines Santa Monica\u2019s response plans in an emergency and makes the City eligible for Federal and state natural disaster funding.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In 2004, the Santa Monica All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan was originally approved by the Santa Monica City Council. On May 27th, 2014 the Santa Monica City Council approved the updated All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan. As required by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), once the plan is approved by the local jurisdiction and reviewed by both the State of California Office of Emergency Services (OES) and FEMA, it must then be formally adopted by the local jurisdiction as the final step in the process. This updated version reflects changes within the Santa Monica City organization and includes new mitigation actions which are intended to limit the loss of life and property in emergencies. This document is required by FEMA in order to be eligible to receive future Hazard Mitigation funding or other public assistance following a federally declared emergency.", "Background", "In 2004, FEMA required that all state and local governments have an approved All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan (Attachment A) in order to qualify for disaster mitigation and recovery funding. The update of the All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan provides hazard assessments from natural disasters and identifies mitigation strategies to be implemented in order to reduce the effects of emergencies.", "On May 27th, 2014 the Santa Monica City Council approved the updated All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan (Attachment B). As required by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), once the plan is approved by the local jurisdiction and reviewed by both the State of California Office of Emergency Services (OES) and FEMA, it must then be formally adopted by the local jurisdiction as the final step in the process. Once the All Hazards Local Mitigation Plan is adopted by the Council, it will then be approved by FEMA. FEMA requires the Plan be updated every five years.", "Discussion", "The All Hazards Mitigation Plan is required in order to apply for disaster mitigation and recovery funding prior to and following a federally declared disaster. The All Hazards Mitigation Plan serves to provide the community with an accurate assessment of potential natural hazards and identifies mitigation activities to assist Santa Monica in preparing for, responding to, and recovering from disasters.  This updated Plan does not change processes in place for disaster response operations. The All Hazards Mitigation Plan includes several key components focused on Santa Monica and the reduction of risk and impacts to lives, property, and the environment in the event of disasters. Some of these components include:", "\u00b7 A Community Profile", "\u00b7 Risk Assessment", "\u00b7 Mitigation Goals", "\u00b7 Mitigation Action Items", "\u00b7 Hazard Analysis", "The Planning Committee which was chaired by members of the Office of Emergency Management, and included representatives from many City Departments including the Police Department, Fire Department, Department of Public Works, Planning Department, and others,  met with key community stakeholders including the Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce, Downtown Santa Monica, Inc., The Convention and Visitors Bureau, UCLA Santa Monica Hospital, Providence St. John\u2019s Hospital, the Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District, the Santa Monica College and others to address the hazard analysis and mitigation actions. Community involvement is a key component in the development of an All Hazards Mitigation Plan.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions:", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Council approval of the Santa Monica All Hazards Mitigation Plan will make the City of Santa Monica eligible for federal disaster assistance money prior to and following an emergency."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for Purchase of Two Compressed Natural Gas Regenerative Air Street Sweepers", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4234 to Mar-Co Equipment Company, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of two Compressed Natural Gas Truck Mounted Regenerative Air Street Sweepers;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Mar-Co Equipment Company for two Compressed Natural Gas Truck Mounted Regenerative Air Street Sweepers in an amount not to exceed $636,141.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is responsible for street sweeping services. This purchase would replace two vehicles that have reached the end of their cost effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In January 2016, the City solicited bids for the purchase of two Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Truck Mounted Regenerative Air Street Sweepers. After reviewing all bids received, staff recommends Mar-Co Equipment Company as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of two CNG Truck Mounted Regenerative Air Street Sweepers in the amount of $636,141. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing a vehicle powered by CNG fuel.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The existing vehicles have a cost-effective useful life span of 5 years based on industry standards as well as utilization and the environment in which they are operated. Sweeping vehicles are in operation six days and six nights per week (Sunday through Friday).  The sweeping vehicle is in operation anywhere from three hours per day (Sunday morning shift) to six and a half hours per day and again per night during a regular eight hour daytime and nighttime shift. The current equipment was purchased in 2010 and is 5 years old.", "The truck mounted regenerative air street sweepers would be used to support street sweeping operations in the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division. Resource Recovery and Recycling currently employs seven street sweepers, two of which would be replaced by the new vehicles. Street sweeping is necessary to maintain the aesthetics, environment and safety of the streets through the removal of debris. Street sweeping protects the environment by assisting in the removal of metals, pesticides, herbicides, oil, and other pollutants and debris that may impact the storm water system. Street sweeping clears debris from the street and gutter which may impede motorists, bicyclist, or pedestrians. The City currently sweeps over 26,000 curb miles and collects over 2,000 tons of sweeping debris annually.", "Example of a CNG truck mounted regenerative air street sweeper", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In January 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver two CNG Truck Mounted Regenerative Air Street Sweepers as required by the Street and Fleet Services Division in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 578 vendors were notified and 16 vendors downloaded the bid. A total of 3 bids were received and publicly opened on January 21, 2016 per Attachment A.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Mar-Co Equipment Company is the second lowest bidder and submitted a competitive bid for a model which the City currently employs. The City utilizes multiple sweepers of this model for which Fleet Maintenance staff have been trained to maintain. Mar-co Equipment Company\u2019s proposal was able to best meet the City\u2019s requirements, including the ability to provide the method of dumping required in the specification and the option to include a broom assisted pick-up head. After reviewing the bids received, staff recommends Mar-Co Equipment Company as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of two CNG Truck Mounted Regenerative Air Street Sweepers in the amount of $636,141. #0", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Mar-Co Equipment Company is for an amount not to exceed $636,141. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Approving Final Tract Map No. 66611 for a 19-Unit Condominium Project at 1433 14th Street.", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution approving Final Tract Map No. 66611.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report transmits for City Council approval a Final Tract Map for the following condominium project. The Tentative Tract Map was approved by the Planning Commission on October 17, 2012.", "TRACT MAP ADDRESS SUBDIVIDER  UNITS", "No. 66611 1433 14th Street 1433 14th Street, LLC  19", "Discussion", "After a public hearing and careful review of the record and staff recommendations, the Planning Commission approved a Tentative Tract Map for the above project on October 17, 2012. The action of the Planning Commission was based on its findings that the proposed subdivision will have no significant environmental impact and is in conformance with all state and local laws and regulations and applicable General Plan Elements. The Final Map conforms to the Tentative Map. The developer will be required to show proof of payment of the condominium tax of $19,000 prior to issuance of a building permit. The Final Map has been approved by the Los Angeles County Engineer\u2019s office and certified by the City Engineer for conformance with the Tentative Map and conditions thereon, the Subdivision Map Act, and local ordinances. The City Engineer\u2019s office indicates that there are no required off-site public improvements. The City Attorney's office has approved the Covenants, Conditions, and Restrictions for the Final Map as complying with the conditions of the Tentative Map and applicable laws.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Acceptance of 2015 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) Grant Funds", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": "Police Chief Jacqueline Seabrooks", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant award in the amount of $572,878 from the 2015 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) and execute the subrecipient agreement and related documents to purchase equipment and training that supports regional homeland security goals; and2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impact and Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In 2015, $572,878 was awarded to the City of Santa Monica Police and Fire Departments as a part of the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant. Funds were requested to purchase equipment and training that supports regional homeland security goals. Specifically, the Police Department requested funding in the amount of $200,000 to fund a specialized response vehicle and $10,000 in animal shelter disaster supplies. The Fire Department requested funding in the amount of $177,000 to fund rescue equipment for the Urban Search and Rescue (USAR) team, $55,833 to fund hazardous material (HazMat) chemical detection equipment, $16,200 to fund radio batteries and accessories, and $88,845 for USAR and HazMat specialized team training for the Fire Department.", "Background", "The UASI program focuses on enhancing regional preparedness in major metropolitan areas. The UASI program directly supports the national priority of expanding regional collaboration within the national preparedness guidelines and is intended to assist participating jurisdictions in developing integrated regional systems for prevention, protection, response, and recovery from natural or man-made disasters.", "The UASI grant program was created to support large, \u201ccore\u201d cities and those other cities with contiguous borders to the core city. The UASI grant program is 100% federally funded from the Department of Homeland Security managed through the State of California. The City of Los Angeles is the Los Angeles region\u2019s core city for the UASI grant and allocates funds to the City of Santa Monica.", "The City of Santa Monica has directly received over $7.5 million of Department of Homeland Security no-match grant funds since 2001. These funds have been used to purchase necessary interoperable radio equipment, supplies, and training in direct support of overall regional goals to promote effective information gathering, sharing, and response to threats and/or acts of terrorism.", "Discussion", "The Police Department requested funding in the amount of $200,000 to fund a specialized response vehicle and $10,000 in animal shelter disaster supplies. The Fire Department requested funding in the amount of $177,000 to fund rescue equipment for the USAR team, $55,833 to fund hazardous material chemical detection equipment, $16,200 to fund radio batteries and accessories, and $88,845 for USAR and HazMat specialized team training for the Fire Department.", "The Police Department would use $200,000 of the $572,878 UASI 2015 grant to purchase a special purpose response vehicle specifically designed to transport specially trained law enforcement personnel and their equipment to the scene of a critical incident. The Police Department would also use $10,000 to purchase disaster supplies and emergency preparedness equipment items for the City\u2019s Animal Shelter.", "The Fire Department would use the funds to purchase rescue equipment including rescue tools, ropes, webbing, harnesses, and search cameras for the USAR team; to purchase chemical detection field kits and personal radiation monitors for the HazMat team; and to purchase a forklift for the Fire training center. The useful life for most of this equipment is three to five years. The Fire Department would also use funds for specialized training for both the USAR and HazMat teams.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "Award of a $572,878 grant from the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency requires the following FY 2015-16 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budgets at account 20304.406809 in the amount of $210,000 and account 20312.40679A in the amount of $362,878", "2. Appropriate the following expenditures to reflect receipt of the 2015 UASI grant: $200,000 at account C209139.589000, $10,000 at account 20304.555409 and $362,878 at account 20312.555401."]}, {"Title": "Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Contract Amendment", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #9916 in the amount of $584,736 (including a 5% and 10% contingency only on Task 2 and Task 5, respectively) with ICF International, a Virginia-based company, for additional groundwater program activities. This will result in a 4-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $2,805,636, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. The City will be reimbursed by the Gillette Company for $355,995 upon completion of Tasks 2 and 3.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "ICF International (ICF) is the City's current environmental consultant responsible for implementing the Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Program. The Olympic Well Field area has a long history of manufacturing and light industrial operations. Releases from these industrial operations have led to the presence of volatile organic compounds (VOCs) in groundwater produced from these wells. The Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management Program ensures that the contamination is fully characterized, captured and monitored. Five new additional groundwater tasks are required for the Olympic Basin to keep the City in full compliance with State and local regulatory programs.", "The current agreement with ICF, in an amount not to exceed $1,732,500, ends on June 30, 2016, with two additional one-year renewal options in the amount not to exceed $244,200 per year. A modification is required to include additional groundwater program activities in an amount of $584,736 (including a 5% and 10% contingency per proposal, only on Task 2 and Task 5, respectively) for a not to exceed total of $2,805,636 over a four-year period, if all renewal options are exercised.", "Background", "On June 10, 2014, Council approved a Professional Services Agreement with ICF International, to implement the Olympic Well Field Management Plan for a two-year term ending June 30, 2016 with two additional one-year renewal options.", "The Olympic Well Field Management plan was subsequently approved by the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board (RWQCB). The Olympic Groundwater Basin is the City's second largest drinking water aquifer and provides up to 1,500 gallons per minute (gpm) of groundwater for treatment and distribution to the City of Santa Monica. The Olympic Well Field has been adversely impacted by contamination from several former manufacturing facilities in the immediate area. This area of Santa Monica has a long history of manufacturing and light industrial operations. Releases from these industrial operations have led to the presence of volatile organic compounds (VOCs) in groundwater produced from these wells. The City has entered into Settlement and Release Agreements with Boeing and Gillette Company, which formerly conducted business in the Olympic Well Field area. Funds from these settlements will be used to build a new Olympic Well Field Drinking Water Treatment plant.", "Five new additional groundwater tasks have been identified by Public Works/Water Resources which require immediate attention by the City in order to successfully implement the City\u2019s Olympic Well Field Groundwater Management program.", "Discussion", "ICF has been the City\u2019s primary environmental consultant in the Olympic Basin for over ten years. Their original contract was to perform quarterly groundwater monitoring for the City\u2019s Corporate Yards property that had underground storage tanks. Their work expanded to assist the City with negotiations with two Potentially Responsible Parties (PRPs) in the Basin: Boeing and The Gillette Company. ICF currently is responsible for implementing the Olympic Well Field Management Plan. The scope of work for this amendment consists of five new additional tasks that are described in detail below. The tasks include:", "Task 1 - Addition of 1, 4-Dioxane Analysis to the Existing Quarterly Groundwater Monitoring Program", "In late 2014, the City began the design and construction of a pilot treatment system for the Olympic Basin. It was determined that one of the critical groundwater contaminants, 1,4-Dioxane, needed to be fully characterized throughout the Olympic Basin to determine the range of expected influent concentrations to the pilot plant and, in the future, to the new Olympic Drinking Water Plant. Costs include all labor and expenses associated with the addition of 1, 4-Dioxane for fifteen quarters (4Q 2014 through 2Q 2018) for 30 samples (14 from B-Zone wells and 15 from C-Zone wells, and one QA/QC sample). All chemical analysis results would be reported in the quarterly monitoring reports submitted to the RWQCB.", "Task 2 - Installation and Development of Three Additional Groundwater Monitoring Wells", "Planned redevelopment activities at the former Papermate site (1681 26th Street) will require the abandonment of all existing monitoring wells, with the exception of GW-14 and GW-18. Through discussions with the RWQCB staff, an agreement was reached with Gillette for reimbursement for expenses related to the installation of three replacement wells. The following activities are required for this task:", "Task 2.1 - Planning, Permitting and Pre-field Preparation", "Task 2.2 - Groundwater Monitoring Well Installation", "Task 2.3 - Well Development", "Task 2.4 - Management and Disposal of Investigation-Derived Waste", "Task 2.5 - Well Surveying", "Task 2.6 - Reporting", "Task 3 - Installation of Dedicated Pumps in the New Groundwater Monitoring Wells", "Following the completion of well development, ICF would install dedicated submersible pumps in the newly installed monitoring wells. The use of dedicated pumps significantly decreases the amount of time required at each well during sampling events, reduces the volume of investigation-derived waste produced and eliminates the potential for cross-contamination between wells. The cost for this task would be reimbursed by the Gillette Company.", "Task 4 - Production Well Siting Support", "The City is in the process of evaluating suitable locations for additional groundwater production wells in the Olympic Well Field and has hired a hydrogeologist as a water resource expert to assist in this effort. The principal reason for the installation of the production wells is to provide additional water supply. As part of this task, ICF would support the efforts of the City's hydrogeologist as needed.", "Task 5 - Redevelopment of Five Existing Groundwater Monitoring Wells", "ICF is experiencing numerous problems with the new monitoring wells that were installed in the Olympic Well Field. Fine sediment is preventing the pumps from working. Due to the large amount of sediment in the wells, ICF\u2019s ability to conduct low-flow groundwater removal requirements as set forth by the RWQCB has been compromised. Redevelopment of the five wells would involve retaining a drilling contractor with well development equipment and crew, field geologist, traffic control, waste management and disposal, and overall project management.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to ICF is $584,736 for an amended agreement total not to exceed $2,805,636.  Funds in the amount of $584,736 for added scope of work are included in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019045.589000. The Gillette Company will reimburse the City for costs expended under Tasks 2 and 5 of this add-on project for a total of $355,955, which would be a net increase to the city of $228,781. Future year work and funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid for the Purchase of Calsense Smart Irrigation Controllers", "Department": "Public Works, Public Landscape", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4236 to Smith Pipe & Supply, Inc., a California-based company for the purchase of 39 Calsense smart irrigation controllers, including component parts; 2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Smith Pipe & Supply, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $328,726 (includes a 10% contingency), with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In accordance with statewide drought efforts, the City is engaging in efforts to reduce its water consumption. In 2015, City landscaping accounted for 39% of the City\u2019s total water usage. The purchase of Calsense smart irrigation controllers would replace old irrigation technology at various park and landscape locations citywide. In January 2016, the City solicited bids to purchase 39 Calsense smart irrigation controllers, including component parts, to help increase the City\u2019s water delivery efficiency and staff\u2019s ability to monitor irrigation performance, make adjustments remotely and create real time reports related to water use. Staff recommends Smith Pipe & Supply, Inc. as the best bidder for this project for a total cost of $328,726 (includes a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On January 13, 2015 (Attachment A), Council adopted the update to the Water Shortage Response Plan (WSRP), re-declared a Stage 2 Water Supply Shortage, established a citywide 20% reduction target from 2013 water usage by December 31, 2016, and approved the implementation of water use allowances for all water customers (except non-potable accounts) and penalties for exceedances of the allowance.", "On April 1, 2015, California Governor Brown issued an Executive Order directing the State Water Resources Control Board to impose mandatory restrictions to achieve an aggregate statewide 25% reduction in potable urban water use by February 2016. To support the City\u2019s drought response, staff sought to replace the current irrigation controllers, the devices that operate automatic irrigation systems, used throughout the City\u2019s parks, landscape sites and other City property.", "Discussion", "The Public Landscape Division of the Public Works Department maintains 28 parks (130 acres) and 282 landscaped sites (92 acres) such as medians, parkways and curb bump-outs in the public right-of-way. Public Landscape Division staff responsibilities include the management of active turf for sports fields and lawn bowling, passive turf areas (low intensity use) such as the Civic Center and in front of City Hall, plant material and public trees. Additionally, staff oversees six water features and landscaping at 34 City facilities such as Woodlawn Cemetery and the Big Blue Bus site.", "Staff inventoried the existing irrigation infrastructure of the above mentioned areas and recommends replacement of the current irrigation technology that is over 15 years old. To help determine the capabilities and effectiveness of new irrigation technology, staff has been piloting Calsense irrigation controllers at two parks for nearly a year. During this time, staff has discovered faster and more relatable communication between the controller and user\u2019s smartphone and the ability to make irrigation adjustments remotely after business hours. Given the knowledge and experience with the pilot project, Calsense smart irrigation controllers appear to be the most technologically advanced. The table below provides a brief comparison of the current and new technology.", "Current", "New", "\u00b7 Utilizes modem to modem and radio to radio communication which is outdated and makes communication difficult with field controllers", "\u00b7 Cumbersome and limited data gathering, analysis and reporting", "\u00b7 No longer under warranty and requires expensive component replacement parts to keep operational", "\u00b7 Manual irrigation schedule programming", "\u00b7 Wireless communication capability enables the use of smart phones and tablets to make irrigation adjustments remotely", "\u00b7 Easy and comprehensive data gathering, analysis, and reporting", "\u00b7 10-year warranty", "\u00b7 Automatic irrigation schedule programming based on climate and landscape type", "In 2015, water use at parks and landscape sites decreased by 34% compared to water use in 2013 due to operational adjustments such as shutting off irrigation for street medians and implementing more strict irrigation schedules. With the aforementioned technological advancements, staff anticipates that further water reduction can be achieved but will not know to what extend until full implementation. Installation of all controllers would be performed by staff by the end of June 2016.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On January 4, 2016, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to purchase 39 Calsense smart irrigation controllers, including component parts for use at locations citywide as required by the Public Landscape Division. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 503 vendors were notified and 27 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid below was received and publicly opened on January 20, 2016.", "Bidder       Bid Amount", "Smith Pipe & Supply, Inc.    $298,842", "Procurement conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; \u201cNo Bid\u201d forms were received from two firms (Stay Green, Inc. and Master Landscape & Maintenance, Inc.). Stay Green, Inc. stated that they were not interested in the scope of work and Master Landscape & Maintenance, Inc. stated that they would only be interested in landscape maintenance bids. In addition, Ewing Irrigation and Landscape Supply, the largest family-owned supplier of landscape water management products in the country, likely did not bid because it is headquartered in Arizona and the city requires that all vendors complete and submit the State of Arizona Disclosure form with their bid responses.", "The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications and scope of work. Based on these criteria, Smith Pipe & Supply, Inc. is recommended as the best bidder to deliver and provide 39 Calsense smart irrigation controllers, including component parts for use at locations citywide in accordance with City specifications.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Smith Pipe & Supply, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $328,726 (includes a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015 -16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C259131.589000."]}, {"Title": "Lease Agreement for Office Space at 429 Santa Monica Blvd. For the Community Broadband Division", "Department": "Information Services Department, Broadband", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a lease agreement with CA-429 Santa Monica Limited Partnership, a Delaware limited partnership company for office space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard for a period of 62 months beginning May 1, 2016 at a first year lease cost of $90,568 (including common area expenses and on-site parking costs) and $21,030 for tenant improvements, for a total amount not to exceed $536,323 (including 4% annual increase on base rent) over five years, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Information Systems Department\u2019s (ISD) Community Broadband Division (CB Division) currently occupies 220 sq. ft. of privately leased office space shared with ISD\u2019s Web Development and Software Systems Divisions and the Housing and Economic Development Department at 1901 Main Street. The CB Division, which originated as a pilot program launched in 2006, was established in 2012. Since its launch, staffing in the division has grown from one full-time staff member to four permanent full-time staff, two temporary full-time staff, and seven part-time staff. The shared office space occupied by the CB Division does not adequately accommodate current staff operational needs. Since there is no vacant office space available within existing City offices, staff seeks Council approval to lease office space at 429 Santa Monica Blvd.", "The available space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard would enable the CB Division to accommodate its staffing needs, better market its services to local businesses and enable broadband service delivery to additional businesses that occupy the building. The rentable space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard is 1,326 sq. ft. The proposed term would commence on May 1, 2016, and would continue for just over five years through June 30, 2021. The 62-month lease term would cover the period of time required for construction and occupancy of the proposed new City Services Building. It is anticipated that CB Division staff would permanently relocate to the City Services Building upon its completion. The rental rate at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard is $5.35 per sq. ft. and would increase 4 percent per year. Additional monthly occupancy costs to the City would include common area expenses and parking costs. Total lease costs during the first year are anticipated to be $90,568 for base rent, common area expenses and parking costs. Total costs for tenant improvements would be approximately $67,440 of which the Lessor agrees to contribute a one-time, non-recurring tenant allowance of $46,410, resulting in $21,030 in costs to the City. The total not to exceed amount for the 62-month lease is $536,323, including estimated 4% lease rate increases per year. The office space to be vacated by CB Division at 1901 Main Street would be occupied by staff from the Web Development Division.", "Discussion", "In 2008, the City\u2019s broadband pilot program was assigned one full-time staff member to lease dark fiber cable to local businesses that had a need for high bandwidth broadband services. Since then, the City\u2019s fiber optic network system (CityNet) has extended throughout the downtown area and services a number of commercial buildings. The City\u2019s ability to offer CityNet as a cost-effective and secure internet service option for local businesses with high bandwidth broadband requirements has created a revenue source for the City. The program subscriber base has increased and the program offerings to the community have expanded. As a result, the demand for services offered by the CB Division has grown over the last several years. CB Division staffing has grown to comprise four permanent full-time staff and two temporary full-time staff, for a total of six full-time staff members. These staffing levels increase in the summer to 13 full-time members when the workgroup operates special community programs, such as the Youth Tech Program and the Digital Inclusion Program.", "While the majority of ISD staff are located in City Hall and other City buildings such as the Municipal City Yards, Public Safety Facility, and Big Blue Bus office, the CB Division, Software Systems Division and Web Development Division occupy a small portion of the privately leased office building that the Housing and Economic Development Department occupies. The limited workspace does not allow for the CB Division staff to have the dedicated space needed for vendor setup areas for network upgrades and maintenance, for testing and troubleshooting of network equipment, or a workbench area to set-up and test fiber optic infrastructure. The one room that the CB Division occupies is not conducive to providing quality customer service, personnel management, or allow storage of required emergency network equipment inventory. Staff evaluated other City offices to move into, but was unable to find any space available for its needs.", "The 1,326 square feet of available office space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard is of sufficient size to accommodate the CB Division. The first year rental rate is $5.35 per sq. ft. per month and increases at a flat 4 percent per year. Office rental rates in Santa Monica have been increasing over the last several years and the proposed rental rate is within the downtown Santa Monica office market. Staff from Housing and Economic Development and Information Systems Departments investigated office availability in downtown Santa Monica with space requirements between 1,000 - 1,500 sq. ft. Nine (9) office space options within six (6) buildings located in the downtown area were reviewed and considered for occupancy. The downtown location is ideal for CB Division operations due to the proximity to the City\u2019s data centers in downtown and City Hall, to minimize the required response time for network incidents. Network incidents impact the City and CityNet business subscribers obtaining broadband services in accordance with industry standard service level agreements. Furthermore, CB Division offices are required to connect to the City\u2019s fiber optic network, for internal City operations and for monitoring and supporting CityNet network operations. The City\u2019s fiber network was previously installed at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard and therefore construction costs will be considerably less than to construct to a building located a significant distance from the City\u2019s network. Occupying the available office space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard also offers the opportunity for the City to service 19 other businesses located in the building that could generate new revenue opportunities to offset a portion of the rent. Housing and Economic Development staff negotiated the lease and contract terms. The proposed term of 62 months would cover the period of time required for construction and occupancy of the proposed new City Services Building. It is anticipated that CB Division staff would permanently relocate to the City Services Building upon its completion.", "Currently, the CB Division pays rent in the amount of $2,813.40 per month ($5.21/sq. ft.) with a rate increase effective May 1, 2016 to $2,953.80 per month ($5.47/sq. ft.) for approximately 220 sq. ft. of office space. The CB Division rent is included in the total rent contribution of the Information Systems Department, jointly paid with the Housing and Economic Development Department rent to the property owner. The new base rent at 429 Santa Monica Blvd would be $7,094.10 per month ($5.35/sq. ft.) for 1,326 sq. ft. of office space effective May 1, 2016 and would result in a monthly increase of $4,140.30.", "Alternatives", "If the proposed lease with CA-429 Santa Monica Limited Partnership for space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard is not authorized, staff will continue to look at other alternative spaces in order to accommodate the staff and operations of the Information Systems Department.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The lease agreement with CA-429 Santa Monica Limited Partnership for space at 429 Santa Monica Boulevard is for an amount not to exceed $536,523. Funding for the two months of lease costs in FY 2015-16 and tenant improvements requires the following FY 2015-16 appropriation: 01248.522620 - $36,125.", "Budget authority for FY2016-17 will be requested as a part of the proposed FY2016-17 Exception Based Budget for Council Approval. Budget authority for subsequent years will be requested in each budget cycle for Council approval. Future funding is contingent upon Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Award Bid to Provide Bus Transportation Services for Youth and Senior Programs", "Department": "Human Services (CCS)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4219 to Screamline Investment Corp. dba Tourcoach Charter & Tours, a California based company, to provide bus transportation services as requested by the Community and Cultural Services Department; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with Screamline Investment Corp. dba Tourcoach Charter & Tours for bus services, in an amount not to exceed $42,200 for the remainder of fiscal year 2015-16, with 3-additional 1-year renewal options in the amount of $253,800, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $296,000 over a 3-1/4 year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In 2012, with the ending of the Big Blue Bus Charter services, youth programs in the Community and Cultural Services Department began to use a single vendor for transportation to various athletic, educational, and social activities. In 2015 a new formal bid was posted. Staff recommends Screamline Investment Corp., as they have met required specifications and were the lowest bidder. The total cost of the contractual service agreement shall not exceed $296,000.", "Discussion", "The Community and Cultural Services (CCS) Department schedules up to 100 excursions per fiscal year for various youth and senior programs including CREST, Santa Monica Police Activities League (PAL), Santa Monica Adaptive Recreation & Sports (SMARS), Virginia Avenue Park, and WISE & Healthy Aging. Most excursions are day trips to amusement parks and sporting events as well as for educational and cultural enrichment (i.e. college tours and museums).  An occasional overnight trip may be scheduled during the fiscal year. Charter buses are used when the number of program participants exceeds City-owned passenger van capacity. Trips follow Prop A guidelines to destinations within Los Angeles, Orange, and Ventura Counties and parts of Kern, San Bernardino, and Riverside Counties. The amount requested in the bid is based on previous years\u2019 expenses and programming.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On October 7, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide bus transportation services as requested by the CCS Department, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press, in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 249 vendors were notified, of which 27 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on October 29, 2015, per Attachment A. Bids were evaluated based on price, types of buses available, quality of service, and compliance with City specifications.", "Screamline Investment Corp. was able to meet all of the specifications and they had the lowest bid. Based on this criteria, Screamline Investment Corp. is recommend as the best bidder to provide bus transportation services for the CCS Department program related activities in accordance with the City specifications. They have been providing transportation services for the WISE and Healthy Aging senior program for over four years with no complaints.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Funds in the amount of $84,600 are available to CCS in Proposition A accounts annually, as detailed below.", "20642.57839B", "Prop A - Community Recreation", "$ 30,000.00", "20642.57839C", "Prop A - Senior Services", "$ 3,000.00", "20642.57839D", "Prop A - Human Services", "$ 51,600.00", "Total", "$ 84,600.00", "As of February 2016, it is estimated that funds in the amount of $42,200 remain available through June 2016. The maximum amount of the contractual service agreement to be awarded to Screamline Investment, Corp. for the remainder of fiscal year 2015-16 is $42,200.", "Additionally, up to $84,600 per fiscal year with three one-year options to renew will be awarded annually. Over a three year period, the agreement total amount shall not exceed $253,800. The total cost of the agreement shall not exceed $296,000. Budget authority for subsequent years will be requested in each budget cycle for Council approval. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Award RFP and execute Professional Services Agreement to provide professional assurance services for the City\u2019s Human Services Grants Program", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #67 to Levitt & Rosenblum, CPAs, a California-based company, for professional assurance services for the City\u2019s Human Services Grants Program (HSGP);2.  Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with Levitt & Rosenblum, CPAs, in an amount not to exceed $30,000 for one year, with 4-additional 1-year renewal options in the amount of $120,000, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $150,000 over a 5-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City\u2019s Human Services Grants Program (HSGP) provides four-year operating grants totaling over $8 million to 22 non-profit human service organizations supporting 45 unique programs. The City of Santa Monica engages an independent firm to evaluate accounting and internal control systems, monitor program compliance and to conduct fiscal evaluations of non-profit organizations funded through the HSGP. On December 21, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for professional assurance services for the City\u2019s HSGP. Following a thorough review and selection process, Levitt & Rosenblum, Certified Public Accounts (CPAs) is recommended to provide professional assurance services and fiscal evaluations of City-funded non-profit organizations. Services will be provided on an as-needed basis as required by staff during the term of the agreement. The total cost of the services for a five-year term will be $150,000.", "Background", "The City\u2019s Human Services Grants Program (HSGP) provides financial support to public and non-profit organizations working to increase the wellbeing and improve quality of life for Santa Monica\u2019s priority populations. The current FY2015-19 HSGP provides over $8 million annually to 22 human service organizations supporting 45 programs aimed at meeting the needs of Santa Monica\u2019s target populations and service areas, including youth and families, seniors, people with disabilities, victims of domestic violence, low-income households, and those who are homeless.", "While HSGP grantees are required to contract with their own independent auditor in order to prepare annual Audited Financial Statements, effective fiscal monitoring remains an important tool for and recognized best practice of effective grant management. Throughout the course of a four-year HSGP operating cycle, each agency can expect to receive a minimum of one official fiscal evaluation from the City\u2019s contracted firm. Additional evaluations may be conducted at the City\u2019s discretion should they be deemed necessary to ensure continued compliance. Also, agencies receiving federal funds as part of their HSGP award may be subject to more frequent evaluations if required for compliance with federal regulations.", "To monitor for program compliance, the City engages an independent firm to evaluate the accounting and internal control systems of organizations funded through the HSGP.", "The firm is responsible for monitoring and reporting on agencies\u2019 compliance with the terms and conditions of their respective City Grant Agreements in order to ensure the adequate safeguarding of City funds and the retention of appropriate financial records and documentation associated with their expenditure. The partners of Levitt & Rosenblum, CPAs, have been conducting fiscal evaluations of City-funded non-profit organizations on behalf of the City for over twenty years.", "Prior to each engagement, agencies are given a minimum of 30-days advance notice of the City\u2019s intent to conduct a fiscal evaluation. Each official engagement begins with a  1-2 day site visit, which includes a review of policies, procedures, and program records along with interviews of appropriate administrative and program staff. Following the site visit, the City\u2019s contractor will prepare a report detailing any issues identified during the visit. City staff reviews the report internally before officially communicating the results to the agency. Finally, agencies are required to provide a written response to the City documenting their strategies to address any outstanding issues requiring resolution.", "Discussion", "Vendor Selection", "On December 21, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for professional assurance services for the City\u2019s HSGP. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Eighty vendors were notified, eleven prospective bidders downloaded the RFP. Two of those vendors submitted proposals by the January 8, 2016 submission deadline.", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed and evaluated by a four-member selection committee comprised of representatives from the Community & Cultural Services Department (Human Services Division and Cultural Affairs Division) and the Finance Department. The proposals were evaluated based upon each firm\u2019s qualifications and experience; fiscal review methodology; organizational capacity to provide the required level of service; sample fiscal monitoring tools and reports; and overall cost for providing the assurance services.", "Based upon this evaluation process, staff recommends Levitt & Rosenblum, Certified Public Accounts (CPAs) as the best qualified firm to provide professional assurance services for the HSGP. Levitt & Rosenblum, CPAs specializes in auditing, accounting, taxation, training and consulting for non-profit organizations, including governmental agencies, social service providers, affordable housing developers, environmental agencies, and low-income housing partnerships. The partners of Levitt & Rosenblum have been practicing public accounting for over thirty-five years in the Los Angeles area, including conducting fiscal evaluations of City-funded non-profit organizations for the City of Santa Monica for over twenty years.", "Levitt & Rosenblum\u2019s proposal was selected due to the firm\u2019s demonstrated experience monitoring and evaluating fiscal, accounting and internal control systems of government funded non-profit organizations, their fiscal review approach and methodology for evaluating systems and reporting findings, and their comprehensive, competitive pricing for requested services. Additionally, fiscal review engagements will be led by one of the firm\u2019s two partners, ensuring the highest degree of management involvement and technical expertise at all levels of the engagement. Levitt & Rosenblum, CPAs will provide professional assurance services for all agencies and programs funded through the HSGP for a five-year period at a total cost of $150,000.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Levitt & Rosenblum, CPAs is for an amount not to exceed $150,000. Funds of $30,000 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Community and Cultural Services Department. The agreement will be charged to account 012621.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Second Modification to Contract to Provide Emergency Ambulance and Billing Services", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to Contract No. 9438 (CCS) with Ameri-Care Ambulance, a California-based company, to provide emergency ambulance and billing services. This will result in a six year amended contract at no cost to the City.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 26, 2011 Council approved Contract No. 9438 (CCS) with Ameri-Care to provide emergency ambulance and billing services for a three-year term beginning August 4, 2011. On July 22, 2014 Council approved a first amendment to Contract No. 9438 (CCS) with Ameri-Care to extend the terms of the contract until July 31, 2016. The City currently uses Ameri-Care as its ambulance provider and ambulance related billing services. This second modification to the agreement is to extend services for a one-year term. Ameri-Care\u2019s compensation is based on a share of the fee received from the patient rather than a direct payment from the City. Anticipated revenue generated by fees collected by Ameri-Care on behalf of the Santa Monica Fire Department have been included in the FY 2015-16 Budget in the amount of $823,438.", "Discussion", "The City has utilized an emergency ambulance and billing service company since 2004 to provide billing services for the Fire Department for the expenses associated with Emergency Medical Services provided by Fire Department paramedics in connection with the response, assessment, treatment and/or transportation of members of the public. Charges are assessed based on the Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee adopted by Council on June 15, 2004 and the Skilled Nursing Facility fee adopted on June 23, 2015. The Advanced Life Support Assessment Fee is established by the Los Angeles County Emergency Services Agency General Public Ambulance Rates; the fee  is currently $1,561.00. The City receives approximately $548.25 in revenue per advanced life support transport based on the current fee structure. The current Skilled Nursing Facility fee is currently $902.17.", "The Fire Department responds to nearly 12,000 emergency medical calls annually and calls for patient transport have increased 5% as compared to the previous year; Ameri-Care transports approximately 7,200 patients annually. The Fire Department\u2019s response model includes six paramedic engine companies and other support units deployed as needed, including four rescue ambulances which are mainly used for special events. Contracted Ameri-Care emergency ambulances are used to transport patients on behalf of the Fire Department with Santa Monica Fire Department paramedics on-board to provide patient treatment in the ambulance while enroute to a medical facility.", "Ameri-Care has successfully provided ambulance services for the past five years. Staff recommends extending their term for an additional one-year of service while the Department undergoes a cost/revenue analysis of all options available for the delivery of Fire Department-based emergency medical services including the current delivery system and practices. There are significant opportunities for rethinking our current models for service delivery and funding. The next Santa Monica Fire Chief will lead the collaborative interdepartmental exploration of the best options for presentation to the City Council.", "Contractor Selection", "In May 2011, the City issued a Requests for Proposals (RFP) for an emergency ambulance and billing services. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions.  In addition, the notice was disseminated to 16 licensed ambulance companies in Los Angeles County. Five Los Angeles County ambulance providers submitted proposals. Proposals were evaluated on price, response capabilities, commitment to purchase property in Santa Monica to locate an ambulance station, redundant dispatch and operation system, and an ability to provide real-time vehicle location services. After a thorough review, the selection committee recommended Ameri-Care as the best bidder based on the evaluation criteria.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate budget or financial impact related to this staff report. Ameri-Care\u2019s compensation is based on a share of the fee received from the patient rather than a direct payment from the City. Anticipated Fire Department revenue generated by fees collected by Ameri-Care on behalf of the department have been included in the FY2015-16 Budget in the amount of $823,438."]}, {"Title": "Adoption of Resolution Authorizing Participation in Beverage Container Recycling City/County Payment Program", "Department": "Public Works, Resource Recovery & Recycling", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution authorizing the City Manager to submit and execute applications, agreements, and annual reports for the purpose of securing Beverage Container Recycling City/County Payment Program funds offered by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery (CalRecycle), for a five year period, in order to implement new or enhance existing programs to cleanup the waste stream that includes beverage containers.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "CalRecycle administers the beverage container recycling grant and payment program for the State of California. These programs are designed to promote increased recycling and reduce litter in the waste stream. The City has benefited in the past from the annual payment programs, which is based on a per capita calculation and averages around $24,300 annually. In order for the City to continue receiving funding, adoption of a resolution (Attachment A) acknowledging CalRecycle\u2019s Beverage Container Recycling City/County Payment Program must be submitted to the California Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.", "Background", "In 1987, the California Beverage Container and Litter Reduction Act (Act) was implemented to encourage recycling and reduce litter. CalRecycle, the agency responsible for administering the program, distributes payments each year to cities to promote beverage container recycling and litter reduction activities. Each city is eligible to receive a minimum of $5,000 or an amount calculated by CalRecycle, on a per capita basis, whichever is greater. For the last five years the City has received an average payment of $24,300.", "Beginning with the fiscal year 2015-16 funding cycle, CalRecycle is requiring that all jurisdictions adopt a Resolution, which would authorize the City to apply for and collect funds under the Beverage Container Recycling City/County Payment program. Prior to this year, the only action required by jurisdictions to receive their payment was to submit a funding request through CalRecycle\u2019s online portal.", "Discussion", "CalRecycle\u2019s goal for the Beverage Container Recycling City/County Payment program is to reach and maintain an 80 percent recycling rate for all California Refund Value (CRV) beverage containers - aluminum, glass, plastic and bi-metal. Projects implemented by the City would assist the State in reaching and maintaining the 80 percent goal.", "The City has participated in the City/County Payment Program authorized in the Act and has received approximately $356,600 since 2000. These funds have primarily been used for programs and educational materials that encourage residents to properly recycle beverage containers, which ultimately assists the City in meeting its state-mandated waste diversion requirements. Some of the items the City has purchased include 35 gal recycling containers for special events, a reverse vending machine, Curby the Recycling Robot, dual waste stations at SAMOHI, and recycling containers for the parks, beach and Pier. The current funding will be used to purchase additional big belly/smart belly dual trash compactors. A staff report is currently in development to increase an existing purchase order for these additional purchases.", "The attached resolution (Attachment A), recognizes the City\u2019s participation in the Beverage Container Recycling City/County Payment Program. Following adoption of the resolution, the City will be eligible to continue receiving annual funding from the State.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action.  Program funding for FY 2015-16 which is not awarded until FY 2016-17 is included in the FY2016-17 budget. Budget authority for subsequent budget years will be requested in each budget for Council approval."]}, {"Title": "General Services Agreement between the City of Santa Monica and the County of Los Angeles", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to execute the General Services Agreement (GSA) with the County of Los Angeles for a five-year period through June 30, 2021, covering a variety of services such as street maintenance and engineering, emergency and health services.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Since 1986, the City has repeatedly entered into an umbrella five-year General Services Agreements with Los Angeles County under which the County is available to provide services requested by the City on an \"as-needed\" basis. The GSA is general in nature, covering basic governmental services. Any specialized services would require separate agreements.", "Background", "The City first entered into a five-year General Services Agreement with Los Angeles County in 1986 and has renewed such an Agreement every five years since that time. The City Council last approved a five-year General Services Agreement with the County  on April 12, 2011 as Contract Number 9355 (CCS).", "Discussion", "The City from time to time requires services from County agencies. These services, may include street maintenance, animal control, tract map checking, health services, engineering and emergency services, and are provided under an umbrella agreement between the County and the City that allows the City to augment services provided by the City itself. Such agreements have been executed in prior years to allow the City to engage County services quickly on an \"as-needed\" basis. The current GSA with Los Angeles County will expire on June 30, 2016.", "The GSA is general in nature and provides authority for the County to provide requested services, specifies the method by which the City requests and pays for a service, and provides for the annual adjustment rates. The proposed General Services Agreement does not cover specific services for which the City and County have negotiated separate agreements, such as for lifeguard services. In the past, the City has not made extensive use of County services. The City is under no obligation to make use of County services unless and until it reviews and agrees to the rates charged by the County at the time services are requested. The County Auditor-Controller determines the costs of individual services annually. Rates charged in past years were reasonable.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Departments which use County services charge the costs to already budgeted accounts. There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Claims Management Software System", "Department": "Finance Department, Risk Management Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1) Award RFP# 36 to Origami Risk, Inc., an Illinois-based company, for a claims management software subscription service to support the City\u2019s Liability and Workers\u2019 Compensation Programs; 2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute an Agreement with Origami Risk, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $591,353 over a five-year period with future funding contingent on Council budget approval; and3) Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City\u2019s Finance Department is responsible for the internal management of the City\u2019s Liability and Workers\u2019 Compensation Programs. In June 2015, staff solicited proposals from software companies for a new claims management software system to support the City\u2019s Liability and Workers\u2019 Compensation Programs. This process yielded proposals from five software firms, three of which were invited to provide on-site demonstrations of their software\u2019s capabilities.  As a result of this effort, staff recommends the City pursue a five-year agreement with Origami Risk, Inc. (Origami) at a total cost of $591,353.  Origami\u2019s software offers the greatest functionality, is competitively priced, and comes highly recommended by the firm\u2019s existing customer base.  The agreement will be funded by the City\u2019s Self-Insurance Funds, which are financed with contributions from all City Departments.", "Background", "The Risk Management Division of the Finance Department is responsible for managing the City\u2019s Self-Insurance Programs. Integral to this effort is a high functioning automated claims system that supports staff\u2019s efforts to efficiently track, manage, and report on the City\u2019s liability and workers\u2019 compensation claims. For nearly two decades, Risk Management has used Ventiv Technology\u2019s (Ventiv) IVOS claims management software for this purpose. Staff\u2019s most recent report to Council, on May 27, 2015 (Attachment A), describes the City\u2019s history with this software. Approximately two years ago, however, Ventiv announced plans to introduce a new claims management system and discontinue support of IVOS. This prompted staff to begin preparations for purchasing a new claims management software system.", "Discussion", "Prior to releasing a Request for Proposal (RFP) for a new software system, staff formally solicited information from software firms on the capabilities of current state-of-the-art claims systems. A total of nine firms responded to the Request for Information (RFI), of which five were invited to provide on-site demonstrations of their system\u2019s capabilities. The information gained from this process was then used to prepare an RFP for a new claims management system. The results of this process are detailed below.", "Origami provides the service through a cloud-based software subscription (rather than selling a software license) and no new equipment will be necessary. Staff estimates it will take six to nine months from agreement execution to implement the new system. Once this occurs, the City will discontinue its agreement with Ventiv Technology.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On June 15, 2015, the City issued an RFP for a claims management system. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 679 vendors were notified of the RFP; 15 downloaded the RFP; and five firms responded.", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel composed of staff from the Finance, Information Systems, and Human Resources Departments.  After an initial review, the selection panel narrowed the field to three firms and invited each to provide an in-depth, on-site demonstration of its system\u2019s capabilities.  Origami\u2019s proposal rose to the top due to its software\u2019s capabilities and ease of use. The firm also received high praise from existing users (staff conducted on-site visits to obtain feedback on system performance and Origami\u2019s responsiveness to service requests). Finally, Origami\u2019s pricing was the least costly of the top three firms interviewed.", "Consequently, the selection panel recommended the City pursue a five-year agreement with Origami in an amount not to exceed $591,353. This figure includes system conversion costs and ongoing software subscription, system maintenance, and file storage costs.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The chart below summarizes the agreement\u2019s cost by fiscal year:", "FY 15-16", "FY 16-17", "FY 17-18", "FY 18-19", "FY 19-20", "Total", "Installation", "75,000", "75,000", "-", "-", "-", "150,000", "Ongoing Costs*", "-", "102,680", "102,680", "105,854", "109,139", "420,353", "Contingency**", "-", "-", "7,000", "7,000", "7,000", "21,000", "Total", "$75,000", "$177,680", "$109,680", "$112,854", "$116,139", "$591,353", "* Subscription, system maintenance, file storage costs", "** For custom programming or additional file storage needs that may arise", "The General Liability/Auto (56), Transit (57), and Workers\u2019 Compensation (59) Self-Insurance Funds will share the costs for the agreement, with 50% covered by Workers\u2019 Compensation, and the remaining 50% split evenly between General Liability/Auto and Transit.", "To fund the first two years of the Agreement (FYs 2015-16 and 2016-17), staff is requesting that funds of $250,000 previously budgeted in the CIP for this project be moved to the operating budget for subscription payments as follows:", "Account", "FY 15-16 Amt.", "FY 16-17 Amt.", "TOTAL", "C569119.589000", "($62,500)", "n/a", "C579119.589000", "($62,500)", "n/a", "C599119.589000", "($125,000)", "n/a", "Remove from CIP", "($250,000)", "n/a", "($250,000)", "56232.533580", "$18,750", "43,750", "57233.533580", "$18,750", "43,750", "59235.533580", "$37,500", "87,500", "Add to Operating", "$ 75,000", "$ 175,000", "$250,000", "Net", "($175,000)", "$175,000", "$-0-", "Following the transfer above, adequate funding will be available in each of the Self Insurance Funds operating budgets to finance the FY 2015-16 and FY 2016-17 contract payments. Staff will request funding for the remaining contract years\u2019 costs in the FY 2017-19 Biennial Budget. Future year funding is dependent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Authorization of Professional Services Agreements to Community Arts Resources (CARS) to produce June 5, 2016 Open Streets Event", "Department": "Mobility (PCD)", "Sponsors": "Director Karen Ginsberg", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional services agreement with Community Arts Resources (CARS), a California based company, to produce the June 5, 2016 open streets event in an amount not to exceed $150,000.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement No. 9870 (CCS) in the amount of $57,000 with Community Arts Resources (CARS), a California based company, to provide additional production services for the June 5, 2016 open streets event. This will result in a two-year amended agreement in an amount not to exceed $257,000, with three additional one year renewal options in the amount of $300,000, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $557,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is organizing an open streets event on Main Street, Colorado Avenue and Ocean Avenue for Sunday, June 5, 2016 to celebrate mobility, culture and sustainability, and to commemorate the beginning of Expo Light Rail service in Santa Monica. The event will allow pedestrian and bicycle access to designated streets free of automobiles and welcome participants to activity hubs along the route. City staff from nearly all City departments will be engaged in executing a successful event, yet professional services assistance is necessary from an agency with specific knowledge and experience in executing events of this type, and to produce an event of this magnitude within grant timeframes, in coordination with the Expo opening. The City was awarded a $200,000 open streets grant from Metro for the event, and authorization is requested for the City Manager to enter into a professional services agreement with CARS for production of the grant funded portion of the event. In addition, staff recommends modification of an existing professional services agreement with CARS for production of the portion of the open streets event to supplement the grant funds.", "Background", "The open streets event is funded in part with an Open Streets Program grant from Metro, in the amount of $200,000, which necessitates a $50,000 in-lieu local match. Council accepted the grant at its July 28, 2015 meeting (Attachment A) to fund the original route of Colorado Avenue from 5th Street to Ocean Avenue, and Main Street from Colorado Avenue to Marine Street. An expanded event route was described in a March 2, 2016 Information Item \u2018Expo Light Rail Celebration and 2016 Santa Monica Festival Update\u2019 that added the west side of Ocean Avenue between Colorado Avenue and Wilshire Boulevard, and Wilshire Boulevard between Ocean Avenue and Lincoln Boulevard. Since that time, operational concerns have necessitated modifications to the open streets route and the date of the event. The event will no longer include the Wilshire Boulevard segment but the full width of Ocean Avenue between Colorado Avenue and Wilshire Boulevard will be used for the event. The date has been changed to Sunday, June 5, 2016 to respond to operational and business concerns and to be consistent with the prevalence of successful open streets events in southern California being held on Sundays. Funds from the City\u2019s General Fund are necessary for production of the remaining expanded portion of the event route.", "The open streets event is scheduled for the Sunday two weeks after Expo begins service on May 20, 2016. Events on May 20th will be produced by Metro and supplemented by Santa Monica activities. The June 5th open streets event will be Santa Monica\u2019s own celebration of the arrival of Expo, including elements that have traditionally been integrated into the Santa Monica Festival. Funding agreements, however, will require the event advertising to specify that it is \u201cpresented by Metro\u201d in addition to the City. In lieu of having the Santa Monica Festival as a third communitywide event in the months of May and June, resources are being redirected to the open streets event for this year only.", "Discussion", "Coordinating the logistics for this unprecedented event in Santa Monica with successful programming that reflects the themes of mobility, culture and sustainability requires a unique combination of skill, vision and experience to make the event become a reality.", "The production needs for an open streets event include pre-production elements, relevant community outreach, traffic control plans, small business outreach, route and planning for four hubs of activity and overall logistics. The types of materials that need to be prepared include: collateral to solicit business participation in the event, advertisement of the event, signage and day of guides. Programming of hubs involves site selection, site layout, provision of basic amenities such as first aid, water, and bike repair, and the curation of what activities and/or entertainment would be available where and when.", "The comprehensive production of a community gathering of this scope is beyond the capacity of City staff within the grant timelines and coordinated with the Expo Light Rail opening. City staff from nearly all City departments will be engaged in executing a successful event, yet professional services assistance is necessary from an agency with specific knowledge and experience in executing events of this type and magnitude.", "Staff is recommending that CARS produce the open streets event. The production of the open streets event original route is funded by a Metro Open Streets Program grant, which is one-time funds with federal reporting requirements that can be much more easily administered as a stand-alone agreement. The grant is for a total of $200,000. Staff recommends allocating $150,000 to a professional services agreement for services related to the open streets event, reserving $50,000 for direct costs to the City, such as staff overtime for the event. The City funds necessary for production of the expanded route include $100,000 that is being redirected from this year\u2019s Santa Monica Festival budget, plus one-time funding of $57,000 from the City\u2019s operating budget. Staff recommends these City funds be administered through a modification to an existing multi-year agreement with CARS.", "Contractor/Consultant Selection", "As it relates to the agreement modification, in December 2013, staff solicited proposals for an event production team to produce the Santa Monica Festival. Requests for Proposals (RFP) were sent to production companies in the greater Los Angeles area and was posted on Planet Bids. Four production companies submitted proposals and all four were interviewed. CARS was selected based on their experience producing a broad array of community events with a unique understanding of Santa Monica, demonstrated ability to meet both artistic and production standards, relationships with artists, innovative marketing and outreach, and a proven track record in particular with implementation of interactive, engaging and relevant programing. As described in the March, 2, 2016 Information Item, their scope of work for this year only is being revised to produce the non-grant funded portion of the open streets event instead of the Santa Monica Festival. In addition to the $100,000 originally budgeted for the Santa Monica Festival, another $57,000 is necessary for production of the non-grant funded portion of the open streets event.", "As it relates to the grant funded agreement, staff recommends CARS be contracted with, to also provide production services for the grant funded portion of the open streets event. A standard competitive bidding process was not relied on for this recommendation, given the specific needs of the City and unique services that CARS is able to provide, namely:", "\u00b7 The existing agreement for CARS to produce the non-grant funded portion of the event,", "\u00b7 The infeasibility of having different providers produce different parts of the same event,", "\u00b7 The short time frame to plan the event that per the grant needs to be held prior to June 30, 2016 but after Expo Light Rail is operational on May 20, the date of which was only recently announced, and", "\u00b7 CARS staff has a track record of producing open streets events in the region and producing events in Santa Monica such as the Santa Monica Festival and Glow thus having unique experience and knowledge of Santa Monica processes and requirements.", "For these reasons, staff recommends CARS to produce both the non-grant funded and grant-funded portions of the open streets event.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to CARS is $57,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $557,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the City Manager\u2019s Department. The agreement will be charged to account 012071.555060. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.", "The agreement to be awarded to CARS for the grant funded portion of the event is for an amount not to exceed $150,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The agreement will be charged to account 20267.570420."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Regulating Lobbying", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on March 1, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance regulating lobbying.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}], [{"Title": "Leasing Policy for Santa Monica Airport", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": "Director Martin Pastucha", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the attached Santa Monica Airport Leasing and Licensing Policy for the leasehold and license management of properties at the Santa Monica Airport (Airport or SMO).2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute leases at the Santa Monica Airport in accordance with this Policy", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In response to direction provided by Council, staff recommends the adoption of a standardized leasing policy that acknowledges and incorporates the legal obligations and constraints presently associated with the Airport land and its uses; environmental and remediation requirements; concerns about compatibility with surrounding neighborhoods; and the viability of the Airport Fund to remain independent from General Fund subsidies.", "The Santa Monica Airport Leasing and Licensing Policy (SMO Leasing Policy) sets forth the policy goals, objectives, and practices for leasing and licensing for all properties located at the Airport. The Policy rests on the following principles to ensure leasing decisions would promote:", "\u00b7 Harmonious relations with the nearby built environment by protecting the health and safety of Airport neighbors.", "\u00b7 A sustainable Airport Fund that is independent from the General Fund and other subsidies.", "\u00b7 Compliance with legal obligations and protection of the City\u2019s rights.", "\u00b7 Opportunities for arts, education, and culture, including, but not limited to, the Artist Space Program administered in conjunction with Cultural Affairs Division.", "\u00b7 Practices and procedures for evaluating potential leasehold interests, and for lease management and administration.", "\u00b7 Uses and practices that are sensitive to the environment and protect the health of Airport neighbors and users and protect the City from future environmental exposure.", "The Policy would be used to:", "\u00b7 standardize leasing decisions in a manner that is equitable and efficient,", "\u00b7 promote the transparent management of the tenant recruitment, selection, and negotiation process, and", "\u00b7 Establish the standards of performance that are expected of Airport tenants.", "If Council approves the proposed Policy, staff would only approve leases that are consistent with the Policy. Any exceptions to this policy would require Council authorization.", "Background", "The Santa Monica Airport is located on 227 acres, closely surrounded by residential neighborhoods. The proximity of the airport to residential communities generates a number of land-use conflicts, including noise and air pollution. Moreover, because the current airport runway, 5,000 feet in length, does not meet Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) runway standards for some turbine aircraft currently using the airport, Airport operations also raise safety issues. Over the last five years the Santa Monica Airport averaged about 100,000 aircraft operations yearly, of which 15,000 are jet aircraft.", "Airport lands are divided into two categories: aviation and non-aviation. There are 187 acres designated and used for aviation activities and 40 acres designated and used for non-aviation purposes. As of March 1, 2016, there are 306 tenants at the Airport divided as follows: 114 non-aviation leases, 11 aviation leases, and 186 agreements for airplane hangars and aircraft parking areas, also known as tie-downs.", "Airport issues have been prominent topics on the City Council agenda for many years, and over the last three years have focused on two regulatory factors. First, the 1984 Settlement with FAA expired July 2015 thereby eliminating the restrictions on the City imposed by the agreement. Second, the City anticipated that the restrictions associated with the 1994 Airport Improvement Program (AIP) grant would expire after 20 years in July of 2014, thereby eliminating the restrictions on the City imposed by the grant. Unfortunately the FAA ruled that the grant assurances are in effect until 2023. The City is appealing the FAA\u2019s decision.", "Operating under the premise that the restrictions of the 1984 Settlement and the 1994 grant assurances would end in 2015, the City undertook an extensive visioning process for the future of the Airport property intended to identify opportunities for the Airport's future, short of closure, that would be more compatible with surrounding neighborhoods and to identify improvements to the infrastructure that might benefit the community.", "In addition to a visioning process, over the last two years the Council has discussed Airport issues on five occasions. On March 25, 2014, Council directed staff to prepare leasing guidelines that are sensitive to the environment, address remediation, and are consistent with the former light manufacturing and studio district zone (Attachment A). On August 12, 2014, after considerable discussion the Council directed staff to solicit additional input from the Airport Commission regarding leasing guidelines (Attachment B).", "March 24, 2015 the Council decided to permit leases to June 30, 2018 on the main parcel, and month-to-month leases on the \u201cWestern Parcel\u201d, with all leases to end on or before June 30, 2018 (Attachment C). Furthermore, the Council directed staff to develop recreational uses on the non-aviation parcels as soon as possible and contract with professional real estate brokers and property management services (please see the consent calendar for March 1, 2015). Council also directed staff to eliminate the bulk of sub-leases and raise rents to market, and reduce adverse impacts of Airport operations by imposing appropriate conditions on future leases.", "On June 9, 2015 and July 14, 2015 the Council voted to provide lease extensions to June 30, 2018 for Volkswagen of America, Museum of Flying, Ruskin Theater, Spitfire Grill, and Typhoon Restaurant and Milstein Adelman LLP (who have recently vacated the space for month-to-month Attachment D & E). The Council approved month-to-month leases with 77 miscellaneous tenants and decided to postpone a decision on the four properties where there is a master tenancy until staff has analyzed the impact of removing master tenants. Council directed staff to provide options and information relative to the sale of fuel and environmental remediation. Additionally, staff was directed to analyze its ability to control curfew given the decision by East Hampton. Last, staff was directed to analyze how to avoid intensification of jet traffic at the airport.", "October 27, 2015 was the latest hearing regarding the leasing with the City Council (Attachment F). At that time, Council directed staff to:", "1. Limit sales of aircraft fuels for piston engines to unleaded fuels;", "2. Include provisions in flight school leases prohibiting lessees from using leaded fuels for flight training;", "3. Require lessees who currently sell aircraft fuel at the Airport to begin remediation of any contamination of the premises they occupy;", "4. Assess and report back to Council on the possible termination of third-party fuel sales at the Airport and on the feasibility of the City taking over that function to assure that, as long as aircraft fuel is sold at the Airport, it is the most environmentally sound fuel available;", "5. Begin developing and reporting back on a cap on total pollutants, not just greenhouse gases, generated by the Airport;", "6. Direct staff to look at airports that have federal funding and have ceased fuel sales outright;", "7. Examine the question of the City taking over responsibility for all fuel sales at the airport.", "In response to this direction, staff undertook an effort to develop a comprehensive set of leasing and licensing terms for aviation businesses at the Airport. Staff is working on responses to the non-leasing questions posed by the Council. Staff anticipates responding to these questions under separate cover.", "Current Leasing Environment", "The City currently has a combined total of approximately 629 tenants or subtenants operating at the Santa Monica Airport. The number is approximate because it is difficult to ascertain precisely how many subtenants operate at the airport under the leasing policy.", "The City directly leases to 306 tenants at the Airport. These tenants lease hangars, tie-downs, or office/studio/storage. Of the 306 tenants, 6 are master tenants subleasing a mix of facilities to other tenants. A master tenant is considered a landlord of subtenants, meaning that a master tenant is able to evict a subtenant, collect rents, etc. The six master tenants combined have approximately 323 subtenants. Staff can only approximate the number of subtenants because the precise number of subtenants is not known, and reporting of these subtenants agreements is not required under current master lease agreements Therefore, in total there are approximately 629 tenants who are either direct or indirect tenants of the City. The six master tenants have the following sub-tenant relationships:", "MASTER TENANTS AND THEIR SUBTENANTS BY CATEGORIES", "MASTER TENANTS", "Hangars", "Tie-Down", "Office/Studio", "Total", "American Flyers", "16", "45", "2", "63", "Atlantic Aviation", "27", "0", "3", "30", "***Gunnell Properties", "46", "0", "32", "78", "Krueger Aviation", "1", "25", "5", "31", "Santa Monica Air Center", "12", "47", "27", "86", "Santa Monica Art Studios", "0", "0", "35", "35", "TOTAL", "102", "117", "85", "323", "Pursuant to a Forbearance Agreement effective February 29th, the City\u2019s tenant relationship with Gunnell terminated and Gunnell Properties is no longer a tenant at the Airport. Gunnell Properties was the largest master tenant at the Airport with 78 subtenants under lease. The City has the right to retain all, some, or none of Gunnell\u2019s subtenants. Gunnell\u2019s former sub-tenants were given until March 10th, to submit a lease application. The attached Leasing Policy will be used by staff to determine which of Gunnell\u2019s subtenants will be offered the opportunity to lease space at the Airport directly from the City.", "Nearly all tenants at SMO are operating under short-term arrangements or license agreements or under holdover agreements of 30 days duration. The exception is VW Audi whose lease term extends to June 30, 2018. Staff is in negotiations with two restaurants Typhoon and SpitFire Grill, Ruskin Theater, and the Museum of Flying, for lease agreements to June 30, 2018 per the Council action of July 2015.", "Compliance with FAA Regulations", "In 1998 as part of a dispute between airport tenants and the City, the FAA issued a Director\u2019s Determination (FAA Docket No. 16-99-21) reaffirming that the City is obligated to operate the Airport only through July 1, 2015. The Determination went on to state that after July 1, 2015, the decision to continue operation of the airport is \u201ca local land use matter.\u201d Based in part on this language the City continues to challenge the FAA\u2019s position that the City is obligated to operate the Santa Monica Airport in compliance with FAA grant assurances through 2023. Until that matter is resolved, however, the City will adhere to applicable regulations.", "Per FAA, the City is required to adhere to the principles of non-discrimination and non-exclusivity. Essentially, FAA regulations prohibit Santa Monica from taking actions that discriminate and furthermore the regulations do not allow Santa Monica to grant an exclusive right to one service provider. The proposed Leasing Policy is in compliance with FAA regulations.", "Airport Lease Revenues", "Lease and license revenue accounts for 67% of total annual Airport revenues. The revenue derived from Airport leasing supports the City\u2019s goals of achieving a financially self-sufficient airport, reducing subsidies from the General Fund, and repaying the principal of past General Fund subsidies. In the past, the Airport's operation, maintenance, and capital expenditures have been subsidized by the General Fund. In FY 2013/14 the Airport Fund no longer required an operating subsidy from the General Fund. As of March 1, 2016, the Airport has a principal debt obligation to the General Fund of $13.1 million. The proposed Leasing Policy calls for charging market rate rents thus conforming to FAA regulations, maintaining the Airport on the path to self-sufficiency and retiring the debt obligation of the Airport to the City.", "Discussion", "The passage of Measure Local Control (Measure LC), represents a powerful statement by the voters in Santa Monica. The electorate overwhelming voted in favor of regaining local control of the Santa Monica Airport. Moreover, the City Council has repeatedly emphasized that reducing the adverse impacts associated with SMO operations on the nearby built environment is a policy goal of the City. There is no dispute that the City is the owner of Santa Monica Airport. Therefore, leasing policy represents an important tool for achieving the voter mandate and a significant way to reduce the adverse impacts association with airport operations.", "As the airport owner, the City has the authority and responsibility, to lease airport property at market rates. FAA regulations acknowledge the right of airport operators to charge market rates in order in order to generate sufficient revenue to make the airport self-sustaining.", "The Benefits of a Leasing Policy", "There are numerous benefits to modernizing the existing leasing policy at this time for Santa Monica Airport. For one, a new leasing policy will minimize, if not eliminate, any uncertainty regarding the intention of the City Council on matters related to leasing property at Santa Monica Airport. Second, the attached Leasing Policy will provide City staff the direction necessary to operate an airport facility that is compatible with the existing nearby built environment. Third, the City has two real estate brokers under professional services contracts, CRG and Aeroplex. Therefore, it is critical staff have clear policy direction in order to articulate to said brokers the types of tenants the City seeks at Santa Monica Airport. In other words, the proposed Leasing Policy would be utilized extensively by staff to manage the brokers. Fourth, the Leasing Policy will provide public notice of how the City will approach leasing issues. The Airport is public property and hence it is essential, as a matter of public policy and good government, to disclose to the public the City\u2019s leasing policy.", "Highlights of the Proposed Leasing Policy", "\u00b7 Tenant Mix. The City shall, in an orderly fashion, achieve a tenant mix at the airport whose operations are compatible and harmonious with the local community.", "\u00b7 Master Tenants. The proposed Leasing Policy calls for elimination of master tenant agreements in an orderly transition.", "\u00b7 Delegation of Authority. The Leasing Policy delegates leasing decisions at the Airport to the City Manager provided the City Manager finds the proposed lease is consistent with the Policy and does not extend beyond June 30, 2018.", "\u00b7 Lease Terms. Month-to-month leases and leases that expire on or before June 30, 2018 are under the authority of the City Manager. Leases with terms beyond June 30, 2018 must go to the City Council for approval.", "\u00b7 Rates. All new and renewed leases will be leased at prevailing market rates and rates will be adjusted to stay current with market conditions and as new/renewed leases arise.", "\u00b7 Existing Tenants.  All existing airport tenants will be given the opportunity to submit a lease application to the City. The City is under no obligation to offer lease agreements. Submitting an application to the City does not obligate the City to enter into lease negotiations, offer a lease agreement, or execute a lease agreement. The decision to execute a lease agreement will be made solely within the City\u2019s discretion as landlord and property owner.", "\u00b7 Sub-Leasing. Sub-leasing shall be prohibited.", "\u00b7 Real Estate Brokers. The City may cooperate with commercial real estate brokers who are authorized to negotiate leases on behalf of prospective tenants.", "Financial Considerations", "Phasing out master tenant agreements will affect expenditures and revenues. On the expenditure side, costs will increase as the City assumes direct responsibility for property management and capital expenditures. Additionally, the City will be responsible for paying real estate brokerage fees when vacancies arise. On March 1st, the City Council approved an increase in budget and scope of work for Aeroplex for property management and real estate brokerage services. Aeroplex will be assisting the City in the transition to local control over Airport property management. For a complete discussion of Aeroplex please refer to the March 1, 2016 agenda.", "On the other hand, revenues are positioned to increase. Net revenues to the City derived from rents are likely to increase with the elimination of master tenants. Whether the net balance will be negative or positive will ultimately depend on the City\u2019s ability to manage costs and secure quality tenants, and vacancy factors. Staff believes it will be a net positive for two reasons. First, demand for space at the Airport is strong thus mitigating vacancy risk. Second, the consultant selected by staff, Aeroplex, is recognized as an industry leader in property management and real estate brokerage.", "Leasing Policy Implementation", "Sound public policy succeeds when it is accompanied with effective implementation. Executing the recommendations will present difficult but achievable operational challenges. Staff has given considerable thought to implementation issues and concludes the recommendations can be implemented effectively through an orderly phased process. Therefore, staff recommends phasing out master tenant agreements and phasing out tenants that are found to be incompatible, through an orderly transition process.", "1. Phase-Out Master Tenants: Staff recommends phasing out master tenant agreements in order to accelerate greater self-sufficiency and local control of the Airport. Phasing out master tenants will position the City to capture a greater percentage of the lease revenues generated by the Airport thereby reducing the need for subsidies from the General Fund. Eliminating master tenants will increase total net revenues to the City because the intermediary will no longer exist. As master tenancies are eliminated one-by-one, the process will allow time for staff to build administrative capacity to handle these new responsibilities.", "2. Phase-Out Tenants in an Orderly Transition Determined to be Incompatible with the Leasing Policy. There are four compelling reasons to implement a phased and orderly approach to evicting tenants that are incompatible with the Leasing Policy. First, phasing out incompatible tenants in an orderly fashion does not flood the market with numerous vacancies all at one time. As a landlord, flooding the market with available rental space would be deleterious to the City and therefore should be avoided. In other words, if implementation is phased and orderly, the City will be in a stronger position to retain and recruit the highest quality tenants that are most compatible with the local built environment, are willing and able to pay market rents because market conditions will be in our favor and our brokers will have the time needed to find highly qualified tenants. Second, a phased and orderly approach provides the City a steady cash flow thereby stabilizes revenues and does not jeopardize the Airport fund. The City will not need to rush into unfavorable lease terms and conditions because the Airport fund will remain strong. Third, the ability to properly vet and perform due diligence on prospective tenants argues for a phased approach. The goal is to ensure that leasing decisions are fully deliberated, reviewed, and assessed for congruence with the Leasing Policy and that is manageable if phased. Fourth, staff anticipates that existing tenants whose leases are not renewed will vacate in accordance with their lease agreement.", "Airport Commission", "The Airport Commission held a special meeting on March 15, 2016 to discuss the Leasing Policy. After a full discussion, the motion to recommend approval of the Leasing Policy failed on a two-two tie vote. One dissenting Commissioner objected to the Leasing Policy based on his determination that the Leasing Policy is too vague relative to tenant selection criteria. Additionally, one Commissioner expressed objections based on the grounds that on its face the Policy appears to preclude aviation tenants and more details should be provided regarding phasing-out incompatible tenants.", "Alternatives", "Staff identifies three possible alternatives:", "1. The City Council may consider not adopting the proposed Leasing Policy.", "2. The City Council may consider amending the Leasing Policy as it deems appropriate.", "3. The City Council may consider returning the Leasing Policy to the Airport Commission, if necessary, and as appropriate, for additional input from said body.", "Financial Impacts and Budget", "There are no immediate financial impacts or budget authorization required as a result of adopting the Santa Monica Airport Leasing and Licensing Policy.", "Prepared By: Nelson Hernandez, Senior Advisor to the City Manager", "Approved", "Forwarded to Council"]}, {"Title": "Selection of Priority Park Projects for Inclusion in the Los Angeles Countywide Comprehensive Parks & Recreation Needs Assessment Report", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Council review and consider the recommendations from the Recreation and Parks Commission, staff, and community input and formally select the City\u2019s highest priority park projects to be included in the Los Angeles Countywide Parks Needs Assessment Report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Santa Monica is participating in a comprehensive study led by Los Angeles County to assess park needs in all incorporated and unincorporated areas countywide. The primary outcome of the assessment is for each study area established by the County to develop a list of priority park projects that will be used to inform future funding needs and open space planning, countywide. Community input was received at the January and February 2016 meetings of the Recreation and Parks Commission. Staff requests that the Council consider the recommendations from the Recreation and Parks Commission and formally select the City\u2019s priority park projects to be included in the County\u2019s final report, which will be submitted to the County Board of Supervisors in May 2016.", "Background", "Los Angeles County is leading a comprehensive assessment of parks and recreation needs countywide to inform long-range planning. In 1992 Santa Monica participated in a similar but smaller scale needs analysis that led to a Los Angeles County bond measure (Proposition A). This proposition provided $540 million in funding over a 22-year period for parks and recreation projects countywide, including approximately $10 million for Santa Monica, before expiring. A supplemental measure to Proposition A passed in 1996 and provided an additional $319 million in funding and will expire in 2017.", "In preparation for possible future funding opportunities and for general planning purposes, Santa Monica is currently one of 189 study areas participating in Los Angeles County\u2019s Comprehensive Park Needs Assessment. Since July 2015, staff has worked closely with the County to complete several aspects of this assessment. Staff performed a broad inventory of existing parks and park amenities in Santa Monica, evaluated the condition of each per standards provided by the County, investigated all vacant parcels in the City for viability as future park space and reported the findings to the County\u2019s Parks & Recreation Department. By incorporating this information with demographic data from the 2010 Census, the County and its consultants provided the City with a set of metrics to inform developing a list of priority park projects (Attachment A). Most notably, it was determined that Santa Monica has 134 park acres with a resident population of more than 92,000, which equates to approximately 1.4 park acres per 1,000 residents.  The County average is 3.3 acres per 1,000 residents (beach acreage is not included in this metric). Since parks and recreation facilities play an important role in a community, the final step in the County\u2019s needs assessment process was to facilitate public outreach regarding future park priorities.", "Staff recommends that the Council consider the community input data provided below as well as the County\u2019s project criteria and point assignment system to finalize a list of priority park projects to be included in the County\u2019s final report. The County\u2019s guidelines stipulate that a project must meet the following criteria:", "\u00b7 Must be in an existing park or can be a new park or specialty facility (e.g. aquatics center, arboretum, golf course, etc.).", "\u00b7 Must be site specific or can include multiple sites if the project is related to general infrastructure elements (e.g. signage, park furniture, irrigation, restrooms, etc.).", "\u00b7 Must fall into one of the following categories: repairing existing amenities, adding or replacing amenities at an existing park, or building a new park or specialty facility.", "Each study area can submit a list of projects for a total of up to 10 points. It is important to note that projects are weighted in point value as noted below:", "\u00b7 1 Point: Repairing or replacing an existing amenity or adding a new amenity at a park or general infrastructure projects in a single amenity category at multiple locations, such as replacing signage at all parks.", "\u00b7 2 Points: Building a new park or specialty facility on City-owned land; includes general infrastructure and up to two amenities.", "\u00b7 3 Points: Building a new park or specialty facility with general infrastructure and up to two amenities would be considered three points if it includes land acquisition.", "Discussion", "Community Outreach", "On January 21, 2016 approximately 80 community members attended a special meeting of the Recreation and Parks Commission (Attachment B) to provide input on priority park projects for this assessment in three ways: during public comment, by writing on the Idea Wall, and by submitting a project nomination form. With the understanding that future funding locally and from the County is not guaranteed, the community suggested projects related to over 60 different topics and varying in size and scope. (Please see Attachment C for a summary of all projects and Attachments D and E for full written comments as submitted by the community on the Idea Wall and project cards.) The most frequently suggested projects are listed below in descending order. The total number of times each project was suggested and the number of points that would be assigned per the County\u2019s criteria is noted in parentheses.", "\u00b7 Build a sports field at the Civic Center (44) (2 points)", "\u00b7 Replace part or all of the Santa Monica Airport with parkland (37) (2 points)", "\u00b7 Add new pickleball courts or convert existing tennis courts to pickleball courts (32) (1 point)", "\u00b7 Build new sports fields (in general, baseball, and/or soccer) (24) (1 or 2 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Build new pools/aquatics facilities (23) (2 or 3 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Build an ice rink (in general and/or at the Civic Center) (21) (2 or 3 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Build a park at the 4th/5th Streets and Arizona Ave. site (using part of the site and/or all of the site) (18) (2 points)", "\u00b7 Replace existing or add new drinking fountains to parks (with bottle fillers and/or dog bowls) (18) (1 point)", "\u00b7 Build a \u201cCentral Park\u201d (in general, at SMO, and/or at the 4th/5th Streets and Arizona Ave. site) (14) (2 or 3 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Build more parkland (in general and/or on specific sites not otherwise listed) (14) (2 or 3 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Build small/pocket parks (13) (2 or 3 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Add systems to capture stormwater and urban runoff (13) (1 point)", "\u00b7 Build more community gardens (11) (2 or 3 points depending on land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Add or build more off-leash dog areas (dog beach, dog parks, and/or designated areas for dogs in existing parks) (11) (1 to 3 points depending on scope and land acquisition needs)", "\u00b7 Build an expansion of Memorial Park on the former Fisher Lumber site (9) (2 points)", "Commission Action", "At their February 18, 2016 meeting, the Recreation and Parks Commission discussed the input received from the community at the previous month\u2019s meeting and heard additional public comment on Santa Monica\u2019s priority park projects (Attachment F). After considerable discussion, the Commission adopted the following list of recommended projects for Council consideration to be included in the Los Angeles Countywide Parks Needs Assessment Report:", "\u00b7 Build a sports field on a portion of the land that currently serves as the Civic Center Parking Lot.", "\u00b7 Expand Memorial Park to include the 2.91 acre former Fisher Lumber site.", "\u00b7 Expand Airport Park on the 12 acres of non-aviation land and include a multi-use recreation facility with a pool, ice rink, and sports field.", "\u00b7 Open Mt. Olivette reservoir for public use as a park.", "\u00b7 Renovate Stewart Street Park.", "\u00b7 Build a new park/urban greenbelt on City-owned land and include community gardens as one amenity.", "The Commission selected these projects as they are greater in scope and cost, and therefore may not be able to be completed with existing City resources. Smaller-scale projects such as replacing drinking fountains or converting tennis courts to pickleball courts could potentially be funded by the City\u2019s park maintenance or Capital Improvement Program budgets.", "Subsequent to the action taken by the Recreation and Parks Commission, the Social Services Commission considered the suggested list of projects at their February 22, 2016 meeting (Attachment G) and adopted a motion in support of the recommendations.", "Generally staff is supportive of the Recreation and Parks Commission\u2019s recommendations as they are consistent with Santa Monica\u2019s vision for long-term park planning as documented in the City\u2019s Parks and Recreation Master Plan and Open Space Element. Specifically, the Parks and Recreation Master Plan calls for expanding the community park system in several ways, including: implementing open spaces at the Civic Center; developing new recreational facilities on non-aviation land at Santa Monica Airport; redefining and expanding Memorial Park\u2019s role in the community; opening Mt. Olivette to public use; developing a comprehensive system of green streets and pathways; improving and expanding sports and recreation facilities (e.g. aquatics, sports fields, gyms); and investing in existing parks. The project recommendations listed above help to achieve some of the objectives in the Open Space Element as well, such as expanding the open space system through use of public properties and establishing a citywide system of pathways and linear open spaces.", "Of the Recreation and Parks Commission\u2019s recommendations, staff advises against including the multi-use recreation facility on the 12 acres of non-aviation land at the Airport. At the March 24, 2015 Council meeting (Attachment H), Council directed staff to begin the design process for two parcels (12 acres) of non-aviation land at Santa Monica Airport with the goal of developing the site for recreational uses with a focus on sports fields within three years, if possible. Staff believes that if a multi-use recreation facility is identified as a priority on the 12 acres, completing the project within three years will not be feasible. Instead, for purposes of the Countywide Parks Needs Assessment, Council could consider identifying a multi-use recreation facility as a priority to be built on city-owned land without specifying the particular location or actual amenities at this time (valued at 2 points per County point system).", "Staff recommends that the Council consider the recommendations from the community, Recreation and Parks Commission, and staff and adopt a motion to transmit a list of priority projects to the County of Los Angeles for inclusion in the Countywide Parks Needs Assessment.", "Alternatives", "Council could formulate a list of priorities different than those recommended in this report. It  is important to note the County is operating within tight time constraints and Santa Monica\u2019s list must be submitted in March 2016 in order for it to be included in the Comprehensive Countywide Parks Needs Assessment final report.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Request of Councilmember Winterer that the Council allocate $7000 to the Ocean Park Association, a 501(c)3, to hire a professional coordinator to assist with organizing and staging of the annual Fourth of July Parade on Main Street.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1519954200": [[{"Title": "City Manager's Report:  Update on 2016 Homeless Count", "Department": "2: Special Agenda Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "02. Special Agenda Items", "Body": ["The PowerPoint presentation for this item will be available after the meeting."]}], [{"Title": "First Modification to Contract #3022 with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC for Property Leasing and Management Services", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement No. 3022 (CCS) in the amount of $325,000 with Aeroplex Group Partners, LLC (\u201cAeroplex\u201d), a California-based corporation, to provide additional commercial real estate leasing, consulting, and property management services for the Santa Monica Airport. This will result in a one year amended agreement expiring on June 30, 2016 in the amount of $404,990 with two one-year options to renew in the amount of $325,000 in FY 2016-17 and $325,000 in FY 2017-18 at the sole discretion of the City for a total amount not to exceed $1,054,990 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 13, 2015, the City entered into a Professional Services Agreement (PSA) with Aeroplex to provide assistance to City staff with commercial real estate leasing and property management services for aviation properties at Santa Monica Airport. Agreement No. 3022 expires on June 30, 2016, with two one-year options to renew at the sole discretion of the City.", "Staff anticipates that the need for commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned real estate assets in the current and future fiscal years will exceed the current agreement amount of $79,990. Based on Council direction, City staff is currently analyzing policy toward master tenancies. One of them, Gunnell Properties, is leaving on February 29th. They had previously subleased to approximately 75 subtenants. Should the City continue with any of those uses past Gunnell\u2019s February 29th departure, additional property management services will be required since the Airport is not currently staffed to manage that large a cohort of direct tenants . Therefore, staff recommends a first modification to increase the agreement with Aeroplex by $325,000 with two annual renewals of $325,000 in FY 2016-17 and $325,000 in FY 2017-18 for a total agreement amount not to exceed $1,054,990 for additional commercial real estate leasing and property management services for the Santa Monica Airport.", "Background", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A) Council directed staff to contract for real estate brokerage services and property management firms to assist city staff with commercial real estate leasing and property management services for City-owned properties at the Santa Monica Airport. On July 13, 2015, the City entered into Professional Services Agreement No. 3022 (CCS) with Aeroplex for an amount not to exceed $79,990 to provide assistance to City staff in negotiating leases for City-owned properties located at Santa Monica Airport, including brokerage services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period, and to provide real estate consulting and property management services for those properties.", "At present, there are a total of 306 tenants at the Airport that are directly managed by City staff. Six of these tenants are master tenants, which have a total of approximately 323 sub-tenancies. Certain buildings that were leased by tenants became City assets on July 1, 2015 (see Attachment A).  The decision of whether we use City staff or a property management firm to manage the additional new tenants that will come under the direct control of the City has yet to be finalized. The property that was formerly under the management of Gunnell will be managed by Aeroplex as of March 1, 2016 due to the immediacy of the situation.", "The current agreement with Aeroplex provides for commissions for completing any renewal, new lease, or other occupancy agreement at the Santa Monica Airport during the contract period. The commission for a month-to-month lease term is a one-time payment equal to the first month\u2019s rent, but in no case less than $1,000. Commission for longer lease terms is calculated at 5% of the gross rent and fees paid by the tenant to the Santa Monica Airport for the term of the lease or agreement. For property management services Aeroplex will receive a fee of 5% of the gross rent. Aeroplex will be reimbursed for any out-of-pocket expenses that are authorized by the City related to property management. All expenditures for the maintenance and capital improvements from properties managed by Aeroplex will be the responsibility of the City.", "Discussion", "Based on market valuations of real estate properties at the Airport, the current contractual terms with Aeroplex, and the cost of the additional services required, will exceed the present contracted amount of $79,990.", "Leasing needs at the Airport are fluid, dynamic, and somewhat unpredictable, therefore it is important to amend Aeroplex\u2019s contract at this time to ensure there is no break in service and that they are available if and when the need arises beginning with the property formerly managed by Gunnell Properties. Under the direction of City staff, Aeroplex will use their expertise to attract new tenants, negotiate optimal lease terms in and manage Airport properties as directed to ensure consistency with city policies. It should be noted that commissions are paid on services rendered and the funds requested in this contract modification are based on anticipated lease vacancies that may occur during the contract period, specifically the imminent departure of Gunnell.", "If and when master tenancies are phased out, staff anticipates additional expenditures related to property management and leasing to increase with staff returning to Council for additional modifications to this contract as need arises. It is also anticipated that revenues from direct leasing will increase and offset the increased expenditures incurred for the services described in this agreement.", "Fees for commercial real estate leasing and property management services (such as marketing and showing vacancies, responding to tenant inquiries, coordinating routine and on-call maintenance, and responding to emergencies regarding the property) for City owned real estate assets include $175,000 per annum for anticipated expenses associated with property management costs. Costs to be reimbursed include, but are not limited to, minor repairs to the leased properties, marketing costs, and costs for approved employees hired by Aeroplex to exclusively manage properties at the Airport. Additionally, maintenance and capital improvement costs are not included in the services provided by Aeroplex, however, such costs will be borne by the City and accounted for in the Airport\u2019s Operating and Capital Improvement budgets.", "Consultant Selection", "On April 1, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing and property management agent. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. One hundred and thirty four (134) vendors were notified, 21 vendors downloaded the RFP. Five firms (Aeroplex Group Partners, CBRE Group Inc., Corporate Realty Group, PAR Commercial Brokerage, and Property Management Associates) responded. Responses to the RFP were received and publicly opened on May 11, 2015.", "The Airport Division of the Public Works Department and Housing and Economic Development staff evaluated proposals based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 and listed in the RFP, including real estate, leasing, and property management experience, references, project work plans and timelines, management team qualifications, vast knowledge and experience of the aviation market place, proven experience in the area of negotiating, broker, and property management services for Airport properties, and competitive price. Aeroplex currently manage two Airport facilities in the Southern California region, one at Van Nuys Airport and one at Long Beach Airport. Based on these criteria, staff selected Aeroplex as the best qualified firm to assist City staff in negotiating Airport leases at the Santa Monica Airport, including broker and property management services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Aeroplex is $325,000 with two annual renewals of $325,000 for FY2016-17 and $325,000 for FY2017-18 at the sole discretion of the City for a total amount not to exceed $1,054,990.", "Award of the agreement modification requires the following FY 2015-16 budget change:", "Appropriate $325,000 from the Airport Fund to account 33431.555060 in FY 2015-16 to fund the agreement modification.", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Digital Inclusion Broadband Pilot Program Subscription Rates", "Department": "Information Services Department, Broadband", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Adopt the attached Resolution to establish monthly subscription rates for the City\u2019s Digital Inclusion Broadband Pilot Program. 2. Authorize the City Manager to waive proposed installation and subscription rates to Affordable Housing Providers, for the sole purpose of the City to deliver public broadband service to Community Rooms, located within affordable Multi-Housing developments with no less than 25% of its total units qualified as affordable units onsite, whereby Community Rooms are designated as common area rooms utilized for tenant child development services, educational purposes, career development, and other activities as specified by the City\u2019s Public Housing Agency.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica adopted a Telecommunications Master Plan in 1998 to enhance quality of life, economic vitality, and delivery of government services through the strategic use of telecommunications technologies and infrastructure.  In accordance with the Master Plan, the City has built a Municipal Fiber Network, CityNet.  CityNet delivers voice, video, and data communications to City facilities; offers dark and lit fiber services to businesses; and provides free public Wi-Fi in over 36 City Wi-Fi hot zones located in public open spaces throughout the City. In October 2015, Council approved $175,000 in construction funding for a proof of concept Digital Inclusion Broadband Pilot Program (Broadband Pilot) to provide fiber optic services to 10 Santa Monica affordable housing properties to address the digital divide for low income housing residents.  City staff has conducted research on network equipment, residential fiber optic installation techniques, and operational management to design and propose a citywide Gigabit broadband offering to residents of Multi-Dwelling buildings.  Currently, staff is conducting a feasibility analysis and must obtain subscriber testing data for feedback on service performance, to establish rates to attain cost recovery, and to develop a budget for resource planning purposes.", "City staff proposes to establish subscription rates for delivery of services to residential buildings in order to recover the costs of providing the service, and to obtain service data for individual housing units to be used for the feasibility analysis.  The proposed subscription rates are as follows:", "General Rates", "Discounted Rates for Utility Public Assistance Program Participants", "Services", "Monthly Subscription", "One-time Installation Fee", "Services", "Monthly Subscription", "One-time Installation Fee", "1 Gigabit", "$69.00", "$69.00", "1 Gigabit", "$48.00", "$48.00", "10 Gigabit", "$360.00", "$360.00", "10 Gigabit", "$252.00", "$252.00", "Staff also proposes that subscription and installation services be offered at no cost to Affordable Housing Providers, for the sole purpose of the City to deliver public broadband service to Community Rooms, located within affordable Multi-Housing developments with no less than 25% of its total units qualified as affordable units onsite, whereby Community Rooms are designated as common area rooms utilized for tenant child development services, educational purposes, career development, and other activities as specified by the City\u2019s Public Housing Agency.  Staff estimates that the Broadband Pilot subscriptions to individual housing units will generate $15,000 in revenues for fiscal year 2016-17. The revenue estimate is based upon the completion of 24 service installations to individual housing units in FY2016-17 with existing staff and budget.", "Background", "The City of Santa Monica adopted a Telecommunications Master Plan in 1998 to enhance quality of life, economic vitality, and delivery of government services through the strategic use of telecommunications technologies and infrastructure. In accordance with the Master Plan, the City has built a Municipal Fiber Network, CityNet, to enhance delivery of government services, improve performance and lower costs of telecommunications services for City facilities and businesses, and to spur economic growth.", "On April 25, 2006 (Attachment A), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute dark fiber lease agreements with Google Inc. and other interested parties should those opportunities exist. The City\u2019s dark fiber lease offering continues to experience a steady demand from large corporations in the technology, health and entertainment industries.", "On June 22, 2010 (Attachment B), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Lit Fiber agreement with Ocean Ave LLC and other interested parties requesting lit fiber service. The City introduced Lit Fiber service to businesses during an economic period marked by an influx of tech startups launching and expanding in Santa Monica. With dedicated broadband speeds ranging from 100 Megabits per second to 100 Gigabits per second, new tech ventures obtained affordable and globally competitive broadband speeds from their early startup stage to their Initial Public Offering (IPO).", "With the prior success of the City\u2019s broadband initiative, the Broadband Pilot was identified among a list of shovel-ready projects initiated to support the Strategic Priorities established by Council on August 23, 2015 (Attachment C). The lack of broadband access, adoption, and affordability have contributed to the digital divide affecting low-income families. With the goals of offering affordable 1 Gigabit broadband access to over 400 affordable housing units, the Broadband Pilot supports the City Council strategic initiatives for maintaining an inclusive and diverse community, and enabling a life-long learning community. Council approved funding for these shovel-ready projects on October 27, 2015 (Attachment D). The Broadband Pilot was appropriated $175,000 in funding for construction costs to extend the fiber optic network into 10 affordable housing buildings and network equipment costs to enable broadband service delivery from the telecommunication room of each building.", "With the primary goal of closing the Digital Divide, the Broadband Pilot will be used to conduct analysis on the operational resources required to scale broadband service delivery to all affordable housing developments. The Broadband Pilot will also assess the feasibility of introducing a citywide residential Gigabit broadband service by testing service performance under a variety of service and installation conditions. The affordable housing buildings included in the Broadband Pilot vary in their existing telecommunications infrastructure, building age and architecture, offering an opportunity for staff to test several interior infrastructure and cabling installations that could be applied to additional affordable housing buildings and multi-dwelling buildings citywide. The feasibility analysis requires subscriber testing data to be used for feedback on service performance, to establish rates to attain cost recovery, and to develop a budget for resource planning purposes. Staff proposes to establish subscriber rates for residents requesting the City\u2019s Gigabit Broadband offering in their individual housing units.", "Discussion", "CityNet has served as an effective economic development tool to support the local business community with globally competitive broadband speeds at an affordable cost. The broadband initiative has continued to innovate and adopt the latest technologies to ensure broadband services are considered globally competitive by capacity, speed, and customer service. CityNet currently offers Gigabit broadband only to businesses located in commercial buildings. Residents have requested the City provide Gigabit broadband services to their homes since the City\u2019s Incumbent Local Exchange Carrier (ILEC) or local phone company, and cable carrier do not offer such residential services.", "Globally, the Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) compares broadband statistics for more economically developed countries. The OECD ranked the United States 30th out of 34 in affordability, for fixed-broadband prices per megabit per second (Mbps) of advertised speed. The U.S. rate of $0.59 (USD) per Mbps is far more costly than Japan, ranked 1st in affordability with a rate of $0.02 (USD) per Mbps, Korea ranked 11th with a rate of $0.22 (USD) per Mbps, and Canada ranked 18th with a rate of $0.30 (USD) per Mbps. The United States also ranked low in terms of broadband speed, sharing the bottom ranking of 24th with ten other countries for 0% of their populations subscribing to broadband speeds faster than 100Mbps. Korea ranked 1st in speed tier comparisons, with over 34% of their inhabitants subscribing to broadband speeds greater than 100Mbps, while Japan has over 19% of their population subscribing to broadband speeds greater than 100Mbps.", "In 2010, Google launched their Google Fiber competition to offer one U.S. city, Gigabit broadband to highlight the consumer demand for globally competitive broadband, and the benefits of Gigabit broadband to a community. More than 1,100 cities across the U.S., including Santa Monica, applied to be the first recipient of Google\u2019s fiber optic broadband services. Since the launch of Google\u2019s Fiber competition, a number of U.S. cities, municipalities such as Chattanooga, Tennessee and Lafayette, Louisiana have launched Gigabit initiatives and adopted rates similar to Google Fiber.", "The Digital Divide in the U.S. highlights economic disparities prevalent in broadband access and adoption. The Pew Research Center estimates that 40% of U.S. households with school age children and incomes below $25,000 do not have high speed broadband at home. The 2014 Field Poll by Field Research Corporation reported in California, 47% of households earning annual incomes less than $20,000 do not have access to the internet at home. The Field Poll also found that in households with broadband access other than a smartphone, parents were 84% likely to use the internet to help their children learn and 75% likely to obtain information on their children\u2019s homework and grades. Lack of broadband at home can create disadvantages to residents requiring broadband for education, job application searches, health information, news, communicating online and through social media.", "Santa Monica\u2019s Digital Inclusion Pilot Program was established with the goals of both eliminating the digital divide between low income and higher income wage earners, and eliminating the gap in broadband affordability and speed between the United States and the other more economically developed countries, as measured by the OECD. The proposed broadband pilot subscription services of 1,000 Mbps and 10,000 Mbps, would globally rank among the highest speed tier (>100 Mbps), and proposed broadband general rates would rank 2nd in affordability by megabits per second at $0.07 per Mbps for 1,000Mbps and $0.04 per Mbps at 10,000Mbps.", "Broadband Pilot Subscription \u2013 General Rates", "Staff proposes to establish subscription rates for Broadband Pilot services, to recover the costs of providing the service, test service performance, and obtain operational data related to individual housing unit service delivery. The proposed general subscription rates are as follows:", "General Rates", "Services", "Monthly Subscription", "One-time Installation Fee", "1 Gigabit Broadband", "$69.00", "$69.00", "10 Gigabit Broadband", "$360.00", "$360.00", "The proposed general rates are competitive with U.S. Gigabit broadband market rates. The unbundled rates for early adopters of residential Gigabit broadband service include Google Fiber ($70.00/month), City of Chattanooga, Tennessee ($69.95/month), and City of Lafayette, Louisiana ($109.95/month). Rates for residential broadband service greater than 1 Gigabit speeds are varied, and are currently not offered by Google Fiber. Lafayette offers 2 Gigabit service for $299.99 per month with a 4 year contract term, and Chattanooga recently offered 10 Gigabit service for $299.99 per month. In Santa Monica, the local phone company and cable company do not offer 1 Gigabit residential service at this time. Proposed rates account for variances in cost of living, Santa Monica\u2019s Living Wage and Minimum Wage Ordinances, among the comparison cities. In addition, the proposed rates will capture cost recovery for subscriber\u2019s temporary use of customer dedicated network equipment, broadband, and fiber asset during testing. The general rates would apply to households requesting subscription to the Broadband Pilot, yet do not qualify for the California Utility Public Assistance Programs required to obtain discounted rates.", "Broadband Pilot Subscription - Discounted Rates", "To effectively support broadband adoption among communities that are historically underserved in terms of high speed broadband access, staff has identified existing California utility rate reductions for households meeting specific income thresholds. The utility public assistance programs and discounts are as follows:", "California Utility Public Assistance Programs", "Utility", "Program", "Discount", "Southern California Edison (electric)", "CARE", "20%", "Southern California Edison (electric)", "FERA", "30%", "Southern California Gas (gas)", "CARE", "20%", "Santa Monica Water Department (water)", "CARE", "20%", "Staff proposes discounting the broadband subscription rate by 30% for residents currently participating in any California Utility Public Assistance Program, including the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program offered by Southern California Edison, Southern California Gas, or the Santa Monica Water Department; and the Family Electric Rate Assistance (FERA) programs offered by Southern California Edison. To qualify for the discounted rate, subscribers would be required to provide documentation verifying active status in either the CARE or FERA programs.", "The proposed discounted subscription rates are as follows:", "Discounted Rates for California Utility Public Assistance Program Participants", "Services", "Discounted Monthly Subscription", "Discounted One-time Installation Fee", "1 Gigabit Broadband", "$48.00", "$48.00", "10 Gigabit Broadband", "$252.00", "$252.00", "Waiver of Installation and Subscription Rates", "With the goal of closing the digital divide, staff proposes that subscription and installation services be offered at no cost to Affordable Housing Providers, for the sole purpose of the City to deliver public broadband service to Community Rooms, located within affordable Multi-Housing developments with no less than 25% of its total units qualified as affordable units onsite, whereby Community Rooms are designated as common area rooms utilized for tenant child development services, educational purposes, career development, and other activities specified by the City\u2019s Public Housing Agency. Currently, Community Rooms in Broadband Pilot buildings have internet speeds of 3 Mbps or less, and service has proved inadequate to support web-based basic computer training to a classroom of adult tenants, afterschool homework assistance for K-12 students, and more advanced digital literacy programs. The City will provide the network equipment, hardware, and software to deliver a fixed-wired Gigabit Broadband connection, and install at least one computer desktop per Community Room. The City will enable Wi-Fi service within the Community Room, for use by tenants participating in Community Room activities approved by the City\u2019s Public Housing Agency, within the Community Room.", "Terms of Use", "As a residential Broadband Pilot, the existing cost expenditures to provide CityNet\u2019s business-class, 24/7 network support offered to business customers, would increase service costs beyond a marketable consumer rate. During the Broadband Pilot, the City will not provide any service warranty, express or implied, and customers may opt out of the pilot services by not renewing their monthly subscription and returning City equipment. Furthermore, available broadband speeds indicate the maximum data transfer rate offered by the network device, but does not guarantee broadband speeds will be equivalent to maximum broadband speeds. Network support and response times will be offered at \u201cbest effort\u201d, and customer support will not be available outside of normal business hours at City Hall. At the conclusion of the pilot, staff will evaluate the additional resources and staff required to offer any service level assurances (SLAs) for broadband subscriptions to residential customers.  Staff estimates that the Broadband Pilot subscriptions to individual housing units will generate $15,000 in revenues for fiscal year 2016-17. The revenue estimate is based upon the completion of 24 service installations to individual housing units in FY2016-17 with existing staff and budget.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The Digital Inclusion Broadband Pilot is anticipated to generate revenues of $15,000 for FY 2016-17. A revenue budget will be established at account 01248.407783 to reflect the implementation of this program. Funds for the Digital Inclusion Pilot Program construction in the amount of $175,000 are available in the FY2015-16 Strategic Projects account number SC015201.589000."]}, {"Title": "Acceptance of 2014 Urban Area Security Initiative Grant Funds for the Implementation of an Interoperable Public Safety Trunked Radio Communications System", "Department": "Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support", "Sponsors": "Police Chief Jacqueline Seabrooks, Interim Fire Chief Dennis J. Downs", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant award in the amount of $2,997,543 from the 2014 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) to implement a new interoperable public safety trunked radio system and negotiate and execute a first modification of the 2014 UASI Grant Subrecipient Agreement with the City of Los Angeles for a new total amount of $3,306,050.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with Motorola Solutions, Inc., an Illinois-based company, for purchase and installation of radio infrastructure equipment to implement an interoperable public safety trunked radio system. This would be a sole source contract in an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.3. Adopt a resolution approving the Interagency Communications Interoperability System (ICI System) Joint Powers Agreement Authorizing the City's membership in the ICI System.4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica is in the process of implementing an interoperable public safety trunked radio communications system that integrates with the Interagency Communications Interoperability System (ICI System), a regional public safety radio network that ensures coordinated regional response in the face of a natural disaster or other emergency. The total cost of the interoperable public safety trunked radio communications system to be completed in two phases is $9,500,000. The first phase of the project, which was approved by City Council on December 8, 2015, will replace and upgrade existing portable and mobile radio equipment, including related accessories and software, at a cost of $6,500,000. The final phase of the project, which would be funded by a U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant, involves contractual services for the purchase and installation of radio infrastructure equipment at an estimated cost of $3,000,000. In January 2016, the City was awarded $2,997,543 in 2014 UASI grant funding. Staff now seeks Council approval to accept the grant award and approve a sole source contractual service agreement with Motorola Solutions, Inc., for the purchase and installation of radio infrastructure equipment to implement the interoperable public safety trunked radio communications system. Staff has worked with representatives from the ICI System and Motorola Solutions, Inc. to engineer an advanced radio system that would provide coverage throughout most of Los Angeles County for first responders, and coverage throughout the western portion of Los Angeles County for secondary responders. The new radio system would enable the City to establish connectivity to the regional ICI System Master Site in Glendale, California supporting connectivity to the entire ICI System network consisting of 31 public safety agencies representing 22 cities within the County of Los Angeles and the future LA-RICS regional network operated by the County of Los Angeles.", "Staff also seeks Council adoption of a Resolution to approve the ICI System Joint Powers Authority Agreement authorizing the City's membership in the ICI System. In order to join the ICI System, the City must execute a Joint Powers Authority (JPA) Agreement. Execution of the JPA Agreement was approved by Council on June 23, 2015 after it became clear that the Los Angeles Regional Interoperable Communications System (LA-RICS) would not meet the City\u2019s communication needs for public safety and secondary responders due to insufficient coverage and capacity. The annual cost of membership in the ICI System is $46,000.", "Background", "On June 11, 2013 (Attachment A), Council authorized the sole source purchase of radio equipment and replacement parts from Motorola Solutions, Inc. for a total amount not to exceed $2.5 million.", "On February 24, 2015 (Attachment B), Council approved acceptance of a grant award in the amount of $308,507 from the 2014 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) and execution of a subrecipient agreement and related documents to purchase equipment and training that supports regional homeland security goals.", "On June 23, 2015 (Attachment C), Council approved the execution of a Joint Powers Authority Agreement with the ICI System. At that time, staff reported to Council that it would return with recommendations for plans to purchase and implement a replacement radio system that integrates with the ICI System.", "The ICI System is utilized by 31 public safety agencies representing 22 cities within the County of Los Angeles. The ICI System is governed by a Governance Board comprised of one representative from each member agency. There are three committees that report to the Governance Board. The Operations Committee develops policy and procedures for the day to day operations of the ICI System. The Technical Committee oversees the maintenance and system functionality of the network and connectivity between the different member systems. The Legislative Committee works with federal and state lobbyists and advocates to help secure funding for growth of the system.", "On December 8, 2015 (Attachment D), Council approved the first phase of a two phased project to implement an interoperable public safety trunked radio communications system at a total cost of $9,500,000. In the first phase, staff is working to replace and upgrade existing portable and mobile radio equipment, related accessories and software, at a cost of $6,500,000, including a $5,300,000 sole source purchase to Motorola Solutions, Inc. for new and upgrade of replacement portable and mobile radio equipment and accessories. The final phase of the project, which would be funded by a UASI grant involves contractual services for the purchase and installation of radio infrastructure equipment at an estimated cost of $3,000,000.", "The UASI program focuses on enhancing regional preparedness in major metropolitan areas.The UASI program directly supports the national priority of expanding regional collaboration within the national preparedness guidelines and is intended to assist participating jurisdictions in developing integrated regional systems for prevention, protection, response, and recovery from natural or man-made disasters.", "The UASI grant program was created to support large, \u201ccore\u201d cities and those other cities with contiguous borders to the core city. The UASI grant program is 100% federally funded from the Department of Homeland Security to the State of California. The City of Los Angeles acts as the core city for the UASI grant and allots funds to the City of Santa Monica. These funds have purchased necessary equipment, supplies, and training in direct support of overall regional goals to promote effective information gathering, sharing, and response to threats and/or acts of terrorism.", "In January 2016, the City was awarded $2,997,543 in UASI 2014 grant funding to implement the interoperable public safety trunked radio communications system. Staff now seeks Council approval to accept the grant award and to modify the 2014 UASI Grant Subrecipient agreement, which was approved by Council on February 24, 2015. The modified 2014 UASI Grant Subrecipient agreement would total $3,306,050. Staff also seeks approval of a sole source contractual service agreement with Motorola Solutions, Inc., for the purchase and installation of radio infrastructure equipment to implement the radio system and adoption of a Resolution to approve the ICI System Joint Powers Authority Agreement authorizing the City's membership in the ICI System.", "Discussion", "The City has utilized multiple disparate radio systems for Police, Fire and Public Works. These systems are not presently centrally managed and utilize infrastructure equipment that is no longer manufactured and is either no longer supported or soon will not be supported by the manufacturer. Although the radio systems operated by Police, Fire and Public Works provide for some level of interoperable communications between the various departments and with other public safety agencies, there are limitations that often pose challenges, and would be addressed with newer technology and participation in a regional radio system.", "Staff has worked with representatives from the ICI System and Motorola Solutions, Inc. to design and engineer an advanced radio system that would support Police, Fire, Public Works and other City departments that have needs for radio communications, as well as integrate with the ICI System\u2019s regional network. The proposed radio system would provide coverage throughout most of Los Angeles County for first responders, and coverage throughout the western portion of Los Angeles County for secondary responders and other users. As part of the radio system design, the City would retain the license to all of its radio frequencies licensed to the City by the Federal Communications Commission.", "The proposed system would include infrastructure equipment to be installed at existing remote sites located at 100 Wilshire Boulevard, Mount Olivette Reservoir and the Public Safety Facility. These sites would be linked together using the City\u2019s Municipal Fiber Network and bridged to the ICI System via both fiber and microwave paths for redundancy. The proposed system would also provide new radio console equipment for the Public Safety Communications Center, replacing console equipment that is approximately 14 years old.", "Based upon the latest state-of-the-art technology offered by Motorola Solutions, Inc., the new console equipment would fully integrate with the Police Department\u2019s Mobile Command Center, expanding radio system capacity within the Mobile Command Center from several channels to the entire new radio system. The proposed system would have the ability to provide GPS data from the radio to the Computer Aided Dispatch (CAD) system for the Police and Fire Departments, which would increase safety for first responders. The proposed system would have the ability to allow for radios to be reprogrammed over the air, including updating encryption keys. Without the ability to reprogram radios over the air, the process to update a fleet of radios for the City can take a month or more, resulting in significant labor costs. The system would be centrally managed by the City\u2019s Information Systems Department.", "The new radio system would enable the Police and Fire departments to directly communicate with each other, as well as with Public Works. This level of interdepartmental communication is needed for major events the City hosts, such as the Los Angeles Marathon and GLOW. The new system would also enable the Police and Fire Departments to directly communicate with all 31 agencies utilizing the ICI System today, as well as maintain communications with agencies not yet a part of the ICI System, such as the County of Los Angeles and the City of Los Angeles.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In 2001, the City of Glendale, which hosts the ICI System master site, performed a formal competitive process for a trunked radio system. The process resulted in the selection of Motorola Solutions, Inc. to provide the radio system. At the time, the radio system utilized proprietary technology developed by Motorola Solutions, Inc., as industry standards had not yet been adopted, but completely fulfilled the requirements published in the Request for Proposal. In 2011, the ICI System Governance Board decided to migrate towards P25 technology and a new formal competitive process took place, which resulted in the selection of Motorola Solutions, Inc.", "The Association of Public Safety Communications Officials (APCO), an international organization and leader in public safety communications, has adopted standards for digital radio communication systems and equipment. The standards have been published as APCO\u2019s Project 25 (P25) and are intended to ensure interoperable communications between public safety agencies utilizing equipment designed by different manufacturers that is compatible with one-another. The City is in the process of implementing a P25 compliant system developed by Motorola Solutions, Inc. The City\u2019s system will be linked to the ICI System, a regional radio system comprised of 31 public safety agencies. The ICI System uses a P25 compliant system developed by Motorola Solutions, Inc. In order to ensure the City\u2019s radio system can properly integrate with the ICI System, it is necessary to purchase equipment manufactured by Motorola Solutions, Inc.", "Radio system manufacturers that agree to participate in the P25 program are permitted to develop technology that extends beyond P25 standards. Motorola Solutions, Inc. has developed technology as part of their ASTRO 25 system that extends beyond P25 standards and is not available from other radio manufacturers. The systems procured by Glendale and subsequently by other partner agencies relies on these enhanced features as part of the radio communications system. To maintain interoperability among the regional ICI radio system, therefore, Santa Monica like all other ICI member cities, must procure components of its system from Motorola Solutions, Inc.", "On June 23, 2015, Council approved executing a Joint Powers Authority agreement with the ICI System after it became clear that the Los Angeles Regional Interoperable Communications System (LA-RICS) would not meet the City\u2019s communication needs for public safety and secondary responders due to insufficient coverage and capacity. The ICI System infrastructure is comprised of the Motorola Solutions, Inc. ASTRO 25 system.", "The advanced technology and features that Motorola Solutions, Inc. has developed beyond the industry standards is only available from and supported by, Motorola Solutions, Inc. Therefore, this sole source purchase is necessary in order to ensure connectivity with the ICI radio system as specified in SMMC 2.24.080 (a) Competition does not exist, for proprietary items of original equipment manufacturers and/or their authorized exclusive distributors.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Award of a $2,997,543 grant from the U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency\u2019s Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) requires the following FY 2015-16 budget changes:", "1. Establish revenue budget at account 20243.408781 in the amount of $2,997,543.", "2. Appropriate the following expenditures to reflect receipt of the 2014 Urban Security Initiative (UASI) grant: $2,997,543 at account C209051.589000.", "Funds for the membership in ICI are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Information Systems Department. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Expo Light Rail Marketing Services", "Department": "City Manager's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 66 to GOOD Worldwide Inc., a California-based company for Expo Light Rail marketing services;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with GOOD Worldwide Inc., in an amount not to exceed $500,000 for one year, with one-additional one-year renewal option in the amount of $250,000, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $750,000 over a two-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The arrival of Expo (Expo LRT) to Santa Monica is the catalyst to forge a new model of mobility for the community. To maximize public awareness about Expo, staff recommends securing a contract with GOOD Worldwide Inc. for marketing services for a one-year term with the option to renew for an additional two-year period, for an amount not to exceed $500,000.", "Background", "The Expo LRT is a 15-mile light rail line extending from downtown Los Angeles to downtown Santa Monica and will be the first extension of Metro rail to the west side. The project, which has come to fruition after over 20 years of collaboration and planning between multiple jurisdictions, is part of a significant county-wide investment of $1.5 billion in transportation.", "The Expo LRT to Santa Monica is a significant and long-term investment in public transit, city-wide and regional mobility, and sustainability. It will provide Santa Monica residents, workers, students, and visitors with easier access to major destinations both locally and regionally. The light rail stations were incorporated into the City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), and are part of an integrated citywide strategy to reduce greenhouse gases and achieve no net new evening peak trips. Metro revenue operation of the Expo LRT is targeted to begin in late spring 2016.", "Discussion", "Over the next six to 24 months, the Office of Communications, with the assistance of a marketing consultant, is developing marketing, outreach, and educational strategies for an overarching campaign focusing on the issue of mobility in Santa Monica, with the initial goal of ensuring that Santa Monica\u2019s residents, workers, students, and visitors are prepared for the changes and new opportunities presented with the operation of the Expo LRT in Santa Monica.", "The consultant would work closely with, and on behalf of, the Office of Communications staff to provide expert and creative marketing planning and implementation support. The consultant would develop the campaign strategy and assist in the execution of the tasks developed for the coming of the Expo LRT. The campaign strategy would educate the community about the use of and community impacts related to the Expo LRT system based on the following core categories:", "\u00b7 Commuters and Riders", "\u00b7 Arrival and Departure Circulation", "\u00b7 First and Last Mile Connections", "\u00b7 Maintenance", "\u00b7 Public Safety", "\u00b7 Launch and Opening Events", "Consultant Scope of Work", "The scope of work for the initial term includes:", "1. Developing an overarching campaign focusing on mobility within Santa Monica, with a full outreach plan for the use of, and impacts associated with the Expo LRT operating in Santa Monica. All strategies would include communication, outreach and education plans to assist members of the community, including residents, workers, and visitors, with pre-launch, launch and post-launch of the Expo LRT. The plan would include a variety of outreach strategies including, but not limited to:", "\u00b7 Community outreach. This strategy would define methods for communicating with members of the community. Tactics may include, but are not limited to website information, brochures, social media, and direct mail.", "\u00b7 Community education. This strategy would address methods for describing or demonstrating the Expo LRT and its benefits to the community and would include how to access the train, and first and last mile connections without a car.", "\u00b7 General promotion and advertising. This strategy would address print and electronic mass media promotion and advertising.", "\u00b7 Targeted promotion and advertising. This strategy would define market specific advertising, such as multi-lingual, geographic, and targeted market segments.", "\u00b7 Experiential marketing. Development of experiential tactics that would encourage locals to use public transit as a viable way to commute in and out of Santa Monica.", "\u00b7 Government and community relations. This strategy would identify tactics for keeping community leaders informed about the launch and encouraging their support.", "2. Developing and overseeing the copy, graphic designs, and production of all communication materials, and promotion and advertising creative.", "3. Developing a unifying tag line that could be used on all outreach materials.", "4. Providing support for executing some, if not all, aspects of the campaign strategy.", "5. Establishing the benchmarks and metrics on what would define a success. Providing methods for monitoring and measuring the effectiveness of the campaign strategy and reporting results.", "Pending Council approval of staff\u2019s recommendation, the Office of Communications would execute an agreement with the consultant utilizing the following timeline, with minor adjustments as necessary depending upon the actual opening date of the Expo LRT.", "\u00b7 By April 4, 2016: Complete Campaign Strategy", "\u00b7 April 4-May 31, 2016: Creative Production", "\u00b7 May 1-June 30, 2016: Campaign Strategy Implementation & Activation", "\u00b7 May 31-July 31, 2016: Campaign Strategy Measurement & Evaluation", "\u00b7 September 30, 2016: Identify and Plan for Future Communication Efforts", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On November 30, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for Expo Light Rail Marketing Services. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 617 vendors were notified, 75 prospective vendors downloaded the proposal and ten firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the City Manager\u2019s Office, Big Blue Bus, Planning and Community Development, and the Police Department.", "Evaluation of the proposals was based on the following selection criteria: Experience; References; Work Plans and Timelines; Project Team; Cost; Sample Material; and Flexibility, Creativity, and Responsiveness. Five short-listed firms were also invited to provide the selection panel with a presentation or demonstration. Following the presentation phase, the two top applicants were asked to submit their final and best offer, to aid in selection of the recommended firm.", "Staff recommends GOOD Worldwide Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide Expo LRT marketing services. GOOD Worldwide Inc. is experienced in campaign development including strategy, messaging and design, market research, grassroots and digital marketing, and metrics and reporting. Reference checks indicate the firm is a strong partner, highly creative, and has expertise with social impact marketing programs. GOOD Worldwide Inc. would develop an overarching campaign focusing on mobility within Santa Monica, with a full outreach and implementation plan for the use of, and impacts associated with the Expo LRT operating in Santa Monica.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to GOOD Worldwide Inc. for marketing services for a one-year term with the option to renew for an additional two-year period, for an amount not to exceed $500,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the City Manager's Office. The agreement will be charged to account SO015104.589000."]}, {"Title": "Design Services for The Clover Park Restroom Facility Replacement Project SP2388", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Request for Proposals (RFP) SP2388 to DNA A+D / Pleskow Architects, a California-based company for design services for the Clover Park Restroom Facility Replacement Project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with DNA Architecture and Design, in an amount not to exceed $114,410 (including 10% contingency). 3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary changes to complete additional work within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Clover Park Facility Replacement Project would demolish and replace two existing restroom facilities, restroom facility #1 (located next to the park offices) and restroom facility #2 (located next to the south fields) at Clover Park. The existing restroom facilities are over 30 years old and require extensive maintenance. They are currently not code-compliant and are in disrepair. The new facilities would follow the current Santa Monica prototypical layout model for park facilities, including single stalls accessed directly from the exterior with ample passive lighting and ventilation. The prototype design has been found to reduce the incidence of misuse and vandalism. The two new restroom buildings would have the same capacity as the existing structures, be located in the same location as those to be demolished, and would be designed and constructed to meet all current applicable code requirements. The demolition of the restroom facility #1 also eliminates connected underutilized storage space, which will not be replaced. In November 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Proposals for design services for the demolition and replacement of the existing Clover Park restroom facilities. After reviewing the twelve proposals DNA A+D / Pleskow Architects is recommended for the design of the Clover Park restroom replacement in an amount not to exceed $114,410.", "Discussion", "Clover Park is a 17.9 acre park located at 2600 Ocean Park Boulevard in Santa Monica California. The park amenities include two playgrounds, picnic areas, walk/bike path, soccer fields, lighted baseball fields and tennis courts and two separate restroom facilities. The restroom facilities are over 30 years old and have become dilapidated and require extensive maintenance. Full replacement of both buildings is recommended.", "The park\u2019s current restrooms are housed in two separate, free standing buildings, each with both men\u2019s and women\u2019s facilities. The existing restrooms have become outdated, rundown and are in need of repair and major finish and fixture upgrades. The existing restrooms are not code-compliant and would require substantial work to be updated appropriately, thus full replacement of both buildings is recommended. The restroom facilities would be replaced simultaneously. Temporary facilities for public use would be provided at each site during construction length of approximately 1 year.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On November 2, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) to provide design services for demolition and replacement of the Clover Park restroom facilities. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. There were 752 vendors notified and 47 vendors downloaded the RFP. The City received 12 proposals that were publicly opened on November 24, 2015.", "Proposals received were as follows:", "Firm", "Amount", "Fleetwood Fernandez Architects", "$201,000.00", "Minarc", "$150,700.00", "RM Architecture", "$140,450.00", "Deborah Richmond Architects", "$122,800.00", "Base Architecture and Engineering", "$118,085.00", "DNA A+D / Pleskow Architects", "$104,007.50", "HH Fremer Architects", "$103,500.00", "Nonzero / Architecture", "$103,400.00", "Studio Jantzen", "$97,850.00", "Adrian-Gaus Architects Inc.", "$89,115.00", "IDS Group Inc.", "$74,100.00", "BOA Architecture", "$39,500.00", "Proposals were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Public Works and Community and Cultural Services. Proposals were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, including references, work plans, project team, cost, design proficiency, experience with comparable projects, and accuracy in response to the RFP. DNA A+D/Pleskow Architects is not the lowest bidder, but is an established design firm with experience on similar projects, and with municipal work (they are on-call architects for the City of Los Angeles and have done restroom and other municipal projects for them).  Although restroom projects seem simple, historically these projects have suffered extensive delays which have raised the cost considerably. It was imperative to select a design team that had demonstrated successful experience with the same building type within a municipal framework. The proposal submitted by DNA A+D / Pleskow Architects detailed a strong work plan and design team. During the interview process DNA A+D/ Pleskow Architects and their consultants demonstrated a very good understanding of City process and the particular challenges of the project type. Their reference checks were all very positive. Based on these criteria, DNA A+D / Pleskow Architects is recommended as the best bidder to provide full design services for a cost not to exceed $114,410, including a 10% contingency.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to DNA A+D / Pleskow Architects is for an amount not to exceed $114,410 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16", "Capital Improvement Budget in account C010747.589000."]}, {"Title": "Sanitary Sewer Master Plan Preparation", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award RFP #64 to HDR Incorporated, a Nebraska-based company, for the preparation of a Sanitary Sewer Master Plan and assistance with Water Modeling iterations;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with HDR Incorporated, in an amount not to exceed $505,000 (including a   10% contingency) for four years from the date of contract execution;3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary changes to complete additional work within contract authority;4. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends the development of a Sewer Model and associated Sanitary Sewer Master Plan. The City\u2019s sanitary sewer system is nearing design capacity in some segments of the system. The currently available information provides some limited data on locations that have been monitored in the past in the downtown area and areas near new developments. In order to accurately model the effect of current conditions, future development, and identify the need to construct critical infrastructure improvements, a Master Plan and System Model needs to be developed which evaluates the system in its entirety. The Master Plan/Sewer Model preparation would include development of a full system model to evaluate future sewer connections, establish a 10-year Capital Improvement Program for the improvement of pipes, and evaluate the Amalgamated Agreement with the City of Los Angeles. In November 2015 the City solicited bids for the preparation of a Sanitary Sewer Master Plan and assistance with Water Modeling iterations. Staff recommends HDR Incorporated as the best bidder for the preparation of a Sanitary Sewer Master Plan and assistance with Water Modeling iterations in an amount not to exceed $505,000 (including a 10% contingency).", "Background", "In 2011 Black and Veatch prepared a study of a limited portion of the City\u2019s sanitary sewers in order to evaluate the discharge of 2 million gallons per day (MGD) of brine (the wastewater produced as a by-product of potable water treatment)from the city\u2019s treatment plant into the sewer system at 19th and Broadway. At that time sewer main pipes over 10 inches in diameter along the Broadway corridor (from Ocean Avenue to the eastern City limits, and its tributary sewer lines) were monitored and a model of this limited area was prepared showing future system deficiencies.", "In 2013 the Planning Division requested review of the Infrastructure Element of the Downtown Specific Plan Environmental Impact Report (EIR), which used the Black & Veatch study as a basis for capacity assessment in the downtown area. The Black and Veatch study was limited to only the Broadway Corridor and did not evaluate the 6 inch and 8 inch diameter pipes which make up the majority of sewer mains in the downtown area. Water Resources staff recommended that the system undergo further evaluation to take into account all of the mains in the downtown area as well as mains downstream of Broadway.", "In January of 2015 the sewer system was audited by the State of California. The routine audit recommended that the City develop a Capital Improvement Plan for upsizing the system based on future demand. Future demand (at 2030) would be tied to development anticipated by the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE), addition of up to 1,607,222 gallons per day (gpd), Downtown Community Plan (DCP), and the addition of up to 878,550 gpd, as well as to the addition of approximately 800,000 gpd of brine anticipated to enter the system if the proposed Olympic Treatment Plant is completed.", "Later in 2015 V&A Consultants completed a focused sewer monitoring effort in the downtown area, showing some sewer pipe segments were reaching design capacity even during dry weather and conservation conditions. The creation of the Wastewater Model will allow the City to evaluate the system based on current impact, the impacts of future development, as well as the impact of future policy initiatives, such as the implementation of a net-zero water initiative.", "Discussion", "The Sanitary Sewer Master Plan preparation would include the development of an \u201call pipe\u201d model, that would show every pipe in the system throughout the City, rather than only larger diameter mains studied as part of the 2011 Black and Veatch Study. The model would be validated by current conditions, but will be loaded using the LUCE and DCP growth elements. This would allow staff to see critical system issues at full build out and also eliminate upsizing the same line more than once in order to accommodate future capacity.  Upon completion of the model, the City would be able to study all options available to ensure the sewer pipeline capacity is sufficient in the future and develop a comprehensive Capital Improvement Program moving forward.", "A small amount of funding for instruction on the City\u2019s Water Model, which was completed in 2015 and studies the flow of potable water throughout the City, is also being requested. The City\u2019s Water Model has already been prepared but updates to include future projects like the Olympic Treatment Plant require the assistance of a modeling professional.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On November 11, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for preparation of a Sanitary Sewer Master Plan. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. There were 1,527 vendors notified, 63 vendors downloaded the RFP.  Three firms (HDR, Black and Veatch Corporation, and Quantum Consulting Inc.) responded.", "Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Public Works and Planning departments. In accordance with SMMC 2.24.073, evaluation was based on the following selection criteria:  experience, references, work plans, project team, and cost. HDR and Black and Veatch were invited to a final interview to further assess each team\u2019s qualifications. HDR was rated highest of the two respondents following the interviews with each firm. In addition, they provided the lowest cost proposal in its initial response to the base scope of services presented in the RFP. Therefore, staff recommends HDR Incorporated as the best qualified firm to provide Sanitary Sewer Master Planning services and assist the City in running scenarios in the Water Model. The contract amount recommended for the Sewer Master Plan to be conducted by HDR reflects the final scope of work discussed and negotiated with HDR. HDR Incorporated has extensive experience providing master planning services including modeling, demand projections, asset management, capacity assessment, and financial planning. HDR Incorporated would prepare a sewer model in InfoSewer (the software which the City purchased in 2014) and develop a Sanitary Sewer Master Plan to guide the Water Resources Division through the next decade of capital planning.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to HDR Incorporated is for an amount not to exceed $505,000.  Funds in the amount of $377,500 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Public Works Department and the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget. Award of the agreement to HDR Incorporated requires an appropriation of $127,500 in the CIP account C319039.589000. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "25671.533580", "$20,000", "C319039.589000", "$485,000", "TOTAL:", "$505,000"]}, {"Title": "Property Management Services for Affordable Housing", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fifth modification to Contract #9183, in an amount not to exceed $164,245, with Real Estate Consulting and Services, Inc. (RECS), a California-based company, for property management services at City-owned residential properties. The proposed amendment would result in a new total contract amount not to exceed $3,413,316. Theproposed amendment would not extend the existing term beyond December 2016.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Real Estate Consulting and Services, Inc. (RECS) provides property-management services for three City-owned residential rental properties and was selected through a request-for-proposals process. Transfer of two properties subject to the contract (1616Ocean Avenue and 419 Ocean Avenue) to a local nonprofit affordable housing organization has been delayed as a result of property title issues. In addition, the third property (Mountain View Mobile Home Park) requires unanticipated capital repairs in the immediate future. As a result, staff recommends that the contract with RECS be increased by $164,245 to reflect the unforeseen needs.", "Background", "A professional services agreement with RECS was first approved by Council on March9, 2010 (Attachment A) to provide property management services for Mountain View Mobile Home Park. On September 13, 2011 (Attachment B), Council approved staff\u2019s recommendation to consolidate property management services with RECS for all City-owned properties including 419 Ocean Avenue and 1616 Ocean Avenue. OnApril28, 2015 (Attachment C), Council approved a fourth modification to the property management contract with RECS, involving a contract extension of 18 months ending December31,2016, and an associated increase in contract budget. OnMay12, 2015 (Attachment D), Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute agreements for the transfer of the 419 Ocean Avenue and 1616 Ocean Avenue properties, as a package, to Community Corporation of Santa Monica (CCSM), a local nonprofit affordable housing organization, for the purpose of operating the properties as affordable housing and undertaking necessary rehabilitation. Staff originally anticipated the transfer would occur by September 2015 and estimated the portion of the RECS property management budget that was to be allotted for the two Ocean Avenue properties accordingly. The existing RECS contract provides for property management of Mountain View Mobile Home Park through December 2016, including funding for necessary capital repairs.", "Discussion", "The scope of property management duties that RECS currently performs covers all necessary routine functions, including: day-to-day operations, supervision and coordination of maintenance and repair contracts, payment of all operating expenses such as utilities, maintenance, repairs, and fees, and occupancy responsibilities including leasing and rent collection. Housing staff provides direct oversight of RECS to ensure effective and efficient management of the City properties, including conferring with RECS weekly and reviewing monthly status reports.", "Transfer of the two Ocean Avenue properties to CCSM has been delayed due to inconsistencies in the legal description and boundaries for 1616 Ocean Avenue. Proper boundaries must be defined before an accurate legal description can be prepared and title insurance issued. Staff anticipates that the legal description issue will be resolved within the next month and conveyance of the two Ocean Avenue properties to CCSM will occur by June 2016.", "To avoid an interruption of property management services and payment of operational expenses, RECS has continued to provide ongoing property management services for 1616 Ocean Avenue and 419 Ocean Avenue during the delayed transfer period. However, the RECS contract was budgeted in anticipation of transfer of the two Ocean Avenue properties by September 2015, with the associated scope of expenses reduced accordingly. The delayed transfer of the properties has resulted in several months of unanticipated operating expenses. Therefore, the FY2015-16 contract budget is currently insufficient and will be exhausted by the end of March 2016.", "Additionally, bids for the Mountain View Mobile Home Park pool area renovation, which include fence replacement, installation of a lift, resurfacing of existing concrete, and widening of a ramp, are higher than originally estimated. Furthermore, unanticipated work associated with tree trimming, stump removal, and cart repair are also required for the Mountain View property. Staff recommends that the issues be addressed in the near term. As a result, additional funding in the RECS contract is needed to complete the pool area improvements and other repairs. Total additional funds needed for ongoing property management of 1616 and 419 Ocean Avenue through the end of June 2016, as well as capital improvements and repairs for Mountain View Mobile Home Park, is $164,245. The current term of the contract, through December 2016, would be unchanged.", "RECS has provided property management services for City-owned property for six years and has performed well, demonstrating expertise in the field, familiarity with City rental regulations, and professionalism in their communications with residents. Staffrecognizes that residents benefit from having a property management provider with a local presence throughout the week. RECS staffs an office at Mountain View seven days a week (full-time during weekdays and part-time on the weekends).", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On October 19, 2009, a Request for Proposals (RFP) was issued to solicit proposals to provide property management services for the Mountain View Mobile Home Park. TheRFP was sent to 20 property management firms and was posted on the City\u2019swebsite. Three proposals were received and reviewed and two firms wereinterviewed. Staff recommended RECS as the best firm to provide property management services at the Mountain View Mobile Home Park. RECS demonstrated expertise in the field, professionalism in written and oral communication, excellent references, and competitive pricing. Their property management services was later expanded to include all City-owned properties including 419 and 1616 Ocean Avenue.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to RECS is $164,245, for an amended contract total not to exceed $3,413,316. Funds are available in the Housing and Economic Development Department\u2019s FY2015-16 budget in accounts 01264.533220 and 01264.555060."]}, {"Title": "Statement of Official Action denying without prejudice appeal 15ENT-0321 of the Joint Design Review Body's denial of Building Design, Colors, Materials, and Landscape Plans for 14ARB-173 for the construction of a new 271-room hotel and 15,210 square feet of ground floor retail/restaurant space at 710 Wilshire Boulevard.", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the attached Statement of Official Action denying Appeal 15ENT-0321 and upholding the Joint Design Review Body\u2019s denial of Building Design, Colors, Materials, and Landscape Plans for 14ARB173 for the construction of a new 271-room hotel and 15,210 square feet of ground floor retail/restaurant space at 710 Wilshire Boulevard.", "Body": ["Executive Summary and Discussion", "This staff report transmits for City Council certification the Statement of Official Action for Appeal 15ENT-0321. After holding a public hearing on December 8, 2015 Council denied the appeal and upheld the Joint Design Review Body\u2019s denial of the ARB application. The City Council\u2019s decision was based upon the findings and conditions contained in the attached Statement of Official Action.", "In denying the appeal, Council also gave the following direction:", "\u00b7 Remand the project back to the JDRB;", "\u00b7 Set a 6-month time limit or the JDRB to make a decision regarding the ARB application; and", "\u00b7 That the JDRB provide as promptly as possible clear direction to the applicant based on the findings in the Statement of Official Action.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Amendment to Professional Services Agreement for additional work related to the Bi-annual Citywide Resident Survey", "Department": "Strategic & Transportation Planning (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to professional services agreement No.10141 in the amount of $69,050 with Goodwin Simon Strategic Research Corporation, a California based company, for additional scope of work related to the Bi-annual Citywide Resident Satisfaction Survey. This will result in a four-year amended contract agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $192,450, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "A second contract modification of $69,050 is requested to address increased costs associated with the added calls necessary to complete the required number of interviews, expand the scope of work to utilize Random Digit Dial (RDD) wireless numbers instead of voter file wireless numbers, thereby including both voters and non-voters as well as voters who did not list a phone number in the voter file, and to include an assessment of Santa Monica resident travel patterns, resulting in a total amount not to exceed $192,450.", "Background", "On July 28, 2015, Council approved Contract No. 10141 with Goodwin Simon Strategic Research in the amount of $83,400 to prepare the Bi-Annual Citywide Resident Satisfaction Survey, a telephone survey to assess the satisfaction of Santa Monica residents with regards to City services. The contract was postponed as staff reorganized and refocused efforts to obtain the best possible data. A first modification to the contract was approved by Council on January 12, 2016 in the amount of $40,000 to conduct a resident survey to gauge support for various potential affordable housing funding strategies.", "The City of Santa Monica is interested in better understanding the travel patterns of", "Santa Monica residents. The City currently collects biannual signalized intersection counts and annual employer travel surveys, but depends upon infrequent Census and American Community Survey (ACS) data for resident travel information that only represents how people get to work. The resident travel survey is designed to collect baseline data regarding resident\u2019s different modes of travel prior to the opening of the Exposition Light Rail Project (Expo Line), which is scheduled to begin service operations to Santa Monica in spring 2016. Accordingly, the data collection portion of the Baseline Resident Mobility Survey must be completed in May 2016 prior to Expo opening. It is the City\u2019s intention to conduct a replicable survey of resident\u2019s travel to be able to conduct subsequent surveys after the Expo Line has begun to assess changes in resident\u2019s travel behavior.", "Discussion", "The Bi-Annual Citywide Resident Satisfaction Survey will utilize a traditional methodology that relies on Random Digit Dial (RDD) land line, enhanced voter list, and enhanced listed wireless numbers to provide a sample of responding residents that align with the most recent Census demographic figures for the City regarding resident age, gender, ethnicity, auto-ownership, and income levels. In order to better reach underrepresented groups, including young persons, and cell-phone only residents this contract modification seeks to replace voter file wireless numbers with enhanced listed cell phone and Random Digit Dial wireless list that include both voters and non-voters to create a more robust representative sample of Santa Monica residents.", "The contract modification would build on and expand the scope of work for the Bi-Annual Citywide Resident Satisfaction Survey allowing Goodwin Simon Strategic Research to:", "\u00b7 Conduct additional survey work of Santa Monica resident\u2019s travel behavior prior to the opening of the Expo light rail service.", "\u00b7 Provide survey results to staff with information regarding sampling methodology, weighted survey responses.", "\u00b7 Attend, present (as requested) and help prepare for Planning Commission, City Council and other boards and commission meetings.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On December 22, 2014 the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver qualifications regarding conducting public opinion and polling research to conduct the bi-annual citywide telephone survey to gauge satisfaction levels amongst residents in regards to programs and services provided by the City. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 102 vendors were notified, 41 vendors downloaded the bid. Eight bids were received and publicly opened on February 4, 2015.", "The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. The City Manager\u2019s Office and Community and Cultural Services department staff evaluated the eight proposals based on criteria listed in the RFP. Four finalist firms were interviewed. Based on the selection criteria SMMC 2.24.073, Goodwin Simon Strategic Research was recommended as the best qualified firm to conduct the bi-annual resident survey based on the firm\u2019s expertise as an independent opinion research firm, the depth of their experience with similar projects, their knowledge of the community, and their experience conducting the 2007 Santa Monica Resident survey for the City.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Goodwin Simon Strategic Research Corporation is $69,050, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $192,450. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the City Manager and Planning & Community Development Departments. The agreement will be charged to the following accounts:", "01267.555061 $50,000", "012071.555060 $19,050", "TOTAL  $69,050", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Adopt Resolutions to Authorize Additional Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) providers", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council: 1. Adopt resolutions authorizing additional Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) programs through the following joint powers authorities: California Home Finance Authority, California Enterprise Development Authority, California Municipal Finance Authority, and California Statewide Communities Development Authority.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and enter into member agreements with the following Joint Powers Authorities (JPAs): California Home Finance Authority and California Enterprise Development Authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Office of Sustainability and the Environment is responsible for helping the City of Santa Monica meet established targets for energy reduction and greenhouse gas emissions as outlined in 15 x 15 Climate Action Plan, adopted by Council in 2013 (Attachment A). To help residents and businesses find ways to reduce their energy use, Council authorized Santa Monica\u2019s participation in the Home Energy Renovation Opportunity (HERO) in 2013. HERO is a provider of services and resources that connect home and building owners with incentives and rebates through Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) program.", "Staff would like to authorize five additional PACE service providers to operate in Santa Monica. Authorizing more PACE providers would offer multiple competitive financing mechanism options that provide benefits for residential and commercial property owners and the City with minimal resource impacts on the City. In addition to improvements related to energy efficiency, renewable energy and water conservation, several providers are eligible to provide financing for seismic retrofit projects. This powerful financing tool will enable the City to encourage seismic upgrades before and after a mandatory ordinance is adopted. In order to authorize additional PACE providers, the City must be a member of the Joint Powers Authority (JPA) that oversees the PACE providers\u2019 operations and adopt a resolution to authorize the PACE provider to operate within the City. Staff are proposing to authorize five PACE providers operating under four JPAs. Santa Monica is already a member of two JPA\u2019s and therefore, staff recommends that Council join the remaining two JPA\u2019s and authorize all five PACE providers.", "Background", "The PACE financing mechanism was first conceived in 2001, and allows property owners to fund energy and water efficiency, renewable energy, and seismic retrofit projects with no up-front costs. When a PACE program is authorized, a municipality or county may form special tax districts or join designated joint power authorities with authorized PACE providers to help property owners finance these projects. Participating property owners repay the cost of the improvements through an assessment levied against their properties, which is payable in semi-annual installments on property tax bills. A lien is filed against the property as security until the assessment is re-paid. The assessment remains with the property should the owner transfer or sell the property before the loan is re-paid.", "On July 13th, 2010 Council authorized participation in the Los Angeles County Energy Program (LACEP) which, at the time had only offered financing to commercial property owners.", "On November 12th, 2013, Council adopted a resolution to join Western Riverside Council of Governments\u2019 (WRCOG) under its JPA authority thereby enabling the HERO PACE program to operate in the City of Santa Monica. Since the authorization of HERO in Santa Monica, 32 residential property owners have had solar photovoltaic and water and energy efficiency projects approved for PACE financing. 17 projects have been completed thus far, valuing $495,000 in total. In sum, the projects will provide $591,000 in energy savings and $14,900 in water savings. In terms of a lifetime reduction in greenhouse gas emissions, 849 tons will be abated from the currently completed projects.", "Discussion", "PACE providers assist property owners with funding and consumer protections, and support contractors with certification, marketing, and administrative software. They are facilitated by large JPAs that offer the program only to their member agencies, after being authorized by official resolutions to do so. JPAs provide all assessment administration, bond issuance and bond administration functions for PACE programs. As a participant in a JPA, the City is not obligated to repay the bonds issued by the authority, or collect or pay the assessments levied on the participating properties.", "PACE financing addresses two key issues that often prevent property owners from installing energy efficiency, water efficiency and renewable energy projects:", "1. PACE eliminates the need for property owners to pay out of pocket up-front costs for improvements.", "2. PACE establishes a loan obligation that is attached to the property and not to the individual borrower.", "The availability of PACE financing supports the local economy by creating energy retrofit jobs and stimulating construction activities. Energy retrofit improvements to existing buildings in the City will allow property owners to reduce energy and water use as well as greenhouse gas emissions. Participating property owners reduce operating costs for electricity, natural gas and water and improve the comfort and safety of their homes and businesses. Increasing renewable energy and energy efficiency improvements in the City is a critical component of the 15x15 Climate Action Plan adopted by City Council in February 2013.", "Currently, there are ten PACE providers operating throughout California. The five additional PACE vendors being recommended by staff are the only vendors that operate statewide programs and are eligible to operate in the City of Santa Monica. The five vendors are Ygrene, Figtree, Alliance NRG, CaliforniaFIRST and Energy Efficient Equity. The other five companies operate within specific jurisdictions and are not available to Santa Monica or LA County. Many other jurisdictions have seen an increase in solar energy and energy efficiency installations once PACE financing is made available. Ygrene, Figtree, Alliance NRG, and CaliforniaFIRST are all listed by the Bay Area Regional Energy Network (BayREN) as prominent PACE providers operating in the region. Below is a description of each provider:", "1. Ygrene Energy Fund (\u201cYgrene\u201d) is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Home Finance Authority (CHFA), a Joint Powers Authority established in 1993. The City is not a member of CHFA, and would therefore need Council approval to become a member in addition to authorizing Ygrene. Ygrene currently operates in the states of Florida and California, and allows for financing of both residential and commercial renewable energy generation, energy and water efficiency improvement, and seismic strengthening projects. From projects in both states, Ygrene has helped to save $1.3 billion in energy costs and 2.8 billion gallons of water, and has created 9,700 new jobs. Most recently in California, the cities of Los Angeles and Poway adopted Ygrene as a PACE provider on September 22nd and October 20th, 2015, respectively.", "2. Figtree is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Enterprise Development Authority (CEDA), a JPA with a current membership of 40 cities and 21 counties. The City is not currently a member of CEDA, and would therefore need Council approval to become a member in addition to authorizing Figtree. Figtree allows for financing of commercial renewable energy, energy and water efficiency improvement, and seismic retrofit projects. The program\u2019s residential financing mechanism planning is currently underway.", "3. Energy Efficient Equity (\u201cE3\u201d) is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Municipal Finance Authority (CMFA), a JPA designed to assist local governments, non-profit organizations and business with financing economic development projects throughout California. Specifically, E3 provides program design, consulting, and turnkey administration for energy efficiency and renewable energy generation projects, for both residential and commercial properties. The City is currently a member of the CMFA JPA, thus, Council would only need to authorize E3 to operate within Santa Monica.", "4. Alliance NRG is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Statewide Communities Development Authority (CSCDA), the largest Joint Powers Authority in the state of California. Alliance NRG offers PACE financing for residential and commercial energy and water efficiency, renewable energy generation, and seismic strengthening projects statewide. Alliance NRG provides PACE financing for the City and County of San Francisco\u2019s Earthquake Safety Implementation Program. Alliance NRG is one of the two major PACE programs provided by the CSCDA, under the JPA\u2019s greater OPEN PACE initiative. By authorizing multiple providers, OPEN PACE enables local jurisdictions to benefit from one authorization. The City is currently a member of the CSCDA, thus, Council would only need to authorize OPEN PACE.", "5. CaliforniaFIRST is a PACE administrator also facilitated by the California Statewide Communities Development Authority (CSCDA). CaliforniaFIRST offers PACE financing for residential and commercial energy and water efficiency, renewable energy generation, and seismic strengthening projects statewide. CaliforniaFIRST is the other of the two major PACE programs provided by the CSCDA, under the JPA\u2019s greater OPEN PACE initiative. By authorizing multiple providers, OPEN PACE enables local jurisdictions to benefit from one authorization. The City is currently a member of the CSCDA, thus, Council would only need to authorize OPEN PACE.", "Authorizing multiple PACE providers to operate within the City of Santa Monica would provide additional benefits to the property owners, including:", "\u00b7 Competition: Additional PACE providers would compete to provide the best service and rates for property owners. Property owners would have more financing options and the ability to shop for their desired price and service.", "\u00b7 Seismic retrofits: The current HERO program in Santa Monica does not provide financing for seismic retrofits. Four of the five proposed PACE providers allow for seismic retrofit project financing (Ygrene, Figtree, Alliance NRG and CaliforniaFIRST). With seismic retrofits aimed at increasing resilience of buildings garnering increasing interest from both residential and commercial property owners, PACE financing will become increasingly attractive. Examples of such retrofit projects include strengthening of soft-story buildings, non-ductile concrete buildings, non-ductile welded steel-framed buildings, unreinforced masonry buildings, concrete tilt-up buildings, and the bracing and bolting of building foundations in single family dwellings.", "\u00b7 Increased impact: The HERO program has already shown success in providing financial and greenhouse gas emissions savings during its two years in Santa Monica. The addition of more PACE providers would provide more opportunity for property owners to save money and add to the City\u2019s sustainability.", "\u00b7 Loan loss reserve: Some PACE providers participate in risk mitigation vehicles such as California\u2019s PACE Loss Reserve Program (\u201cthe Program\u201d), which allows for loan loss reserve. In 2013, seeking to address the concerns of mortgage lenders who opposed the fact that PACE loans were senior to mortgage loans, the State enacted SB 96 directed the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority (CAEATFA) to develop the $10 million Program, which mitigates the potential risk to mortgage lenders associated with residential PACE financing. Specifically, it makes first-time mortgage lenders whole for any losses in a forced sale or foreclosure that are attributable in any way to a PACE-related lien. Effectively, it aims to put first-time mortgage lenders in the same position they would be in without a PACE lien. As of November 2015, 36,729 PACE financings with a total principal value of $810,164,896 are enrolled in the Program. Currently, HERO, Ygrene, Alliance NRG, and CaliforniaFIRST participate in the Program.", "Should the resolutions be adopted, the legal counsels of all five PACE programs would begin a process of judicial validation to: ensure the JPA has the legal approval to provide its services and issue debt to finance valid PACE assessments; and to ensure that any local government is protected from all liability associated with JPA assessments and that, despite future changes in related law, the assessments that have been placed are secure and valid. During that time, City staff would begin to inform property owners and contractors of the pending availability of PACE financing. The City, in partnership with the providers, would begin education, outreach and marketing to raise awareness to the community. Marketing and outreach material templates will be provided by the program at no charge for use by the City in its own promotion of the program within the community. The City will provide additional marketing and outreach about the program to Santa Monica residents and businesses through the ongoing activities of the Solar Santa Monica program.", "Alternatives", "If the City Council was to take no action, LACEP and HERO would remain as the only two PACE providers for commercial and residential property owners. Alternatively, property owners could utilize other existing financing options for renewable energy, energy and water efficiency, and electric vehicle charging installation projects, including home equity loans, business lines of credit, and consumer credit. Financing for energy efficiency is also available through the Energy Upgrade California Program. Additionally, financing plans, leases, and power purchase agreements (PPAs) are commonly offered by solar installation companies. Currently, there are no financing options available to property owners related to seismic retrofit other than PACE.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no direct financial impacts associated with adoption of these resolutions. With the process of permitting more PACE providers, local government agencies in general bear no costs for setup or implementation. All PACE administrative costs are covered through an initial administrative fee included in the property owner\u2019s voluntary contractual assessment and an annual administrative fee which is also collected on the property owner\u2019s tax bill. The amount charged from the fees varies per PACE provider."]}], [{"Title": "Santa Monica Use of Open Data and Performance Management Practices", "Department": "City Manager's Office, Administration", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "04. Study Sessions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council conduct a study session exploring a citywide approach to more consistently use data to manage performance, and direct staff to proceed with implementation of a data and performance management program.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "As cities grow more sophisticated in their access to technology and data, they are using that data to improve decision-making, measure effectiveness and drive improved performance. An enhanced emphasis on \u201cPerformance Management\u201d is the cornerstone what Harvard Professor Bob Behn defines as \u201ca leadership strategy\u201d that focuses on achieving specific targeted results within a specific time period. Measuring performance is critical to this strategy, using SMART metrics \u2013 that is performance targets that are Specific, Measurable, Achievable, Results-focused and Timely.", "This shift is not easy for public agencies even though it is widespread in the private sector and increasingly common among non-profit agencies. Metrics are often divided into three types of measures: inputs, outputs and outcomes. Public policies have most often been measured by inputs and outputs. Instead of defining and measuring successful outcomes, elected officials and managers have measured how much money or staff are devoted to a particular problem or service (inputs) or the tasks accomplished such as number of arrests made, lane miles of road paved or books checked out of the library (outputs.) In the public sector, it is often challenging to identify clearly desired outcomes. In Santa Monica, for example, while the City Council identified five top priority Strategic Goals, it will be challenging to pinpoint specific measures of success for creating a new model of mobility, preserving affordability and inclusion in the Santa Monica community, achieving local control of Santa Monica Airport, asserting regional leadership on homelessness and promoting an ethic of \u201clearn + thrive\u201d wellbeing.", "Santa Monica has been a pioneer in establishing and tracking measures of sustainability and building a Wellbeing Index as an innovative national model. By building on that legacy, our city can create a comprehensive \u201cdata-driven culture of performance\u201d collecting consistent, accessible metrics and using them to actively manage performance. Open data and openly reported performance metrics also help promote community engagement and accountability.", "Background", "Santa Monica has been at the forefront of using data to help measure the impact of its efforts on the community for over 20 years. In 1994, it adopted the Sustainable City Plan along with key performance indicators and goals to foster a sustainable community in Santa Monica. These goals have evolved and expanded over the years, but the Plan provides a framework by which each metric established a baseline of performance and target goals for the community to reach. Every other year, the Office of Sustainability prepares an updated report on Santa Monica\u2019s progress and areas where additional work needs to be done.", "This work laid the foundation for Santa Monica to become a leader in using data and metrics in the public sector. Big Blue Bus, Police and the Fire Departments are among the departments using various metrics to track their performance. Big Blue Bus looks at on-time stop performance and other \u201ckey performance indicators.\u201d Police regularly analyze crime patterns to deploy resources and fine-tune operational tactics. Fire looks at response times and call types to analyze new deployment approaches such as the augmentation of staffing through Rescue Ambulances. This culture of data is what ultimately led Santa Monica to apply and win the Bloomberg Mayor\u2019s Challenge for the Wellbeing Index \u2013 one of five model projects funded nationwide. The Wellbeing Index takes Santa Monica\u2019s existing practices one step further by measuring community sentiment in various areas as well as looking at the data metrics the City captures in its systems.", "Santa Monica has the opportunity to capitalize on these initiatives to build a comprehensive approach to identifying desired outcomes, selecting appropriate SMART metrics to measure progress toward achieving those outcomes and actively tracking and managing performance of city programs and services. Implicit in this commitment is developing an organizational culture and capacity to ensure this approach is not a \u201cflavor of the month\u201d management fad \u2013 but rather a long-term citywide commitment to focus on achieving meaningful measurable results.", "Discussion", "Cities and Data", "Like Santa Monica, other cities around the nation and the world are embracing data metrics and performance management to address real-life operational and community issues. In the face of a growing fiscal mismatch between revenues and costs of traditional local public services, pressure has mounted for cities to embrace innovation to reduce costs and/or improve efficiency and effectiveness. Leading cities are increasingly measuring success by the impact on desired outcomes rather than inputs or outputs of work. Academics, public policy experts and the media are paying increasing attention to the challenge of identifying meaningful metrics and best practices for improving public sector performance. Louisville, Boston, Kansas City, New York and Los Angeles are among the leaders among larger municipalities, and cities large and small are moving toward a more rigorous and data-driven evaluation of the way localities have long delivered services.", "Technology has enabled collection of more and more data -- and cities have become more sophisticated in aggregating and reporting that data in real time. The proliferation of Open Data portals and the influence of Code for America\u2019s network of tech-savvy civic hackers has created an accelerating deluge of raw data such as Kansas City\u2019s kcstat.kcmo.org, Los Angeles\u2019, data.lacity.org, and Seattle\u2019s data.seattle.org. These cities have instituted a culture of data, typically with a Chief Data Officer leading broad-based organizational training of staff and the broader community to understand, analyze and act on the expanding sources of data available to them.", "Boston recently launched its City Score (cityofboston.gov/cityscore/) to give that City\u2019s Mayor and other executives the ability to spot trends that need additional investigation, and measure the impact of changes to process and policy. Using a batting average score, those indicators exceeding a 1 are doing well, those below a 1 need some attention. Elected officials and City staff see the same score card, as does the public. City staff and managers are trained on how to use the data and trends to change operational practices in efforts to respond to issues quickly and effectively.", "Santa Monica and Data", "Like other cities, Santa Monica is leveraging the sophisticated technology environment in which we work to make more of data and metrics. Santa Monica is officially ranked among the top ten cities in the nation (by the U.S. Census Bureau) for access to data placed on the City\u2019s open data portal (data.smgov.net).", "Staff also partnered with the Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce to launch \u201cHack the Beach\u201d last year. Hack the Beach brings City staff and the local tech industry together to build partnerships within Silicon Beach. These emerging relationships help staff see how data and metrics are useful outside of City Hall. Likewise, the City turned inward in its pursuit of data and hosted a Data Hack with over 20 staff representing nearly every department. These staff collaboratively identified ways the City could use data to help drive decisions and how to create a culture of data within City Hall.", "Instilling a Culture of Data", "Significant changes in policing have foreshadowed both the potential and perils of shifting toward a culture that uses data to drive performance.", "Twenty-five years ago, the dominant culture in law enforcement was that the goal of police departments was to respond to crime, to solve crimes and to gather evidence to assist in the prosecution of the accused. The prevention of crime was seen by most police professionals as an ancillary supplement to real police work. The incidence of crime was seen as a result of factors largely beyond the control of police professionals such as social mores, economic cycles, demographic factors, rates of poverty, family dynamics and the larger framework of the criminal justice system.", "In a series of high-profile leadership roles, Bill Bratton brashly challenged the dominant mindset of police chiefs. He ultimately vowed to achieve major reductions in crime by pursuing \u201cbroken window\u201d policing policies and implementing a system he called \u201cCompStat\u201d (variously traced to \u201ccomputer statistics\u201d or \u201ccomparative statistics.\u201d) For the purposes of this study session, CompStat is directly relevant to the challenge of Performance Management. Bratton\u2019s striking success in achieving major reductions in crime rates in America\u2019s two largest cities (New York and Los Angeles) highlighted the potential of the CompStat system to track and improve performance.", "CompStat has become a widespread law enforcement tool. In Los Angeles, precinct captains regularly appear before the department\u2019s top leadership to discuss crime trends in their territory. Sophisticated crime analysts display detailed maps that highlight geographic and chronological patterns of reported crimes. Precinct captains are asked, \u201cWhat is your analysis?\u201d of those patterns \u2013 and then quizzed on \u201cWhat is your strategy?\u201d for interrupting those patterns to reduce crime. There is a collaborative atmosphere that fosters clear thinking, honest interchange and creative problem-solving. That constructive tone only changes when precinct leaders fail to be on top of what\u2019s going on in their territory; or fail to aggressively follow through on responses to crime spikes; or fail to forthrightly respond to questions or concerns.", "Precisely because CompStat has been widely embraced as a successful performance management system, it has also revealed a potential dark side that provides cautionary notes to take into account. Where CompStat has been summarily imposed on traditional organizational structures and pursued with a punitive approach, performance management can go astray. There is pressure to conceal bad news and \u201cfudge\u201d numbers. An over-emphasis on \u201chitting the target\u201d can turn toxic. Such distortions of the CompStat model underscore the importance of building an ongoing \u201cpositive\u201d culture that focuses on achieving results, rather than a \u201cpunitive\u201d culture of blaming individuals and cutting corners.", "Striking the right balance rests on embracing both \u201caccountability\u201d and \u201cempowerment.\u201d A data-driven culture of performance at its essence is the antithesis of \u201cmicro-managing.\u201d It establishes a clearly-defined \u201cscoreboard\u201d or \u201cdashboard\u201d so that everyone can see \u201cwhat matters most\u201d \u2013 and see whether the numbers are going in the right (or wrong) direction. One useful mantra to keep in mind is, \u201cIt\u2019s not the numbers that count, it\u2019s what you do with the numbers that counts.\u201d By using data rather than anecdote or long-standing practices to guide actions, it is possible to continuously fine-tune our efforts to achieve the desired results.", "Building on successful models of using metrics to drive performance \u2013 both those pioneered in Santa Monica and forged by other cities \u2013 our city could create a comprehensive data-driven culture of performance. There are a number of key elements needed to foster that climate:", "\u00b7 Train Staff. While many staff are increasingly tech savvy, maximizing the potential of using data requires widespread tech and data literacy to help staff apply these analytical and data skills to performance management here within the City.", "\u00b7 Normalize vocabulary and standards. Currently, each department and program may use different terms for similar things and collect similar data in incompatible ways that make cross-referencing data sets cumbersome or impractical. It is important to breakdown these siloes and develop citywide standards for terms with commonly understood definitions and practices.", "\u00b7 Set measurable goals. Like the Sustainable City Plan and Wellbeing Index, the City will establish goals that are Specific, Measurable, Achievable, Results-focused, and Timely. These targets will provide a common guide across departments on what outcomes are most desirable during the next fiscal year.", "\u00b7 Identify high value data sets. Building on the work of the Sustainable City Plan and Wellbeing Index, the City will work to develop accurate and timely data sets by which to measure the goals set for the upcoming year.", "\u00b7 Implement standard, easy to use tools. The City has a successful Open Data portal. To make even better use of this portal, the City must invest in tools and training to help connect various systems so they can feed needed data to the portal consistently and accurately.", "\u00b7 Consistently manage performance. Using tested models for collaborative performance management, staff will regularly monitor the effectiveness of our programs and actions to drive desired outcomes. Based on updated data, the staff will fine tune its strategies throughout the year to reach their targets.", "As noted earlier in this report, the key to successfully implementing a performance management system is developing the organizational culture and capacity to ensure that it is not a \u201cflavor of the month\u201d management fad. Providing training, support, and specific and achievable milestones will facilitate the shift to performance management.", "Next Steps", "The City is already taking steps to leverage data. These include:", "\u00b7 Strategic Goal Teams. Council identified five Strategic Goals last year. Staff have formed teams to address each one of the goals areas and will work to identify goals and supporting data to measure progress in each goal area.", "\u00b7 Chief Data Officer. As part of the FY 2016/17 budget, staff will request the addition of a Chief Data Officer. This position will coordinate the use of data within the City, including supporting efforts to standardize on terms and definitions, set baselines for measurement, train staff, set goals, and measure progress.", "\u00b7 Performance Management Unit: Using \u201cjumpstart project\u201d funds allocated by the City Council to track performance toward achieving the Council\u2019s Strategic Goals, staff will engage performance management experts who will partner with key department staff in developing a plan to  establish oversight of citywide performance management in the City Manager\u2019s office..", "\u00b7 Investment in Staff development. Through the Santa Monica Institute, the City\u2019s internal staff development program, and national and local efforts, the City will encourage staff to learn more on how the City can leverage data in new and innovative ways.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Funding for any new staff, training or technology enhancements will be brought forward as appropriate, including during the regular budget cycle."]}], [{"Title": "Proposed Ordinance Regulating Lobbying", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached proposed ordinance which would regulate lobbying of City officials and City staff. Staff also recommends that the Council direct staff to prepare a modification to the Council Rules requiring disclosure of contacts with Lobbyists and to promulgate an Administrative Instruction requiring staff disclosure of contacts with lobbyists.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Council has directed staff to prepare an ordinance regulating lobbying activities. The attached proposed ordinance fulfills that direction. It would establish requirements applicable to individuals who receive compensation for communicating with City officials or employees in order to influence legislative or administrative actions. The requirements would include registration and reporting of basic information about the Lobbyists' businesses, their clients, their clients' businesses, the decisions to be influenced, and certain expenditures made by Lobbyists in support of their work. The proposed ordinance would also authorize the City Clerk to adopt implementing rules and regulations, and it would establish remedies for violations.", "Background", "At its meeting of December 16, 2014, Council directed staff to prepare a proposed ordinance requiring Lobbyists to register and containing other requirements promoting transparency. Staff reviewed lobbying ordinances adopted by over a dozen other cities and returned to Council on July 14, 2015, with a proposed ordinance containing registration and disclosure requirements and prohibitions against certain deceptive practices, as well as provisions governing administration and establishing remedies. Council considered the proposed ordinance and directed staff to return with a simpler ordinance.", "Staff returned to Council on October 27, 2015 with a revised proposed ordinance. Council directed staff to make additional revisions to the proposed ordinance, including new language that would apply the ordinance's requirements to Lobbyists' contacts with all City officials, require reporting updates in order to capture Lobbyists' new clients, and include the reporting of certain expenditures by Lobbyists.", "Discussion", "The attached proposed ordinance fulfills Council's directions. It includes the three revisions to the prior version specified by Council during its last consideration of the matter.", "First, the definition of \"Lobbyist\" has been expanded to include anyone who receives economic consideration for communicating with any official or employee of the City for the purpose of influencing a legislation or administrative action. This is a change from the prior version, which defined a Lobbyist as an individual who received economic consideration for communicating with \"any elected official, officer or employee of the City for the purpose of influencing a legislative or administrative action.\" The currently proposed wording would ensure that the proposed ordinance covers the activity of lobbying board and commission members.", "Second, the registration requirement has been supplemented. The registration requirement has been renamed to add the term \"reporting\". This change is recommended to convey the ongoing responsibilities created by the section. Additionally, language has been added requiring Lobbyists to update their annual registration forms within ten days of changes to the reported information. This new language will, among other things, effectively require Lobbyists to promptly report new clients and new projects for existing clients. Because the proposed ordinance would require updating of registration forms, annual registration could be deemed unnecessary. However, staff recommends requiring both annual registration and timely updates to promote disclosure and safeguard transparency.", "Third, the registration and reporting requirement has also been supplemented by the addition of a requirement that Lobbyists report gifts and expenditures, exceeding $20 in amount or value, which are given to or made for the benefit of clients. This requirement could cover activities ranging from, for example, buying a meal for an official to preparing a mailer intended to influence Council's vote on a proposed development project.", "In addition to these revisions directed by Council, staff also recommends the addition of a provision authorizing the City Clerk to adopt regulations implementing the requirements of the ordinance. Proposed language appears in the proposed ordinance for that purpose. The addition of this language would situate staff to effectuate the ordinance by clarifying its application to a variety of circumstances and new developments.", "Finally, staff continues to recommend addressing Council disclosures of contacts with Lobbyists through the Council Rules and disclosures of staff's contacts with Lobbyists through an Administrative Instruction. Direction on these matters could be given to staff in conjunction with Council's consideration of the attached ordinance. Additionally, staff continues to recommend selecting an effective date for the ordinance that is at least several months distant to allow time for community education and staff preparation for implementation.", "Alternatives", "The Council could, once again, consider modifications to the proposed ordinance. For example, the proposed threshold for reporting Lobbyists' gifts and other expenditures on behalf of clients could be raised (or lowered) from the $20 threshold proposed in the ordinance. Council could also consider requiring Lobbyists to report individual contacts with City officials and staff. The proposed ordinance does not impose that requirement, partly because staff believes that officials' and staffs' disclosures will achieve the same purpose and perhaps better promote transparency. Council could also consider broadening the definition of a Lobbyist to include those advocating their own interests. However, staff recommends against that approach in order to minimize First Amendment issues. Finally, in order to distinguish between Lobbyists and those who are simply seeking or providing information, the definition of Lobbyist could be narrowed by specifying that a Lobbyist is one who communicates with City official or staff \"primarily\" for the purpose of influencing a legislative or administrative action.", "Staff does not believe that any of these possible modifications needs to be made now. Instead, staff recommends beginning implementation of this new regulatory system based on the proposed ordinance, relying upon the Clerk's ability to facilitate implementation through the adoption of rules and regulations, and directing staff to report back on its experiences and particularly upon any perceived need to amend the ordinance.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Costs associated with implementing this ordinance would be covered by a registration fee to be set and periodically adjusted by City Council resolution."]}], [{"Title": "Recommendation to accept Anne Troutman's resignation from the Arts Commission and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Recommendation to accept Keith Fiddmont's resignation from the Arts Commission and authorize the City Clerk to publish the vacancy.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1519435800": [[{"Title": "Bid Award for Purchase of Medium and Heavy Duty Tires", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4218 to Industrial Tire Service, Inc., a California-based company for the purchase and delivery of miscellaneous medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services.2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Industrial Tire Service, Inc. for the purchase and delivery of miscellaneous medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services in the amount not to exceed $84,105 for one year, with three additional one-year renewal options at an additional 3% increase per year, for a total not to exceed $351,864, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City purchases medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services, as part of the City\u2019s tire replacement program. In November 2015, the City solicited bids for the purchase and delivery of medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services. Staff recommends Industrial Tire Service, Inc. as the best bidder for the purchase and delivery of miscellaneous medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services in the amount not to exceed $84,105 for one year, with three additional one-year renewal options at an additional 3% per year, for a total not to exceed $351,864, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Discussion", "The City purchases medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services, as part of the City\u2019s tire replacement program. These tires are used on heavy and medium duty vehicles, which include refuse collection trucks, bucket trucks, and tractors.", "Vendor Selection", "In November 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services, as required by the City, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 582 vendors were notified and 19 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and publicly opened on November 12, 2015 per Attachment A.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, ability to deliver, quality of product, 24/7 emergency services, proximity to Santa Monica, and compliance with City specifications. Staff averaged the amount spent on medium and heavy-duty tires and related services over the last four years in order to compare the bidders\u2019 material and labor pricing. An average of 79% has been spent on materials and 21% has been spent on labor. Industrial Tire Service, Inc. provides the lowest pricing on the majority of the listed materials and, based on the 79% materials/21% labor breakdown, is the lowest and best bidder to furnish and deliver medium and heavy-duty tires, new and recapped, and related services, as required by the City, in accordance with City specifications.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Industrial Tire Service, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $84,105. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Public Works Department. The purchase order will be charged to account 54459.522930. Future year", "funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Fire Department Training Center and Temporary Fire Station Modular Building", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Bid #SP2401 to Atlas Performance Industries, Inc. (API), a California-based company, for the Fire Department Training Center and Temporary Fire Station Modular Building.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Atlas Performance Industries, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $694,857 (includes a 10% contingency).3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary changes to complete additional work within contract authority,", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica\u2019s Fire Department Training Center modular buildings in the City Yards are in need of replacement. The current modular buildings are over 30 years old. The new center would be made up of two single-wide modular buildings used as offices and training props storage and one triple-wide modular building would be used as a training center. Initially the triple-wide modular building would be used as a temporary fire station while Fire Station 3 undergoes the seismic upgrade. In October 2015, the City solicited bids to design, manufacture and install two single-wide and one triple-wide modular buildings, and provide the metal deck and ramp to access the modular buildings. Staff recommends Atlas Performance Industries, Inc. as the best bidder for this project for a total project cost of $694,857 (includes a 10% contingency).", "Background", "On July 23, 2013, Council approved the modification to the Professional Services Agreement with IDS Group, Inc. to provide design and construction administration services for the seismic retrofit of Fire Station No. 3. The original contract was under Council approval threshold and was executed in November 2012.", "Fire Station 3 is a two-story, wood frame and stucco structure constructed in 1970\u2019s and does not meet current building codes. In the years since it was built, building codes have been upgraded in the aftermath of many catastrophic earthquakes. Fire Station 3, an \u201cEssential Facility\u201d defined by California Building Standards Codes, needs to be upgraded to meet with current City and State building codes.", "On December 17, 2013, Council approved financing options for constructions of a new Fire Station 1, the Fire Station 3 seismic retrofit, and the replacement of the Fire Training Center.", "While Fire Station 3 undergoes a seismic upgrade, one of the new modular buildings (a triple-wide module) located at Fire Training Yard in the City Yards would be used as a temporary fire station. After the seismic upgrade is complete, the firemen would move back to the Fire Station 3 and the triple-wide building would be converted to offices and replace its existing training center. Two single-wide modular buildings would also be installed in the Training Yard and would function as the office and training prop storage space for the department\u2019s personnel.", "Discussion", "In early 2014, the Fire Department identified the need to replace the aging training center housed in the training yard within the City Yards which is comprised of temporary trailers that have been in service for over 30 years. The trailers have suffered from wear and tear over extended use and exhibited structural problems due to their location on top of a landfill. The training center is currently used on a daily basis to train Santa Monica and other local municipality\u2019s fire fighters. The state-of-the-art center will require five single modular building to accommodate the current functions served by the existing facility. After considering cost efficiency and timeliness, staff recommends using this triple-wide modular building to house the fire fighters during the seismic retrofit of Fire Station 3 as the temporary fire station. This temporary fire station would house four fire fighters that provide equivalent service as the permanent Fire Station 3. The ladder truck associated with this battalion would be located immediately adjacent to the triple-wide modular building. The new triple-wide modular would be converted to the Training Center after the Fire Station 3 seismic retrofit is complete. At the same time, two single modular buildings would be purchased and used for training props storage, and then converted later as permanent offices in the training yard. This will satisfy their programmatic requirements.", "Project Timeline", "The site work for the temporary station and office and storage buildings is scheduled to begin in May 2016, and the installation of the modular buildings will follow in June. The seismic retrofit of Fire Station 3 is scheduled to begin in September 2016. The construction is expected to last nine months.", "Vendor Selection", "On October 19, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to design, manufacture and install two single and one triple-wide modular buildings and provide the metal deck and ADA ramp to access the buildings within the City Yards Fire Department Training Yard.  The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions.", "A total of 2,117 vendors were notified, and 77 vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids were received and publicly opened on December 4, 2015, Attachment A. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder       Bid Amount", "Atlas Performance Industries, Inc.  $631,688", "Design Space Modular Buildings, Inc.  $1,048,936", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, qualifications, references, completeness of bid and compliance with City scope of work. Based on these criteria, Atlas Performance Industries (API), Inc., the lowest bidder is, recommended as the best bidder for the Santa Monica Fire Department Training Center and Temporary Fire Station Modular Building Project in accordance with City scope of work. API has provided modular buildings to municipalities and public agencies such as Caltrans and Santa Clara Valley Water District. The Caltrans project was a custom building, similar to the one in the proposed project. References were positive.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Atlas Performance Industries, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $694,857 (includes a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C019047.589000."]}, {"Title": "Memorandum of Understanding with the City of Los Angeles for Venice area Breeze Bike Share Stations Installation and operation", "Department": "Strategic & Transportation Planning (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to execute a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) with the City of Los Angeles for the installation of Breeze Bike Share Stations and bike share operation in the Venice area of the City of Los Angeles. 2. Authorize the City Manager to execute future Memorandum of Understandings (MOU) with the City of Los Angeles for the installation and operation up to 15 additional Breeze Bike Share Stations in other adjacent areas, not to exceed 20 City of Los Angeles stations.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "When the Council adopted the2011 Bike Action Plan (Attachment A), it prioritized the development of abike sharesystemthroughout Santa Monica with a focus on supporting a regional bike share network. On November 12, 2015 Santa Monica launched the Breeze Bike Share system throughout Santa Monica. The grant funding for Breeze Bike Share included capital funding for up to five stations outside of Santa Monica. Staff has received numerous requests for stations in the Venice area of Los Angeles, and therefore initiated conversations with Los Angeles City Councilmember Mike Bonin\u2019s office to pursue the expansion of Breeze Bike Share to that district. After thorough review, both parties have agreed to the terms of the zero-cost MOU, which will enable the City of Santa Monica and its operator Cyclehop, to site, install, maintain, and operate five Breeze Bike Share stations in the Venice area of Los Angeles.", "This expansion of Breeze Bike Share to the Venice area would: improve operational efficiency for Cyclehop by reducing the time spent retrieving out-of-hub bikes, enhance the user experience by opening-up a new destination where users can visit and lock the Breeze Bikes without incurring out-of-hub fees, and provide a desired service to a neighboring constituency increasing staff\u2019s ability to attract new bike share members and generate additional revenue.", "The report recommends that City Council authorize the City Manager to execute the MOU to enable Breeze Bike Share to be expanded into the Venice area, and to authorize similar MOUs for potential expansions in other adjacent communities like the Mar Vista area, not to exceed 20 City of Los Angeles Stations. Los Angeles City Council is anticipated to review and approve the MOU on February 26, 2016.", "Background", "OnAugust 23, 2011 (Attachment B), Council directed staff to pursue a regionally-coordinatedbike sharesystem as a high implementation priority.OnSeptember 24, 2013 (Attachment C), staff gave a progress update to Council, including an initial feasibility analysis and update on regional bike share development. Council gave direction to move forward on the project in Santa Monica while working with regional partners.Council accepted a grant in the amount of $500,000 for thebike sharesystem through an agreement with the South Coast Air Quality Management District Mobile Source Air Pollution Reduction Committee that provided capital funding for up to five stations outside Santa Monica.", "On November 11, 2014 (Attachment D) Council authorized the City Manager to execute an eight year operations contract with Cyclehop LLC, consisting of four initial years and two additional two-year renewal options, not to exceed a total amount of $10,405,580 over eight years for the operations of the 500-bicycle sharing system. Following the contract execution, staff and the operator initiated a public engagement process to solicit community feedback on bike share station siting. Through public meetings and solicitation of comments through a web-portal, staff received numerous requests for stations in the Venice area of Los Angeles because of its proximity and strong connections to Santa Monica including Main Street to Abbott Kinney, and the Marvin Braude beach bike path.", "On November 12, 2015 Santa Monica launched Breeze Bike Share throughout the City of Santa Monica. Preceding launch, staff initiated contact with Los Angeles City Councilmember Mike Bonin\u2019s office to explore the siting of Venice area Breeze Bike Share stations. Councilmember Bonin\u2019s office confirmed their constituents\u2019 desire for Breeze Bike Share in their district, and advised that an MOU would be needed. The MOU between the City of Santa Monica and the City of Los Angeles, would permit the installation of five stations in the Venice area, and allow Cyclehop to operate and maintain the Breeze Bike Share at the selected sites.", "Discussion", "There is a near seamless connection between the City of Santa Monica and the Venice area of Los Angeles including main connections along Main Street to Abbott Kinney and along the Marvin Braude beach bike path. People riding on-street facilities and the beach path regularly cross from one jurisdiction to the other for commuting, recreation, or tourism purposes. Over the first two months of operation the Breeze Bike Share operator, Cyclehop, has observed numerous daily Breeze trips to and from the Venice area and beyond. Because of the flexibility of Breeze\u2019s \u2018smart bike\u2019 technology Breeze bikes have been, and will continue to be, used and dropped off in the Venice area. Dedicated stations in the Venice area will focus the majority of trip origins and termini to specific locations, which will improve operational efficiency by reducing the time spent retrieving out-of-hub bikes. Since the Breeze Bike Share launch on November 12, 2015 Councilman Bonin\u2019s office has been inundated with requests for stations in their communities and has expressed to staff their eagerness to provide Breeze Bike Share to their constituents.", "Following a thorough review by City of Santa Monica Attorney\u2019s Office and City of Los Angeles DOT, both parties have agreed to the terms of the MOU, which will enable the City of Santa Monica and its operator Cyclehop, to site, install, maintain, and operate five Breeze Bike Share stations in the Venice area of Los Angeles.", "The agreement stipulates a seven year term of service in which: the City of Santa Monica is permitted to operate Breeze Bike Share in accordance with the Cyclehop contract with the City of Santa Monica; neither party shall be financially compensated for this service; both parties indemnify and hold harmless the other party and will assume the liability imposed on it for any wrongful act or negligence; and the City of Santa Monica carries the appropriate insurances to carry out bike share operations within the City of Los Angeles. Either party can terminated the agreement upon giving a sixty day notice in writing.", "Los Angeles City Council is anticipated to review and approve the MOU on February 26, 2016. The siting and installation of the Venice area bike share stations is tentatively scheduled for mid-March 2016.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. While neither city will be financially compensated for the service, new stations in the Venice area will create no additional costs for the Breeze Bike Share System. A grant from the South Coast Air Quality Management District provided capital funding for station equipment acquisition, including stations in the Venice area. The cost of operating and maintaining Breeze Bike Share stations in the Venice area is included in the existing contract with CycleHop to operate the 500-bicycle bike share system. Venice area stations may generate additional revenue by attracting new users from neighboring communities to the system and facilitate greater public use of bike share between the two cities."]}, {"Title": "Professional Auditing Services for the City of Santa Monica", "Department": "Finance Department, Financial Operations", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP# 62 to Lance, Soll & Lunghard, LLC, a California-based company for professional external auditing services; and2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year agreement with Lance, Soll & Lunghard, LLC, for a total amount not to exceed $779,175 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. Costs for the first year of the agreement will not exceed $149,725; each year thereafter contains an annual increase of 2%.#0", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "According to the City Charter, the City is required to contract with an independent qualified accountant to complete a year end audit. The contract with the City\u2019s current independent external auditor expires in May 2016. In October 2015, staff issued a Request for Proposals for professional external auditing services for fiscal years 2015-16 through 2019-20. Following an evaluation process that included staff and members of the Audit Subcommittee (Subcommittee), staff recommended Lance, Soll and Lunghard, LLP (LSL) as the best proposal to the Subcommittee. The Subcommittee approved the recommendation and authorized staff to present the recommendation to Council with a 4-0 vote, with Committee Member Vasquez absent. Staff recommends that the City pursue a five-year agreement with LSL, for a total amount not to exceed $779,175.", "Background", "As required by Section 1516 of the City Charter, a year-end independent audit is required by a qualified accountant to examine the City\u2019s books, records, inventories and reports as directed by City Council. At the end of the year, a final audit and report shall be submitted by such accountant to the City Council, City management, and the general public.", "Discussion", "The City engages an independent auditing firm to perform an examination of the City\u2019s basic financial statements, Big Blue Bus Fund financial statements, Air Quality Improvement Program, and the City\u2019s Schedule of Expenditures of Federal Awards (Single Audit). The independent auditor also performs agreed-upon procedures to test and report on the City\u2019s GANN appropriation limit calculation. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. The audit also includes evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements and evaluating the appropriateness of accounting policies used and the reasonableness of significant accounting estimates made by management. The objective of the audit is to express an opinion as to whether these financial statements are fairly presented in all material respects in conformity with all applicable accounting standards generally accepted in the United States of America and as promulgated by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA), the standards applicable to financial audits contained in Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States, and the U.S. Office of Management and Budget (OMB) Circular A-133, Audits of States, Local Governments and Non-Profit Organizations.", "The City\u2019s contract with its current independent auditor, Macias, Gini and O\u2019Connell, LLP (MGO), ends in May 2016 for audit services related to FY 2014-15. Upon Council\u2019s approval, staff will work to execute a contract swiftly to initiate the strategic planning of the audit to ensure reporting deadlines are met and the required auditor communications with Council, the Audit Subcommittee, and management.", "Staff anticipates that the selected auditor will be present at the April Audit Subcommittee meeting to discuss planning and communication.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On October 29, 2015, staff issued a Request for Proposals to seek qualified certified public accounting (CPA) firms to audit its financial statements for the fiscal years 2015-16 through 2019-20. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 245 vendors were notified, 25 prospective vendors downloaded the RFP, and 6 firms submitted proposals.", "Vendor", "The Pun Group, LLP", "Brown Armstrong Accountancy Corp", "Vavrinek, Trine, Day & Co, LLP", "Lance, Soll & Lunghard, LLP", "Vasquez & Company LLP", "Macias, Gini, & O\u2019Connell, LLP", "An evaluation committee, consisting of two financial experts from the Audit Subcommittee and staff from the Finance, Big Blue Bus, and Housing and Economic Development departments, reviewed and evaluated the six proposals. The evaluation criteria, developed by staff with assistance from the City\u2019s internal auditor, included experience, ability to meet project work plan/timelines, quality control, cost of services, stability/references, and value added, defined as the contractor\u2019s ability to provide insight and information related to new accounting standards or industry best practices and ability to effectively communicate information to management and the Audit Subcommittee, and provide technical training or resources.", "Based on the initial review of proposals, the evaluation committee shortlisted four firms and interviewed the three firms that were unfamiliar to the City on January 13, 2016. As a result of this process, the evaluation committee recommended LSL to provide auditing services for the City of Santa Monica. Staff presented the recommendation to the Audit Subcommittee on January 19, 2016 (Attachment A). The Audit Subcommittee approved the evaluation committee\u2019s recommendation by a vote of 4-0, with Committee Member Vasquez absent, and authorized staff to present its recommendation to the full Council for award of contract.", "Established in 1929, LSL is a California-based CPA firm that specializes in government audits and is known as an industry expert at the state and federal level.  LSL was selected based on the technical knowledge of the partners and managers to be assigned to the engagement; their emphasis on time management, planning, and realizing deadlines; and their ability to provide valuable insight and information related to new accounting standards, industry best practices, and unusual accounting transactions throughout the process. They were the highest ranked proposal and on average to the other proposals their cost is comparable.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The total cost of auditing services is $149,725 per year with a 2% increase each year, for a total not-to-exceed amount of $779,175 during the five-year term of the professional services agreement from FY 2015-16 to FY 2019-20. Costs will be allocated to the City\u2019s General Fund, the Big Blue Bus Fund, the Air Quality Management District (AQMD) Fund, and other programs where an audit is required for funding. Future year funding is subject to Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Cost-Sharing Memorandum of Agreements with the City of Los Angeles for the Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plan for the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute Memorandum of Agreements (MOA) with the City of Los Angeles to implement cost-share monitoring plans to comply with the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board's NPDES permit requirements for the Santa Monica Bay, $438,886, and Ballona Creek, $9,728.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City is obligated, as a municipal agency within the boundaries of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) permit system of Los Angeles County, to comply with the NPDES requirements to reduce pollution from urban runoff into the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek. The NPDES permit requires Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plans to collect data on water quality to demonstrate compliance with water quality objectives of the NPDES permit. As a member of the jurisdictions that drain into the Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek watersheds, the City is obligated to share in the costs of implementing these monitoring plans for these water bodies. The cost over the three-year (FY15-18) monitoring period of the Santa Monica Bay Memorandum of Agreement (MOA) will not exceed $438,886; the cost over the three-year (FY15-18) monitoring period of the Ballona Creek MOA will not exceed $9,728.", "Background", "The Federal Clean Water Act (CWA) requires the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Los Angeles Region (Board), to develop water quality standards that identify criteria to protect beneficial uses for each water body found within its region. Beneficial uses include swimming, fishing, drinking water, navigability, and wildlife habitats and reproduction. Section 303(d) of the CWA requires states to prepare a list of water bodies that do not meet water quality standards and establish for each of these water bodies pollutant load allocations known as total maximum daily loads (TMDLs) which will ensure attainment of water quality standards. A TMDL represents an amount of pollution that can be released by anthropogenic and natural sources of a watershed into a specific water body without causing a decline in water quality and beneficial uses.", "The Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek watersheds have been listed since 1998, initially for bacteria, on California\u2019s Section 303(d) list due to impairments by bacteria, trash, organic chemicals and metals. The Board adopted many TMDLs for these pollutants since 2003 to address these impairments. These TMDLs reduce the amounts of pollutants found in runoff discharges from the cities within these watersheds.", "Council approved an initial Santa Monica Bay MOA for cost-sharing bacterial monitoring on July 8, 2003 and Ballona Creek MOAs for cost-sharing monitoring for bacteria, metals and toxics on July 14, 2009.", "In accordance with these TMDLs, the City of Los Angeles submitted a Coordinated Monitoring Plan for compliance with the TMDLs on behalf of the agencies within these watersheds. The City of Los Angeles currently performs all required monitoring and reporting to the Control Board, and annually invoices the City of Santa Monica for its share of monitoring costs for Santa Monica Bay and Ballona Creek.", "Discussion", "On November 28, 2012, the Control Board approved a new NDPES permit with more extensive monitoring requirements than were included in the previous 2001 permit. The expansion of monitoring requirements in the new permit requires the adoption of a new monitoring plan, called a Coordinated Integrated Monitoring Plan (CIMP). This requires new MOAs with the City of Los Angeles to reflect an increase in the amount of funding the City of Santa Monica provides to Los Angeles to complete the monitoring necessary to comply with the permit. Under the terms of each MOA the City of Los Angeles would continue to be responsible for all monitoring and reporting activities to the Control Board, which include daily sampling at multiple locations along Santa Monica Bay and daily laboratory analyses.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "Santa Monica Bay", "Santa Monica\u2019s share of the monitoring costs per the terms of this MOA is not to exceed $438,886, which is $398,987 over the three-year monitoring period ending FY 2017-18 plus an additional $39,899 contingency. The estimated payments are $143,031 to the City of Los Angeles for FY 2015-16, $148,233 for FY16-17, and $107,723 for FY 2017-18. Funds are available in the Public Works Department. The Agreement will be charged to account 06402.555170. Future year funding is contingent upon Council approval.", "Ballona Creek", "Santa Monica\u2019s share of the monitoring costs per the terms of this MOA is not to exceed $9,728, which is $8,844 over the three-year monitoring period ending FY 2017-18 plus an additional $884 contingency. The estimated payments are $3,344 for FY 2015-16, $2,863 for FY16-17, and $2,637 for FY 2017-18. Funds are available in the Public Works Department. The Agreement will be charged to account 06402.555170. Future year funding is contingent upon Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Adopt Resolutions to Authorize Additional Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) providers", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council: 1. Adopt resolutions authorizing additional Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) programs through the following joint powers authorities: California Home Finance Authority, California Enterprise Development Authority, California Municipal Finance Authority, and California Statewide Communities Development Authority.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and enter into member agreements with the following Joint Powers Authorities (JPAs): California Home Finance Authority and California Enterprise Development Authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Office of Sustainability and the Environment is responsible for helping the City of Santa Monica meet established targets for energy reduction and greenhouse gas emissions as outlined in 15 x 15 Climate Action Plan, adopted by Council in 2013 (Attachment A). To help residents and businesses find ways to reduce their energy use, Council authorized Santa Monica\u2019s participation in the Home Energy Renovation Opportunity (HERO) in 2013. HERO is a provider of services and resources that connect home and building owners with incentives and rebates through Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) program.", "Staff would like to authorize five additional PACE service providers to operate in Santa Monica. Authorizing more PACE providers would offer multiple competitive financing mechanism options that provide benefits for residential and commercial property owners and the City with minimal resource impacts on the City. In addition to improvements related to energy efficiency, renewable energy and water conservation, several providers are eligible to provide financing for seismic retrofit projects. This powerful financing tool will enable the City to encourage seismic upgrades before and after a mandatory ordinance is adopted. In order to authorize additional PACE providers, the City must be a member of the Joint Powers Authority (JPA) that oversees the PACE providers\u2019 operations and adopt a resolution to authorize the PACE provider to operate within the City. Staff are proposing to authorize five PACE providers operating under four JPAs. Santa Monica is already a member of two JPA\u2019s and therefore, staff recommends that Council join the remaining two JPA\u2019s and authorize all five PACE providers.", "Background", "The PACE financing mechanism was first conceived in 2001, and allows property owners to fund energy and water efficiency, renewable energy, and seismic retrofit projects with no up-front costs. When a PACE program is authorized, a municipality or county may form special tax districts or join designated joint power authorities with authorized PACE providers to help property owners finance these projects. Participating property owners repay the cost of the improvements through an assessment levied against their properties, which is payable in semi-annual installments on property tax bills. A lien is filed against the property as security until the assessment is re-paid. The assessment remains with the property should the owner transfer or sell the property before the loan is re-paid.", "On July 13th, 2010 Council authorized participation in the Los Angeles County Energy Program (LACEP) which, at the time had only offered financing to commercial property owners.", "On November 12th, 2013, Council adopted a resolution to join Western Riverside Council of Governments\u2019 (WRCOG) under its JPA authority thereby enabling the HERO PACE program to operate in the City of Santa Monica. Since the authorization of HERO in Santa Monica, 32 residential property owners have had solar photovoltaic and water and energy efficiency projects approved for PACE financing. 17 projects have been completed thus far, valuing $495,000 in total. In sum, the projects will provide $591,000 in energy savings and $14,900 in water savings. In terms of a lifetime reduction in greenhouse gas emissions, 849 tons will be abated from the currently completed projects.", "Discussion", "PACE providers assist property owners with funding and consumer protections, and support contractors with certification, marketing, and administrative software. They are facilitated by large JPAs that offer the program only to their member agencies, after being authorized by official resolutions to do so. JPAs provide all assessment administration, bond issuance and bond administration functions for PACE programs. As a participant in a JPA, the City is not obligated to repay the bonds issued by the authority, or collect or pay the assessments levied on the participating properties.", "PACE financing addresses two key issues that often prevent property owners from installing energy efficiency, water efficiency and renewable energy projects:", "1. PACE eliminates the need for property owners to pay out of pocket up-front costs for improvements.", "2. PACE establishes a loan obligation that is attached to the property and not to the individual borrower.", "The availability of PACE financing supports the local economy by creating energy retrofit jobs and stimulating construction activities. Energy retrofit improvements to existing buildings in the City will allow property owners to reduce energy and water use as well as greenhouse gas emissions. Participating property owners reduce operating costs for electricity, natural gas and water and improve the comfort and safety of their homes and businesses. Increasing renewable energy and energy efficiency improvements in the City is a critical component of the 15x15 Climate Action Plan adopted by City Council in February 2013.", "Currently, there are ten PACE providers operating throughout California. The five additional PACE vendors being recommended by staff are the only vendors that operate statewide programs and are eligible to operate in the City of Santa Monica. The five vendors are Ygrene, Figtree, Alliance NRG, CaliforniaFIRST and Energy Efficient Equity. The other five companies operate within specific jurisdictions and are not available to Santa Monica or LA County. Many other jurisdictions have seen an increase in solar energy and energy efficiency installations once PACE financing is made available. Ygrene, Figtree, Alliance NRG, and CaliforniaFIRST are all listed by the Bay Area Regional Energy Network (BayREN) as prominent PACE providers operating in the region. Below is a description of each provider:", "1. Ygrene Energy Fund (\u201cYgrene\u201d) is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Home Finance Authority (CHFA), a Joint Powers Authority established in 1993. The City is not a member of CHFA, and would therefore need Council approval to become a member in addition to authorizing Ygrene. Ygrene currently operates in the states of Florida and California, and allows for financing of both residential and commercial renewable energy generation, energy and water efficiency improvement, and seismic strengthening projects. From projects in both states, Ygrene has helped to save $1.3 billion in energy costs and 2.8 billion gallons of water, and has created 9,700 new jobs. Most recently in California, the cities of Los Angeles and Poway adopted Ygrene as a PACE provider on September 22nd and October 20th, 2015, respectively.", "2. Figtree is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Enterprise Development Authority (CEDA), a JPA with a current membership of 40 cities and 21 counties. The City is not currently a member of CEDA, and would therefore need Council approval to become a member in addition to authorizing Figtree. Figtree allows for financing of commercial renewable energy, energy and water efficiency improvement, and seismic retrofit projects. The program\u2019s residential financing mechanism planning is currently underway.", "3. Energy Efficient Equity (\u201cE3\u201d) is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Municipal Finance Authority (CMFA), a JPA designed to assist local governments, non-profit organizations and business with financing economic development projects throughout California. Specifically, E3 provides program design, consulting, and turnkey administration for energy efficiency and renewable energy generation projects, for both residential and commercial properties. The City is currently a member of the CMFA JPA, thus, Council would only need to authorize E3 to operate within Santa Monica.", "4. Alliance NRG is a PACE administrator facilitated by the California Statewide Communities Development Authority (CSCDA), the largest Joint Powers Authority in the state of California. Alliance NRG offers PACE financing for residential and commercial energy and water efficiency, renewable energy generation, and seismic strengthening projects statewide. Alliance NRG provides PACE financing for the City and County of San Francisco\u2019s Earthquake Safety Implementation Program. Alliance NRG is one of the two major PACE programs provided by the CSCDA, under the JPA\u2019s greater OPEN PACE initiative. By authorizing multiple providers, OPEN PACE enables local jurisdictions to benefit from one authorization. The City is currently a member of the CSCDA, thus, Council would only need to authorize OPEN PACE.", "5. CaliforniaFIRST is a PACE administrator also facilitated by the California Statewide Communities Development Authority (CSCDA). CaliforniaFIRST offers PACE financing for residential and commercial energy and water efficiency, renewable energy generation, and seismic strengthening projects statewide. CaliforniaFIRST is the other of the two major PACE programs provided by the CSCDA, under the JPA\u2019s greater OPEN PACE initiative. By authorizing multiple providers, OPEN PACE enables local jurisdictions to benefit from one authorization. The City is currently a member of the CSCDA, thus, Council would only need to authorize OPEN PACE.", "Authorizing multiple PACE providers to operate within the City of Santa Monica would provide additional benefits to the property owners, including:", "\u00b7 Competition: Additional PACE providers would compete to provide the best service and rates for property owners. Property owners would have more financing options and the ability to shop for their desired price and service.", "\u00b7 Seismic retrofits: The current HERO program in Santa Monica does not provide financing for seismic retrofits. Four of the five proposed PACE providers allow for seismic retrofit project financing (Ygrene, Figtree, Alliance NRG and CaliforniaFIRST). With seismic retrofits aimed at increasing resilience of buildings garnering increasing interest from both residential and commercial property owners, PACE financing will become increasingly attractive. Examples of such retrofit projects include strengthening of soft-story buildings, non-ductile concrete buildings, non-ductile welded steel-framed buildings, unreinforced masonry buildings, concrete tilt-up buildings, and the bracing and bolting of building foundations in single family dwellings.", "\u00b7 Increased impact: The HERO program has already shown success in providing financial and greenhouse gas emissions savings during its two years in Santa Monica. The addition of more PACE providers would provide more opportunity for property owners to save money and add to the City\u2019s sustainability.", "\u00b7 Loan loss reserve: Some PACE providers participate in risk mitigation vehicles such as California\u2019s PACE Loss Reserve Program (\u201cthe Program\u201d), which allows for loan loss reserve. In 2013, seeking to address the concerns of mortgage lenders who opposed the fact that PACE loans were senior to mortgage loans, the State enacted SB 96 directed the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority (CAEATFA) to develop the $10 million Program, which mitigates the potential risk to mortgage lenders associated with residential PACE financing. Specifically, it makes first-time mortgage lenders whole for any losses in a forced sale or foreclosure that are attributable in any way to a PACE-related lien. Effectively, it aims to put first-time mortgage lenders in the same position they would be in without a PACE lien. As of November 2015, 36,729 PACE financings with a total principal value of $810,164,896 are enrolled in the Program. Currently, HERO, Ygrene, Alliance NRG, and CaliforniaFIRST participate in the Program.", "Should the resolutions be adopted, the legal counsels of all five PACE programs would begin a process of judicial validation to: ensure the JPA has the legal approval to provide its services and issue debt to finance valid PACE assessments; and to ensure that any local government is protected from all liability associated with JPA assessments and that, despite future changes in related law, the assessments that have been placed are secure and valid. During that time, City staff would begin to inform property owners and contractors of the pending availability of PACE financing. The City, in partnership with the providers, would begin education, outreach and marketing to raise awareness to the community. Marketing and outreach material templates will be provided by the program at no charge for use by the City in its own promotion of the program within the community. The City will provide additional marketing and outreach about the program to Santa Monica residents and businesses through the ongoing activities of the Solar Santa Monica program.", "Alternatives", "If the City Council was to take no action, LACEP and HERO would remain as the only two PACE providers for commercial and residential property owners. Alternatively, property owners could utilize other existing financing options for renewable energy, energy and water efficiency, and electric vehicle charging installation projects, including home equity loans, business lines of credit, and consumer credit. Financing for energy efficiency is also available through the Energy Upgrade California Program. Additionally, financing plans, leases, and power purchase agreements (PPAs) are commonly offered by solar installation companies. Currently, there are no financing options available to property owners related to seismic retrofit other than PACE.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no direct financial impacts associated with adoption of these resolutions. With the process of permitting more PACE providers, local government agencies in general bear no costs for setup or implementation. All PACE administrative costs are covered through an initial administrative fee included in the property owner\u2019s voluntary contractual assessment and an annual administrative fee which is also collected on the property owner\u2019s tax bill. The amount charged from the fees varies per PACE provider."]}, {"Title": "Purchase of Uniform and Protective gear for Public Safety Employees", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4209 to Uniform Warehouse, a California-based company for the purchase of uniforms and protective gear for Public Safety employees;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Uniform Warehouse for uniform and protective gear in the amount not to exceed $218,050 for one year, with 4-additional 1-year renewal option(s) to extend on the same terms and conditions for a total not to exceed $1,090,250, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Police Department, Fire Department and Office of Emergency Management currently supply public safety employees with approved uniforms, safety equipment and other protective gear required to perform their job duties. Following a formal bid process, Uniform Warehouse is recommended to provide and deliver the uniforms, safety equipment, and protective gear. The total annual expenditure is $218,050 for the first year and a total five-year contract amount not to exceed $1,090,250.", "Discussion", "The Police Department, Fire Department and Office of Emergency Management purchase a variety of public safety equipment and apparel for first responders and public safety employees annually, pursuant to their respective Memoranda of Understanding (MOU). A public bid is completed every three years to five years to ensure best pricing and customer service. Supplies and equipment purchased include items such as: uniforms, protective eyewear, and tactical gear.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In September 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and provide uniforms and protective gear as required by the Police Department, Fire Department, and Office of Emergency Management in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 474 vendors were notified, 33 vendors downloaded the bid. 4 bids were received and publicly opened on November 3, 2015 per Attachment A. Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Based on these criteria, Uniform Warehouse, the lowest bidder is recommended as the best bidder for the purchase of uniform and protective gear in accordance with City specifications. Galls, a Kentucky-based company, submitted a protest claiming the winning bid did not complete all the bid specification as required; however the Finance Department\u2019s Procurement investigated all the concerns and determined that Uniform Warehouse complied with all requirements and the protest was denied.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Uniform Warehouse is for an amount not to exceed $218,050. Funds are available in the FY 2014-15 budget in the Police Department, Fire Department and Office of Emergency Management. The purchase order will be charged to the following accounts:", "01304.544170", "$17,000.00", "01305.544170", "$27,000.00", "01306.544170", "$33,000.00", "01307.544170", "$10,000.00", "01306.544020", "$5,500.00", "30623.544170", "$5,400.00", "01304.544030", "$2,000.00", "01313.544170", "$100,000.00", "012272.544170", "$17,550.00", "012271.544170", "$600.00", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Custodial and Maintenance Services for Big Blue Bus (BBB) Bus Stops and Zones Located Within and Outside of Santa Monica", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Transit Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Award Bid #4144 to Shelter Clean Services, Inc., a California-based company, to provide custodial and maintenance services for Big Blue Bus (BBB) bus stops and zones located within and outside of the City of Santa Monica.2. Authorize City Manager to negotiate and execute a Contractual Services Agreement with Shelter Clean Services, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $155,000 for one year with one additional one year renewal option in the amount of $160,000 on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $315,000 over a two year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends City Council to authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Contractual Service Agreement (CSA) with Shelter Clean Services, Inc., to enable a one year contract with a one-year renewable option to provide custodial and maintenance services for all Big Blue Bus (BBB) bus stops, bus shelters and bus loading zones located in the City of Santa Monica, Los Angeles, and Los Angeles County, served by BBB routes at specified hourly labor charges. The award would enable the City to provide clean and well maintained Big Blue Bus stops and zones and ensure that all street furniture and shelters at stops are maintained to a high standard of cleanliness.", "Background", "In 2014 and continuing into 2016, Big Blue Bus initiated the Evolution of Blue program designed to provide new bus routes and stops related to the new proposed BBB services that would integrate with the Expo Line light rail service. This program included the newly-designed and implemented Bus Stop Improvement Project within Santa Monica as well as the upgrade of traditional amenities outside the City of Santa Monica. Due to the increase in the number of stops and amenities at stops, maintenance requirements have increased on multiple levels. The newly installed BBB bus stop sign units and amenities require additional maintenance, repairs, and custodial services. The prior version of BBB stops consisted of a pole, eye levels displaying maps and schedules, and a target displaying the BBB brand logo. The new sites include a large sign unit with multiple route and information slots, custom seating, solar panels, lighting, and Real-Time Signage with electronic components and canopies, all of which require additional cleaning, maintenance and system updates. The award of this bid would complement the work currently done by BBB\u2019s facility maintenance crews to ensure that regular signage updates and ongoing maintenance are completed to the City of Santa Monica\u2019s and BBB\u2019s standards.", "On January 16, 2015, the City executed a Contractual Services Agreement (CSA) with Shelter Clean for an amount of  $of $150,000 to provide custodial and maintenance services for all Big Blue Bus (BBB) bus stops, bus shelters and bus loading zones. The previous CSA was under the City Manager\u2019s authority. To date, $120,000 has been spent under that contract. Staff is now recommending that Council award and authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a new contractual services agreement with Shelter Clean Inc., in an amount not to exceed $155,000 for one year with one additional one year renewal option in the amount of $160,000 on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $315,000 over a two year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Discussion", "Bus stops and zones are high profile elements that require regular cleaning and maintenance. The bus stop component of BBB\u2019s Evolution of Blue program addresses stop spacing efficiency and elimination and addition of stops through route creation, changes, and deletions. Over the three-year phasing of Evolution of Blue from 2014 through 2016, the number of bus stops in the BBB service area will adjust from over 1,200 stops in place prior to the start of the program to 1,003. Beginning February 21st, there will be 920 bus stops served by BBB\u2019s 20 routes, with 270 stops in Santa Monica and 650 outside of Santa Monica. By August 2016, all of the Expo related stops will be in place taking the total number of bus stops to approximately 1,003.", "In January of 2016, the Bus Stop Improvement Project, which provided new amenities of varying service levels at all the bus stops in the City of Santa Monica, was completed. The newly designed stops have three shelter configurations: high volume, medium volume and low volume stops:", "\u00b7 High volume shelters have a sign unit, two shade units and seating for 2-6 customers depending on location.", "\u00b7 Medium volume shelters have a sign unit, one shade unit and seating for 2-4 customers.", "\u00b7 Low volume shelters have a sign unit, one shade unit and seating for 1-2 customers.", "Stops outside of Santa Monica have a pole, target, seating, eye levels and specialty signage. Each bus stop requires routine safety inspection, tree trimming, cleaning and repair services to the amenities. The award of the bid would ensure that each bus stop would be maintained to a high level of cleanliness.", "The cleaning and maintenance of each bus stop consists of, but not limited to:", "\u00b7 Picking up trash", "\u00b7 Sweeping any debris from the transit cement pad", "\u00b7 Pressure washing the cement pad on an as-needed basis", "\u00b7 Wiping down transit furniture", "\u00b7 Hand wiping shade structure ceiling panels", "\u00b7 Cleaning of solar panel arrays and lighting system", "\u00b7 Disinfecting seats, backs, and arm-rests", "\u00b7 Cleaning and polishing shade structures and signs", "\u00b7 Removing graffiti, stickers, and non-transit related signs and posters on all bus stop signs and furniture", "\u00b7 Real-Time Signage inspection and maintenance communication", "\u00b7 System information updates throughout the year", "\u00b7 Performing minor maintenance such as removing/replacing/refastening bus signage and poles, shelter panels, solar lighting and transit furniture", "The award of the bid would ensure that each stop would be inspected and maintained on a weekly basis. Technicians would log into a work order system and document all work specific to a bus stop. Weekly and monthly reports would be evaluated by BBB maintenance staff for quality control and to ensure compliance with scope of work.", "Method of Service", "On January 13, 2015, Council adopted a Policy for Hiring Contracted or As-needed Staff for Non-professional Services. This policy includes criteria under which contracting for a public service is appropriate. Staff has reviewed the service needs, and recommends providing bus stop cleaning and maintenance through Shelter Clean Services, Inc., based upon cost, capital equipment required and level of risk associated.", "The cost to provide bus stop maintenance through a contractor, staff estimates a cost difference of $402,636, including $198,160 one-time and $334,803 ongoing for staffing and equipment.", "The risk of potential liability is increased if stops are not maintained properly as per safety standards and Original Equipment Manufacturers recommendations. The potential liabilities could be unsafe or slippery surfaces, metal protrusions caused by damage or vandalism, loose seating and arm rests, loose lighting above heads, and very large heavy discs that need to be checked regularly for proper tightening of bolts.", "Vendor Selection", "In April 2014, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to provide bus stop maintenance as required by Big Blue Bus in accordance with City\u2019s specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City notified 364 vendors, of which 15 prospective vendors downloaded the bid specifications. Four bids were received and publicly opened on May 22, 2014.", "The bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City scope of work. Based on these criteria, two vendors were deemed qualified.  Shelter Clean Services Inc., is recommended as the best bidder to perform the cleaning and maintenance of bus stops in accordance with the City scope of work. Furthermore, Shelter Clean Services is recommended based on the highly positive testimonies from the County of Los Angeles Department of Public Works, Orange County Transit Authority and CBS/Decaux, LLC.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Shelter Clean Services, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $315,000. Funds in the amount of $155,000 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Big Blue Bus Department. The agreement will be charged to account 416574.555018. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Authorization to execute a contractual services agreement with Governmentjobs.com", "Department": "Human Resources Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual services agreement with Governmentjobs.com, Inc. dba NEOGOV, a California-based company, for Human Resources\u2019 applicant tracking software, under an exception to competitive bidding, in an amount not to exceed $36,000 for two years, with three additional one-year renewal option(s), each of which are subject to a 3% annual increase, otherwise on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $93,305 over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "NEOGOV is a comprehensive applicant tracking software used by the Human Resources Department for daily hiring operations. NEOGOV is geared towards public sector hiring and performance management, offering a more developed product than the generic applicant tracking systems currently on the market. Staff recommends NEOGOV for its candidate eligibility list formation, performance evaluation tracking, electronic position requisition and approval, minimum qualifications screening and Equal Employment Opportunity reporting. These features are essential to public sector hiring and the Civil Service process.", "Background", "NEOGOV has provided applicant tracking services to the Human Resources Department since 2004 when an original agreement was put in place for a term of two years, in an amount not to exceed fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000). Following the termination of the original agreement, the Human Resources Department requested an exception to the competitive bidding process, under the authority of the City Manager, to continue authorized payments to the vendor. Justification for these requests stated that Governmentjobs.com is the only vendor with rights to host and support NEOGOV, making the applicant tracking system used by Human Resources exclusive to this vendor. Continuing payments to this vendor would exceed the authority of the City Manager and therefore City Council approval is requested.", "Discussion", "Today, NEOGOV continues to lead the market for public sector applicant tracking systems. The Human Resources Department recommends a two-year agreement with NEOGOV to receive critical software updates and support. This two-year agreement will allow the City to determine if the new Enterprise Resource Planning System would impact applicant tracking and offer another alternative.", "Staff recommends NEOGOV to furnish and deliver/provide applicant tracking software on a sole source basis.  Governmentjobs.com was selected through a competitive bud process in 2004 to provide online recruiting and applicant tracking. The NEOGOV Insight software is a web based product tailored for the public sector; it automates the City\u2019s hiring process from requisition to hire. Each year, the Human Resources Department renews a license subscription with Governmentjobs.com. The subscription allows for Governmentjobs.com to continue to host the City\u2019s online recruiting and applicant tracking system and provides the City with the necessary support to minimize the interruptions to the City\u2019s recruitment processes. Since Governmentjobs.com is the hosting company, there are no other vendors that have rights to provide training, support and access to their NEOGOV software.", "Vendor Selection", "Governmentjobs.com is the sole vendor that can provide maintenance and support for its software system and is therefore the exclusive vendor for NEOGOV pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) of the Municipal Code.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to NEOGOV is for an amount not to exceed $93,305. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Human Resources Department. The contract will be charged to account 01251.533580. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Cancellation of Regular City Council Meeting Scheduled for March 8, 2016", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council vote to cancel the regular meeting scheduled for March 8, 2016, due to a lack of quorum, and schedule a special meeting at 5:30 p.m. on Tuesday, March 1, 2016, in City Hall."}, {"Title": "Award Bid for Purchase of Urban Search and Rescue Vehicle", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4227 to Emergency Vehicle Group (EVG) Inc., a California-based company, for the purchase of one Urban Search and Rescue Vehicle; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with EVG Corporation in an amount not to exceed $998,000, which includes a 10% contingency.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Fire Department currently has one Urban Search and Rescue (USAR) specialized apparatus that it uses to respond to and mitigate emergency response incidents involving complex urban search and technical rescue techniques. The City\u2019s current USAR specialized apparatus is from 2001 and has exceeded its useful life; due to not maintaining specialized apparatus in the reserve fleet, the useful life is fifteen years. In addition, the current USAR apparatus is undersized and is incapable of carrying required equipment inventory for a Type I USAR apparatus as stipulated by the California Office of Emergency Services (OES). According to OES, Type I apparatus represents \u201cthe minimum capability to conduct safe and effective search and rescue operations at structure collapse incidents involving the collapse or failure of heavy floor, pre-cast concrete and steel frame construction, high angle rope rescue, permit required confined space rescue and mass transportation rescue.\u201d In consideration of the supplies and equipment the Department now carries, the current USAR apparatus is at its gross vehicle weight (GVW) without capacity to carry the equipment and supplies stipulated by OES to meet Type I USAR specifications. The new apparatus is a heavy duty Type I that is capable of meeting all of the state requirements. Therefore, staff recommends purchasing one USAR specialized apparatus to be used by Fire Department personnel. Following a formal bid process, EVG is recommended as the best bidder to provide and deliver the vehicle in an amount not to exceed $998,000, which includes a 10% contingency.", "Discussion", "The City replaces heavy Fire apparatus vehicles that have reached the end of their useful life through the Fire Vehicle Replacement Program within the Capital Improvement Program. The USAR apparatus designated for replacement is a 2001 vehicle currently being used by the City of Santa Monica Fire Department for emergency responses involving complex urban search and technical rescue techniques. The USAR apparatus responds to all incidents involving complex urban searches and technical rescues; it is available for emergency responses resulting from earthquakes and other natural or man-made disasters. In addition, this vehicle will respond to all emergency incidents involving the Expo line Metro train.", "Some of the incidents to which the USAR vehicle was deployed during the last twelve months include:", "\u00b7 Building stabilization and shoring due to vehicle into building at Montana and 26th (February 2015)", "\u00b7 Building stabilization and shoring due to vehicle into building and fire in the 700 block of Montana (August 2015)", "\u00b7 Building stabilization and shoring due to a large section of window glass becoming dislodged in the 2800 block of Santa Monica (November 2015)", "\u00b7 Approximately 10-12 bluff rescues (this figure represents the approximate number of responses the Department makes annually)", "The USAR apparatus is also a regional asset with the potential for county-wide as well as state-wide mutual aid response. All equipment carried on the USAR apparatus and the necessary specialty training associated with USAR operations is primarily funded by the Federal Homeland Security Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant program.", "Vendor Selection", "In November 2015, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids for the purchase and delivery of an Urban Search and Rescue vehicle required by the Fire Department in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 639 vendors were notified, of which 19 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on November 30, 2015. Two no bids notices were received from prospective vendors who cited the reasons for not submitting a bid as being unable to meet the submittal deadline and their own internal workload demands. The USAR apparatus is the most technical and complex apparatus the Santa Monica Fire Department owns. There are only a few companies nationally that can construct such an apparatus to meet stringent state and national standards for a Type I Heavy USAR apparatus.", "Although other local jurisdictions recently bid out USAR apparatus, the specifications were not similar enough to piggyback on the other jurisdictions\u2019 bid process. Specifically, the Department was unable to piggyback on other bids due to the City\u2019s facility size limitations to house the apparatus and the larger apparatus ordered by other jurisdictions. The bid was evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. City staff also researched recently awarded bids for USAR apparatus developed for the City of Los Angeles Fire Department. The current bid pricing received by EVG is consistent with the City of Los Angeles\u2019 bid. Based on these criteria, EVG is recommended to provide and deliver the USAR in accordance with the City specification and scope of work.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to EVG is for an amount not to exceed $998,000. Funds are available in the General Fund FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C010170.589000."]}, {"Title": "2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #SP2380 to Ramona, Inc., a California-based company, for the 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Ramona, Inc., in an amount not to exceed $2,731,190 (including 15% contingency).3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Willdan Engineering, a California-based company, in an amount not to exceed $252,000 (including a 10% contingency) for construction management and inspection services for the 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project.4. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project would replace over 7,000 linear feet and rehabilitate nearly 6,000 linear feet of sewer pipeline to extend useful life, reduce maintenance needs, and upgrade capacity throughout the city. Pipelines identified for replacement and rehabilitation are selected based on factors such as age, condition, and capacity demand. Specific work would include replacement, upgrade, lining and rehabilitation of existing wastewater mains as well as construction of new and rehabilitation of existing maintenance access structures.", "In November 2015 the City solicited bids for construction services. After reviewing the six bids received, Ramona, Inc., the best bidder, is recommended for construction of the project in an amount not to exceed $2,731,190 (including a 15% contingency). To support the 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project, construction services are needed. In May 2014 the City requested Statements of Qualifications for construction management and inspection services for upcoming construction projects throughout the city. Staff recommends Willdan Engineering to provide construction management and inspection services for this project in an amount not to exceed $252,000 (including a 10% contingency), for a project total of $2,983,190.", "Discussion", "The Water Resources Division operates and maintains an extensive sanitary sewer collection system including approximately 150 miles of wastewater pipelines. The Division uses a sewer asset management plan that evaluates data such as age, pipe condition, capacity demands, and maintenance needs. Information from this asset management plan combined with video and visual inspection records are used by staff to identify areas of the collection system that require rehabilitation and upgrade. This project includes improvements at selected areas based on highest priority deficiencies in the wastewater collection system. The proposed improvements consist of replacing substandard 6-inch-diameter pipe with new 8-inch-diameter pipe and replacing/repairing maintenance access structures to ensure adequate and reliable sewer service for customers. Improvements are scheduled mostly northwest of Montana Avenue along Palisades Place North between 1st Court and 7th Street, Alta Place North between 4th Street and 7th Street, Marguerita Place North between 4th Court and 7th Street and 9th Court between Marguerita Avenue and Georgina Avenue. Improvements would also take place southwest of the I-10 freeway on 11th Court north of Michigan Avenue, Pacific Street between 6th Street and 7th Street and Euclid Street and 14th Street, and on Longfellow Street and Ozone Street.  The project also implements cured-in-place lining and rehabilitation of existing mainline pipes providing substantial extension to the lifecycle of the existing critical segments. Sewer lining improvements are proposed at beach parking lots 5 south (2600 Barnard Way) and 2030 Ocean Avenue, and along Ocean Front Walk (Attachment A).", "Vendor Selection - Construction", "On October 28, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for construction services for the 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project as required by the Civil Engineering Division. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Fourteen hundred sixty vendors were notified and 56 vendors downloaded the bid. Six bids were received and publicly opened on December 10, 2015. Bid results are as follows:", "Bidder", "Bid Amount", "Ramona, Inc.", "$ 2,374,948.00", "Blois Construction, Inc.", "$ 2,541,289.00", "Mike Prlich and Sons.", "$ 2,805,000.25", "GRFCO, Inc.", "$ 2,833,524.00", "Vasilj, Inc.", "$ 2,971,579.00", "PALP Inc. Excel Paving, Co.", "$ 3,350,358.00", "Engineer\u2019s Estimate", "$ 2,505,054.00", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, capacity and skill, ability to deliver and provide future maintenance or service, and compliance with City scope of work. Ramona, Inc. has completed recent similar projects for the cities of Los Angeles, Long Beach, Brea, Palos Verdes Estates, and Vernon. Staff contacted references listed in the bid package and all respondents reported that work performed by Ramona, Inc. was completed in a timely and cost-efficient manner while maintaining consistent quality. Staff also verified with the Contractors State License Board that Ramona, Inc. and its subcontractors\u2019 licenses are current, active, and in good standing. Based on these criteria, Ramona, Inc., the lowest bidder, is recommended as the best bidder for construction services of the 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project in accordance with City scope of work.", "Vendor Selection - Construction Management", "In May 2014 the City requested Statements of Qualifications for construction management and inspection services for upcoming construction projects throughout the city to provide more seamless reporting and management of these projects. This process established a list of consultants prequalified to provide construction management services for the City. The consultant list is valid for selection for a period of two years. Once selected for a project, the consultant and City would enter into a one year contract with an option to extend for an additional year, if necessary to complete the project. The 2015 Annual Wastewater Main Improvements Project requires construction management services.", "On June 6, 2014, the City received Statements of Qualifications in the category of Water and Wastewater on the City\u2019s online bidding website. Fifteen firms submitted Statements of Qualifications for this project which were reviewed and rated by Public Works staff. Selection criteria included technical competence, staffing capability, project approach, past performance, dispute resolution, price, quality control, cost control, management services, customer service, and the ability to meet required time frames. The top three firms were invited to interview with Public Works staff in July 2014. These included GK & Associates, SA Associates, and Willdan Engineering. Willdan Engineering is recommended as the best bidder to provide construction management and inspection services based on their qualifications and their directly related experience providing similar services for municipal agencies. Staff contacted reference agencies and all respondents reported that Willdan Engineering provided exceptional construction management and inspection services.", "Services provided by Willdan Engineering would include construction management, continuous inspection of the contractor\u2019s work, verification and management of field changes and unforeseen conditions, monitoring and mitigation of impacts as a result of the construction activities, attendance at contractor\u2019s safety meetings, attendance at periodic progress meetings, recordkeeping of all necessary inspection documentation relevant to the work performed during construction, coordination with adjacent properties, and public outreach.", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach during construction of this project would be provided by Willdan Engineering, the City\u2019s construction management consultant. Public outreach would include notifications distributed to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope of the project and potential impacts. Weekly updates would be posted on the City\u2019s \u201cKnow Before You Go\u201d (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily Press. Updates regarding the project would be provided on the City\u2019s website and various social media channels. Properties impacted by the project would receive two construction notices. The first general notice would be mailed to properties adjacent to the proposed work two weeks prior to the start of construction. A second two-day notice would be subsequently hand-delivered to each adjacent property with detailed information regarding the planned construction activity, potential impacts, and contact information. The notices would be prepared by Public Works staff and distributed by the contractor.", "Sewer lining work in Beach Parking Lots and along Ocean Front Walk", "Sewer lining work, which is much less invasive, would be performed at two beach parking lots and along a portion of Ocean Front Walk. All vehicular and pedestrian ingress and egress access points will be maintained at all times during sewer lining operations at Parking Lot 5 South (2600 Barnard Way) and 2030 Ocean Avenue. Various parking stalls will be utilized to stage construction vehicles and equipment during construction operations at these locations, and will be coordinated with parking office staff.", "In addition, work along Ocean Front Walk between Bay Street and Moss Avenue would also maintain pedestrian ingress and egress access points at all times during sewer lining operations along the path.", "Construction Schedule", "Work is anticipated to begin in April 2016 and be completed by April 2017. Work in the Beach Parking Lots and along Ocean Front Walk would take approximately two months to complete. Work is tentatively scheduled to start in April and be completed end of May 2016 before the start of summer season.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Ramona, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $ 2,731,190 (including a 15% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:", "Account No. Description FY15-16", "C310628.589000 Wastewater Main Replacement  $ 1,365,595", "C310947.589000 AB1600 Sewer Expo Project $ 1,365,595", "Total Funds Available  $ 2,731,190", "The contract to be awarded to Willdan Engineering is for an amount not to exceed $252,000 (including a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in the following accounts:", "Account No. Description FY15-16", "C310628.589000 Wastewater Main Replacement  $ 126,000", "C310947.589000 AB1600 Sewer Expo Project $ 126,000", "Total Funds Available  $ 252,000"]}, {"Title": "Annual Update on City Investment Policy", "Department": "Finance Department, Treasury", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review and approve the City\u2019s revised Investment Policy including the addition of a citizen representative to the City\u2019s Investment Committee;2. Extend the delegation of investment authority to the Director of Finance, as City Treasurer, from March 1, 2016 through February 28, 2017; and3. Adopt the attached resolution updating the list of persons authorized to conduct transactions with the State Local Agency Investment Fund on behalf of the City.Staff also recommends that the Successor Agency Governing Board:1. Review and approve the City Investment Policy for Successor Agency Investments; 2. Extend investment authority to the Treasurer of the Successor Agency, from March 1, 2016 through February 28, 2017; and3. Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the establishment of bank and brokerage accounts and approving the list of persons authorized to conduct transactions with the State Local Agency Investment Fund on behalf of the Successor Agency.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "State law requires that the City adopt an investment policy and that the City Council annually consider the policy at a public meeting. The Santa Monica City Charter delegates the authority for investing City funds to the Director of Finance as the City Treasurer. State law requires that the Council delegate investment authority to the City Treasurer for a one-year period, renewable annually. The current delegation of authority carries through February 29, 2016.  Staff is requesting to extend the delegation of investment authority to the Director of Finance, as City Treasurer, from March 1, 2016 through February 28, 2017.  Staff has revised the policy to add a citizen representative to the City\u2019s Investment Committee. Additionally, staff recommends that the City Council and Successor Agency adopt the attached resolutions updating the list of persons authorized to conduct transactions with the State Local Agency Investment Fund (LAIF).", "Background", "Per State law, Council annually considers and approves the City\u2019s Investment Policy (Attachment A) and delegates investment authority to the City Treasurer for a one-year period, renewable annually. The current delegation of authority carries through February 29, 2016. In addition, Santa Monica City Charter Section 711 delegates the authority to invest City funds to the City Treasurer.", "Discussion", "City investments are made only in those instruments specifically authorized by California State laws, primarily Sections 53601, 16429.1, and 53684 et seq. of the Government Code. Within these legal guidelines, the three primary objectives of the City\u2019s Investment Policy and Investment practices, in priority order are:", "\u00b7 Safety \u2013 Safety of principal is the foremost objective of the City\u2019s investment program. City investments shall be undertaken in a manner that seeks to ensure the preservation of capital in the overall portfolio by diversifying its investments among a variety of securities offering independent returns.", "\u00b7 Liquidity \u2013 City investments are kept sufficiently liquid to enable the City to meet all operating requirements which might be reasonably anticipated by structuring the portfolio so that securities mature concurrently with anticipated cash needs to the extent possible. Investments are primarily made in securities with active secondary or resale markets. Additionally, an adequate liquidity buffer is maintained for extraordinary circumstances.", "\u00b7 Rate of Return \u2013 The City\u2019s investment portfolio is designed with the objective of attaining a benchmark rate of return throughout budgetary and economic cycles taking into account safety and liquidity requirements. The benchmark may vary from time to time depending on the economic and budgetary conditions present.", "The City continues to abide by the highest professional standards in the management of public funds. While the investment strategy is flexible and can change based on market and economic conditions, the legal and policy guidelines governing these investment decisions remain relatively static.", "This investment policy extends the delegation of investment authority to the Director of Finance, as City Treasurer, from March 1, 2016 through February 28, 2017.", "In addition to several minor wording changes, the proposed policy reflects a statutory change regarding investing funds with placement services and a regulatory change modifying the maximum investment in LAIF. These changes are summarized below:", "\u00b7 As of August 12, 2015, the Governor signed AB283 extending the existing temporary authority for using placement services for deposits from January 1, 2017 to January 1, 2021. For the use of placement services for certificates of deposit, the sunset date has been removed. Additionally, the limit on the percentage of local agency funds that may be invested in certificates of deposit by one private placement service has been removed. The City does not currently use a placement service for the investment and/or deposit of City funds.", "As of January 1, 2016, the State Treasurer increased the LAIF deposit limit for regular accounts from the current $50 million to $65 million. This change was based on the needs voiced by local government participants and comments from the Local Investment Advisory Board. The last time the State Treasurer increased the LAIF deposit limit for regular accounts was November 16, 2009, when the limit went from $40 million to the current $50 million. LAIF accounts provide flexibility to the investment process and increase short term returns while maintaining the primary objectives of safety and liquidity of City funds.", "The City\u2019s Investment Policy has been certified by the Association of Public Treasurers United States and Canada (APT) and is periodically submitted for recertification per APT guidelines.", "Investment Committee", "The purpose of the City\u2019s Investment Committee (the Committee) is to provide general oversight and act in an advisory capacity. The Committee meets quarterly to evaluate the previous quarter\u2019s investment activity, review the current status of the City\u2019s investment portfolio, and to discuss anticipated cash requirements and the proposed investment strategy for the next and future quarters. The Committee currently consists of the City Manager, the Assistant City Manager, the Director of Finance, the Assistant City Treasurer, and one other department head serving a one-year term on a rotating basis. In order to increase the transparency of the City\u2019s investment practices, and acknowledging that having the ability to access additional expertise and perspective would be a benefit to any investment committee, staff is proposing to add a citizen representative to the Committee. Staff proposes that the citizen representative be appointed by the City Manager for a one year term and should possess strong skills and knowledge in the areas of finance and economics.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended actions. Staff provides monthly reports to the City Council and the City Manager describing the present status of City investments and monies held by the City, as well as summarizing all investment transactions for the month. Interest earnings from the City\u2019s pooled investment portfolio are allocated to the various City funds based upon each fund\u2019s share of total City cash and investments. Projected investment earnings for each fund are included in the FY 2015-16 Revised Budget. No budget action is required at this time."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of Ordinance Establishing Speed Limits for Certain Streets Pursuant to the California Vehicle Code Amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 3.12.490", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on February 9, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance establishing speed limits for certain streets pursuant to the California Vehicle Code and amending Santa Monica Municipal Code Section 3.12.490.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}], [{"Title": "State of the Water Fund", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "09. Public Hearings", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council suspend part of the 9% water rate increase authorized by Council to go into effect on January 1, 2016 and authorize a 5% increase. The partial suspension would reduce the water rate increase scheduled to go into effect on January 1, 2016 from 9% to 5%. This rate adjustment would be in effect until December 31, 2016.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report recommends the City Council adopt a 5% water rate increase for 2016 instead of the previously approved 9% increase.  This is based on staff\u2019s review of prior years\u2019 expenditures and revenues, projected expenses and revenues and projected fund balances over the next 5 years.  On February 24, 2015, Council approved annual 9% water rate increases for the 5-year period beginning March 1, 2015 and ending December 31, 2019. The first 9% increase went into effect on March 1, 2015, with second 9% rate increase scheduled to go into effect on January 1, 2016. The resolution approving these annual water rate increases authorized the increases to go into effect automatically each year unless Council suspended all or part of the increase, beginning with the January 1, 2016 scheduled rate increase. Based upon review of Water Fund performance for Fiscal Year 2014-15, including greater than anticipated revenues, decreased operating expenses, and decreased capital project expenditures, staff is recommending a partial suspension of the 9% rate increase, and implementation of a 5% increase effective January 1, 2016. The change in rate is only effective for 2016, returning to the adopted 9% increase authorized for subsequent years, evaluated annually. Council can take action to adjust future rate increases at the next annual review.", "Background", "On February 24, 2015 Council approved the following schedule of rate increases:", "Calendar Year", "2015,", "effective March 1, 2015", "2016, effective January 1, 2016", "2017, effective January 1, 2017", "2018, effective January 1, 2018", "2019, effective January 1, 2019", "Maximum Projected Increase", "9%", "9%", "9%", "9%", "9%", "The rate increases go into effect automatically on an annual basis unless Council suspends a scheduled rate increase. The circumstances which might demonstrate that a particular year\u2019s increase is unnecessary include greater than anticipated revenues, decreased operating expenses, or decreased capital project expenditures. Based upon staff review of Water Fund revenues and expenses for Fiscal Year 2014-15, staff is recommending a suspension of the yearly 9% rate increase and the implementation of a 5% increase which would go into effect for water consumption beginning on January 1, 2016. Since water bills reflect the previous two month\u2019s consumption (approximately), water bills prepared beginning March 1, 2016 would reflect the revised rate, if Council approves the recommended rate adjustment.", "Discussion", "The multi-year rate adjustment schedule approved by the City Council in February 2015 was based upon projected revenue and cost estimates in the Water Fund through the year 2019. The financial forecast approved in the 2015 Rate Study (Attachment D) submitted to Council on December 16, 2014 is presented in Figure 1 (Attachment A). For the first year, Council adopted a 9% increase, effective March 1, 2015, with direction to staff to return later in the year with a recommendation for the following year\u2019s rate adjustment.", "At the time rate increases were being considered by Council, reductions in proposed capital programs were deemed necessary to avoid higher increases than the 9% annual rate increases approved by Council over the 5-year rate period. In order to accommodate the series of 9% increases over the 5-year period, $2.5 million in water main replacements, and $5 million in Advanced Meter Infrastructure programs were eliminated (from the higher 13% rate increase option).", "Specifically, the revenue plan approved by Council at the February 24, 2015 meeting (Figure 1, Attachment A) projected that the water utility would collect sufficient revenue to cover fixed expenses, maintain cash reserves consistent with adopted Council policy, fund capital improvements on a pay as you go basis, and create a Water Fund balance in the later years of the planning period that would allow for future bond funding.", "Past Year Water Fund Performance and the Implications for Year 2 Rate Suspension", "In considering whether to suspend all or part of the scheduled 9% rate adjustment for calendar year 2016, staff analyzed the FY 2014-15 actual performance of the Water Fund.  Using financial performance information from a full fiscal year basis coincides with the City\u2019s financial reporting period, allowing the use of the ending fund balance to be considered along with the five-year projections in formulating a rate adjustment recommendation. Consequently, the ending Fiscal Year performance of the Water Fund, considered along with the five year projections of future operations and capital project expenditures are the key elements in determining future rate adjustment recommendations in the remainder of the 5-year planning period.", "It is important to note that FY 2014-15 information only reflects performance of the fund through June 30, 2015. Accordingly, the effects of the rate increase approved at the February 24, 2015 meeting (which became effective for water use beginning March 1, 2015) are not fully reflected in the FY 2014-15 numbers. For example, the first bills at the new rates were sent out May 1, 2015. As a result, any impact on revenues which may have been due to the rate increase generated by the 2015 rate adjustment were limited to only one billing cycle. Similarly, the end-of-year ramp-up of conservation programs and implementation of the City\u2019s stage two drought response measures show very little effect on the FY 2014-15 financial results due to timing.", "Going forward, the ending fund balance of the Water Fund following a full Fiscal Year\u2019s performance, in combination with newly projected five year forecasts, typically prepared in December, will serve as the most up-to-date projections upon which to base a potential rate adjustment recommendation to be implemented annually at the beginning of March.", "Considerations to Suspend a Part of the 2016 Rate Increase", "Utilizing FY 2014-15 actuals, the fund balance projection has been updated to show the implications over the remainder of the 5-year planning period of suspending all or a portion of the 9% rate increase previously authorized for 2016.  Current and proposed rates are listed in Table 4 (Attachment C). In all options, it is assumed the suspension remains in effect only for 2016 followed by the full 9% increase authorized for subsequent years, evaluated annually. Each option is included in Figure 1 (Attachment A), which indicates the projected performance (ending fund balance) of the Water Fund for the total suspension (Table 1, Attachment B), partial suspension resulting in 5% versus the full 9% increase (Table 2, Attachment B), and the full 9% increase automatically authorized unless suspended (Table 3, Attachment B) relative to the 5-year rate plan (the February 2015 revenue plan) without any suspension of rates as indicated in Figure 1. For all three options presented, the ending fund balance estimates project the changes in revenue realized with the respective proposed change in the rate. For all options, projections in operating and capital expenses are the same.", "It should be noted that the actual ending fund balance for FY 2014-15 begins at a point higher than envisioned in the rate study forecast (Figure 1). This is due to actual revenues being higher than projected, as the impact of conservation programs had not fully taken effect in FY 2014-15; operating expenses being lower, and capital budget amounts decreasing through review of projects and programs which eliminated substantial amounts from the Capital Improvement Program (CIP).  Also contributing to the fund balance was a one-time infusion of $33.4 million in MTBE settlement funds transferred into the Water Fund at the end of FY 2012-13. These funds had been kept in a separate Charnock/Arcadia-only fund; upon completion of treatment plant improvements they were transferred into the Water Fund.  These funds are used to offset certain water treatment costs, and in doing so, they effectively subsidize a portion of the water rates.", "Total Suspension of the 9% Increase (0% Increase)", "Suspension in its entirety of the previously authorized 9% rate increase for 2016 leaves water rates unchanged from those effective as of March 1, 2015.  This is represented graphically in Figure 1 and Table 1.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 No increase in rates for 2016; rates are not increased beyond the increase adopted by Council in March 2015.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 As indicated in Figure 1 and Table 1, the minimum recommended reserve fund balance of $7 million is not achieved for the last two years of the planning period.", "\u00b7 Financial conditions are not met which would allow the City to bond for future Capital projects.", "Partial Suspension Resulting in a 5% vs. 9% Increase For 2016 (staff recommendation)", "As indicated in Figure 1 and Table 2, a 5% increase in year 2 of the planning period shows a forecast of fund balances in the later years of the planning period at levels less than the projections for the full 9%. Ending fund balances through FY 2019-20 meet the minimum reserve level of $7 million.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 Lower increase in unit price compared to the 9% increase option discussed below.", "\u00b7 Bond issuance criteria for future capital projects (revenues exceeding expenditures by 20% or more) are met by FY2018-19.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 Reduced ability to address unforeseen emergency situations due to the lower fund balances in the outer years than the 9% option.", "No Suspension 9% Increase", "Based on the five-year forecast prepared annually in December, the ending fund balance for the Water Fund with a 9% increase this year (effective January 1) and 9% increases in the following years is indicated in Figure 1 and Table 3.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 Creates the strongest financial position (ending fund balances) throughout the planning period in excess of adopted minimum reserve levels.", "\u00b7 Bond issuance criteria for future capital projects are met by FY 2018-19.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 Highest increase in water rates, compounded over the maximum increase in the prior year.", "Summary and Recommendation", "Attempting to forecast revenues from water sales to support the utility\u2019s objective of producing potable water, meeting capital project goals, and supporting ongoing conservation and drought response plans includes the challenge of accounting for an uncertainty of water usage throughout the service area. Various factors come into play in consideration of the recommended rate adjustment.", "Water Conservation:  Although the City has experienced a sizeable water use reduction starting from approximately March 2015 to present, for FY 2014-15 (period ending June 30, 2015) water use was only reduced 4% from the prior year. In comparison, water conservation city-wide has averaged beyond 20% for the period from March 2015 and January 2016. The full effect of this accomplishment will be considered in next year\u2019s analysis and subsequent rate recommendation.", "Revenues:  Revenue projections assumed a water use pattern which included increased water demand in a rebounding economy, a 10% level of conservation throughout the year, and a 9% rate increase. However, since water demand did not fall as much as anticipated during FY 2014-15, revenues came in higher than projected.  Revenue from water sales were $3 million higher in FY 2014-15 than projected in the rate study.", "Capital Expenditures:  After significant review and scrubbing of capital program expenditures, which had previously included rollover amounts from prior years\u2019 CIP, there were $6.8 million in savings from projects completed under budget or deferred to later years.", "Operating Expenses:  Operating expenses were less than anticipated by $2.7 million.  Conservation Program Expenses: Implementation of conservation programs, for which additional funding was approved by Council in order to accelerate carrying out the Stage 2 Water Shortage Response Plan, took several months to implement and it was not until late summer 2015, during FY 2015-16, that they became fully operational. The Water Fund-budgeted expenses were $1.9 million less than budgeted in FY 2014-15.", "In comparing full implementation of the 9% increase previously authorized by Council in February 2015 versus a partial suspension of that increase amounting to a 5% increase over rates in place as of December 31, 2015 clearly creates a stronger fund balance at the end of the planning period, as would be expected with a higher rate increase. However, the 5% increase option does increase fund balances in later years, while still meeting minimum reserve balances and debt issuance criteria.  Additionally, the bond issuance criteria is met by the 5% increase, similar to the conditions established by the 9% increase.", "The 5% water rate increase for 2016 allows the City to continue the current fiscal management of the water utility while ensuring the operation, maintenance, and infrastructure investments necessary to continue the delivery of safe drinking water to the community.", "The adjusted rate, if approved by Council, will be effective for water use commencing January 1, 2016. Billings for water use beginning this date will begin March 1, 2016, and will reflect the adjusted rate. Council complied with Proposition 218 public notice requirements when it approved a schedule of rate increases (up to 9% per year) in February 2015. Since the rate adjustment does not exceed the maximum 9%, the Proposition 218 public notice period of 45 days is not required.", "Cost of Service Analysis", "Subsequent to the adoption of the City's latest 2015 water rate increases, the Court of Appeal, Fourth Appellate District, issued its opinion in the case Capistrano Taxpayers Association, Inc. v. City of San Juan Capistrano (2015) 235 Cal.App.4th 1493. In its decision, the court held that for tiered water rates to be valid under Proposition 218, the various water tiers must correspond to the actual cost of delivering water. Because the City of Capistrano could not demonstrate that its tiers followed this principle, the Court ruled against the city. While the court\u2019s decision has been criticized by many, including the Governor, who is considering proposing an initiative to modify Proposition 218, and while the court's opinion runs counter to the statewide practice of using tiered rates to encourage water conservation, the court did not reject tiered pricing altogether.", "In light of the Capistrano opinion, staff has reviewed the cost assumptions in the 2015 rate study. Even taking into consideration the Capistrano decision, staff has concluded that the City's rate structure meets Proposition 218 requirements. In performing its analysis, Staff compared current water rates with updated FY 2014-15 cost-of-service data, which is the most recent data available, as well as with the data utilized in the development of the Rate Study.", "As demonstrated in the tables and attachments, the water rates paid by the City\u2019s water customers are below the City\u2019s cost-of-service. This is true at each Tier breakpoint (the point at which the price for each additional unit of water usage increases) in each customer class, as indicated in Tables 5 and 6 in Attachment E.", "Moreover, the effective water rate paid by water customers \u2013 that is, the actual water rate paid for water used, which takes into account the progression of rates through the various Tiers \u2013 is also below the actual cost of service.  An example helps to illustrate. A single family residential customer, who uses 40 hundred cubic feet (HCF) of water, where 1 HCF = 748 gallons, would pay $2.73/HCF at the Tier 1 rate, for the first 14 HCF, and $4.09/HCF at the Tier 2 rate, for next 26 HCF (based upon 2015 prices). The combined or effective blended rate paid for all the water purchased is $3.61/HCF, for 40 HCF of water. However, the actual cost of service to provide 40 HCF to a single family residential customer in FY 2014-15 was $5.51/HCF, based upon the data provided in the 2015 rate study. Thus, a single family customer using 40 HCF of water paid $1.90/HCF less than the actual cost-of-service.", "The difference between the City\u2019s actual costs-of-service and the amount paid by each customer class represents essentially a subsidy. The subsidy is being funded from $33.4 million in Charnock settlement proceeds and $56.1 million in Olympic Basin settlement proceeds from FY 2014-15 through FY 2018-19, as indicated in Table 5B of the Rate Study.[1] The settlement proceeds are offsetting certain capital and operation and maintenance costs that otherwise would need to be funded by water sales.", "As represented by the example above, tiered pricing is a form of progressive or blended pricing. Customers in Tiers 2 and above pay a water rate that is a combination or blend of rates. A Tier 2 customer, for instance, pays Tier 1 pricing for the first 14 HCF of water used and then pays Tier 2 pricing for the balance of the water used. Because of the tiered pricing and the subsidy of rates provided by the various settlements, lower tier water users are benefitted and subsidized more heavily by the Water Fund reserves than higher tier users in each classification. Water users that primarily pay lower tier rates are those with the lower water consumption. As consumption increases, water users graduate to the higher tiers and lower subsidies.  However, rate payers at the higher tiers still benefit from paying a blended rate that remains partially subsidized at all tier levels.  Nothing in Proposition 218 prevents subsidies of water rates and nothing in Proposition 218 requires the City to subsidize all water customers in the same amount.", "It must be acknowledged, however, that the 2015 Rate Study assumes certain cost-of-service savings that cannot be anticipated with precision. Because of this, and given that the current rate structure anticipates partial or whole suspension of rates on a year to year basis, staff anticipates that actual revenue and cost scenarios can be adjusted to ensure that the implementation of the annual 9% rate increase authorized in 2015 is warranted on a year to year basis. Furthermore, the legal status of tiered pricing may be further clarified by future court decisions or possible changes Proposition 218.", "Task Force on the Environment Action", "At its January 25, 2016 meeting, the City\u2019s Task Force on the Environment approved the following motion:", "The City of Santa Monica Task Force on the Environment recommends a 5% rate increase for the coming year and requests revisiting the rate structure within the next year, particularly in regards to a conservation based block rate structure and fixed charges.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The revenue budget established at account 25671.402310 will be reduced by $300,867 in FY 2015-16 and reduced by $776,064 in FY 2016-17 to reflect implementation of the partial suspension of water rates for calendar year 2016."]}], [{"Title": "Consideration of the Pedestrian Action Plan", "Department": "Mobility (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council hold a public hearing, receive public comment, and adopt the attached resolution and Pedestrian Action Plan. The Pedestrian Action Plan contains goals, policies, practices, programs, built projects, implementation priorities, and a framework for strategic on-going investments that enhances pedestrian safety and comfort.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Pedestrian Action Plan provides a framework for strategic on-going investments that increase pedestrian safety and comfort. It includes community input and reflects current conditions and anticipates changes associated with Expo Light Rail Service. The Plan includes the City\u2019s first statement on Vision Zero, the effort requested by City Council in March 2015 to strive to eliminate roadway fatalities and severe injuries. It builds on the 2010 Land Use and Circulation Element and subsequent implementation efforts.", "The recommendations in the draft Pedestrian Action Plan are based on detailed spatial analysis of where pedestrian demand is highest, where pedestrian facilities could be improved, and where pedestrian collisions have occurred. This detailed approach was taken to maximize the effectiveness of implementation actions going forward. The recommended actions take the form of practices that address how the City completes its day-to-day work, programs to encourage people in the community to safely walk more, and specific infrastructure projects to improve Santa Monica\u2019s walking environment.", "This report summarizes the approach of the plan, explains how it is organized, highlights major recommendations and looks ahead at how it will be implemented. Based on feedback received on the draft plan from the Planning Commission and additional boards, commissions, individuals and community organizations, an errata sheet includes recommended changes from when the draft Pedestrian Action Plan was released in 2015.", "Background", "The 2010 Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) established a comprehensive land use and circulation strategy, emphasizing livability and supporting all types of transportation, including walking. The Circulation Element specifically identifies walking related goals, policies and actions, including:", "\u00b7 Goal T6: Enable everyone to walk comfortably everywhere in Santa Monica", "\u00b7 Goal T7: Ensure that walking is safe for everyone, everywhere in Santa Monica, and", "\u00b7 Goal T8: Provide a beautiful and attractive pedestrian environment throughout the City.", "The Pedestrian Action Plan is a direct implementation of the LUCE and was developed in concert with other LUCE efforts: creating a companion piece to the 2011 Bike Action Plan, incorporating physical improvements identified in the 2013 Bergamot Area Plan, and developed simultaneously with the Draft Downtown Community Plan. The Pedestrian Action Plan implements Council\u2019s March 17, 2015 direction that pedestrian and bicycle mobility and safety are of the utmost importance by pursuing a multi-departmental approach to complete streets and safety, and that the Pedestrian Action Plan should incorporate best practices from initiatives such as Vision Zero and 8 to 80 Cities.", "Council, which has a history of supporting Santa Monica as a walkable community, including specific pedestrian and streetscape improvement projects, supported the creation of the plan and authorized the hiring of consultant assistance at their June 12, 2012 meeting. Following the success of the Bike Action Plan to implement physical and programmatic changes, the Pedestrian Action Plan was a logical next step to further the City\u2019s mobility objectives. The Plan was intended to and accomplishes prioritizing improvements and includes specific analysis regarding the integration of the Expo Light Rail stations into the community.", "Community Feedback", "The Pedestrian Action Plan\u2019s recommended actions focus on addressing community concerns. Over 600 in-person surveys were completed at community events including the Santa Monica Festival and National Night Out. The survey provided information about reasons people walk in Santa Monica and locations where they would like to see changes.", "Two community meetings, including one Planning Commission hosted workshop, enabled people to provide ideas in response to early data analysis in January 2013 and then provide feedback to potential recommendations in September 2014.", "An online forum, which hosted over 1400 unique visitors, extended the opportunity for community members to interact and provide feedback on \u201cthe question of the week,\u201d identify specific areas of concern on maps and vote on ideas submitted by other participants. Discussion about the Plan was also held during meetings with the Commission on the Senior Community, the Recreation and Parks Commission, Disabilities Commission, Chamber of Commerce, and Downtown Santa Monica Inc.", "Throughout the plan development process, in-person and on-line community support for action was consistent, with the most common suggestions including:", "\u00b7 More improved crosswalks", "\u00b7 Separate paths for people riding bicycles and people walking", "\u00b7 Beautiful walking routes with trees, landscaping, public art", "\u00b7 Enforcement of pedestrian related vehicle violations", "\u00b7 Improved lighting at sidewalks, walkways, and intersections", "\u00b7 Clean sidewalks, walkways and beaches", "\u00b7 More, maintained, and visible flashing crosswalks", "\u00b7 Traffic signals with shorter wait times and more time to cross", "\u00b7 Safe and attractive freeway crossings and pedestrian overpasses", "Discussion", "Santa Monica is recognized as a community where residents walk for recreation and to make trips within the City, a community where employees walk for daily errands and community visitors from around the world come to walk along the edge of the Pacific Ocean and through commercial areas. Continued investment and conscious decision-making are imperative to continue to improve safety and to ensure that Santa Monica is a comfortable place to walk.", "The Pedestrian Action Plan recognizes and celebrates walking as a core part of the City\u2019s identity and character, while laying out a specific vision of the future of walking in Santa Monica, priority projects, practices, and programs to guide improvements to the walking environment over the next 15 years. Making coordinated, strategic and continuous investments for pedestrians can make Santa Monica an even better place to walk.", "The Plan continues the City\u2019s longstanding effort to prioritize people walking in its planning and transportation decisions, promoting equity, and ensuring comfort for a wide range of users. The continued evolution of the City and major infrastructure investments such as the new Expo Light Rail line will increase the number of people walking here, and change walking routes. Walking can also improve community health through injury prevention and increased physical activity. The Plan can help to achieve many of the objectives of the Wellbeing Project, which found that one-third of residents cite being stressed all or most of the time and that 52% of Santa Monicans are not active on a daily basis.", "The Plan also reinforces the Council\u2019s priorities of being a Vision Zero and \u20188 to 80\u2019 community. Vision Zero is an international strategy to eliminate all traffic fatalities and severe injuries, while increasing safe, healthy, equitable mobility for all; it is the first goal of the Pedestrian Action Plan and informs the Plan\u2019s recommendations. \u20188 to 80\u2019 communities recognize that a well-designed community works well for residents from 8 years of age (and younger) to 80 years of age (and older); the Plan\u2019s recommendations include a range of actions for a wide range of community members, from school age children to seniors.", "Community Themes", "Hundreds of community members participated in workshops, meetings, online forums, and surveys to help develop the Pedestrian Action Plan. Their input coalesced around the following four essential crosscutting themes which inform the Plan.", "Analytical Approach", "The Pedestrian Action Plan utilized detailed analysis of land use patterns, community input, collision history, pedestrian environment, socio-economic factors and anticipated demand for walking based on destinations and the opening of the Expo Light Rail line to develop a robust and fact-based plan of action. Relying on data analysis enables the Pedestrian Action Plan to estimate:", "\u00b7 How many people are walking and where", "\u00b7 The current quality of the pedestrian environment", "\u00b7 How well the current pedestrian network and infrastructure works for walking", "Today, biannual intersection counts show that people walking outnumber vehicles at some of the City\u2019s busiest intersections, particularly in Downtown and near the Beach. Detailed future demand modeling considered residential density, community destinations such as parks and schools, transit hubs, commercial areas, and household characteristics such as vehicle ownership and income. Over 18 percent of Santa Monica is identified as a high demand area for walking, and demand is increasing on streets that have been designed to prioritize regional traffic, in part because of their rich transit and commercial services.", "Figure 1. Pedestrian Counts at Intersections", "Santa Monica is fortunate to have a relatively consistent street and alley system that supports many pathways to destinations. This grid system breaks down with a limited number of streets that cross the I-10 freeway and Pacific Coast Highway, and sometimes limited and challenging conditions crossing major boulevards with multiple lanes of vehicle traffic. Higher speed limits on these streets result in increased severity of injury when crashes occur. Sidewalks are provided on almost 95 percent of Santa Monica streets, and the Plan prioritizes closing the remaining gaps. Pedestrian scale lighting is much more limited, however, and providing adequate sidewalk width and evening illumination to meet increasing demand for walking, through discrete capital improvement projects focused on areas near transit is a priority going forward.", "Figure 2. Conditions that Deter Walking", "The analysis reveals that current walkway facilities will not meet the demand near the Expo Light Rail station areas at Bergamot, Memorial Parking and Downtown.", "Safety was cited as a primary concern for most community members, and a significant factor in the feeling of comfort while walking. Analysis of collision data from 2001-2012 showed an average of 100 reported injury collisions per year. Seniors and youth were disproportionately represented relative to their share of the population. Police reports indicate that approximately 70 percent of crashes were associated with driver failure to yield, indicating that solutions must involve all roadway users. Pedestrians were crossing in a marked crosswalk in over 65 percent of collisions. Many crashes occurred with drivers turning left at signalized intersections or proceeding straight through intersections with two way stop controls.", "These analyses of pedestrian demand, performance and facilities were used to carefully determine recommendations that serve the needs of all road users and improve walking convenience and safety in Santa Monica.", "Plan Policies and Actions", "The Pedestrian Action Plan includes goals and policies that set citywide direction in key areas related to walking such as supporting safety, eliminating barriers such as difficult crossings, increasing education efforts and promoting health and sustainability through walking. Most importantly, the Plan identifies a coordinated set of practices, programs, and projects that will improve the City\u2019s walking environment over the next 15 years.", "Practices", "Practices describe how City departments approach their daily activities. Some of the most important new practices include elevating pedestrian design concerns in the development and design of all city projects. Maintenance and enforcement practices are also suggested. The Plan recommends that pedestrian upgrades be incorporated into maintenance efforts so they become a day-to-day part of operating activities and budgets. Pursuing strategies to reduce maximum speed limits and increase compliance with posted speeds are proposed to decrease the incidence of crashes and to reduce injury severity when crashes occur.", "Programs", "Programs provide encouragement, outreach, education and a human touch to support walking in Santa Monica. Complementary programs proposed in the Plan include the Vision Zero Santa Monica safety and design program, pedestrian safety campaigns, Safe Routes to School, and a comprehensive wayfinding and signage program. Safe Routes to School programs are geared toward teaching kids about the \u201crules of the road\u201d and encouraging them to take active transportation to school. Programs provide an opportunity to partner with community organizations and institutions to increase participation and create a culture where walking is a preferred mode of travel. Some programs include the use of operational funds to make incremental improvements in the city\u2019s street network, such as traffic signal timing and pavement markings.", "Figure 3. Recommended Immediate and Future Programs", "Infrastructure", "The Plan identifies over 100 individual opportunities to meaningfully improve the pedestrian experience through new or enhanced facilities such as crosswalks, curb extensions, wider sidewalks, signals, and pedestrian amenities. Infrastructure projects were informed by community-expressed values. These values were prioritized in the form of criteria that accounted for: access to rapid transit, high collision corridors and intersections, and areas of concentrated jobs and housing. Projects that enhance connections to community assets and serve existing demand such as the Downtown, schools, parks, and the beach are particularly prevalent in the Plan. These improvements are anticipated to positively affect the most residents, although they are primarily located in commercial areas. Projects range from large-scale infrastructure projects previously identified, such as better accommodating pedestrians on the northern portion of the Beach Path, to more fine-grained changes, such as installing parklets along Main Street or creating sidewalks on the eastern end of Olympic Boulevard.", "Figure 4. 5, 10 and 15 year Capital Improvement Projects", "The Plan calls for the various capital projects to be completed within a 5-year, 10-year, or 15-year timeframe, depending on project readiness, funding, and priority. Short-term projects include new curb ramps, signal timing changes, pavement markings along paths to schools, sidewalks leading to Bergamot Station, and pedestrian scrambles in Downtown. Longer-term projects include a number of greenways, lighting, reconfigured intersections, new median refuge islands, relocated transit stops, and investing in a streetscape plan for Santa Monica Boulevard. Other important infrastructure improvements \u2013 such as the long-planned capping or bridging over portions of Interstate 10 to link Downtown and the Civic Center \u2013 are not specifically called out in the Plan but would be coordinated with the Plan\u2019s pedestrian improvements. The combined cost of all projects is estimated at $187,000,000.", "Technical Appendices", "The Plan includes a number of technical resources related to design and project implementation. These will be included as technical appendices that accompany the final document:", "\u00b7 Appendix A contains specific examples for capital improvements that can be used to support funding applications and further the timely implementation of projects", "\u00b7 Appendix B provides detailed information about potential funding sources.", "\u00b7 Appendix C examines First Mile-Last Mile pedestrian access to bus and light rail service.", "\u00b7 Appendix D contains a Pedestrian Design Toolkit, which will be leveraged during design and planning of future improvements.", "Measuring and Monitoring", "Finally, the Plan establishes a monitoring and evaluation strategy to ensure the City is meeting the stated goals over time. The Planning Commission reviewed the plan\u2019s initial recommendation that trends regarding the number of pedestrians observed, the amount, type and location of crashes, what percentage of trips are made by walking, and student participation rates in Safe Routes to School events should be tracked. The Planning Commission recommended that fewer and the most meaningful measures be tracked. Staff recommends:", "\u00b7 Vision Zero Progress as measured by number of pedestrian fatalities and severe injuries,", "\u00b7 Percent of all trips made by walking as measured through a biannual transportation survey, and", "\u00b7 Number of constructed transportation operations and capital improvement projects that support the pedestrian infrastructure, described on a citywide map.", "Measuring and monitoring are essential to make informed investment decisions to improve the pedestrian environment and experience in Santa Monica.", "Plan Feedback to Date", "The Draft Pedestrian Action Plan was released for public review and comment on October 15, 2015. Multiple City commissions and task forces have expressed interest in the Pedestrian Action Plan and have provided input throughout the development of the plan. Through December 2015 public presentations have been made to the Commission for the Senior Community, the Parks and Recreation Commission, Downtown Santa Monica Inc., the Chamber of Commerce Government Affairs Committee, Santa Monica Travel and Tourism, Northeast Neighbors, and Mid-City Neighbors.", "Feedback on the plan has been positive overall. There has been widespread interest in encouraging more people to walk in Santa Monica and support for the concept that pedestrian safety is a shared responsibility \u2013 that pedestrians, cyclists and drivers all need to take more responsibility to create a better environment for pedestrians. The conversations have netted specific geographic recommendations. Recommended changes come in the form of adding streets that had not previously been identified for pedestrian improvements, but would benefit from them, such as Montana Avenue\u2019s neighborhood commercial district or Airport Avenue. Other recommendations include changing the priorities of projects, such as moving certain projects from a ten year completion horizon to a five year completion horizon. There are also recommended changes to the recommended monitoring of the effectiveness of the plan as requested by the Planning Commission. Recommended changes to the draft plan are detailed in the errata sheet, Attachment D.", "Planning Commission Recommendation", "The Planning Commission considered the plan at their December 2, 2015 meeting. The Planning Commission unanimously recommended the Council approve the plan. The positive feedback on practices, programs, and policies was paired with recommendations that:", "\u00b7 Metrics should be fewer in number and focused on the effectiveness of the plan", "\u00b7 Additional projects should be pursued in the 5 year time frame, emphasizing projects that could make locations with a history of crashes safer, improve access to Expo and improve access to schools.", "Environmental Analysis", "An Initial Study and Negative Declaration (IS/ND) was prepared pursuant to Sections 15063(c) and 15070 of the California Environmental Quality Act Guidelines and the City of Santa Monica CEQA Guidelines to address the potential environmental effects of the policies, programs and projects identified in the Pedestrian Action Plan (Attachment C). Based on the analysis provided within the IS/ND, the adoption of the Pedestrian Action Plan will not result in significant impacts on the environment. No mitigation measures were identified in the IS/ND and none were needed to reduce the severity of an identified impact. The Pedestrian Action Plan is a programmatic document; future individual projects identified in the Plan will be subject to environmental review on a project-by-project basis to determine compliance with CEQA.", "The Draft Initial Study/Negative Declaration was circulated for a 20-day public review period from October 27, 2015 to November 17, 2015. No comments were received.", "Next Steps", "Once adopted, the Plan will guide the City practices, programs and project implementation efforts. It will be used to shape department work plans, staffing efforts and applications for funding from external soures and outside grant opportunities. To monitor implementation, a biannual pedestrian report card for the Pedestrian Action Plan will be published using key qualitative and quantitative data. The report card will inform future efforts to support Plan goals based on the indicators established by the Plan. Funding for the ongoing and one time investments will be requested through the City\u2019s budgeting process. When the Bike Action Plan was adopted in 2011, the Council allocated funds to jump start implementation at the same time. Without dedicated funds, staff will pursue other funding opportunities should they become available.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Amendment to the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt a Resolution amending the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street changing the zoning from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "During the update of the Zoning Ordinance in 2015, the parcel located at 1419 19th Street was identified as a parcel where the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) land use designation was inadvertently changed from a commercial designation to a residential designation during the LUCE update. The Council consequently amended the LUCE Map for 1419 19th Street returning it to a commercial designation; however, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time. In order to make the zoning of the subject parcel consistent with the land use designation of the LUCE Map, the Official Districting Map needs to be amended changing the zoning of the property from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC). This report recommends that Council adopt a Resolution amending the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street changing the zoning from R2 to GC.", "Background", "On May 12, 2015 (Attachment B), Council introduced for first reading an Ordinance to adopt a new Zoning Ordinance, new zoning and land use related chapters, and a new final Official Districting Map. Council also directed staff to commence procedures to amend the LUCE Map designation of 1419 19th Street from a Low Density Residential designation to a General Commercial designation. This land use designation change would be consistent with the commercial zoning in existence at the time for the subject parcel and allow for the continued commercial use of the parcel.", "On June 3, 2015 (Attachment C), the Planning Commission voted to recommend to Council the adoption of a resolution to amend the LUCE Map for 1419 19th Street. On June 23, 2015 (Attachment D), the Council adopted a resolution approving the LUCE Map amendment changing the land use designation of 1419 19th Street to General Commercial. However, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time.", "In order to make the zoning of the subject parcel consistent with the land use designation of the LUCE Map, the Official Districting Map needs to be amended changing the zoning of the property from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC).", "The Planning Commission adopted a Resolution of Intention on November 18, 2015 (Attachment E) to consider this amendment to the Official Districting Map.", "On December 16, 2015 (Attachment F), the Planning Commission reviewed the proposed map amendment. The map amendment was technically denied as a motion to recommend approval of the map amendment failed by a vote of 3-3 with one Commissioner absent. Several Commissioners expressed concern that a commercially zoned property could result in a new medical office or auto dealership use on the subject site adjacent to residential uses to the south. Pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 9.46.070(A), within 14 days after the Planning Commission action, the owner of the subject property filed a request for a hearing by the City Council on the proposed map amendment.", "Discussion", "1419 19th Street is located on the east side of 19th Street south of Santa Monica Boulevard. A one-story commercial building is located adjacent to the north. Multi-unit residential buildings are located adjacent to the south and across an alley to the east. An auto repair building is located across 19th Street to the west.", "The parcel is currently vacant but has historically been zoned and used commercially. Zoning maps dating back to 1960 show the subject parcel zoned commercially (C4). In 2007 the Planning Commission unanimously approved a hotel annex project for the site that, although was never constructed, supported the appropriateness of the parcel for a commercial project.", "Location and existing zoning - 1419 19th Street", "Address", "APN", "Existing LUCE Designation", "Existing Zoning", "Proposed Zoning Change", "1419 19th St", "4275009018", "General Commercial", "Low Density Residential (R2)", "General Commercial (GC)", "Council amended the LUCE Map designation of 1419 19th Street from a Low Density Residential designation to a General Commercial designation when it adopted the new Zoning Ordinance. However, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time. The approved land use designation change is consistent with the commercial zoning in existence at the time for the subject parcel and allows for the continued commercial use of the parcel. The subject amendment to the Official Districting Map will make the zoning of 1419 19th Street consistent with its existing land use designation.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one annual vacancy on the Clean Beaches Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee for a term ending on 12/31/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1518226200": [[{"Title": "First Modification to Contract #3021 for Commercial Real Estate Leasing Services for the Santa Monica Airport", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement No. 3021 (CCS) in the amount of $180,000 with Corporate Realty Group (\u201cCRG\u201d), a California-based corporation, to provide additional commercial real estate leasing services for the Santa Monica Airport. This will result in a one year amended agreement expiring on June 30, 2016 in the amount of $259,990 with two one-year options to renew in the amount of $50,000 per year at the sole discretion of the City for a total amount not to exceed $359,990 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.Authorize the City Manager to amend professional services agreement No. 3021 (CCS) to include a provision for payment of a one-time commission on month-to-month lease negotiation services at a rate equal to one and one half month\u2019s rent.3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On July 1, 2015, the City entered into a Professional Services Agreement (PSA) with CRG to provide assistance to City staff with lease negotiations at Santa Monica Airport. Agreement No. 3021 expires on June 30, 2016 with two one-year options to renew at the sole discretion of the City. Staff anticipates that brokerage service needs in the current fiscal year will exceed the current agreement amount, and anticipates that services will be needed in future fiscal years as City\u2013owned real estate assets at the Airport will require lease renegotiations.", "Therefore, staff recommends a first modification to increase the PSA with CRG by $180,000 with two annual renewals of $50,000, for a total agreement amount not to exceed $359,990 for additional commercial lease negotiation and brokerage services for the Santa Monica Airport. Staff recommends that the contractual terms of compensation to CRG be modified to include a provision for a one-time commission payment when CRG negotiates month-to-month leases (the current contract terms provide compensation for longer term lease negotiations). The commission payment for month-to-month term leases would be equal to one and one half month\u2019s rent.", "Background", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A) Council directed staff to contract for real estate brokerage services to assist city staff with negotiating leases for City-owned properties at the Santa Monica Airport. On July 13, 2015, the City entered into Professional Services Agreement No. 3021 (CCS) with CRG for an amount not to exceed $79,990 to provide assistance to City staff in negotiating leased properties located at Santa Monica Airport, including brokerage services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.", "Discussion", "Based on market valuations of real estate properties at the Airport and the current contractual terms with CRG, the cost of the additional services required would exceed the present contracted amount. In the immediate short-term, the recent vacancy of 2800 Donald Douglas Loop North requires broker services. Staff anticipates that a standard commission of negotiated lease revenue for the term of the agreement will be paid during FY2015-16 for this property. Securing CRG\u2019s services for this vacancy and future vacancies that may arise would require increasing the current agreement by $180,000 and appropriating budget from the Airport Fund. CRG\u2019s expertise to attract new tenants and negotiate optimal lease terms will ensure that the City receives maximum revenue from Airport properties. It should be noted that commissions are paid on services rendered and the funds requested in this contract modification are based on anticipated lease vacancies that may occur during the contract period. Staff also recommends an allocation of an additional $50,000 for FY2016-17 and $50,000 for FY2017-18 anticipating that various additional leaseholds might become available or be renegotiated during that period. An Airport Leasing Policy will be brought to Council for consideration during the upcoming months.", "Under the current terms of their agreement with the City, provisions for CRG\u2019s compensation are based on longer term leases and it is silent for month-to-month lease term. Staff recommends that the agreement be amended to provide CRG with a compensation structure for month-to-month leases. Compensation for negotiations and broker services for month-to-month leases would be a one-time commission payment equal to one and one half month\u2019s rent.", "Staff recommends a first modification to increase the agreement amount by $180,000 with two annual renewals of $50,000, for a total agreement amount not to exceed $359,990 with CRG for additional commercial lease negotiation and broker services for the Santa Monica Airport; and a modification of the contract compensation terms to include one-time commission payments for month-to-month lease negotiations at a commission rate equal to one and one half month\u2019s rent.", "Consultant Selection", "On April 1, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals for commercial real estate firms to act as a leasing agent. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Responses for the RFP were due by April 24, 2015. One hundred and thirty four (134) vendors were notified, and 21 vendors downloaded the RFP. Five proposals were received and publicly opened on May 11, 2015. The Airport Division of the Public Works Department and Housing and Economic Development staff evaluated proposals based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 and listed in the RFP including, real estate and leasing experience, references, project work plans and timelines, management team qualifications, and cost. Staff selected CRG for non-aviation properties as the best qualified firm to assist City staff in negotiating master leases and single tenancy leases at the Santa Monica Airport, including broker services for vacancies that might arise within the contract period.", "CRG was selected based on the depth and breadth of their training and proven experience in the area of expertise required; their efficiency and timeliness in completion of projects, and their positive references. Additionally, CRG\u2019s rates are competitive with the other proposal submitted.Based on these criteria, staff selected CRG as the best qualified to provide professional services as a Leasing Agent.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to CRG is $180,000 with two one-year options for renewal at $50,000 per year for an amended agreement total not to exceed $359,990.", "Award of the agreement modification requires the following FY 2015-16 budget change:", "Appropriate $180,000 from the Airport Fund to account 33431.555060 in FY 2015-16 to fund the agreement modification.", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval.#1"]}, {"Title": "Software Subscription Agreement for an Electronic Patient Care Records System and Fire Records Management System", "Department": "Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support", "Sponsors": "Interim Fire Chief Dennis J. Downs", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP#37 to ESO Solutions, Inc, a Texas -based company for an Electronic Patient Care Record System and Fire Records Management system;2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a software subscription agreement with ESO Solutions, Inc, at a cost of $121,890, with two additional one-year renewal options, for total amount not to exceed $223,404 (including 10% contingency) over a five-year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval; and3. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts & Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Fire Department is required to document all Emergency Medical Services (EMS) provided by an Emergency Medical Technician or Paramedic to the public. These incident reports are submitted to local, county, state and federal agencies. Under federal guidelines, the City is required to implement a paperless certified Electronic Patient Care Reporting (EPCR) system that meets the data guidelines, requirements and standards implemented by the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services (DHS) and the US Department of Health and Human Services Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPPA) for collection transmittal and storage of patient data. The City\u2019s current system, FireMed Pro, is dependent on the collection of patient information on paper forms, which does not meet federal guidelines. To comply with the new guidelines effective December 2016, staff recommends executing a software subscription agreement with ESO Solutions, Inc, to implement an EPCR and Fire Records Management system at a cost of $121,890, with two additional one-year renewal options, for total amount not to exceed $223,404 (including 10% contingency) over five years.", "Background", "On September 25, 2007 (Attachment A), Council authorized an agreement with Proper LLC for the purchase of FireMed Pro software and equipment to implement an EMS/Patient Care Tracking and Reporting System. On September 23, 2008 (Attachment B), Council authorized a first modification of the agreement to expand the system by adding one FireMed Pro workstation. On September 8, 2015 (Attachment C), Council authorized a second modification to the software license agreement for maintenance and support, customizations and upgrade services. On November 10, 2015 (Attachment D), Council authorized a first modification to the software maintenance and support agreement, as it was determined that the second modification to the purchase and license agreement was not necessary.", "Current federal mandate requires that all medical records in the United States be collected and transmitted in an electronic format. FireMed Pro is dependent on the collection of patient information on paper forms, it does not meet the new federal guidelines.", "Discussion", "The Fire Department responds to more than 16,000 fire and emergency medical incidents annually. Incident reports are completed for every dispatched fire and emergency medical response. Incident reports contain demographic information as well as specific information regarding patient treatment. Reports also classify incidents by type specified by federal standards as well as document the actions taken by field personnel. The new system allows for better quality assurance reviews and quality improvement mandates and meets HIPPA requirements. These incident reports are transmitted to the County of Los Angeles, State Fire Marshal, Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) and National Fire Incident Reporting System (NFIRS). This process is critical for local, state and national reporting and data analysis. It is required to meet local, state and federal reporting mandates and for receipt of grant funding. All of the Santa Monica Fire Department's reports are submitted to another agency.", "The reports are used by the Fire Department for tracking, analyzing and improving the quality of medical services and emergency response operations, including response times and service effectiveness.", "ESO Solutions, Inc. offers an integrated Electronic Patient Care Record System and Fire Records Management system that allows fire personnel to prepare electronic incident reports that meet the needs of the Fire Department, as well as the mandates for local, state and federal electronic reporting. The ESO system utilizes software, which enables the collection of information electronically from the incident location, reducing errors in fire and emergency medical reporting and streamlining the communication of patient care information to medical care facilities. Staff recommends executing a software subscription agreement with ESO Solutions, Inc. to implement an EPCR and Fire Records Management system at a cost of $121,890, with two additional one-year renewal options, for total amount not to exceed $223,404 (including 10% contingency) over five years.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "On July 8, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for an Electronic Patient Care Records System and Fire Records Management System. The RFP was posted on the City's on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 918 vendors were notified and 70 vendors downloaded the RFP. Three firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Fire and Information Systems Departments.", "Evaluation was based on the following selection criteria: experience, references, project team, cost and an on-site demonstration. Staff then interviewed two shortlisted firms. Staff recommends ESO Solutions, Inc. as the best qualified firm to provide a fully integrated fire records management system and electronic patient care records system based on their competitive pricing, ability to meet the business requirements of the Fire Department and local, state and federal reporting mandates.  ESO Solutions, Inc. offered the lowest price product. Additionally, ESO Solutions, Inc. has a proven record of implementing similar systems nationwide including the City of Palo Alto, City of Novato, and Marin County in California.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The Fire Department received a County of Los Angeles Measure B grant to fund up to $87,500 of the total cost of the project. The grant requires a City match of $87,500, which requires an appropriation of $27,500 in the Capital Improvement Program (CIP) account C019048.589000. The grant related funding for the project totals $175,000.", "The contract to be awarded to ESO Solutions, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed $223,404. Funds in the amount of $121,890 are available in the FY 2015-16 CIP budget in accounts C209048.589000 ($87,500) and C019048.589000 ($34,390). Hardware costs in the amount of $53,110 will be charged to account C019048.589000 once a vendor is selected. Future year funding for this contract in the amount of $101,514 is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Bergamot Advisory Committee Extension of Service", "Department": "Economic Development Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that Council extend the term of the Bergamot Advisory Committee until April 2016 in order to provide the committee with additional time to complete their review and finalize their recommendations on the conceptual project plan for the revitalization of the City-owned Bergamot Station Arts Center property.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on February 10, 2015 (Attachment A), Council created an advisory committee to help shape the future of the City-owned Bergamot Station Arts Center property. The role of the committee is to work with the WortheReal Estate Group and City staff to evaluate and identify the appropriate mix of uses and review and comment on the conceptual plan for the property, in accordance with the Council-adopted guidelines for the property. The timeline for the Committee\u2019s work was identified as six to nine months, and the Committee has been meeting monthly since April 2015. However, the Committee has not completed its review or recommendations and staff requests Council allow the Committee an additional three months to complete the assignment.", "Background", "On September 9, 2014 (Attachment B), Council authorized exclusive negotiations with Worthe Real Estate Group (Worthe Group) for the revitalization of the City-owned portion of Bergamot Station Arts Center (Arts Center) at 2525 Michigan Avenue (Site) and directed staff to develop a recommendation on the formation of an advisory committee (Advisory Committee) to participate in shaping the project. OnFebruary10,2015, Council approved a proposal for the creation of an eleven\u2011member Advisory Committee including four representatives of the BergamotStation Gallery and Cultural Association, four neighborhood association representatives from the Santa Monica Neighborhood Council, and one representative each from the Santa Monica Arts Commission, Chamber of Commerce, and Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (see Attachment A). In addition, Council adopted a set of Guidelines for the revitalization of the Site, and defined the role of the AdvisoryCommittee. Staff initially estimated that the Advisory Committee would require six to nine months to review the Worthe Group\u2019s conceptual plan for the Site and make their recommendations on the five key deliverables for the Arts Center: parking management strategy, construction phasing, urban design and site management strategy, infrastructure and Site improvements, and elements of an Arts Center management plan.", "Discussion", "The Advisory Committee first met on April 15, 2015, and has held monthly public meetings with the Worthe Group and City staff to review the conceptual plan and provide input, feedback, and recommendations. Staff created a project website to provide the Advisory Committee and the public with an accessible resource of the committee meeting minutes, agendas, and materials presented in the Advisory Committee meetings. To date, the Advisory Committee has conducted significant due diligence as well as evaluated, identified, and approved the amount and mix of uses for the Site and commented on all five elements of the key deliverables. However, the Advisory Committee seeks additional time in order to complete their review and finalize their recommendations.  Specifically, the Advisory Committee seeks additional time to continue to discuss and adopt formal recommendations on the following key deliverables for the Site: parking management strategy, final urban design and Site management strategy, infrastructure and overall Site improvements, and the Arts Center management plan. The Advisory Committee has committed to completing their analysis and recommendations by April and staff is confident that the committee will be able to finalize their work within the next three months and is therefore recommending the extension.", "Following Council\u2019s selection of the Worthe Real Estate Team, the City entered into an Exclusive Negotiation Agreement (ENA) with the Worthe Group on April 30, 2015. TheENA schedule anticipates that the Worthe Group would submit design concept plans for Council review (in its proprietary role) following completion of the Advisory Committee process. If Council approves the extension of time for the Advisory Committee\u2019s work, the ENA schedule would be adjusted accordingly.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required."]}, {"Title": "California Incline Pedestrian Overcrossing Funding Adjustment", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Amend Action #2 of Item 3.I on the November 10, 2015 agenda and authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a separate contract in lieu of a first modification to contract #10025 with MCM Construction, Inc. in an amount not to exceed $1,900,000 for construction of the California Incline Pedestrian Overcrossing.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In conjunction with the work being done on the California Incline, the City is working to repair and rebuild the California Incline Pedestrian Overcrossing (Overcrossing) and the Idaho Trail (Trail) that scales the bluff from the beach to Palisades Park. This project addressed the need to replace the Overcrossing, improve drainage, mitigate bluff erosion, and improve the usability of the Trail. The Overcrossing and Trail project is locally funded and in compliance with the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) environmental regulations per previous City action. The project is categorically exempt per Sections 150302 and 150304 of the CEQA Guidelines.", "On November 10, 2015, Council approved the inclusion of the Overcrossing and Trail Project by modifying MCM\u2019s existing contract. MCM is the construction company currently building the California Incline Bridge and Roadway. This requires adding a new scope of services for MCM to complete its work. However, modifying the existing MCM contract would activate federal regulations and require that it meet National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) environmental regulations. Staff was informed by Caltrans Local Assistance that obtaining NEPA approval would require additional studies, environmental reports, and reviews that would likely add nine to twelve months to the project timeline. Therefore, staff recommends entering into a separate contract with MCM to alleviate the need to initiate a new and separate Federal NEPA process (while still conforming with equally stringent California CEQA requirements). This would keep the project on schedule for completion before July 3, 2016 (barring any weather delays). The project will remain within the $1,900,000 budget previously authorized.", "Background", "The Overcrossing crosses over the California Incline Bridge and Roadway between Ocean Avenue and Pacific Coast Highway (PCH). The Trail goes diagonally up the bluff to Palisades Park and exits near Idaho Avenue. To the west, the Trail and Overcrossing connect to another pedestrian overcrossing (owned by Caltrans) that goes over PCH, providing pedestrian access to the beach from Palisades Park (Attachment B).", "Bi-annual inspection reports for the Overcrossing performed by the Los Angeles County Department of Public Works (LACDPW) per an agreement with Caltrans, have consistently given the Overcrossing a poor structural rating. These reports have indicated the need to repair the delamination and spalling in the deck surface, patch spalls in the south girder, replace missing tie wires in the bottom of the pedestrian fence, and rebuild the east slope to stabilize the staircase and walkway.", "On April 2, 2014, TY Lin  (the structural engineer that designed the California Incline Bridge and Roadway) completed a Structural Assessment Report for the Overcrossing and Trail to provide a more detailed and thorough assessment than the LACDPW bi-annual reports. TY Lin are experts in civil and structural engineering and are considered by staff to be well-qualified to assess this structure. This report concluded that a portion of the Overcrossing should be replaced, and the structure is in need of seismic retrofitting and rehabilitation work to patch concrete. Additionally, recommendations were made to improve the bridge aesthetics. The report also suggests improvements to the Trail which has numerous erosion and drainage maintenance issues.", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment C), Council awarded a construction contract to MCM Construction, Inc. (MCM), in an amount not to exceed $15,690,211 for the construction of the California Incline. On August 25, 2015 (Attachment D), Council awarded a professional services agreement to TY Lin to provide engineering design services for the Overcrossing and Trail Project in an amount not to exceed $411,827. On August 28, 2015 the City processed and filed a CEQA Notice of Exemption completing the CEQA process.", "On November 10, 2015 (Attachment A), Council approved the conceptual layout of the Overcrossing and authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute a modification to the existing MCM contract in an amount not to exceed $1.9 million for the construction of the Overcrossing.", "Discussion", "After the November 10, 2015 Council approval of the bridge layout and authorization to modify the contract, staff continued the design process and began pursuing the construction of the Overcrossing and Trail project as a modification to the existing MCM contract. The existing MCM contract is for work that is paid for primarily from Federal Transportation funds.  By being part of the same contract, the Overcrossing and Trail project became subject to the requirements of the Federal Highway Administration. Federal Highway Administration projects approval process is administered through Caltrans. Caltrans requested that the City obtain revalidation of the existing NEPA document for the California Incline due to the increased scope of work created by the addition of the Overcrossing to this project. After a kick-off meeting with Caltrans, City staff expected the revalidation to be a quick process and provided Caltrans with a new Preliminary Environmental Study (PES) as requested. The City undertook the CEQA review of the Overcrossing earlier in the year. Based upon this review, the proposed Overcrossing is categorically exempt from CEQA pursuant to Section 15302 and 15304 of the CEQA Guidelines. On August 25, 2015, the City processed and filed a CEQA Notice of Exemption completing the CEQA process.", "In response, Caltrans requested additional project information and instructed the City to complete an updated Finding of Effect (FOE) (included in the initial Environmental Impact Report / Environmental Assessment) because of the potential visual impacts caused by the addition of the Overcrossing.  This FOE would then need to be reviewed and approved by both the Caltrans and the State Historic Preservation Officer (SHPO), resulting in additional agreement with the Federal Highway Administration. These processes could likely add four to 12 months to the project timeline. This would require the California Incline closure to be extended for an additional 12 months, or require the City to open the Incline, then close it at a later date for a second time to complete the Pedestrian Overcrossing work.", "Caltrans staff suggested that the best course of action to keep the project moving forward in a timely manner and minimize delay in the California Incline opening would be to construct the project under a new contract with MCM. The Overcrossing and Trail project only utilizes City funds. By not combining this portion of the contract with the broader California Incline Bridge Replacement work that utilizes federal funds, the Overcrossing and Trail would not be required to adhere to NEPA regulations. By utilizing a separate contract, the project would only need to meet to CEQA regulations, which had been completed in August 2015.", "Contractor Selection", "On October 27, 2014, the City published Bid #SP2059 for the California Incline Bridge Replacement Project, which is currently being constructed by MCM. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press and the Los Angeles Times in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The City Clerk\u2019s office received five sealed bids, which were publicly opened by the Deputy City Clerk on December 16, 2014.", "The bids were evaluated based on competitive pricing, understanding of the project\u2019s scope, direct experience with similar projects, approach to the work, technical competence, qualifications of the proposed staff, and the ability to meet the project schedule. Staff verified with the Contractors State License Board that MCM Construction\u2019s license is current, active, and in good standing. Staff contacted reference agencies listed by the contractor to ascertain past performance on similar projects. Based on these criteria, staff recommended MCM as the best bidder for the construction of the California Incline Bridge Replacement Project. This recommended action was approved by City Council on January 27, 2015.", "The choice to utilize MCM for the construction of the Overcrossing and Trail projects without initiating a new competitive bidding process is not normally utilized, but applied in this unusual case due to cost savings, expediency in construction, and overall benefit to the community.  The City\u2019s Municipal Code Section 2.24.080 \u201cExceptions to Competitive Bidding\u201d, section 2.24.080(b) states that competitive bidding is not applicable when \u201ccompetitive bid procedures have already been utilized\u201d and when \u201cservices can be provided to the City at the same or better price\u201d. Competitive bid procedures were utilized when selecting MCM for the California Incline Bridge Replacement Project. Staff is confident that the Overcrossing and Trail projects, attached to the Incline, can be constructed by MCM at a better price than other qualified potential bidders because of low mobilization costs, a lower cost of labor due to the construction crew\u2019s expertise and familiarity with the existing site, and traffic control cost savings due to not having to install and uninstall new traffic control measures for the re-closure and re-opening of the California Incline.", "In addition to the costs savings associated with utilizing MCM to perform the Overcrossing and Trail work, there is also significantly less public disruption with this scenario. If the project were competitively bid as a separate project, the California Incline would need to be closed to the public during the duration of the California Incline Bridge project again in the future for the Overcrossing construction. Contracting with MCM to perform the work now while they are already on site completing the California Incline Bridget Replacement will avoid future circulation disruptions.", "Next Steps", "TY Lin would continue with the expedited design and prepare construction plans and specifications. The plans and specifications would be reviewed by City departments, and upon approval, MCM and the City would negotiate a final price and execute a new contract. The project would then be expeditiously constructed.", "Alternatives", "If the City does not authorize the execution of a separate contract with MCM for construction of the Overcrossing and Trail then that project could only be completed after the California Incline is reopened to the public. This option would require a second closure of the California Incline which would significantly increase project costs through new bidding process, additional traffic control to close the incline a second time, and further inconvenience the public through the closure of the roadway during the second construction period.", "Construction Schedule", "Staff estimates that construction of the Overcrossing and Trail will add an additional two to three months to the closure of the California Incline. The California Incline Bridge project began on April 20, 2015 and is scheduled to be completed by April 20, 2016. With the Overcrossing construction added, it\u2019s estimated both structures and the Trail would be completed by July 3, 2016 (not including potential weather related delays). If this contract is not approved the delay for necessary Federal approvals could result in a 4 to 12 month delay prior to start of construction.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There are no immediate financial impacts or budget actions required as a result of this recommendation. The contract to be executed with MCM Construction is for an amount not to exceed $1,900,000, which is the same amount that was approved on November 10, 2015 for the MCM contract modification. The $1,900,000 will now be used for a separate contract with MCM to complete the Overcrossing. Funds are available in the", "FY2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget. The contract will be charged to the following accounts:", "C010678.589000  $1,700,000", "C040678.589000  $ 200,000", "TOTAL  $1,900,000"]}], [{"Title": "Introduction and first reading of an Ordinance of the City Council of the City of Santa Monica establishing speed limits pursuant to an Engineering and Traffic Survey and the California Vehicle Code and amending the Santa Monica Municipal Code.", "Department": "Parking Operations (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance to revise speed limits for certain City streets pursuant to the California Vehicle Code and amending Santa Monica Municipal Code (\u201cSMMC\u201d) section 3.12.490.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "By adopting this ordinance, Council will be acting under the authority granted to the City by the California Vehicle Code (\"VC\"), which authorizes local authorities to increase local speed limits under certain specified conditions (VC \u00a7 22357), decrease local speed limits under certain specified conditions (VC \u00a7 22358), and decrease local speed limits on roadways less than 25 feet in width (VC \u00a7 22358.4). If adopted, this ordinance would adjust the speed limits for ten (10) street segments.", "If adopted, this ordinance would also remove ten (10) street segments from the ordinance, resulting in a prima facie speed limit of 25 mph for these segments in accordance with VC section 22357. The reason for removal is that these segments were erroneously included in the 2013 survey that was the basis of Council's adoption of SMMC section 3.12.490 in 2014. Local streets have a prima facie limit of 25 mph and they do not need to be surveyed unless the City desires to increase the limit based upon an engineering survey.", "Background", "SMMC section 3.12.490 currently sets speed limits for certain City streets based upon an engineering and traffic survey completed in 2013. The current ordinance was adopted by Council at the June 10, 2014 meeting.", "The adoption of section 3.12.490 in 2014 was based upon a 2013 survey that included ten (10) street segments that should not have been surveyed because they were not intended to have speed limits greater than 25 mph, which is the prima facie speed limit for local streets, pursuant to Vehicle Code section 22357. Staff is therefore recommending that these street segments be removed from SMMC section 3.12.490.", "The California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) requires that speed limits be established at the nearest 5 mile per hour increment of the 85th percentile speed of free-flowing traffic. The MUTCD allows for one 5 mile per hour reduction when conditions not readily apparent are documented. No further reductions can be applied.", "The Vehicle Code also provides that a local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, determine and declare prima facie speed limits as follows:", "VC \u00a7 22357. (a) Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that a speed greater than 25 miles per hour would facilitate the orderly movement of vehicular traffic and would be reasonable and safe upon any street other than a state highway otherwise subject to a prima facie limit of 25 miles per hour, the local authority may by ordinance determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 30, 35, 40, 45, 50, 55, or 60 miles per hour or a maximum speed limit of 65 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate to facilitate the orderly movement of traffic and is reasonable and safe. The declared prima facie or maximum speed limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street and shall not thereafter be revised except upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey.", "VC \u00a7 22358. (a) Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the limit of 65 miles per hour is more than is reasonable or safe upon any portion of any street other than a state highway where the limit of 65 miles per hour is applicable, the local authority may by ordinance determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 60, 55, 50, 45, 40, 35, 30, or 25 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate to facilitate the orderly movement of traffic and is reasonable and safe, which declared prima facie limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street.", "VC \u00a7 22358.3. Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the prima facie speed limit of 25 miles per hour in a business or residence district or in a public park on any street having a roadway not exceeding 25 feet in width, other than a state highway, is more than is reasonable or safe, the local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 20 or 15 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate and is reasonable and safe. The declared prima facie limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street.", "The proposed revisions to SMMC section 3.12.490, which are set forth in Attachment B, adopt speed limit recommendations included in the 2014 survey. The proposed revisions include: a) providing a reduction of the speed limit along five street segments, b) providing an increase of the speed limit along two street segments, c) authorizing speed reductions along three residential street segments that are less than 25 feet wide; and d) posting of the limits.", "Discussion", "1. As discussed, above, this ordinance, if adopted would remove the following street segments from the SMMC 3.12.490, resulting in prima facie speed limits of 25 mph:", "1. Olympic Boulevard from 4th Street to 11th Street", "2. 16th Street from Montana Avenue to south City Limit", "3. 21st Street from Ocean Park Boulevard to Dewey Street", "4. 22nd Street from Pico Boulevard to Ocean Park Boulevard", "5. 24th Street from San Vicente Boulevard to Ocean Park Boulevard", "6. Airport Avenue from 23rd Street to east City Limit", "7. Alta Avenue from 7th Street to 14th Street", "8. Chelsea Avenue from Wilshire Boulevard to Santa Monica Boulevard", "9. Michigan Avenue from 7th Street to 17th Street", "10. Navy Street from Highland to Lincoln Boulevard", "2. This ordinance, if adopted, would also reduce the speed limits in the following street segments, based upon the 2014 survey:", "On 26th Street between north City limit and Wilshire Boulevard, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 35 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance is 30 miles per hour, consistent with the other street segments along 26th Street.", "On Barnard Way between Ocean Park Boulevard and Neilson Way, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 30 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance is 25 miles per hour, due to the high amount of pedestrian traffic adjacent to the beach area.", "On Exposition Boulevard between Stewart Street and Centinela Avenue, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 30 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance is 25 miles per hour, due to the residential land uses along the segment.", "On Lincoln Boulevard between San Vicente Boulevard and Montana Avenue, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 30 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance is 25 miles per hour, due to the residential land uses along the segment.", "On Ocean Park Boulevard between Lincoln Boulevard and 14th Street, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 35 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance is 30 miles per hour, consistent with the other street segments along Ocean Park Boulevard.", "Summary Of Speed Limit Reductions Supported By The 2014 Survey", "1. 26th Street between north City limit and Wilshire Boulevard - from 35 MPH to 30 MPH", "2. Barnard Way between Ocean Park Boulevard and Neilson Way - from 30 MPH to 25 MPH", "3. Exposition Boulevard between Stewart Street and Centinela - from 30 MPH to 25 MPH", "4. Lincoln Boulevard between San Vicente Boulevard and Montana Avenue - from 30 MPH to 25 MPH", "5. Ocean Park Boulevard between Lincoln Boulevard and 14th Street - from 35 MPH to 30 MPH", "3. This ordinance, if adopted, would also increase the speed limits in the following street segments, based upon the 2014 survey:", "On 4th Street between Colorado Avenue and Pico Boulevard, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 25 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the survey and would be established by this ordinance is 30 miles per hour, due to an 85th percentile speed of 37 miles per hour recorded along the segment. The MUTCD requires that an 85th percentile speed of 37 miles per hour must be rounded to the nearest 5 mile per hour increment, which is 35 miles per hour. A reduction of 5 miles per hour to 30 miles per hour was applied citing conditions not readily apparent. No further reductions can be applied.", "On Marine Street between Lincoln Boulevard and 17th Street, the speed limit currently established in SMMC 3.12.490 is 25 miles per hour. The speed limit that is supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance is 30 miles per hour, due to an 85th percentile speed of 33 miles per hour along the segment.  The MUTCD requires that an 85th percentile speed of 33 miles per hour must be rounded to the nearest 5 mile per hour increment, which is 35 miles per hour. A reduction of 5 miles per hour to 30 miles per hour was applied citing conditions not readily apparent. No further reductions can be applied.", "Summary Of Speed Limit Increases Supported By The 2014 Survey", "1. 4th Street between Colorado Avenue and Pico Boulevard - from 25 MPH to 30 MPH", "2. Marine Street between Lincoln Boulevard and 17th Street - from 25 MPH to 30 MPH", "4. Pursuant to the State of California Vehicle Code Section 22358.3, the Survey supports a 15 miles per hour prima facie speed limit along streets that are less than 25 feet wide upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey.", "The following 15 miles per hour prima facie speed limits are supported by the Survey and would be established by this ordinance:", "1.  Bryn Mawr Avenue from 16th Street to 18th Street", "2. Sunset Avenue from 16th Street to Dewey Street", "3. Wellesley Avenue from Ashland Avenue to 18th Street", "Attachment C compares existing speed limit postings, speed limits established by SMMC 3.12.490, and recommended speed limits (that would be incorporated into SMMC 3.12.490 if this ordinance is adopted).", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Implementation of the changes will utilize existing CIP and operating budgets."]}], [{"Title": "Civic Working Group Final Report and Next Steps for the Civic Auditorium", "Department": "Cultural Affairs (CCS)", "Sponsors": "Director Martin Pastucha, Director Andy Agle", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1. Accept the Civic Working Group\u2019s report.2. Consider the proposed \u2018Guiding Principles\u2019 and \u2018Priorities for Council Consideration\u2019.3. Consider the proposed alternatives and direct staff to issue an RFQ for the renovation and operation of the Civic Auditorium as a first step in implementing the Civic Working Group\u2019s recommendations.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Council appointed the nine member Civic Working Group (CWG) to one two-year term in the fall of 2013, and tasked them with facilitating community dialogue and developing recommendations regarding the future of the Civic as the hub of a new mixed-use cultural district. The CWG completed its task in September 2015, and approved a report on the process and outcomes (Attachment A). The CWG\u2019s recommendations are summarized in two sections of the report, the \u2018Guiding Principles\u2019 and \u2018Priorities for Council Consideration\u2019. Staff has developed several proposed alternatives to move forward with the CWG\u2019s recommendations and is asking for Council direction on the report, the proposed \u2018Guiding Principles\u2019 and \u2018Priorities for Council Consideration\u2019, as well as next steps for the Civic and the surrounding site. Staff is recommending that the City issue an RFQ for the Civic Auditorium only as a first step in implementing the CWG\u2019s recommendations.", "Background", "The Santa Monica Civic Auditorium (Civic) was designed by Welton Becket and completed in 1958. The 73,000 square foot building is a local landmark and is located on approximately four acres. The overall Civic site (Site) comprises approximately 10.3 acres. The Early Childhood Education Center (ECEC) will utilize approximately 1.4 acres, leaving approximately 4.9 acres of surface parking. The closure of the Civic in June of 2013 provides a significant opportunity for the City to determine how best to preserve and repurpose the building and the adjacent Site for future generations.", "Over the course of the last few years Council has worked extensively with the community and with staff to consider options and possibilities. On August 14, 2012, (Attachment B) Council authorized the suspension of the Civic renovation project due to the loss of redevelopment funds and directed staff to develop alternatives for the rehabilitation of the facility. Council considered these alternatives at an October 23, 2012, (Attachment C) study session. At that meeting Council affirmed the intent to close the facility as planned and directed staff to return once additional research, including outreach to stakeholders and experts, was completed. As part of this process the City worked with the Urban Land Institute to hold a Technical Assistance Panel which brought in experts to look at the future of the Civic and issue a report. On June 11, 2013, (Attachment D) Council reviewed and commented on recommendations regarding an interim use of the Civic, long-term management options, and strategies to generate revenue for the renovation, and the concept of the development of a cultural campus with the Civic Auditorium as the hub. At that time, Council also directed staff to return with a recommended structure and criteria for a temporary Civic Working Group (CWG) that could provide input on the development of recommendations for the renovation, programming and long-term operation of the Civic.", "On October 22, 2013 (Attachment E) Council appointed nine members to the Civic Working Group (CWG) to one two-year term and tasked them with facilitating community dialogue and developing recommendations regarding the future of the Civic as the hub of a new mixed-use cultural district, which was the vision articulated in the Urban Land Institute Technical Assistance Panel\u2019s final report (Attachment F).", "The CWG held regular public meetings in the East Wing of the Civic between December 2013 and September 2015. The CWG structured its work and the community visioning process around three well-attended public workshops. The first took place on September 27, 2014 and focused on the facility, the site and development of a set of working assumptions for the CWG\u2019s deliberative process. The second workshop unfolded in two parts, over two days, in early in 2015, on January 31st and February 1st, and was structured around an on-line interactive \u2018trade-off\u2019 tool that was specifically developed for this planning process.", "Workshop #2 participants, and community members who accessed the tool via the City\u2019s website, were able to explore alternative uses for the Civic and the surrounding site, and make choices regarding use preferences and potential funding sources for capital and annual operating costs. The process allowed nearly 1,700 participants to formulate priorities and corresponding tradeoffs regarding the future use of the Civic Auditorium, potential adjacent cultural uses as well as potential private land uses, and open space, which helped inform the Civic Working Group\u2019s recommendations and are detailed in the report.", "The third community workshop took place on June 13, 2015, and provided an opportunity for the public to discuss the Civic Working Group\u2019s findings and draft recommendations.", "From the beginning, the members of the CWG placed a very high priority on community engagement and transparency. All of the materials developed for the CWG, or that the members of the CWG referenced during their work, including notes and video from each workshop, are available on the Civic Auditorium\u2019s website (santamonicacivic.org), as part of an extensive document library (Attachment G). All of the CWG documents and written community feedback were also compiled in Volume II of the CWG report, which is also available on-line.", "The CWG was supported in its process by an interdepartmental team of staff from Community and Cultural Services, Housing and Economic Development, Planning and Community Development, and Public Works, as well as a diverse team of consultants led by HR&A Advisors, Inc. (HR&A).", "Discussion", "Civic Working Group report", "The attached report, prepared by HR&A, presents the Civic Working Group\u2019s process, findings and recommendations in detail (Attachment A). It lays out the information and the rationale that the CWG used to arrive at its collective recommendations and also documents other community points of view expressed throughout the planning process.", "The CWG approved the report at its final meeting on September 28, 2015, after making minor revisions. The CWG structured its recommendations to Council in two parts, consisting of a series of \u2018Guiding Principles\u2019 which specify parameters for the future of the Civic and the surrounding site, and a set of \u2018Priorities for Council Consideration,\u2019 which begin to address implementation and next steps.", "Guiding Principles", "The CWG developed six broad Guiding Principles that form its central recommendations to Council. The Guiding Principles incorporate the CWG\u2019s far-reaching public outreach into both goals, and limits, for the future Civic and the Site, and are intended to serve as a clear, but flexible, framework for implementing a new mixed-use arts and cultural district anchored by a re-purposed Civic Auditorium, and to reconnect the site with its surroundings for the first time since its development. The CWG Guiding Principles are as follows:", "1. Preserve and rehabilitate the landmarked Civic Auditorium.", "\u00b7 Rehabilitate the landmark Santa Monica Civic Auditorium.", "\u00b7 Satisfy the community\u2019s desire for an iconic, multi-generational, innovative, state-of-the-art, professional performing arts venue that is the anchor of a cultural campus.", "\u00b7 Consider taking advantage of the Civic Auditorium\u2019s flexibility to enable it to serve both performing arts and special events, including community events.", "2. Create a vibrant cultural and community hub around the Civic Auditorium.", "\u00b7 Strive to create a signature Civic Auditorium arts and cultural campus that will serve as the city\u2019s cultural center with a preference for the performing arts.", "\u00b7 Include synergistic arts and cultural features, and uses that add to an exciting experience for patrons, such as a flexible performance event space.", "\u00b7 Integrate complementary uses that create activity during both daytime and evening such as cafes, restaurants and open space.", "3. Consider private land uses that support and enhance the cultural campus.", "\u00b7 Ensure that any private land uses are synergistic with the spirit and activities planned for the site, and add to its vibrancy.", "\u00b7 Ensure that any private land uses create a smooth, interactive connection to the surrounding neighborhood and the landmarked Civic Auditorium through compatibility of use and scale.", "\u00b7 Collaborate with the City to commemorate the lost Belmar Triangle neighborhood that predated the Santa Monica Civic Auditorium on the site.", "4. Create a flow between the Civic Auditorium site and the surrounding community.", "\u00b7 Visually and physically connect the Civic Auditorium, the site, adjacent amenities, streets, neighbors and institutions.", "\u00b7 Prioritize uses that enhance linkages and connectivity between the Civic campus, Santa Monica High School, Main Street, Pico Boulevard, Tongva Park, the Pier and the beach.", "\u00b7 Consider establishing a cultural network with the Santa Monica High School performing arts venues including Barnum Hall and the Memorial Greek Amphitheater, and other shared use possibilities with the high school.", "\u00b7 Integrate the site with the City\u2019s mobility plans for pedestrians, vehicles, bikes, and transit.", "5. Include open space on the site.", "\u00b7 Include open space that encourages cultural, recreational, and athletic uses consistent with a vibrant cultural campus.", "\u00b7 Investigate plans that would allow for a full size multi-use playing field on the site.", "6. Generate innovative and financially sustainable proposals for the Civic and its site.", "\u00b7 Consider creating a consortium of public and private management entities.", "\u00b7 Ensure financial strategies for capital, including revenue and general obligation bonds, are viable, meaning that they fund estimated costs for Civic Auditorium rehabilitation and any other planned capital improvements on the site.", "\u00b7 Ensure financial strategies for the Civic Auditorium and site operations and programming are viable and do not rely upon open-ended subsidies from the City\u2019s general fund.", "\u00b7 Evaluate private philanthropic funding and non-traditional sources of funding for renovation and operation of the Civic Auditorium.", "Priorities for Council Consideration", "Implementation of the vision for a renovated Civic Auditorium as the hub of a mixed-use cultural district will take a sustained commitment over a number of years. In order to assist Council in formulating next steps in the process, the CWG developed a series of \u2018Priorities for Council Consideration\u2019 which lay out the beginnings of a possible implementation plan. They are:", "\u00b7 Develop a milestone schedule for all of the steps needed to implement rehabilitation and operation of the Civic, and development and operation of new arts, cultural and open space uses, and new private uses, on the Civic site, consistent with the Guiding Principles.", "\u00b7 Formulate and implement a transparent Request for Proposals (RFP) process for seeking competitive proposals from highly-qualified companies to rehabilitate and operate the Civic, and to develop new arts, cultural and open space uses, and new private uses, on the Civic site, consistent with the Guiding Principles.", "\u00b7 In formulating the RFP process, evaluate alternative approaches that might reduce developer/operator risk and uncertainty and maximize value to the City, including, for example, City processing of land use entitlements prior to requesting competitive proposals.", "\u00b7 Evaluate options for an appropriate long-term management structure for the Civic site that reflects best management practices for high-performing, self-sustaining mixed-use arts and cultural districts and maximizes value for the City while achieving public objectives.", "\u00b7 Consider assigning, delegating or sharing City control of the Civic Auditorium and the Civic site as a whole to, or with, the selected management entity to operate, maintain and program the facilities on the Civic site.", "\u00b7 Consider dedicating all revenue from ground leases, City tax revenue, and any other value capture strategies, generated from new uses on the Civic site, in order to support predevelopment and development costs for the Civic Auditorium, new arts, cultural and open space uses, parking, and public amenities.", "\u00b7 Identify and evaluate a range of other potential public financing methods to support construction of improvements to the Civic and new arts, cultural and open space uses, including for example, general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, special assessments, dedication of a share of citywide Transient Occupancy Tax (TOT), and use of state and federal tax credit programs.", "\u00b7 Evaluate private philanthropic funding opportunities and non-traditional sources to fund renovation of the Civic Auditorium, and annual operation of new arts, cultural and open space uses at the Civic site, while minimizing dependence on the City\u2019s General Fund for annual operations.", "\u00b7 Investigate plans that would allow for a full size multi-use field on the site, but if that investigation indicates that such a field is not consistent with a mixed use arts and cultural district, or if the Council otherwise decides not to include such a field on this site, then address community desire for a field on this site by building fields elsewhere.", "Commission Action", "The Arts Commission considered the CWG\u2019s report and reviewed the \u2018Guiding Principles\u2019 and \u2018Priorities for Council Consideration\u2019 at its meeting on November 16, 2015. The Commission voted unanimously to endorse the Guiding Principles and Priorities for Council Consideration developed by the Civic Working Group. The Commission also added a statement to the motion that reiterates the importance of the Civic as a cultural venue, in keeping with the City\u2019s adopted cultural policy documents.", "At its meeting on November 19, 2015, the Recreation and Parks Commission voted unanimously to advocate to retain the playing field as part of the plans for the Civic Auditorium site as described in the 2005 Civic Center Specific Plan.", "Alternatives", "Staff worked with HR&A to develop a robust set of alternatives for Council to consider in relation to the CWG\u2019s recommendations and next steps. While some alternatives are more complex than others, each will require an investment of staff and consultant time to frame, analyze and present the issues and options to Council for direction at various stages, and substantial time to implement.", "1. Implement a Request for Qualifications/Request for Proposals Process for Reuse of the Civic Auditorium Only", "This approach would focus on the Civic Auditorium only, and make no decision about the rest of the site at this time.  It is in keeping with the overall CWG recommendations, and could yield a solution for the Civic and/or serve as the initial step in implementing a phased approach.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 Maintains the focus on the highest priority City and CWG objective, i.e. reuse of the Civic Auditorium.", "\u00b7 Immediately tests the degree of market acceptance for the CWG\u2019s recommendation that Civic reuse focus on a privately operated performing arts venue.", "\u00b7 Could include a modest amount of supportive development directly adjacent to the Civic Auditorium such as the replacement/expansion of the East Wing and reconfiguration of the Main Street/Pico Boulevard corner.", "\u00b7 Does not raise the controversial issue of more extensive private co-development that is inconsistent with the adopted Civic Center Specific Plan.", "\u00b7 Defers significant cost and logistics of constructing subterranean parking.", "\u00b7 Could be implemented independent of any other possible site improvements.", "\u00b7 Could be implemented faster than a strategy for reuse of the entire Civic site, assuming responsive proposals are submitted by qualified operators.", "\u00b7 Responses could also help inform decisions regarding any possible future phases for the site.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 Defers the objective of creating a mixed-use arts and cultural district at the Civic site.", "\u00b7 Defers the CWG\u2019s objective of reconnecting the Civic site to the surrounding neighborhoods.", "\u00b7 Narrows the range of prospective bidders to only those qualified to operate the Civic Auditorium.", "\u00b7 Puts a higher premium on the need for public funding to finance the cost of the renovation of the Civic Auditorium.", "2. Resolve Key Open Space Issues Regarding a Sports Field and General Development Parameters Prior to Seeking Proposals for Reuse of the Civic Auditorium and Civic Site", "The CWG Report defers to Council two key issues that could affect the willingness and ability of qualified respondents to submit proposals for the reuse of the Civic Auditorium and the Civic site as a whole: (a) whether to include a sports field at the corner of Fourth Street and Pico Boulevard, as envisioned in the 2005 Civic Center Specific Plan; and (b) guidance on the general scale and locations of arts/cultural and/or private development that might be permitted on the site.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 Could provide important general guidance about these issues to City staff for drafting a Request for Proposals (RFP); to prospective RFP respondents; and to City decision makers and the public in evaluating proposals.", "\u00b7 Could ultimately attract a wider range of qualified developers and operators.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 Requires making preliminary decisions about these issues in the near term prior to seeking proposals for the Civic Auditorium and Civic site.", "\u00b7 Requires significant additional investment of both staff and consultant time in site planning and analysis.", "\u00b7 Requires consultant assistance to further investigate physical planning and financial planning for development of field facilities.", "\u00b7 Takes more time to implement, including potential amendments to the existing Civic Center Specific Plan.", "3. Implement a Request for Qualifications/Request for Proposals for Reuse of the Civic Auditorium and the Civic Site", "This alternative most comprehensively reflects the CWG\u2019s recommendations and leaves open-ended the issues of development, scale, parking and open-space which proved to be the most contentious throughout the process.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 Goes the furthest in attempting to implement all of the objectives in the CWG report, for both the Civic Auditorium and the balance of the Civic site.", "\u00b7 While more expensive to implement than pursuing the limited reuse of the Civic Auditorium alone, this alternative enables a more diversified range of financing strategies, potentially reducing the demand for public funding.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 Requires significant detailed planning regarding management and funding options for the entire site, which could take as much as several years and requires a significant investment of staff and consulting time.", "\u00b7 Requires significant cost and logistics for constructing subterranean parking.", "\u00b7 Is unlikely to attract a wide range of developers and operators because of the unresolved issues related to the development envelope and open-space, and therefore would require substantial investment from the developers with little certainty that anything would come of it.", "\u00b7 Takes more time to implement.", "4. Take No Further Action at This Time", "The Civic Auditorium would remain closed to the public, with the East Wing available for meetings, and the remainder of the facility available for limited access, revenue-producing uses, such as film shoots.", "Advantages:", "\u00b7 Requires no further action or investment of resources at this time.", "\u00b7 Retains Council and staff focus on other identified City priorities.", "Disadvantages:", "\u00b7 No progress on reuse of the Civic or improvements to the Civic site.", "\u00b7 No progress on reducing City exposure related to the advancing age and condition of the Civic Auditorium.", "\u00b7 Could engender public frustration about the lack of progress on the Civic and the appearance that the CWG effort was ill-timed.", "Recommendation", "After careful consideration of the options, adopted City priorities, and available resources, staff believes that the best approach at this time would be that outlined in Alternative One: to take action on part of the CWG\u2019s recommendations through an initial step that focuses on the Civic Auditorium only and to make no decision about the rest of the site at this time.", "This approach would allow the City to begin implementation of the vision articulated by CWG relatively quickly with a modest investment of staff and other resources. It would defer decisions about the broader site to a time when other planning processes have been completed and additional information is available, for example the campus development plan for improvements to the Santa Monica High School campus which is underway, the Downtown Community Plan, exploration of ways to finance sports fields such as a public-private partnership and expansion of the field space at the Santa Monica Airport. Further, the response would allow the City to quantify the level of interest in investing in and operating the Civic Auditorium, on the part of entertainment companies, philanthropists, and other potential partners. This is anticipated to be significantly different than when the City first issued an RFP in 2009, as the market and major players have changed in the intervening years.", "The restoration of the Civic Auditorium and resolution of the use or uses of the rest of the site will be a lengthy multi-year process.  If Council were to direct staff to issue an RFQ for the Civic Auditorium only, the process to develop and  issue an RFQ, and for responses to be received and evaluated, could take nine months to a year, at which point staff would return to Council for direction on next steps.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future."]}, {"Title": "Big Blue Bus Advertising Policy", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council review options for the policy governing advertisements displayed on the exterior of City buses and adopt either the King County policy, which allows non-commercial advertising and has been judicially approved, or reaffirm the City's existing policy, which prohibits non-commercial advertisements and which also comports with legal requirements.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Council has directed staff to present alternative options for a policy governing advertising on the exterior of City buses. This report responds to that direction by presenting three options for Council consideration. As explained in this report, staff recommends that Council either approve adoption of the King County policy, which has been validated by the Ninth Circuit as comporting with First Amendment standards and which allows non-commercial advertising, or affirm the City's current advertising policy. It prohibits non-commercial advertising, a prohibition authorized by First Amendment case law. Staff recommends against adopting the third policy, proposed by prospective advertisers, because it has not been validated in court.", "Background", "The City sells advertising space on the exterior panels of its buses for the purpose of raising revenue to fund Big Blue Bus (BBB) operations. At present, all such advertisements are commercial and about 90% of the ads are for movies, television programs or health care services. The annual income from advertising is about $2 million.", "The City has advertising guidelines utilized by BBB personnel to ensure that advertisements on bus exteriors do not conflict with BBB's mission of providing safe and efficient public transportation. A copy of the guidelines is attached as Attachment \"A\". The guidelines constitute an advertising policy intended to meet a number of BBB goals. These include, but are not limited to: maximizing ridership; preventing harm or abuse to passengers, BBB vouchers, and buses; maximizing revenue; maintaining governmental neutrality and avoiding actual or perceived discrimination; and preserving marketability of advertising space. For at least fifteen years, the City's bus advertising policy has prohibited non-commercial advertisements on the exterior of City buses. It was adopted to effectuate the BBB's mission, achieve its goals, and satisfy First Amendment constraints applicable to government regulation of speech, which includes advertising.", "Generally, the extent of the First Amendment constraints upon government's ability to regulate speech and other forms of expression depends on the classification of the \"forum\" in which the expression occurs. Individual rights of expression are most staunchly protected, and the government's regulatory powers are most limited in a \"public forum\", such as a street or public park. In contrast, the government has maximum authority to regulate expression in a \"nonpublic forum\". The Supreme Court established that the exterior panel of a city bus is a nonpublic forum in Lehman v. Shaker Heights, 418 U.S. 298 (1974) [holding that that an advertising panel on a city bus is not a public forum and therefore the city can ban political advertising on city buses].", "After Lehman, an anti-abortion civil rights advocacy group challenged Phoenix's bus advertising policy, which allowed only commercial advertisements on the exterior of city buses, when Phoenix refused to run the group's proposed anti-abortion advertisement because it did not propose a commercial transaction. Children of the Rosary v. City of Phoenix, 154 F.3d 972 (9th Cir. 1998). The federal district court rejected plaintiff's claim. On appeal, the Ninth Circuit affirmed and upheld the city's advertising policy, concluding that the exterior bus panel was a nonpublic forum and so the government, as forum proprietor, could impose reasonable limitations prohibiting categories of advertisements. The court explained that Phoenix's policy of allowing only commercial advertisements was reasonable because it: ensured governmental neutrality on political and religious issues; protected against violence directed at passengers or buses; and protected advertising revenues, which might be diminished if commercial advertisers withdrew their bus ads because other ads were controversial. The court also concluded that Phoenix's standards were constitutional because they did not discriminate based on particular viewpoint \u2013 only based on category. Thus, Children of the Rosary clarified that public transit operators in the Ninth Circuit could implement standards precluding non-commercial advertising on exterior bus panels.", "Many did, including Santa Monica. The City's current transit advertising policy permits only commercial advertising on Big Blue buses. This policy was recommended by staff and adopted because the policy clearly comports with the guidance provided in Children of the Rosary; and, at the time, it was not clear that First Amendment protections allowed the City to pick and choose between non-commercial advertisements. However, two Ninth Circuit decisions, issued last year, expand the City Council's policy options and allow for flexibility in approving non-commercial advertisements. Those cases are described in some detail here because the facts illustrate the potential difficulties of administering a bus advertising policy and because explaining the law may assist the Council in evaluating its options.", "In Seattle Mideast Awareness Campaign v. King County, 781 F.3d 489 (9th Cir. 2015)[King County I], a non-profit organization, which opposed United States support for Israel, proposed a bus advertisement stating: \"Israeli war crimes your tax dollars at work.\" The advertisement was ultimately determined to comport with King County's bus advertising policy and was approved. However, before the ad ran, a local television station broadcast a story about its approval. A massive and hostile response ensued. The bus company received about 6,000 e-mails in ten days, almost all urging that the ad be pulled. Some of the e-mails threatened vandalism and rioting at bus stops. Photographs depicting dead or injured bus passengers and damaged buses appeared at the bus company service center, and apparent threats were made against the individuals who had approved the ads. Drivers expressed concerns for their own safety, and some refused to drive buses displaying the ad. Within a few days, pro-Israeli groups submitted their own potentially inflammatory ads.", "Based on the volume and extremity of the threats, the county executive withdrew approval of the ad, the bus company revised its policy to exclude all political or ideological ads, and the proponents of the initial advertisement filed suit alleging a violation of their First Amendment rights. The federal district court rejected the group's claims and granted summary judgment to King County. Plaintiff appealed.", "The Ninth Circuit affirmed the decision in favor of King County. The court applied the forum analysis and concluded that the exterior bus panels were a limited or nonpublic forum, largely because the government did not intend to grant general access to its property for expressive use by all classes of speakers; rather, it intended to limit access and impose speaker-based or subject-matter limitations. The court explained that such limitations are constitutional in a nonpublic forum so long as they are reasonable (in that they are compatible with the intended purpose of the property and are both definite and objective) and are also viewpoint neutral. The court concluded that the King County policy met these requirements. It was reasonable for the transit operator to exclude speech so objectionable under community standards as to make it reasonably foreseeable that running the ad would result in harm to and disruption of the system; and this exclusion was, in the court's view, adequately definite and objective. One member of the three-judge panel dissented, concluding that the exterior panels were a designated public forum and that the King County policy did not meet the stricter constitutional constraints applicable to that type of forum.", "Months later, in a second challenge involving the revised King County policy , the Ninth Circuit decided American Freedom Defense Initiative v. King County, 796 F3d 1165 (9th Cir. 2015)[King County II]. In that case, the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) submitted a bus advertisement showing photographs of 15 peoples' faces described by the ad as the \"Faces of Global Terrorism\" and offering up to $25 Million in rewards. After the ad began running, King County received a small number of complaints from the public including a complaint from a Congress member and complaints from two community leaders. The FBI withdrew the ad. The nonprofit organization American Freedom Defense Initiative then submitted a very similar version of the same ad. King County rejected it as failing to comply with its revised advertising policy because the county determined the ad to be false or misleading, demeaning or disparaging and potentially harmful or disruptive to the transit system. The nonprofit filed suit and sought a preliminary injunction, which was denied by the district court. Plaintiff appealed. Relying on its prior decision in King County I, the Ninth Circuit affirmed because the county's policy met the requirements for a limited or nonpublic forum.", "The facts underlying these two cases are quite different. In King County I, the record demonstrated that running the proposed advertisement posed a clear risk of violence and disruption to the transit system. In contrast, in King County II, there were apparently no threats of violence or disruption to transit services. Plaintiff non-profit has petitioned for review by the United State Supreme Court in November of 2015, and that petition is pending. Nonetheless, King County II establishes the present legal validity of King County's advertising policy, which is summarized in Attachment B.", "The City's own advertising policy has also been challenged in court. In 2012, Aids Walk LA filed suit against the City, claiming that prohibiting noncommercial advertising violates free speech guarantees of both the state and federal constitutions. In November of 2014, Council approved a settlement of that case which provided monetary relief to plaintiff but maintained the City's bus advertising policy. The settlement agreement was finally executed in June of last year.", "Most recently, a law firm representing the Advertisers has written to the Council urging that the City's policy be revised through adoption of either the King County Policy or an alternative policy prepared by the law firm and apparently modelled after the current Los Angeles Department of Transportation policy. A summary of the advertising standards in that proposed policy are attached as Attachment C.", "Discussion", "The three policies presented for Council consideration differ in structure and language. However, they contain mostly similar prohibitions. A comparison of the three policies' prohibitions is attached as Attachment D. All three policies prohibit advertising that:", "\u00b7 is false, misleading or deceptive;", "\u00b7 is obscene, sexually explicit or harmful to minors;", "\u00b7 promotes violence or illegal activity;", "\u00b7 ridicules/defames groups or individuals;", "\u00b7 creates a clear danger of inciting a public safety threat;", "\u00b7 promotes alcohol/tobacco/gun purchase/use;", "\u00b7 violates copyright, trademark and other laws;", "\u00b7 or interferes with transit operations.", "The main difference between the three policies is that only Santa Monica's current policy prohibits non-commercial advertising. In contrast, the King County policy and the Advertisers' proposed policy both allow noncommercial advertising but prohibit political campaign speech. Additionally, both the King County policy and the Advertising Entities' proposed policy both prohibit adult entertainments/services and adult entertainment facilities, while Santa Monica's does not explicitly prohibit such ads (though it may be interpreted to prohibit them). Finally, the Advertisers proposed policy also prohibits religious advertisements, while the other two do not.", "As to the practical viability of Santa Monica's present policy, BBB management reports that the present advertising policy has worked well for the enterprise. Exterior advertising sales are robust and have raised significant revenues that provide support for public transit in Santa Monica \u2013 presently about $2 Million per year.", "In support of their request that the City change its policy, the Advertisers urge that, following the King County decisions, the City need no longer draw a line between commercial and non-commercial advertisements to meet First Amendment constraints, that the distinction between commercial and non-commercial advertisements may be difficult to draw, and that a policy allowing non-commercial advertisements would have legal and practical advantages.", "Legal staff agrees that the Ninth Circuit's 2015 decision in King County II affords the legal option of adopting the King County policy. Doing so would eliminate the current prohibition against non-commercial advertising and would allow the BBB to run some categories of non-commercial advertisements but prohibit others, such as political advertisements.", "Legal staff also agrees with the Advertisers that, in some circumstances, it can be difficult to distinguish between commercial and non-commercial advertisements (though usually it is not). For example, as the Advertisers have argued, a non-profit entity could submit an advertisement that conveyed the non-profit's message and also proposed a commercial transaction, such the sale of a book advancing the non-profit's cause.", "Legal staff is less certain about the Advertisers' policy and practical arguments. They argue that the current policy should be changed because a different policy would afford expressive opportunities to more speakers to express more types of views on the exteriors of Big Blue buses. Staff agrees with the general proposition that the government creating more opportunities for speech is, in the abstract, good policy. However, as the City's past First Amendment disputes illustrate, this generality is likely insufficient to dictate policy. Competing concerns about use of public property for expression must be recognized in setting policy, and the devil is often in the details.", "The Advertisers also argue that accepting non-commercial advertisements would enhance BBB advertising revenues. This is possible but uncertain. BBB management reports little or no difficulty selling exterior advertising space under current policy. Thus creating larger pool of potential applicants would not necessarily enhance revenues. Moreover, BBB management believes that changing policies is likely to impact operating expenditures. Expanding the pool of applicants would require additional administrative oversight of the program because more prospective advertisements would need to be reviewed. King County staff reports that this has been their experience, and it would likely be duplicated here.", "Also, more prospective advertisers would be competing for the space, and prospective advertisers would be afforded advertising space on a first-come, first-served basis (as they are now). It is possible that increased competition for ad space could discourage some advertisers - particularly commercial advertisers who may need certainty as to the timing and saturation of their advertisements.", "It is also possible that some non-commercial advertisements that would be allowed under the King County policy would be perceived as unpleasant, distasteful, or unattractive by BBB patrons, the general public, or other BBB advertisers. Theoretically, this could impact BBB revenues - though significant impact seems unlikely. In any event, under the current policy there have occasionally been commercial bus ads that drew complaints from patrons and the public. So, maintenance of the present policy is not a guarantee against that risk. Staff simply notes that the risk might increase with a different policy.", "Thus, it is unclear whether policy or practical considerations militate in favor of adopting the King County policy. However, if the Council wishes to allow non-commercial advertising on bus exteriors, legal considerations make adoption of the King County policy the best alternative, because it has been approved by the Ninth Circuit.", "As to the policy suggested by the Advertisers and summarized in Attachment C, staff recommends against its adoption. If the purpose of changing the advertising policy is to obtain flexibility to run non-commercial ads while meeting legal requirements, adopting the proposal prepared by the Advertisers' counsel might not fulfill that purpose because that policy has not been judicially validated. Thus, staff recommends only the King County policy if Council wants to allow non-commercial advertising.", "Of course, the King County policy may face further judicial scrutiny. The plaintiff in King County II has petitioned for Supreme Court review; so, the Ninth Circuit's decision could be overturned or modified in the future. However, the odds of that are small; the Supreme Court grants review of only a very small percentage of petitions. Likewise, there could be a decision in another case that would undermine the legal viability of the King County policy. First Amendment case law develops rapidly and sometimes unpredictably. However, if the case law changes, the City's bus advertising policy can always be changed accordingly.", "Thus, for the reasons stated in this report, staff recommends that the City Council either adopt the King County policy or reaffirm the BBB's existing policy. And, whether or not Council opts to change the advertising policy, legal staff will add to the policy a statement of purpose and intent to the policy. It will help facilitate its consistent application and insulate it against legal challenge.", "Alternatives", "As an alternative, Council could adopt but modify one of the three policies covered by this report, either by adding or eliminating a particular prohibition and/or by modifying the language of one or more prohibitions. For instance, Council could decide to maintain the present City policy, but eliminate the prohibition on non-commercial advertising and, for example, add express prohibitions against political advertisements and advertisements for adult services and entertainment facilities. Council might also wish to broaden the prohibition against tobacco advertising to include all smoking materials.", "Financial Impacts", "Exact financial impacts of adopting a new policy are difficult to predict. However, it is unlikely that any financial impacts would be so significant as to substantially alter BBB operations."]}, {"Title": "Presentation of the City\u2019s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report", "Department": "Finance Department, Financial Operations", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council receive and file the City\u2019s Comprehensive Annual Financial Report, the independent auditors\u2019 unmodified (clean) report for the City\u2019s financial statements, and the attached Auditor\u2019s Letter to Council for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2015.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR) communicates the City\u2019s financial condition and activity for the year ended June 30, 2015. The City\u2019s operations show signs of stability, a result of the prudent and sound management practices of the City of Santa Monica.", "The independent auditor\u2019s unmodified (clean) report provides the assurance that the CAFR, and audited information within, fairly present the City\u2019s financial position for the year ended June 30, 2015. This audit is performed in compliance with City Charter requirements. A letter from the City\u2019s independent auditors communicating that there are no audit findings and discussing other matters is also submitted with this report. The recommended reclassifications included in this letter have not been made as they do not materially change the City\u2019s financial standing or statements.", "The City of Santa Monica has received a clean audit report for more than three decades. In FY 2013-14, the City was awarded the Certificate of Achievement for Excellence in Financial Reporting by the Government Finance Officers\u2019 Association of the United States and Canada (GFOA) for its CAFR for the 31st consecutive time since it began participating in the program in FY 1983-84. Staff anticipates that the current CAFR also conforms to the Certificate of Achievement program requirements. In an effort to make the CAFR more transparent, staff has provided an explanation for key financial performance indicators shown in the report.", "The City\u2019s external auditors, Macias, Gini & O\u2019Connell LLP presented the CAFR to the Audit Subcommittee on January 19, 2016. The Audit Subcommittee approved the CAFR and recommended that it be presented to the full Council with a 4-0 vote, with Committee Member Vazquez absent.", "Background", "The CAFR is used to communicate the City\u2019s financial condition and activity in a transparent and organized manner. The report presents historical and comparative information that can be useful to City staff, elected officials, and external users, such as debt rating agencies, businesses, other public agencies and the City\u2019s residents. The most recent CAFR and several prior year reports are available at the City\u2019s libraries and on the City\u2019s Finance website (Attachment A).", "As required by the City Charter, financial statements are prepared by the City and audited by independent auditors who are contracted through a competitive procurement process. The City\u2019s current independent auditor is Macias, Gini & O\u2019Connell LLP (MGO).", "The quality of the City\u2019s work and the CAFR is measured in two ways: (1) a clean audit report by the independent auditors; and (2) the Certificate of Achievement for Excellence in Financial Reporting, awarded by the Government Finance Officers\u2019 Association of the United States and Canada (GFOA). Attaining the latter is the highest form of recognition in governmental accounting and financial reporting.", "Auditors follow audit industry standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA). These standards require auditors to provide an opinion on specific areas of the City\u2019s financial statements based on observations, inquiries, testing of transactions and analysis.", "A clean, unmodified opinion communicates to users that the financial statements are fairly presented and that the information used in the report is reliable. Other minor issues that would not warrant a change in the auditor\u2019s opinion are presented in the form of recommendations to management, suggesting ways that the City could improve reporting in future years. In the letter to Council, auditors have summarized what are known as \u201cpassed adjustments\u201d which are adjustments noted during the audit that are not material enough to warrant recording in the current year. MGO consults with staff regarding each of these entries. The adjustments are not required and are considered immaterial. Staff assesses the auditors\u2019 recommendations and determines the appropriate course of action for each one, typically implementing those that improve transparency and financial reporting on the City\u2019s financial records.", "A clean report is defined as one without audit-related findings. The City of Santa Monica has received a clean, unqualified/unmodified audit report and the GFOA Award for at least the last 31 years, since the City began participating in the GFOA program in FY 1983-84.", "The City\u2019s CAFR includes the following major sections and information:", "Introductory Section", "\u00b7 Letter of Transmittal \u2013 prepared by management and used to communicate information on areas that may have an impact on the City\u2019s finances now and in the future. This includes economic factors as well as budget and management factors.", "Financial Section (the main body of the CAFR for current year information)", "\u00b7 Independent Auditor\u2019s Report \u2013 the City\u2019s report card on the content of the CAFR", "\u00b7 Management\u2019s Discussion and Analysis (MD&A) \u2013 provides an analytical overview of the City\u2019s financial status", "\u00b7 Basic Financial Statements \u2013 show finances at a point in time (assets - liabilities) and throughout the year (revenues - expenditures), budget to actual revenues and expenditures, and cash flows", "o City-Wide Statements \u2013 overview of financial information including all of the City\u2019s operations", "o Fund Financial Statements \u2013 a detailed look at funds, showing Balance Sheet and Statement of Revenues, Expenditures and Changes in Fund Balance", "o Budget to Actual Comparisons \u2013 for the General Fund and other select major funds", "o Notes to the Financial Statements (Notes) \u2013 a narrative explanation that accompanies the Basic Financial Statements", "Required Supplementary and Supplementary Information Sections", "\u00b7 Pension Information \u2013 schedule of changes in the pension liability and related ratios; schedule of contributions by plan", "\u00b7 OPEB Information \u2013 three years of Other Post-Employment Benefits (medical benefits for retired employees) funding information", "\u00b7 A breakout of individual funds \u2013 for funds that were presented in a cumulative manner in the Financial Section", "Statistical Section (current and historical information \u2013 up to 10 years)", "\u00b7 Financial Trends", "\u00b7 Revenue Capacity Information", "\u00b7 Debt Capacity Information", "\u00b7 Demographic and Economic Information", "\u00b7 Operating Information", "MGO presented the CAFR to the Audit Subcommittee of the City Council on January 19, 2016. Subcommittee members were given an opportunity to review the report and ask questions of the external auditor. Among the topics discussed were the required communication and responsibilities of the external audit firm, changes to significant accounting policies, the function of significant accounting estimates, and prior period adjustments recommended by MGO. The Audit Subcommittee received the CAFR and recommended that it be presented to the full Council with a 4-0 vote, with Committee Member Vazquez absent.", "Discussion", "The attached CAFR for FY 2014-15 has received an unmodified, or clean, opinion by the City\u2019s independent auditor, MGO (Attachment B). The CAFR shows that City finances are stable. The following is an explanation of some key indicators shown in the CAFR.", "General Fund Balance", "The most notable measure of a City\u2019s financial health is the General Fund balance. As presented in the Basic Financial Statements, the City\u2019s General Fund had a balance of $375.0 million as of June 30, 2015. This balance is comprised of a number of categories, as follows:", "\u00b7 $42.2 million nonspendable, restricted or committed resources that are inventory or are required for specific purposes according to legal/contractual agreements or by ordinance or resolution of the City Council;", "\u00b7 $218.6 million assigned funds set aside for specific purposes based on budget priorities (i.e., continuing and future capital projects; potential investments to lower long term costs, such as additional payments to CalPERS to lower the City\u2019s unfunded liability or use as project financing equity; strategic goals; expenditure control budget; and pollution remediation); and", "\u00b7 $114.2 million in unassigned funds as follows:", "o $51.0 million rainy day contingency (15% of annual operating and capital expenditure budget);", "o $9.7 million economic uncertainty reserve to mitigate potential revenue losses;", "o $50.2 million for public works infrastructure expenditures; and", "o $3.3 million fund balance.", "The strong fund balance and rainy day and economic uncertainty reserves play a key role in Santa Monica\u2019s AAA bond rating. In addition to being an indicator of very strong financial health, the high bond rating allows the City to pursue lower cost financing structures.", "The General Fund balance increased by $9.0 million, primarily due to an increase in property tax, other tax, and license and permit revenues.", "Citywide Net Position", "The Statement of Net Position, similar to a balance sheet, shows total assets and liabilities of the City as of June 30, 2015. The total net position of the City for all activities was $1.4 billion. Net position is broken out into three categories: capital, restricted, and unrestricted.", "Net Capital Position ($1.2 billion)", "Capital assets include land, buildings, improvements, intangibles, infrastructure and utility systems, and construction in progress. Intangible assets represent rights of use for items such as software and payments for Santa Monica\u2019s cost of improvements to the City of Los Angeles sewage treatment system. Some notable capital projects that were underway as of June 30, 2015 are:", "\u00b7 California Incline and Pedestrian Overpass", "\u00b7 Expo Light Rail Phase 2", "\u00b7 Colorado Esplanade", "\u00b7 Expo Light Rail Maintenance Yard Buffer Park", "\u00b7 City Services Building", "\u00b7 Citywide (Breeze) Bike Share", "\u00b7 Replacement of Elevators in Downtown Parking Structures 2, 4, and 5", "Restricted Net Position ($193.7 million)", "These assets are subject to agreements with creditors, developers, grantors, or laws or regulations of other governments. Approximately 51% of this amount is restricted for affordable housing and committed to various projects, 14% is restricted per federal, state and other grant regulations, 18% is restricted according to development agreement terms, and the remaining amount is restricted for the Cemetery\u2019s trust fund, debt service reserve, and other grant and legislative constraints.", "Unrestricted Net Position ($74.8 million)", "Ninety-three percent of this amount is made up of the unrestricted portions of General Fund balance shown above (i.e. committed, assigned and unassigned). The remaining amount is held as reserves in other funds, such as the Water and Wastewater Funds. Healthy capital and operating reserves outside of the General Fund support rate stabilization and disaster recovery strategies for the City\u2019s many activities.", "Long Term Liabilities", "While short term liabilities are considered current and payable within a year after the date of the financial statements, long-term liabilities are due after a year and are an important factor in the City\u2019s financial planning. The primary source of long term liabilities is in the form of bonds and the debt service that is owed on them. $10.1 million in debt service payments were made on one general obligation bond for the Main Library construction, five General Fund revenue bonds for various parking structures and the Public Safety Facility, and one revenue bond to fund capital contributions towards the Hyperion wastewater treatment facility. The City did not issue any new debt for the fiscal year ended June 30, 2015. More information on long term debt can be found in Note 9, page 77 of the CAFR.", "Pension Liabilities", "For greater transparency, beginning in FY 2014-15, the Governmental Accounting Standards Board (GASB) established new pronouncements for pension accounting which moves reporting of the unfunded liability from the footnotes to the face of the financial statements. These GASB pronouncements do not affect the amount of the contributions that a government makes to pension plans, which remains government policy. The total net pension liability calculation also has not changed. This liability is an actuarial calculation based on projected future benefit payments for the service of past and current employees less the assets accumulated to pay those liabilities. Factored into the calculation of pension expense are the benefits earned each year, the interest on the unfunded pension liability, changes in benefit terms, if any, and projected earnings on the plans investments. The pronouncements also require that net pension liabilities be allocated to the City\u2019s proprietary funds. Because of the new standards, net position (assets minus liabilities) is reduced by the amount of the unfunded liability, but this does not affect the City\u2019s actual pension costs.  A detailed explanation of the Employee Benefits Programs including detailed pension information by plan is included in the Notes section (see Note 16, pages 94 through 106) and the Required Supplementary Information (pages 117 and 118).", "Recent State-mandated reforms and cost saving measures approved by Council, including an additional $30.1 million paid toward the City\u2019s unfunded pension liability, have worked to mitigate pension cost increases for the City. As shown on page 117 of the CAFR, the City\u2019s various pension plans are approximately 76% funded, leaving a combined unfunded actuarial liability of approximately $367 million. The City will continue per its Council-adopted policy to pay down at least $1 million of its unfunded liability every year. Furthermore, employees are currently paying for 25% of the total pension cost, and additional increases to public safety employee pension contributions will continue through FY 2016-17 based on collective bargaining agreements.", "Settlement with the State", "On October 28, 2013 the City and the Successor Agency entered into a settlement agreement with the State Department of Finance, the State Controller\u2019s Office, and the Board of Equalization stipulating payment of $56.8 million over four equal installments beginning on January 15, 2014 and ending on July 15, 2015. The City paid down the total settlement on January 14, 2015, leading the State to issue a Finding of Completion to the Successor Agency. Among other things, the finding of completion allows the Successor Agency to request the repayment of certain prior loans made from the City to the Redevelopment Agency. One such loan, totaling $36.1 million, was recently approved by the Department of Finance and the first repayment of $7.9 million was received in January 2016.", "Cash and Investments", "The CAFR also includes detailed information on the City\u2019s cash and investments. As of June 30, 2015, the City had $741 million in total cash and investments, 88% of which is in the form of investments authorized by the California Government Code and the City\u2019s investment policy. More information on cash and investments is found in Note 5, page 59 of the CAFR.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Amendment to the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street", "Department": "Development Services (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "11. Resolutions", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt a Resolution amending the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street changing the zoning from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "During the update of the Zoning Ordinance in 2015, the parcel located at 1419 19th Street was identified as a parcel where the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) land use designation was inadvertently changed from a commercial designation to a residential designation during the LUCE update. The Council consequently amended the LUCE Map for 1419 19th Street returning it to a commercial designation; however, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time. In order to make the zoning of the subject parcel consistent with the land use designation of the LUCE Map, the Official Districting Map needs to be amended changing the zoning of the property from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC). This report recommends that Council adopt a Resolution amending the Official Districting Map for 1419 19th Street changing the zoning from R2 to GC.", "Background", "On May 12, 2015 (Attachment B), Council introduced for first reading an Ordinance to adopt a new Zoning Ordinance, new zoning and land use related chapters, and a new final Official Districting Map. Council also directed staff to commence procedures to amend the LUCE Map designation of 1419 19th Street from a Low Density Residential designation to a General Commercial designation. This land use designation change would be consistent with the commercial zoning in existence at the time for the subject parcel and allow for the continued commercial use of the parcel.", "On June 3, 2015 (Attachment C), the Planning Commission voted to recommend to Council the adoption of a resolution to amend the LUCE Map for 1419 19th Street. On June 23, 2015 (Attachment D), the Council adopted a resolution approving the LUCE Map amendment changing the land use designation of 1419 19th Street to General Commercial. However, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time.", "In order to make the zoning of the subject parcel consistent with the land use designation of the LUCE Map, the Official Districting Map needs to be amended changing the zoning of the property from Low Density Residential (R2) to General Commercial (GC).", "The Planning Commission adopted a Resolution of Intention on November 18, 2015 (Attachment E) to consider this amendment to the Official Districting Map.", "On December 16, 2015 (Attachment F), the Planning Commission reviewed the proposed map amendment. The map amendment was technically denied as a motion to recommend approval of the map amendment failed by a vote of 3-3 with one Commissioner absent. Several Commissioners expressed concern that a commercially zoned property could result in a new medical office or auto dealership use on the subject site adjacent to residential uses to the south. Pursuant to Santa Monica Municipal Code (SMMC) Section 9.46.070(A), within 14 days after the Planning Commission action, the owner of the subject property filed a request for a hearing by the City Council on the proposed map amendment.", "Discussion", "1419 19th Street is located on the east side of 19th Street south of Santa Monica Boulevard. A one-story commercial building is located adjacent to the north. Multi-unit residential buildings are located adjacent to the south and across an alley to the east. An auto repair building is located across 19th Street to the west.", "The parcel is currently vacant but has historically been zoned and used commercially. Zoning maps dating back to 1960 show the subject parcel zoned commercially (C4). In 2007 the Planning Commission unanimously approved a hotel annex project for the site that, although was never constructed, supported the appropriateness of the parcel for a commercial project.", "Location and existing zoning - 1419 19th Street", "Address", "APN", "Existing LUCE Designation", "Existing Zoning", "Proposed Zoning Change", "1419 19th St", "4275009018", "General Commercial", "Low Density Residential (R2)", "General Commercial (GC)", "Council amended the LUCE Map designation of 1419 19th Street from a Low Density Residential designation to a General Commercial designation when it adopted the new Zoning Ordinance. However, the zoning of the property on the Official Districting Map was not changed at that time. The approved land use designation change is consistent with the commercial zoning in existence at the time for the subject parcel and allows for the continued commercial use of the parcel. The subject amendment to the Official Districting Map will make the zoning of 1419 19th Street consistent with its existing land use designation.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Santa Monica Travel and Tourism Board for a term ending on 06/30/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmember Himmelrich that the City Council support the continued work and tenure of California Coastal Commission Executive Director Charles Lester and direct staff to communicate this via a letter to Governor Jerry Brown.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1517016600": [[{"Title": "Fourth Modification to Agreement #8417 (CCS) with Kronos, Inc. for software licensing and upgrade services and Third Modification to Agreement #8434 (CCS) with Kronos, Inc., for software maintenance and support services", "Department": "Information Services Department, Customer Experience and Support", "Sponsors": "Interim Fire Chief Dennis J. Downs", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to agreement #8417 (CCS) in the amount of $85,179 with Kronos, Inc., a Massachusetts-based company, for 200 additional employee software licenses for Citywide use and upgrade services for Kronos, the City\u2019s electronic timekeeping and attendance system used by all departments and to implement an upgrade of Workforce TeleStaff (TeleStaff), event-based employee scheduling software used by the Fire Department. The term of the contract remains unchanged at 15 years, ending June 30, 2020. The new amended total contract amount will not to exceed $465,179, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval;2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to agreement #8434 (CCS) in the amount of $74,000 (including a 10% contingency) with Kronos, Inc., for maintenance and support services for Kronos and TeleStaff. The term of the contract remains unchanged at 15 years, ending June 30, 2020. The new amended total contract amount will not to exceed $1,202,653, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In 1998, the City purchased electronic timekeeping and attendance hardware and software from Kronos, Inc for Citywide use. In preparation for implementation of the new Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system, an overall upgrade of the Kronos system is required, as well as the purchase of 200 additional employee licenses to accommodate for a Citywide increase in staff and for some job-sharing of current positions.", "Additionally, in 2004, the City purchased TeleStaff, an automated staff scheduling and notification system for the Fire Department. The purchase included software maintenance services, which have been renewed annually since 2005. The City currently uses a version of TeleStaff that is four years old and will soon no longer be supported by Kronos, Inc., the current manufacturer who purchased the system from PDSI on May 2, 2011.  An upgrade to the latest version of TeleStaff is required at this time for the Fire Department.", "Staff recommends modifying the existing Sales Agreement and Software License Agreement #8417 (CCS) with Kronos, Inc. in the amount of $85,179, for a new total contract amount not to exceed $465,179, to upgrade Kronos and purchase additional licenses and upgrade TeleStaff to the latest version. Staff also recommends modifying the Software Maintenance and Support Agreement #8434 (CCS) in the amount of $74,000, including a 10% contingency, for a new total contract amount not to exceed $1,202,653, to extend the maintenance and support services for Kronos and TeleStaff and to purchase additional licenses as needed during the term of the contract. These changes will result in the consolidation of all Kronos licensing and maintenance services into two agreements with Kronos as referenced above.", "Background", "Currently, the City has three contracts with Kronos, one for hardware and software purchases and services, governed by a Kronos Sales Agreement and Software License Agreement No. 8417 (CCS); one for hardware and software maintenance, governed by Software Maintenance and Support Agreement No. 8434 (CCS); and by virtue of the PDSI acquisition, Agreement #8400 (CCS) for TeleStaff.", "On December 15, 1998 (Attachment C), Council authorized the purchase of a timekeeping and attendance system from Kronos, Inc. for the Police Department. The contract included the purchase of a time, attendance, and labor management system, and maintenance agreement to cover the five years following the end of the system warranty. Staff recommended Kronos, Inc. to provide this service following a competitive process.", "On November 23, 2004 (Attachment D), Council authorized an agreement with Kronos, Inc. for the purchase of a time and attendance software system for Citywide use \u2013 Agreement #8417 (CCS) and an agreement for maintenance and support services \u2013 Agreement #8434 (CCS). Following the initial purchase and software agreement, the contract has been modified previously to add software purchases and professional services to accommodate for upgrades, new staff, and to extend the maintenance agreement: administratively, on December 23, 2008; and through Council approval on September 14, 2010 (Attachment E), June 12, 2012 (Attachment F), and May 12, 2015 (Attachment G).", "On October 12, 2004 (Attachment A), Council authorized the purchase of TeleStaff for the Fire and Police Departments from PDSI \u2013 Agreement #8400 (CCS). On February 8, 2005 (Attachment B), Council approved a modification to the agreement to add three years of maintenance. In 2006, the contract was modified to remove the scheduling component for the Police Department who moved to a different scheduling system. On May 2, 2011, Kronos, Inc. acquired PDSI and assumed the terms and conditions of the City's agreement with PDSI for the TeleStaff software.", "Discussion", "In preparation for implementation of the new ERP system, an overall upgrade of the Kronos Citywide timekeeping system is required, as well as the purchase of 200 additional Citywide employee licenses to accommodate for an increase in staff and for some job-sharing of current positions. Additionally, the version of TeleStaff that is currently being used by the Fire Department is four years old and will soon no longer be supported by Kronos. The version in use does not offer many of the new features now available in the current product, such as support for advanced scheduling needs and mobile devices. Therefore, staff recommends upgrading TeleStaff to the latest version and extending the maintenance and support services.", "Staff evaluated alternatives for Kronos and TeleStaff for timekeeping, employee notification, scheduling, and attendance systems during the RFP process for the new ERP in 2014. However, none of the systems that were evaluated had the robust functionality of the Kronos and TeleStaff systems and did not integrate to allow for attendance data and scheduled time worked to be transferred to the City\u2019s financial system.", "Staff recommends modifying the sales and software license and software maintenance and support services agreements with Kronos to include the additional licenses and upgrade services for Kronos and TeleStaff, and related maintenance and support services. These changes would result in the consolidation of all Kronos licensing and maintenance services into two agreements with Kronos.", "A fourth modification of the Kronos Sales Agreement and Software License Agreement No. 8417 (CCS) would add 200 additional employee licenses for Citywide use and related upgrade services for Kronos and would incorporate the upgrade services and licenses for TeleStaff used by the Fire Department, currently under a separate agreement, into the existing Kronos agreement, for a total cost of $85,179. This would result in a revised contract amount not to exceed $465,179. A third modification of the Software Maintenance and Support Agreement No. 8434 (CCS) with Kronos, Inc. would incorporate the maintenance and support services for Kronos and TeleStaff, currently under a separate agreement, into the existing Kronos agreement and extend the services to cover both systems at a cost of $74,000, including a 10% contingency. This would result in a revised contract amount not to exceed $1,202,653.", "Additionally, one of the critical components of the new version of TeleStaff is the ability to notify Fire Department employees of work assignments via system generated automatic phone calls through a service provided by Voxeo, which would become available with the TeleStaff upgrade. The Voxeo services are billed through Kronos, Inc. Therefore, during the term of the agreement, up to $10,000 may be paid to Kronos, Inc. for Voxeo\u2019s services as part of the software maintenance and support agreement. The amount for these services is incorporated into the third modification amount for the TeleStaff component.", "Vendor Selection", "In 1998, Council authorized the purchase of a timekeeping and attendance system from Kronos, Inc. The system was selected after a competitive bidding process, which resulted in the evaluation of five vendors systems for their ability to meet the City\u2019s needs. The Kronos system was selected because it offered the most robust database, extensive real-time reporting capabilities, a hardware and software platform that conforms to the City standards to ensure support by existing personnel and compatibility with other City systems, and offered a turnkey solution with on-site and telephonic technical support and a local training facility.", "In 2004, Council authorized the purchase of TeleStaff, an automated staff scheduling and notification system for the Fire Department. The system was selected after evaluating multiple vendors\u2019 systems for their ability to be customized to fit the Fire Department\u2019s complex call-out requirements, including accommodating for organization specific rules in a decision-making hierarchy to automatically notify staff-via phone and email \u2013 with the details of their required attendance.", "In 2014, staff evaluated new timekeeping, attendance and scheduling alternatives during the RFP process for the new Enterprise Resource Planning system. However, none of the systems that were evaluated had the robust functionality of the Kronos and TeleStaff systems and they did not integrate to allow for scheduled time worked to be transferred to the City\u2019s financial management system.", "At this time, staff recommends Kronos, Inc. to continue to provide software licenses and maintenance and support services on a sole source basis for the Kronos and TeleStaff software. Kronos is the only vendor that can provide maintenance and support for its software systems.  Therefore, this sole source purchase is necessary in order to ensure service continuity as specified in SMMC 2.24.080 (a). Competition does not exist, for proprietary items of original equipment manufacturers and/or their authorized exclusive distributors.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The fourth modification to contract 8417 (CCS) to be awarded to Kronos, Inc. for software licenses and services is for an amount not to exceed $85,179. Funds for the TeleStaff licenses and upgrade services are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Fire Department. Funding for the Kronos Citywide employee licenses and upgrade services will be included in the FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget for Council approval. The modification will be charged to account C55000314.589000 ($15,179) and C019135.589000 ($70,000).", "The third modification to contract 8434 (CCS) to be awarded to Kronos, Inc. for the maintenance and support services is for an amount not to exceed $74,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Fire and Finance Departments budgets. The modification will be charged to account 01312.533580 ($47,785) and 01221.533580 ($26,215).", "Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Airport Park Expansion Award of Design Agreement", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Request for Proposals (RFP) #SP2422 to Rios Clementi Hale Studios (RCH), a California-based company, for the feasibility study and design of the Airport Park Expansion Project.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a Feasibility Study Agreement with Rios Clementi Hale Studios in an amount not to exceed $211,200 (includes a 10% contingency) for the feasibility study portion of the Project.3. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary modifications to complete additional work within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A), Council directed staff to develop recreational uses on non-aviation parcels at the Santa Monica Airport within three years. Following this directive, staff issued a Request for Proposals for feasibility and design services and evaluated responses.  Staff recommends Rios Clementi Hale Studios to provide feasibility and concept design services as the initial phase of their agreement, in an amount not to exceed $211,200 (includes a 10% contingency). Staff will return to Council to present the results of the feasibility study and recommendation to award the design portion of the agreement.", "Background", "On March 24, 2015 (Attachment A) Council heard a presentation by staff regarding future operations and land use at the Santa Monica Airport. The report asked Council to direct staff to continue with a full range of planning, environmental and legal work to enable the City to determine the Airport\u2019s future uses. Staff proposed reducing and eliminating aviation uses on a portion of the Airport land that was previously released from aviation use. Council amended the recommended action, directing staff to begin design and development of recreational uses on two parcels (12 acres) of non-aviation land at the southeastern portion of the airport, with the goal of developing the site for recreational use within three years, if possible.", "Discussion", "Vendor Selection", "On September 28, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for design services of the 12 acre Airport Park Expansion Project. The RFP asked for proposals for two scopes of work: a feasibility and concept design phase which would include community outreach, programming of the site, initial concept design; and a fee for design services which would be entered into after completion of the feasibility phase and upon Council approval. Staff recommends only awarding the feasibility study phase of the contract at this time based on the responses to both the feasibility study and design components of the Project.", "The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s online bidding website and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 10 proposals were received and publicly opened on October 26, 2015. Staff from Public Works, Planning & Community Development (PCD) and Community & Cultural Services (CCS) reviewed the proposals and rated the submittals based on selection criteria including fees, direct experience on similar projects, record performing public sector work, hourly rates for services, understanding of the project\u2019s scope, approach to the work and community outreach, qualifications of proposed staff and proposed project schedule.", "Following staff review of the proposals, three design firms were short listed on November 9, 2015 based upon all of the selection criteria\u2014The Office of James Burnett, AHBE Landscape Architects, and Rios Clementi Hale Studios. Per Council\u2019s direction to staff to develop recreational uses, of particular importance for proposal selection was experience developing sports fields, which all three firms demonstrated.", "After a thorough review process that included interviews with the three bidding teams, it was determined Rios Clementi Hale Studios was the most qualified firm and best bidder, based on  firm\u2019s clear understanding of the project, track record of projects of a similar size and scope, design team composition, previous experience with governmental agencies and community outreach, fees, and references.", "Rios Clementi Hale (RCH) Studios is a multidisciplinary design firm with a wide range of professional skills including architecture, landscape architecture, urban planning, interior design, graphic design and product design. They are an award-winning firm, nationally recognized for their skill and design excellence. Rios Clementi Hale Studios are the designers of the downtown Los Angeles Grand Park, the Rancho Cienega Recreation Center, the LA Zoo Event and Play Space, as well as many other parks and playgrounds. They also designed Euclid Park and Douglas Park for the City of Santa Monica. The RCH design team is comprised of professionals who have vast sustainability and sports field experience. RCH\u2019s talent, ability to collaborate, and past and present successful experience with the Santa Monica community all reinforce the strength of the firm\u2019s proposal.", "The contract to be awarded to Rios Clementi Hale Studios for the initial feasibility phase is $211,200. This amount includes a10% contingency. The results of the feasibility study will be presented to Council at the July 12, 2016 City Council meeting. The design contract was proposed to be $1,311,068 (including a 10% contingency). The budget for the design portion of the contract will be included in the proposed FY2016-18 Biennial CIP Budget.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Rios Clementi Hale Studios is $211,200 (includes a 10% contingency). Funds are available in the FY2015-16 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget at account P019120.589000 ($111,200) and account P339120.589000 ($100,000)."]}, {"Title": "Professional Services Agreement Modification for Graphic Design Services with Selbert Perkins Design for Wayfinding Project", "Department": "Planning Commission Agenda (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement #2946 in the amount of $100,000 with Selbert Perkins Design, a California-based company, for graphic design services for design of Downtown Parking Wayfinding Signage and Citywide First Mile-Last Mile Signage. This will result in a five year amended contract/agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $179,900;2. Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impact and Budget Actions section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report recommends an extension of the contract with Selbert Perkins Design to continue providing graphic design services to support the City\u2019s Downtown Parking and Expo First-Last Mile Wayfinding Project. The contract modification would extend the term of the contract until June 30, 2021 in an amount not to exceed $100,000, for a total amount not to exceed $179,900. Services for graphic design for the wayfinding project would come from funds deposited by Macerich Santa Monica LP pursuant to the Development Agreement No. 13DEV010.", "Background", "In 2014, City staff sought a graphic design consultant that could create a wayfinding system that helps people find an efficient path to where they are going, consisting of elements such as pedestrian-scale maps and information, bike network signs, parking availability and directional information. The goal was to maintain consistency with the City\u2019s accepted signage standards and approved graphic identity, reduce signage clutter and improve wayfinding for all users, including reducing the travel distances and congestion from vehicles circling in the Downtown looking for available parking. The graphic design firm of Selbert Perkins Design was selected following a competitive Request for Proposal process because of its wide range of experience with public agencies, qualified experienced team members and thoughtful creative approach. Selbert Perkins Design has provided graphic design services to the City on previous projects, including the recent Michigan Avenue Neighborhood Greenway (MANGo) identity and wayfinding signage. Selbert Perkins Design\u2019s current work on the City\u2019s Downtown Parking and Expo First-Last Mile Wayfinding Project has been of high quality. They have been expeditious in responding to input from the City\u2019s Wayfinding Team.", "Discussion", "Staff executed professional services agreement No. 2946 on October 28, 2014 in the amount of $79,900. A modification to the existing professional services agreement No. 2946 is proposed to allow the firm to continue to provide graphic design services for this project. The original scope of work was limited to the conceptual design of a family of wayfinding signs and the final design and documentation necessary for construction and installation of only the Downtown parking wayfinding signs. Selbert Perkins Design is finalizing the design of these downtown parking signs; the design is currently under review by a stakeholder committee consisting of key City staff and representatives of DTSM.", "Under the current contract scope Selbert Perkins Design has also developed the preliminary design for a family of signs to provide direction and information to pedestrians and bicyclists oriented toward Expo first-last mile wayfinding. First-last mile wayfinding assists people making connections using rail, bus, bike and walking transportation, encouraging more people to use sustainable and active transportation options and reducing pressure on the vehicle network. This design concept has been developed with public input, including from the Business Improvement Districts leadership, DTSM and other Downtown stakeholders, and via questionnaires completed by attendees at this year\u2019s National Night Out event. A committee of stakeholders comprised of key City staff and DTSM is providing input and direction on the refinement of the design concept. The proposed contract amendment would allow these efforts to continue.", "Preliminary Concept Design for Expo First-Last Mile Wayfinding Signs", "Selbert Perkins has nearly completed the scope of work pursuant to the original agreement, and the modification would allow the firm to provide graphic services to develop final design and documentation necessary for construction and installation of the wayfinding signage oriented towards pedestrians and bicyclists in the vicinity of the three new Expo Light Rail stations. The fabrication and installation of this wayfinding signage is funded through the 2013 Metro Call for Projects award for the \u201cMulti-Modal Wayfinding: Congestion Reduction/Station Access\u201d project.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "The firm, Selbert Perkins Design, was chosen through an RFP process in 2014. The Request for Proposals was released on May 24, 2014; four firms submitted proposals. Selbert Perkins Design was selected to provide graphic design services because of its wide range of experience with public agencies, qualified experienced team members and thoughtful creative approach to the wayfinding project. The conceptual designs for the family of wayfinding signage created to date reflect the firm\u2019s expertise and creativity. Additionally, the firm\u2019s work to date effectively incorporates input from City staff, DTSM and other Downtown stakeholders, as well as input from the general public received via over 100 surveys completed at the July 2015 National Night Out event. The contract modification would allow Selbert Perkins Design to continue to provide the graphic design services necessary to complete the next phase of the City\u2019s Downtown Parking and Expo First-Last Mile Wayfinding Project. Additionally, the continuity will facilitate the expedient preparation of drawings and documentation necessary to implement the project within the schedule(s) established by the funding agency(s). Funding will be allocated to the City over multiple years and installation of the signs is projected to be in calendar year 2017.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "This agreement modification to be awarded to Selbert Perkins Design is $100,000 for an amended agreement total not to exceed $179,900. One-time development agreement funds in the amount of $100,000 were received and set aside in the Special Revenue Source Fund. Award of the agreement modification requires the following budget changes:", "1. Release fund balance from reserve account 4.366515 (Santa Monica Place Development Agreement) of $100,000;", "2. Appropriate $100,000 to C049100.589000 (Wayfinding SM Place DA).", "1. Release fund balance from reserve account 4.366515 (Santa Monica Place Development Agreement) of $100,000;", "2. Appropriate $100,000 to C049100.589000 (Wayfinding SM Place DA)"]}, {"Title": "Approve selection of DNV-GL and authorize the City Manager to execute a contract not to exceed $226,578 (including contingency).", "Department": "Public Works, Office of Sustainability & Environment", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": ":Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP #60 to DNV-GL, a Norwegian-based company with offices in California, for the development of the Santa Monica Climate Action and Adaptation Plan; 2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with DNV-GL, in an amount not to exceed $226,578 (including a $20,598 contingency).", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The activities developed through the 15x15 Climate Action Plan concluded at the end of the 2015 calendar year. Staff is proposing developing a new Climate Action and Adaptation Plan to guide continued reductions and mitigation efforts to meet the City\u2019s long-term emission reduction goals. In October 2015, the City published a request for proposals inviting consulting firms to propose an approach, solicit stakeholder input, and draft potential targets for the Council's consideration, and then develop the plan. After reviewing the five bids received, staff recommends selecting DNV-GL in an amount not to exceed $226,578.", "Background", "On February 26, 2013, Council adopted the 15x15 Climate Action Plan (CAP). The short-term, action-based plan identified 15 measures to be completed by the year 2015, in order to reduce the community\u2019s carbon emissions by 15% below 1990 baseline levels). Additional reduction targets were also established at that time - a target of 30% reduction by 2030 and a target of 80% by 2050 (80x50). As the implementation of measures is concluded, staff will evaluate the impact of the 15x15 CAP on reducing emissions and present a final report by July 2016.", "Discussion", "Goal Setting", "In order to continue mitigating emissions and address the unavoidable impacts of climate change, a new plan with mid-term actions and long-term objectives must be developed. The recently adopted Paris Agreement that resulted from of the United Nations-organized Conference of Parties (COP21) recognizes that in order to limit global average temperature increase, Parties (national governments) should seek to achieve carbon neutrality by 2050.The Agreement also recognizes that deep reductions in global emissions will be required with an emphasis \u201cthat enhanced pre\u20102020 ambition can lay a solid foundation for enhanced post\u20102020 ambition.", "Cities that adopted 80x50 targets have, in recent years, adopted carbon neutrality goals or other more aggressive goals. These cities include Copenhagen, Melbourne, Seattle, Fort Collins, Stockholm and Vancouver. Being carbon neutral or achieving zero net emissions means that the net greenhouse gas emissions associated with a city is zero.", "On December 21, 2015, staff presented an update on climate action planning activities to the Task Force on the Environment. Following discussion, the Task Force adopted the following motion:", "\u201cIn light of the recent COP21, which explicitly includes a carbon neutrality goal, the Task Force on the Environment strongly recommends City Council adopt a carbon neutrality target for Santa Monica and direct staff to develop a plan for meeting that target by 2050 or sooner.\u201d", "Plan Development", "The next Climate Action and Adaptation Plan would be based on information gathered from a steering committee, a technical advisory group, community workshops and events as well as data and strategies related to the City's disaster preparedness, coastal planning, water resource management, mobility, social services, clean energy, clean transportation efforts and more. It would include the following elements:", "\u00b7 Re-inventory of 1990 and 2011 emissions", "\u00b7 Forecast of emissions for the years 2020, 2030 and 2050", "\u00b7 Comprehensive analysis of measures that can be implemented to achieve the City\u2019s 2030 and 2050 goals", "\u00b7 Comparative analysis of an 80x50 target with carbon neutrality", "\u00b7 Climate change hazard and vulnerability assessment", "\u00b7 Comprehensive analysis of measures that can be implemented to prepare for the impacts of climate change", "\u00b7 Community Action Toolkit", "\u00b7 Visual identity of the plan and supplemental documents for communication and outreach", "\u00b7 CEQA analysis for the plan", "\u00b7 Draft and final plan", "The comparative analysis of an 80x50 target and carbon neutrality would take place early in the plan development process. Based on the analysis, staff would return to Council with a recommendation regarding the long range emissions reduction target for the City, likely within the update of the Sustainable City Plan scheduled for March 2016. The final Climate Action and Adaptation Plan would be presented for adoption by June 2017.", "Consultant Selection", "On October 21, 2015, the City published a Request for Proposals to provide consulting services to develop a Climate Action and Adaptation Plan as required by the Office of Sustainability and the Environment, which is responsible for the policy, programs and reporting of carbon emissions and planning for climate change. The Request for Proposals was posted on the City's on-line bidding site. A total of 14 vendors were notified and 31 prospective vendors downloaded the request for proposals documents. Five proposals were received and publicly opened on November 18, 2015.", "A selection committee consisting representatives from the Office of Sustainability and the Environment, the Public Works Department, and the Planning and Community Development Department reviewed the applications and interviewed all five applicant teams on December 4, 2015. The final scores were averaged and then used to select the best qualified firm.", "Staff recommends DNV-GL as the most qualified firm to undertake this project. DNV-GL is recommended based on the team\u2019s demonstrated technical expertise, thought leadership in climate action planning and familiarity with Santa Monica\u2019s local context. The lead members of the DNV-GL team were involved in the City of New York\u2019s climate action projects and pilots, and more recently, the City of Palo Alto\u2019s Climate Action Plan which investigates three aggressive targets including an aggressive goal of carbon neutral by 2025. DNV-GL leads a team comprised of Raimi & Associates, Fehr & Peers and Global Green USA. All of the subconsultants have experience developing plans and working with communities in Santa Monica and elsewhere.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract agreement to be awarded to DNV-GL is for an amount not to exceed $226,578. Funds in the amount of $110,000 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the City Manager\u2019s Department. The agreement will be charged to account 01226.555060.99544. Future year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for One Compressed Natural Gas Rear Load Refuse Packer Vehicle", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4224 to Los Angeles Freightliner, a California-based company for the purchase of one compressed natural gas rear load refuse packer vehicle.2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Los Angeles Freightliner for one compressed natural gas rear load refuse packer vehicle in an amount not to exceed $301,653.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This purchase would replace one vehicle that has reached the end of its cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In November 2015, the City solicited bids for the purchase of one Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Rear Load Refuse Packer Vehicle. After reviewing all bids received, staff recommends Los Angeles Freightliner as the best and lowest bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG rear load refuse packer vehicle in the amount of $301,653. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing a vehicle powered by CNG fuel.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. The replacement of this vehicle is recommended based on criteria including mileage, age, and repair history.", "Resource Recovery and Recycling (RRR) utilizes a rear load packer vehicle Monday through Friday to collect illegal dumps, perform alley clean up, provide special bulk item removals, and remove items from the public right of way. In addition, rear loader packers collect refuse, recycling, and organics from hard-to-service areas that residential side load collection vehicles are unable to access.", "Example of a CNG rear load refuse packer vehicle", "Vendor Selection", "In November 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver one CNG Rear Load Refuse Packer Vehicle as required by the Street and Fleet Services Division, in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 432 vendors were notified and 21 vendors downloaded the bid. A total of 2 bids were received and publicly opened on November 30, 2015 per Attachment A.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. After reviewing the bids received, staff recommends Los Angeles Freightliner as the lowest and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG rear load refuse packer vehicle in the amount of $301,653. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing a vehicle powered by CNG fuel.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Los Angeles Freightliner is for an amount not to exceed $301,653. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "Modification to Agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company for the City Yards Stage 1", "Department": "Public Works, Architecture Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Professional Services Agreement No. 10145 (CCS) in the amount of $115,000 with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC), a California-based company, for additional scope of work to complete the feasibility analysis and concept design phase. This would result in a new total amount not to exceed $502,200. 2. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary modifications to complete the work within budget authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City seeks to redesign the area known at the City Yards at 2500 Michigan Avenue in order to modernize the aging facility. On July 28, 2015 (Attachment A) Council approved a Professional Services Agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company (HDCC) and Miller Hull Partnership to provide a feasibility analysis of the proposed site, cost estimates and concept design services. The team would recommend strategies for building upon the site in conjunction with the concept designs. A modification of $115,000 to Professional Services Agreement No.10145 (CCS) with HDCC is required to complete the feasibility analysis and concept design phase. The additional scope of work would include community outreach meetings, evaluating different parking garage options and additional geotechnical investigations outside the landfill area not included in previous studies.", "Background", "The City Yards is a 14.7-acre site owned and operated by the City of Santa Monica and located at 2500 Michigan Avenue, near the intersection of 24th Street and Michigan Avenue. The City took ownership of the site in the late 1940s. The property has been used as a base for the City\u2019s maintenance operations, storage facilities, and other industrial uses. Currently, a majority of the City\u2019s field maintenance operations are located at the City Yards in 16 buildings and structures of various ages and conditions. These operations include:", "\u00b7 Facilities Maintenance", "\u00b7 Custodial Services", "\u00b7 Street Maintenance", "\u00b7 Fleet Maintenance", "\u00b7 Traffic Operations", "\u00b7 Resource Recovery and Recycling", "\u00b7 Water and Wastewater Operations", "\u00b7 Hazardous Waste Storage (City usage only)", "\u00b7 Fire Department Training Area", "Operations and uses for the City Yards were adapted as-needed for various city functions, resulting in an expedient but inefficient utilization of space. Changing populations, growth, updates in technology, and differing service requirements resulted in a series of retrofitted updates throughout the site. Today, the City Yards operates seven days a week and currently houses more functions and employees than it was designed to accommodate. The scope and breadth of the operating divisions has evolved over time. Functional and space needs are no longer met by the facilities for any of the operations housed at the City Yards. Deficiencies include:", "\u00b7 maintenance shop space", "\u00b7 vehicle hoists", "\u00b7 covered maintenance area for heavy duty vehicles", "\u00b7 employee restroom/locker facilities", "\u00b7 parking for City fleet, employee, and visitor vehicles", "\u00b7 storage", "\u00b7 traffic circulation constraints within and around the City Yards", "\u00b7 customer service facilities to adequately serve members of the public at the various City Yards offices.", "In addition, a private recycling facility of rudimentary design utilizes a substantial portion of the site.", "Portions of the City Yards are considered \u201cEssential Services Buildings,\u201d as defined in the California Building Standards Code, and must remain operational after a major earthquake event as the Department Operations Center for Public Works first responders. This designation adds constraints on the design and raises greater concerns regarding the condition of these aging structures.", "To address these problems, on October 8, 1996 (Attachment B), Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL Interplan, Inc. (RNL) for consulting services to prepare a Master Plan for the City Yards that would address the physical reorganization, renovation and rehabilitation needs of the City Yards. On October 24, 2000 (Attachment C), Council approved the two proposed City Yards Master Plan alternatives in concept. The first concept included the continued operation of a City designed and constructed transfer station, while the second concept assumed contracted transfer station services with a third-party provider.", "On November 12, 2002 (Attachment D), Council awarded a new Professional Services Agreement with RNL for architectural and engineering services for the City Yards expansion project and directed staff to proceed with the design of a new municipal transfer station. On December 10, 2002 (Attachment E), Council approved only a limited schematic design for a new transfer station.", "On October 13, 2009 (Attachment F), Council authorized a Professional Services Agreement with RNL to update the City Yards Master Plan approved in 2002. The update was substantially completed in July 2010; however, the plan was not presented to Council due to additional required updates to the program and phasing changes, which were addressed in four subsequent modifications on September 13, 2011 (Attachment G), February 14, 2012 (Attachment H), September 11, 2012 (Attachment I) and June 25, 2013 (Attachment J).", "OnDecember 16, 2014 (Attachment K), Council authorized consulting services with International Parking Design to review the financing options, economics, demand and viability of a shared parking structure at City Yards with the Bergamot Station Arts Center. Additionally,the consultant will determine the potential to maximize utilization by scaling the parking inventory toapproximately 500 spaces, adding approximately 150 spaces for shared use with the adjacent Bergamot Station Arts Center.", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment L), Council approved the Master Plan in concept and authorized staff to issue a request for bids for a design-build team for the initial phases of the City Yards Master Plan and prepare a financing plan for the initial phases of the City Yards Master Plan.", "Discussion", "On July 28, 2015 (Attachment A) Council approved a Professional Services Agreement with Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company and Miller Hull Partnership to conduct a feasibility analysis of the proposed site, and completed cost estimates and concept design services. The initial selection process for Hathaway Dinwiddie Construction Company and Miller Hull Partnership was competitive and in accordance with the City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. The team would recommend strategies for building on the site in conjunction with the concept designs.", "A modification of $115,000 to Professional Services Agreement No.10145 (CCS) with HDCC is required to complete the Phase I feasibility analysis and concept design phase. The additional scope of work would include early engagement of the community through outreach meetings, evaluating different scaling options of the parking garage that resulted from the Bergamot Arts Center shared parking study and additional geotechnical investigations outside the landfill area not included in previous studies. The additional geotechnical investigation will help inform the design as well as construction cost for the project.", "This is a phased agreement; staff will return to Council at the conclusion of the Phase I feasibility analysis with cost estimates and concept design for direction and authorization to continue to Phase II design services. The final project amount would be modified by two guaranteed maximum prices: one for the design services (Phase II) and a second guaranteed maximum price for construction (Phase III) with Council approval and authorization at each phase.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to HDCC is $115,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $502,200. In addition to funds of $65,000 available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C014028.589000 and $20,000 available in account C019047.589000, an additional $30,000 is required to complete the additional scope of work outlined above. The appropriation of $30,000 will be included in the FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget for Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Medical Services for Arrestees", "Department": "Police Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council take the following actions:1) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with Vital Medical Services, LLC, a California-based company, for in- house medical service provisions for arrestees. This is a contract in an amount not to exceed $150,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.2) Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a professional service agreement with UCLA Santa Monica Hospital and Palm Drive Medical Group, a California-based company, to provide emergency room medical services to arrestees. This is a contract in an amount not to exceed $50,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff recommends that the City enter into a Professional Services Agreement with Vital Medical Services, LLC (Vital) to provide in-house medical services for SMPD arrestees and inmates at a one year cost not to exceed $150,000. Medical services covered under the agreement would include pre-booking medical clearances provided to arrestees who exhibit or complain of medical conditions that police personnel are unable or unqualified to administer treatment for, and blood draws taken from persons arrested for driving under the influence (DUI). Under the proposed agreement, all medical services would be administered by experienced, licensed medical personnel under the supervision of a licensed emergency care physician.", "Secondly, SMPD is seeking authorization to enter into a Professional Services Agreement with UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica (UCLA SM) and Palm Drive Emergency Physicians Medical Group (Palm Drive), which is the billing name for UCLA SM, at a one year cost not to exceed $50,000. Medical services covered under this agreement would include emergency room treatment, which would be any medical treatment, such as medical needs requiring x-rays, which cannot be provided under the in-house treatment services offered by Vital in the SMPD Jail Facility. Under this proposed agreement, all medical services would be administered by UCLA Santa Monica Hospital medical personnel.", "Background", "SMPD is required by state and federal law to provide medical services to arrestees known to have or declaring medical issues or injuries prior to booking and housing in the SMPD Jail. Additionally, the Department routinely requires medical services in the form of blood draws for those arrested for DUI or being under the influence of a controlled substance. Currently, arrestees requiring pre-booking medical clearance, medical care, or blood draws are transported by police officers to local hospitals. The cost of the emergency room visits, physician services, and any ancillary tests or medical services are borne by the Department. Based on data from FY 2008 to FY 2014, the average number of patients requiring medical treatment was 287 per year, with the lowest year\u2019s treatment numbers being 199 arrestees and the highest being 437. Costs paid for those medical services averaged $71,643 per year, with the span of costs ranging from $38,000 to $110,000. These averages do not include the costs associated with the amount of time officer(s) spent in the emergency room and the cost impacts of the resulting patrol shortages. Every medical clearance requires one or two sworn police officers (based on the nature of the arrest) to transport the arrestee to the medical facility, to wait for available medical personnel, to standby during the necessary treatment and tests, and to transport the arrestee back to the SMPD Jail Facility.  Arrestees may also require follow-up medical treatments for wound care or the dispersal of medicine; these activities require additional police transports.  These activities place an additional burden on the Department\u2019s patrol personnel and create additional potential safety risks, while also taking away valuable time from responding to the community\u2019s public safety needs.", "The Police Department and UCLA SM/Palm Drive have had an ongoing relationship for more than twenty years. The most recent Council meeting regarding the use of UCLA-Santa Monica Hospital/Palm Drive (under their previous name \u201cJanzen, Johnston, and Rockwell\u201d) for Emergency Room Treatment of Prisoners dates back to February 10, 1998. Medical services covered under this agreement would include emergency room treatment, which would be any medical treatment, such as medical needs requiring x-rays, which cannot be provided under the in-house treatment services offered by Vital in the SMPD Jail Facility.", "Discussion", "Vital Medical Services, LLC", "Medical services covered by Vital would include pre-booking medical clearances provided to arrestees who exhibit or complain of medical conditions that police personnel are unable or unqualified to administer treatment for, and blood draws taken from persons arrested for driving under the influence (DUI). Earlier in 2015, the Police Department and Vital conducted a nine day pilot program to evaluate the feasibility of Vital\u2019s services in a practical application. The nine days included two weekends when Vital\u2019s medical personnel were on-site at the City Jail facility. Vital\u2019s staff worked evenings and were available on an on-call basis, 24 hours per day with a guaranteed response time of within 30 minutes during the entire nine day period. During this time frame, 23 medical treatments were provided and the Police Department found the service to be timely, responsive, efficient and professional. Services included conducting arrestee assessments to determine the arrestee\u2019s medical suitability for housing in the City Jail; thereby enabling the arrestee to be booked directly into the City Jail without the requirement of being transported to the SM UCLA Hospital\u2019s Emergency Room. During the pilot period, only one incident occurred wherein the arrestee had to be transported to the Emergency Room to be seen for treatment. Vital\u2019s staff may recommend calling paramedic services to transport an arrestee to the hospital; however, there were no such cases during the pilot.", "The average response time when Vital\u2019s personnel were not already on-site was 13 minutes. During the pilot program, approximately 60.72 patrol hours were saved. These service hours were based on the Department\u2019s statistics which indicate that it takes an average of 2.64 officer hours to transport an arrestee to the hospital, maintain custody of the arrestee in the emergency room while medical clearances and/or a blood draw are being performed, and to transport the arrestee back to the City Jail. The 23 arrestees who received medical services from Vital during the pilot program would otherwise have required medical treatment or booking clearance at an area hospital. Given the fully-benefitted hourly compensation rate for a police officer ($90.82), the estimated savings in personnel time for the nine-day pilot totaled $5,514.59. In addition, other cost savings resulted from Vital\u2019s lower cost-per-arrestee charges; Vital charges a maximum of $250 per occurrence versus the $300 per occurrence charged by UCLA SM/ Palm Drive.", "The proposed initial, one-year agreement with Vital, affords the Department an opportunity to assess and evaluate the efficacy of providing medical services within the SMPD Jail. Services would include treatment for up to 600 arrestees annually (an average of 50 per month) on-site in the Jail Facility. The agreement would enable SMPD to exceed this annual estimation by 20% (for a total of 720 arrestees) at no additional charge. Vital would notify the Department when 75% of the agreed upon services have been delivered; this notification serves as an early warning in the event the Department was on track to exceed the service estimations ahead of the 12-month contract timeline. While this level of service provision is higher than the average number of arrestees requiring medical treatment in years past, data collected during a pilot program with Vital in 2015 indicated this level of service is appropriate based on current bookings in the SMPD Jail Facility.", "Vital's Medical Director, Dr. Angelique Campen, MD, FACEP, MBA, is the Director of Saint Joseph's Emergency Department and a clinical instructor of Emergency Medicine and practicing physician at UCLA's Department of Emergency Medicine. Dr. Campen would be responsible for oversight of all Vital's medical services and licensed personnel. Dr. Campen and Vital's emergency room physicians possess relevant experience and have current histories of providing medical services to arrestees at local area hospitals, including level one trauma centers. These board certified emergency room physicians would provide 24/7 on-call support for the Physician Assistants (PA) and Nurse Practitioners (NP) assigned to provide services to the Police Department.", "Vital\u2019s personnel would provide pre-booking medical clearance evaluations and select minor medical treatments to the Police Department\u2019s arrestees utilizing appropriately vetted and licensed PAs and/or NPs. Examples of medical services that could be performed include minor wound care and treatment of nausea. Absent specific evidentiary kits required by County of Los Angeles crime laboratories, Vital would provide the necessary equipment and supplies to perform the medical services in a private room located within the City Jail; the City Jail\u2019s Room B1114 meets all medical and Board of Corrections requirements for these types of services. Providing such medical services in the Jail complies with current standards and regulations of the California Board of Corrections.  The City Jail facility requires no modifications to accommodate this program.", "It is projected that the proposed agreement with Vital would significantly reduce the need to transport arrestees to the hospital. Not having arrestees in the emergency room (ER) prevents the general public and community from having to seek treatment in the ER along with uncooperative, potentially combative, arrestees. It is also an officer safety enhancement in not having to transport uncooperative, potentially combative, prisoners to and from the City Jail. Finally, the Hospital\u2019s ER saves time by not having to spend time treating minor arrestee health issues better addressed by Vital\u2019s personnel in the City Jail facility. Based on Dr. Campen's experience with arrestee pre-booking medical clearances for local police agencies, it is anticipated that approximately 95% of arrestees requiring pre-booking medical clearance would be able to be approved without a hospital visit. Furthermore, police staff time spent transporting and securing those remaining 5% of arrestees requiring hospital treatment due to more severe medical issues would be reduced, as Vital\u2019s staff at the City Jail would alert the hospital ER\u2019s staff before the arrestee arrives at the ER, a circumstance which has the potential to expedite the treatment to be received. Vital\u2019s staff would also be available to evaluate any current jail inmate\u2019s medical health needs, provide treatment, and/or make any recommendations for additional medical care.", "The proposed agreement commits Vital to providing 16 hours of on-site medical services per week and to provide medically certified personnel on an on-call basis 24-hours a day, 365 days a year.  After being called by the Police Department\u2019s personnel, on-call Vital staff members would respond to the City Jail within 30 minutes. In addition to providing medical assessments and treatments, Vital would also perform blood draws on DUI (driving under the influence) arrestees who elect a blood draw over a breathalyzer test under California's implied consent law.", "Based on an analysis of data from the past five fiscal years, staff projects that by utilizing Vital\u2019s services, an average savings of 486 police officer service hours annual would be realized. These service hour estimates are based on Departmental statistics which indicate it takes an average of 2.64 hours each to transport an arrestee to the hospital, maintain custody of the arrestee in the emergency room while medical clearances and/or a blood draw are being performed, and return the arrestee to the City Jail. Based on a police officer\u2019s hourly rate of $90.82, which includes benefits, the total estimated annual cost saving, in terms of personnel, approximates $44,138.52. Given that medical treatment transports are often a two-officer assignment, the total cost savings is likely to be higher than these estimates.", "UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica Hospital and Palm Drive", "The UCLA Medical Center and Santa Monica Emergency Center Director, Dr. Whalid Ghurabi, is Board Certified in emergency medicine. He has extensive experience in the field of EMS, and has served as the Santa Monica Fire Department Medical Director for the past 15 years. In the event an arrestee requires emergency room services, he/she would be transported to the UCLA Medical Center, Santa Monica Emergency Room for treatment.", "The proposed one-year agreement with UCLA SM/Palm Drive, at a cost of $300 per visit, would meet the medical needs of those arrestees who have medical needs requiring ongoing, emergent care and cannot be treated in-house by Vital. In the event that an arrestee requires emergency room treatment, one or two sworn police officers (based on the nature of the arrest) will transport the arrestee to the UCLA SM Hospital Emergency Room, wait with the arrestee for available medical personnel, standby during the necessary treatment and tests, and then transport the arrestee back to the SMPD Jail Facility. Examples of situations requiring emergency room treatment include any injury needing an x-ray or an MRI since that equipment is not available to Vital Medical in the SMPD Jail.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "Staff recommends Vital Medical Services furnish and provide in-house medical services in the City\u2019s Jail facility. Vital approached Santa Monica in 2014 and after research staff determined that Vital is the only service in existence delivering facility-based medical support to municipal law enforcement agencies.  In the past year, similar agreements were launched with the Glendale Police Department and the Hawthorne Police Department; the results have proved beneficial in terms of staff time and cost savings. The alternatives to providing in-house City Jail medical services would require SMPD to hire medical staff as City employees at a significantly higher cost or to continue existing practices.", "In terms of those arrestees who require immediate, emergency medical care, staff recommends UCLA SM/Palm Drive to provide emergency room services to the Police Department\u2019s arrestees. Staff has confirmed that there are no similar emergency room and billing services pairing provided at local hospitals.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to Vital Medical Services, LLC is for an amount not to exceed $150,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Police Department. The agreement would be charged to account 01306.555250.", "The agreement to be awarded to Palm Drive Emergency Physicians Medical Group is for an amount not to exceed $50,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Police Department. The agreement would be charged to account 01306.555250."]}, {"Title": "New and Amended Housing Programs: Housing Opportunity Utilizing Subsidy Enhancements (HOUSE), Revisions to the Affordable Housing Production Program Administrative Guidelines, and Amendment to TORCA Homeownership Loan Terms", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Approve the proposed HOUSE program parameters for incentives outlined in Attachment A, regarding a pilot program intended to maintain and increase opportunities for households with housing vouchers;2. Approve the revised Administrative Guidelines to the Affordable Housing Production Program, as redlined in Attachment B; and3. Authorize the City Manager to approve an amendment to the TORCA loan term of any remaining borrower, upon request and subject to an evaluation regarding repayment feasibility and continued income-eligibility of the borrower, converting the existing 20-year or 30\u2011year term to a term requiring full repayment upon sale or transfer of the condominium.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Opportunities to find housing among residents with housing vouchers are very limited in the current housing market.  As part of a \u201cjump start\u201d project associated with the Council-approved Strategic Goal of Maintaining an Inclusive and Diverse Community, staff proposes a pilot program to incentivize and support apartment owner participation in voucher programs. Key elements of the proposed HOUSE (Housing Opportunities Utilizing Subsidy and Enhancements) Program include property improvement grants, participation bonuses, and loss mitigation measures, as well as a landlord liaison, educational forums, targeted marketing, and a website upgrade.  Additionally, staff has identified minor proposed revisions to the Administrative Guidelines of the Affordable Housing Production Program to clarify protocols regarding eligibility, rent increases, and waitlist management. Finally, staff proposes additional flexibility for TORCA participants regarding loan repayments.", "Background", "At its retreat in August, Council identified Maintaining an Inclusive and Diverse Community as a top strategic goal and specified that affordable housing is a critical component of that priority. At its August 25, 2015 study session (Attachment C) regarding affordable housing, Council discussed the current state of affordable housing in Santa Monica and opportunities to increase financing for affordable housing. TheCouncil\u2019s affirmation of its continued commitment to affordable housing coincides with an internal evaluation of Housing Division programs, including ideas to strengthen affordable housing policies and programs. Three current programs, the Housing Authority voucher programs, the Affordable Housing Production Program (AHPP), and the Tenant Ownership Rights Charter Amendment (TORCA) Loan Program, are discussed in this report.", "In the Housing Authority voucher programs, participants who have been issued housing vouchers are experiencing significant obstacles in finding property owners willing to accept the rent amounts allowed under the federally funded programs, which are well below market rents. For example, the Housing Authority\u2019s exception payment standard (i.e., monthly rent limit) for a one-bedroom apartment under the voucher program is $1,352 and recent data indicates that the median market rent for one-bedroom apartments range from $1,900 to $2,850 (based on data from the Rent Control Board and WestsideRentals). At its October 27, 2015 meeting (Attachment D), as part of its allocation to \u201cjump start\u201d projects associated with the strategic goals, Council approved a FY2015-16 budget allocation of $350,000 toward a pilot program to incentivize property owners to rent to households with vouchers.  The funds are proposed to be directed toward programs that encourage greater apartment owner participation in affordable housing, including participation-based financial incentives and loss mitigation assurances, as well as enhanced communications and outreach efforts. This report provides specific recommendations for a new proposed program. Concurrently, staff has submitted a request to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) asking that the maximum payment standard for Santa Monica vouchers be increased to be more competitive in the current market. While it is uncertain whether HUD will approve an increase in the payment standard, if they do, it is highly unlikely that the increase will make vouchers fully competitive in the Santa Monica market. As a result, staff recommends the pursuit of additional tools that could increase voucher utilization.", "The AHPP requires market-rate housing developers to build, or pay fees toward the development of, affordable housing. Nine-hundred thirty-three affordable apartments have been completed under the AHPP, representing 21 percent of the City\u2019s affordable housing portfolio. Staff has identified a few areas in the Administrative Guidelines concerning eligibility, rent increases, and waitlist protocols which would benefit from clarification.", "Additionally, the TORCA Loan Program provided deferred payment loans to assist low- and moderate-income tenants with purchasing their converted apartments.  Although the TORCA Loan Program has been discontinued with respect to issuing new loans, there are 18 existing loans which begin maturing in the next fewyears. OnDecember11, 2012 (Attachment E), Council authorized staff to allow a 10-year extension of the original 20-year loan terms to coincide with the 30-year term of the TORCA homeowner\u2019s primary mortgage. Another repayment option involving a due-on-sale approach would provide further flexibility to TORCA borrowers who may encounter economic hardship in conjunction with repaying the deferred loan at maturity.", "Discussion", "To address affordable housing programmatic challenges, staff recommends that Council approve the pilot HOUSE (Housing Opportunities Utilizing Subsidy and Enhancements) apartment owner incentive program for Housing Authority vouchers, revise the AHPP Administrative Guidelines, and allow an amendment to the TORCA loan terms for remaining program participants.", "Property Owner Incentive Program", "The Housing Authority\u2019s voucher programs are a critical component of Santa Monica\u2019s affordable housing strategies, though the programs\u2019 viability in the market is at risk. Voucher programs primarily serve extremely low-income households, including elderly and disabled persons, with incomes below 30 percent of the area median income (e.g., $17,950 for a 1-person household). Additionally, Housing Authority data indicate that only seven percent of program participants reside in housing not subject to affordability covenants. This situation reflects the large gap between the voucher payment standard and current market rents, leaving no economic incentive for the private housing market to participate in the voucher program. Existing tenants with vouchers are protected from arbitrary evictions, as only \u2018good cause\u2019 evictions are allowed, based upon Measure RR, adopted in 2010 by Santa Monica voters.  However, landlords often leave the voucher program upon vacancies. Theproposed HOUSE Program would implement strategies to recruit and retain property owners to participate in voucher programs. The proposed components would include: 1) Property Enhancement Grant; 2) Participation Bonus; 3) Loss Mitigation Guarantee; 4) Landlord Liaison; 5) Advisory Forums; and 6) Targeted Marketing Strategies, including website modifications. The parameters of the proposed HOUSE Program are provided in Attachment A.", "To effectively market the HOUSE Program, staff recommends targeted outreach to property owners, association groups, chamber of commerce, and others to provide information about the benefits of participating in housing voucher programs, and to draw attention to the newly developed HOUSE Program. Creation and printing of brochures, flyers, newsletters, information packets, and changes to the Housing Authority\u2019s website would be included in the strategy.", "The $350,000 overall budget of the proposed HOUSE Program includes $100,000 of discretionary funds reallocated from FY 2013-14 to FY2015-16 and budgeted by Council on June 23, 2015 (Attachment F), for use toward loss mitigation measures, and $250,000 budgeted by Council on October 27, 2015, for property owner incentives. Therecommendations above include \u201cestimated budget amounts\u201d for the various components of the proposed HOUSE Program, because the pilot program may require flexibility during implementation to shift resources to more successful elements of the HOUSE Program. However, the allocated budget of $350,000 will not be exceeded.", "Proposed Revisions to AHPP Guidelines", "Staff proposes amendments to Section 7 of the AHPP Administrative Guidelines, which provides rules regarding tenant eligibility, rent increase limitations, and waitlist management. Additionally, staff proposes minor \u2018clean-up\u2019 of existing language throughout the Guidelines to reflect Council-approved revisions to the AHPP in 2013, as well as a stylistic change from \u201cunits\u201d to \u201cresidences\u201d. The proposed revisions to the Guidelines are provided as Attachment B in redline format.", "During the course of compliance monitoring, some issues have arisen regarding tenanteligibility. One issue involves clarifying that the affordable residence must be the household\u2019s sole residence. Another issue involves clarifying that ineligible occupants include employees associated with the owner, including the property management firm, except when State law requires on-site staff.  A third issue involves limiting the scope of rent increases, when the rent charged is significantly below the deed-restricted rent limit, to five percent annually.", "Staff also recommends a change to the waitlist protocol in Section 7(C) (2). The current protocol indicates the waitlist will be re-opened when the number of households in any income category decreases below 300. The language would be eliminated to be consistent with a new waitlist approach involving a substantially reduced and more active waitlist. Additionally, the language in Section 7(D) (1) regarding rules for increases in household income is simplified and reformatted, without substantive changes.", "Proposed Amendments to TORCA Loan Terms", "A total of 53 TORCA Loans were provided from 1994 to 2001 to assist tenants with becoming homeowners. Thirty-five of the loans have been repaid to date and the remaining 18 will mature beginning in 2016 through 2023. Borrowers may request a 10\u2011year deferral of the original 20-year loan term. The TORCA loans are shared\u2011appreciation loans, which means in addition to repaying the original principal, repayment includes the City\u2019s share of the equity growth since purchase.", "Staff has spoken to a few TORCA borrowers concerned that loan repayment would result in economic hardship, due to the necessity of mortgaging the condominium to enable repayment of the TORCA loan. One way to eliminate the potential negative scenario would be to allow the loan term to be amended from a fixed date to a due-on-sale repayment requirement. In a due-on-sale scenario, the repayment of the principal loan balance and the shared-appreciation would happen when the TORCA condominium is sold or ownership is otherwise transferred. Whiledeferringrepayment until sale or transfer may involve complications associated with probate disputes, staff recommends that Council allow such amendments to TORCA loans if requested by the borrower, subject to an evaluation of repayment feasibility and continued income-eligibility of the borrower, with approval by the City Manager.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The cost of the proposed HOUSE Program would not exceed $350,000. Budget authority was approved by Council on October 27, 2015 and the FY 2015-16 appropriation of $250,000 is available in account SO015203.589000. Additional budget authority of $100,000 from discretionary funds for loss mitigation measures was approved by Council on June 23, 2015 and the FY 2015-16 appropriation is available in account 01201.579001.", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action regarding revisions to the AHPP Administrative Guidelines or the TORCA Loan terms. However, allowing repayment of TORCA loans to occur at sale or transfer of the property, rather than at loan maturity (i.e., 20 or 30 years from date of loan issuance), may delay receipt of shared-appreciation revenues associated with loan repayment."]}, {"Title": "Statement of Official Action denying appeal 15ENT-0321 and upholding the Joint Design Review Body's denial of Building Design, Colors, Materials, and Landscape Plans for 14ARB-173 for the construction of a new 271-room hotel and 15,210 square feet of ground floor retail/restaurant space at 710 Wilshire Boulevard.", "Department": "Planning and Community Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council approve the attached Statement of Official Action denying Appeal 15ENT-0321 and upholding the Joint Design Review Body\u2019s denial of Building Design, Colors, Materials, and Landscape Plans for 14ARB173 for the construction of a new 271-room hotel and 15,210 square feet of ground floor retail/restaurant space at 710 Wilshire Boulevard.", "Body": ["Executive Summary and Discussion", "This staff report transmits for City Council certification the Statement of Official Action for Appeal 15ENT-0321. After holding a public hearing on December 8, 2015 Council denied the appeal and upheld the Joint Design Review Body\u2019s denial of the ARB application. The City Council\u2019s decision was based upon the findings and conditions contained in the attached Statement of Official Action.", "In denying the appeal, Council also gave the following direction:", "\u00b7 Remand the project back to the JDRB;", "\u00b7 Set a 6-month time limit or the JDRB to make a decision regarding the ARB application; and", "\u00b7 That the JDRB provide as promptly as possible clear direction to the applicant based on the findings in the Statement of Official Action.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Amendment to Professional Services Agreement to Provide Support Services for MS4 Discharge Permit Compliance", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to professional services agreement #2611 in the amount of $85,000 with California Watershed Engineering (CWE), a California-based company, to continue providing support services for compliance with the Municipal Separate Storm Sewer System (MS4) discharge permit. This will result in a four-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $150,000.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica is part of the Los Angeles County Flood Control District, administered by the Los Angeles Regional Water Quality Control Board (Control Board). The Control Board adopted the new Waste Discharge Requirements for Municipal Separate Storm Sewer Systems (MS4) Discharges within the Coastal Watersheds of Los Angeles County, except those Discharges Originating from the City of Long Beach MS4 (Permit) on November 8, 2012. As part of its Permit compliance efforts, the City participated in the development of an Enhanced Watershed Management Program (EWMP) for the Santa Monica Bay Jurisdictional Group 2 and 3 which were submitted to the Control Board in June 2015.", "This modification would provide staff with technical support in the planning and implementation of the EWMP. Staff recommends increasing the existing California Watershed Engineering (CWE) agreement amount by $85,000 and extending the term for one additional year.", "Background", "CWE has provide support services for permit compliance to the City of Santa Monica since April 2013, previously under Council threshold. The Federal Clean Water Act (CWA) requires the Control Board to develop water quality standards that identify beneficial uses, and criteria to protect beneficial uses for each water body found within its region. Beneficial uses include swimming, fishing, drinking water, navigability, and wildlife habitats and reproduction.", "CWA section 402 requires the issuance of a permit to regulate municipal storm water discharges. On November 8, 2012, the Board adopted the Permit with an effective date of December 28, 2012.", "The Permit covers the Los Angeles County Flood Control District, the County of Los Angeles, and 84 incorporated cities in Los Angeles County, including the City of Santa Monica.", "As part of Permit compliance efforts the City of Santa Monica and Cities of Los Angeles, El Segundo, Los Angeles County Flood Control District and the County of Los Angeles jointly developed the EWMP for Jurisdictional Groups 2 & 3 of the Santa Monica Bay watershed. EWMP is a comprehensive program that is expected to improve water quality through the planning and implementation of multi-benefit, regional projects and low impact development strategies in the watershed area.", "Multi-benefit, regional projects (EWMP Projects) would be designed to retain runoff generated by the 85th percentile 24-hour storm event on the drainage areas tributary to the projects, while also achieving other benefits such as flood control and water supply.", "Discussion", "As part of its Permit compliance efforts, the City would implement the EWMP projects. These projects would be supported by a number of funding sources including Proposition 1 as administered by the State Water Resources Control Board (SWRCB). These funding opportunities require the City to develop individual project reports which include in-depth feasibility studies, cost analysis, alternative comparison and environmental analyses.", "CWE is a multi-disciplined engineering firm that provides design and engineering consulting in stormwater management, water resources and civil engineering. CWE has been providing support services for the City\u2019s permit compliance efforts and was involved in the development of the EWMP. With the proposed amendment, CWE would provide the additional engineering support to complete the necessary feasibility reports for the EWMP Projects.", "With the amended professional services agreement CWE would continue to provide the following services on an as-needed basis:", "A. Provide support services and technical input pertaining to the requirements of the MS4 Permit and its compliance options.", "B. Assist the City in evaluating existing storm water programs and permit compliance efforts.", "C. Provide guidance on permit requirements.", "D. Attend coordination meetings with City staff, the Water Board or other City partners.", "E. Provide feasibility and concept reports for the EWMP Projects.", "Consultant Selection", "On February 4, 2013, the City published Request for Proposals #SP2104 for Los Angeles County MS4 Discharge Permit Compliance, which was posted on the City's online bidding site in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. Sixty firms received copies of the request for proposal. Staff received seven proposals. Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073, CWE, was identified as the best qualified firm to provide the services based on their experience, qualifications, technical competence and competitive cost. Staff recommends CWE as the best proposer to provide as needed support services for this project.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to CWE is $85,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $150,000. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget", "in the Public Works Department. The modification will be charged to account 06402.555060."]}, {"Title": "Software Maintenance and Support Services Contract Renewal for the Housing Authority", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": ": Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contractual service agreement with HAPPY Software Inc. (HAPPY), a NewYork-based company, for ongoing software maintenance and support services of HAPPY\u2019s full suite of Housing Pro 8 Software. The proposed amount for the three-year contract would not exceed $60,000, with future-year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City uses Housing Pro 8 software, owned by HAPPY Software, Inc., to administer the Housing Authority\u2019s rental housing voucher programs, as well as maintain its Affordable Housing Programs wait list. The current agreement expires on January31,2016. Staff recommends a new agreement with HAPPY Software for ongoing software support and maintenance services for up to three additional years in an amount not to exceed $60,000, extending through January 31, 2019. As HAPPY software is a proprietary product, support and maintenance services are available only through HAPPY.", "Background", "On March 15, 2010, a Request for Proposals (RFP) was issued by the Housing Authority to find a solution for maintaining its Affordable Housing Programs wait list. HAPPY Software's Housing Pro 8 wait list software and online portal was selected from responses received and is currently utilized by the Housing Authority to maintain its waitlist. Housing Pro 8\u2019s wait list software is a single component of a larger suite of software components that make up the entire Housing Pro 8 software system. Eachcomponent is referred to as a module and each module of the Housing Pro 8 Software system is designed to aid in administering the Housing Authority\u2019s rental housing voucher programs, Family Self-Sufficiency (FSS) program, and wait list.", "Following the installation of Housing Pro 8\u2019s wait list module, staff determined that upgrading software for other Housing Authority programs would improve administration and efficiency, and allow for paperless automation. Staff researched available voucher programs software and determined that HAPPY Software was the only software provider that allowed for integration with the existing wait-list software. OnJune12,2012, Council authorized the purchase of HAPPY Software's full suite of Housing Pro 8 modules for the Housing Authority, for an amount not to exceed $150,000 and a term of three years.", "Discussion", "Numerous administrative procedures previously completed manually by Housing Authority staff for housing voucher programs have become automated with the use of HAPPY\u2019s Housing Pro 8 software. This includes document retention, transmission, and retrieval. Records for each household can be very large and a significant amount of staff time was previously spent organizing and accessing paper files. In complex situations, multiple staff members often needed simultaneous access to a file, which caused delays in the document retrieval and transmission process. Additionally, files needed to be regularly purged of older information to keep them of a manageable size. Purged files were then transferred into off-site storage for the legally required retentionperiod. The purging process was costly and time-consuming due to off-site retention, which can take more than 24 hours to retrieve urgently needed files. WithHousing Pro 8, all tenant records are stored in one database and can be accessed from individual computer, multiple users can access any tenant record simultaneously, paper copies of households\u2019 files are no longer needed, and copies of documents can be printed or transferred into electronic files, if needed, directly from the software.", "Housing Pro 8 has also improved efficiency and decreased the amount of time spent on various tasks. With the use of a tablet, Housing Pro 8 allows housing inspectors to create inspection reports electronically, including photos taken at the site, and upload the reports directly into the software database. Mail merging and tracking can all be completed with Housing Pro 8, eliminating the need to export data and perform a separate mail merge. Data-entry errors in household records are automatically identified by Housing Pro 8, significantly reducing staff time spent identifying errors. Information regarding households\u2019 transactions and payments to apartment owners can be transferred automatically from HAPPY software into accounting software and HUDreports.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "To continue using the Housing Pro 8 software and receiving maintenance and support services, a new contract with HAPPY Software is necessary. A sole source purchase of Happy Software\u2019s support and maintenance services is justified because HAPPY Software is a proprietary product and only HAPPY Software can provide these services for its software. Engaging a new software maintenance and support company would necessitate purchasing a new software system, which would be much more costly than maintaining the current system and would involve significant disruption to the Housing Authority\u2019s operations.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement to be awarded to HAPPY Software, Inc. is for an amount not to exceed$60,000. Funds are available in the Housing and Economic Development Department budget in account 122691.533580. Future-year funding is contingent on Council budget approval."]}, {"Title": "Application for Funding for the Santa Monica Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP), California Clean Water State Revolving Fund and Proposition 1 Funding Programs", "Department": "Public Works, Water Resources", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council: 1.Adopt the attached resolution authorizing the application for funding consideration from the California State Water Resources Control Board (State Water Board) in the amount of approximately $57,050,000 from the Clean Water State Revolving Fund and Proposition 1 Funding Programs.2.Authorize the City Manager to execute all necessary documents to apply and negotiate for funding.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The attached resolution would authorize an application for the State Water Board Clean Water State Revolving Fund and Proposition 1 funding programs. The proposed Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP) improves drought resiliency, increases water supply for reuse, and enhances flexibility in the management of the City\u2019s water resources by installing a containerized reverse osmosis unit at the Santa Monica Urban Runoff Recycling Facility (SMURRF), constructing a below grade municipal wastewater treatment facility, and installing two below grade stormwater harvest tanks. The proposed project cost is approximately $57,050,000. This SWIP project would be eligible for financial assistance in the form of grants and low interest financing repaid over 30 years.", "Background", "The State Water Board is committed to assisting its stakeholders build resiliency to drought and climate change. Similarly, the City has established among its sustainability goals the objective of reaching water self-sufficiency by the year 2020, concurrent with addressing the water conservation requirements made necessary by the current drought. The City\u2019s proposed SWIP would align with these objectives, while simultaneously helping to improve drought resiliency, increase water supply for reuse, and enhance flexibility in the management of the City\u2019s water resources by allowing for the treatment and reuse of brackish/saline groundwater, municipal wastewater, and stormwater.", "Discussion", "The Clean Water State Revolving Fund and Proposition 1 funding programs were promulgated in response to the unprecedented drought conditions currently afflicting California. The State has allocated over $900 million for various response programs, including grants, and low interest financing.", "City of Santa Monica Sustainable Water Infrastructure Project (SWIP)", "The SWIP is comprised of three integrated project elements to improve drought resiliency, increase water supply, and enhance flexibility in the management of the City\u2019s water resources. Project Element 1 is the installation of a containerized, off-the-shelf saline reverse osmosis unit at the SMURRF. When operational, the reverse osmosis unit will be utilized to advance treat non-potable water resources such as urban and wet weather runoff harvested by the recently funded Clean Beaches Initiative Project storage tanks to be constructed at the Deauville Parking Lot. These tanks will capture runoff from the 90-acre Pier Drainage Area that would normally be discharged to the ocean at the Pier Outfall. When runoff is scarce, the tanks would be replenished with brackish/saline groundwater from a proposed shallow groundwater well located at the Beach Maintenance Yard. Project Element 2 includes the construction of a below grade recycled water treatment plant beneath the Civic Center parking lot. The recycled water plant would advance treat approximately 1.0 million gallons/day (MGD) of municipal wastewater for reuse. Project Element 3 consists of two below grade stormwater harvest tanks. One tank would be constructed beneath Memorial Park, and the other adjacent to the below grade recycled water treatment facility. Project elements to be located under the Civic Center Parking lot would be constructed to accommodate future development on the site. Benefits provided by the stormwater harvest tanks include capturing stormwater and urban runoff for treatment and reuse, improving beach water quality and complying with State Water Board Enhanced Watershed Management Plan (EWMP) requirements. Together, the Project elements would produce approximately 1.5 MGD (1,680 acre-feet/year) of new water for immediate non-potable reuse, and when properly permitted, for indirect potable reuse via aquifer recharge. All treated water would be distributed via the City\u2019s existing recycled water system.", "The preliminary project cost is approximately $57,050,000. As part of the State Water Board funding application process, the preliminary costs will be refined and an initial funding agreement for the full amount consisting of a combination of grants and low interest financing will be provided by the State Water Board to the City for consideration and finalization. If the proposed funding package is acceptable, staff will return to Council with a separate funding resolution for adoption.", "Environmental Analysis", "California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) and National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) evaluations are pending. The studies are required to be completed prior to the State Water Board approving the project final funding agreement.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There are no financial impacts or budget actions required at this time."]}, {"Title": "Amendment to Provide Additional Scope of Work for completing the Downtown Specific Plan", "Department": "Strategic Planning", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a fourth modification to professional services agreement No. 9476 in the amount of $250,000 with Torti Gallas and Partners, Inc. a Maryland based company, for additional scope of work related to the Downtown Specific Plan. This will result in a 5 year amended contract/agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $905,500.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On September 27, 2011, Council approved Contract No. 9476 with Torti Gallas and Partners, Inc. in the amount of $655,500 to prepare the Downtown Specific Plan as required by the 2010 Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) to establish the land-use,circulation and building form for the expanded Downtown district. A contract modification of $250,000 is requested to complete the planning and outreach effort for the Plan, which has been ongoing since 2012.", "Background", "The Downtown Specific Plan is a high priority project called for in the 2010 Council adopted LUCE, to translate the City\u2019s integrated land use and transportation policy into detailed standards and guidelines to give shape to urban design, transportation, open space, infrastructure and economic policy.The Downtown Specific Plan will provide a framework for guiding and integrating new uses and activities within the project area, and will become the basis for review and approval of all projects within its boundaries.The LUCE deferred establishing specific height or floor area ratio (FAR) for the Downtown to the Specific Plan process.Once complete, the Downtown Specific Plan will establish these parameters to direct private and public investment in the area.Coordinated circulation, urban design and community benefits priorities will be included in the plan.", "On September 27, 2011, Council approved a contract No. 9476 with Torti Gallas and Partners, Inc. in the amount of $655,500 to prepare the Downtown Specific Plan.", "In February, 2014, the Draft DSP document was released for public review. The Draft DSP included specific goals, policies, and actions for the following subjects:", "\u2022 Housing & Economic Diversity", "\u2022 Arts, Culture & Entertainment", "\u2022 Historic Preservation", "\u2022 Open Space", "\u2022 Infrastructure", "\u2022 Circulation and Mobility", "\u2022 Development Standards", "\u2022 Design Guidelines", "\u2022 Community Benefits", "\u2022 Implementation", "The plan has been widely circulated and is available online at http://www.downtownsmplan.org/ and also at the Planning counter at City Hall. A series of Planning Commission hearings to review the DSP were held on November 3, 4, and 18 2015.", "Discussion", "This contract modification would build on and expand the scope of work for the Downtown Specific Plan allowing Torti Gallas, Inc. and their sub consultants to:", "\u00b7 Continue to support staff on revising plan chapters, graphics and images, including, but not limited writing and creating new content for:", "o Development Standards", "o Circulation and Mobility", "o Complete Streets and Open Space", "o Other chapters as may be requested", "o Additional photo simulation", "o Additional modeling", "\u00b7 Provide direct support to staff with additional meetings, workshops, charrettes and other forms of communication.", "\u00b7 Provide support and participation for the significant upcoming community outreach campaign. Led by MIG, Inc., a California-based firm that has previously provided with City with support and coordination for major public participation efforts including the LUCE and the Airport Visioning process, the upcoming outreach initiative will involve:", "o Large format speaker series events focusing on topical issues relevant to the future of the Downtown", "o Facilitated focus group events that provide an opportunity for everyone to provide input and to listen to one another", "o Community workshops that provide an additional setting for discussion on Plan components, policies, and actions", "\u00b7 Attend, present (as requested) and help prepare for Planning Commission, City Council and other boards and commission meetings", "The new draft Downtown Specific Plan is expected to be released for public review in February 2016.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "An RFQ was issued on April 15, 2011 in order to identify potential firms with the skills and experience necessary to succeed in creating strategic plans to implement the LUCE community vision.The RFQ was advertised widely and posted on Planet Bids,Planetizen and the Planning and Community Development Department\u2019s webpage.Staff received 72 qualifications from firms throughout California and throughout the western United States. The qualifications were reviewed for relevant experience and expertise that match the project needs, and 11 finalists were interviewed.These firms were rated against criteria that included technical competence and experience, staff quality, quality of sub-consultant team, project approach and planning, and customer service. For the Downtown Specific Plan project, two interviewed firms with the most directly related experience and depth of community involvement were issued a Request for Proposal, which invited the firms to propose a scope of work within the project budget. Based on the selection criteria in SMMC 2.24.073 as well as the firm\u2019s demonstrated knowledge of the City and land use planning, Torti Gallas, Inc. was selected as the best qualified firm to provide consulting services for the DSP.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Torti Gallas, Inc.is $250,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $905,500. In addition to funds of $150,000 included in the FY2015-16 Midyear Budget for Council approval, award of the agreement modification requires an additional appropriation of $100,000 to Capital Improvement Program account C019134.589000."]}, {"Title": "Resolution Repealing Number 10796 (CCS) and Amending the City's Conflict of Interest Code to Revise the Designated Positions for Which Statements of Economic Interest are Required to be Filed", "Department": "City Attorney's Office", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council update the City's Conflict of Interest Code by adopting the proposed resolution.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "California law requires every state and local governmental agency to adopt a Conflict of Interest Code and to periodically update the list of positions for which Statements of Economic Interest must be filed. The attached resolution fulfills that requirement.", "Discussion", "Santa Monica's list of designated positions is divided into disclosure categories which must be periodically reviewed and updated to ensure compliance with disclosure requirements. Exhibit 1 to the attached Resolution contains revisions reflecting changes in titles and job duties which have occurred since the City's Conflict of Interest Code was amended in 2014. Adoption of the accompanying Resolution would fulfill the requirements of state law by specifying disclosure requirements for the City's designated positions.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Award of Transportation Management Organization Consultant Contract", "Department": "Mobility (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award RFP#51 to Steer Davies Gleave, a London-based company, for the provision of professional services for the development and activation of a Transportation Management Organization.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a contract with Steer Davies Gleave, in an amount not to exceed $785,000 for three years, with two additional one-year renewal options at $250,000 per year, on the same terms and conditions for a total amount not to exceed $1,285,000 over a five year period, with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.3.  Authorize budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impact & Budget Action section of this report.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The contract to be awarded to Steer Davies Gleave would provide Transportation Management Organization (TMO) services in the City of Santa Monica for three years, with two additional one year renewal options, for a total amount not to exceed $1,285,000 over a five year period. The TMO is envisioned as a representative membership organization of employers, residents, and other stakeholders that would work in collaboration with the City to achieve the mobility goals set forth in the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) such as increasing transportation options, reducing single occupancy vehicle (SOV) trips, and encouraging active transportation. The TMO would engage in coordinating and marketing transportation options and incentive programs aimed at increasing the use of transit, carpooling, vanpooling, bicycling, walking, telecommuting, and alternative work week schedules by employers, employees, visitors, and Santa Monica residents. Steer Davies Gleave would work with the City to establish the TMO structure, membership, and transportation demand management (TDM) programs in the first year and grow membership and implementation of TDM programs during the subsequent term. If the organization is deemed successful, two additional one-year options for renewal may be exercised at the City\u2019s sole discretion.", "Background", "Transportation Management Organizations are a mechanism for cities, businesses, residents, and local stakeholders to collaborate on developing, delivering, marketing, and promoting transportation solutions. The primary mission of most TMOs is to cooperate with local businesses and public agencies to enhance access and mobility within and around their geographic boundaries.", "In August of 2015, the City Council unanimously selected Mobility as one of the City\u2019s top strategic goals over the next three to five years. This strategic goal pulls all the new and existing mobility options together into a new model for mobility with attractive and convenient choices for people to get where they are going, while helping to reduce vehicle congestion and climate change. The City\u2019s Mobility Strategic Goal and recent City policy documents, including the LUCE, Bergamot Area Plan, Bike Action Plan, and draft Downtown Specific Plan emphasize the formation of TMOs to help reduce the share of single occupancy vehicle trips to address congestion concerns and encourage more sustainable mobility.  The transportation demand management (TDM) services provided by a TMO, such as personalized trip planning, marketing, encouragement programs, and transit pass programs, are important complements to new transportation facilities and services. The TMO services help to increase the utilization of transportation options by providing encouragement, incentives and information. This helps to reduce barriers and increase awareness, and contributes to managing the City\u2019s current mobility concerns and expanding personal transportation options.", "In June 2015, the City\u2019s Transportation Demand Management Ordinance was updated including higher vehicle trip reduction standards for employers and developers in the City. This is largely expressed in Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) targets which increased from 1.5 to a range of 1.6 - 2.2 on January 1, 2016 with the new Ordinance. In addition to providing a wide range of services, the TMO also will be a key tool in assisting employers, developers, and property managers as they strive to meet these higher trip reduction standards and AVR targets.", "In 2012 the City contracted with Transportation Management Services to conduct a feasibility study of a Santa Monica-based TMO. That effort explored TMO best-practices in cities that were similar to Santa Monica including core services, funding and organizational structures. In researching recent approaches to TMO formation, the option of utilizing consultant services rose to the top as the most cost-effective and turn-key approach to providing city-wide TDM services. During the FY15-17 budget process the City allocated funding starting in FY15/16 for a three year TMO contract for consultant services that would provide a dedicated TMO leadership position and operating expenses for the TMO.", "Discussion", "The formation of a Santa Monica Transportation Management Organization would enable the coordination and marketing of transportation options and incentive programs aimed at increasing the use of transit, carpooling, vanpooling, bicycling, walking, telecommuting, and alternative work week schedules by employers, employees, visitors, and Santa Monica residents. The TMO would help improve the effectiveness of the City\u2019s existing TDM programs and regulations, investments in infrastructure, and programmatic efforts to improve mobility options and information. Staff is recommending a three-year program to serve as a strong foundation for Transportation Management Organization services in Santa Monica. The TMO would be tasked with achievement of a fifty percent (50%) single occupancy vehicle (SOV) employee commute mode share by the end of the contract terms, and an agreed upon resident mode share goal to be determined by the City during the contract period.", "TMO Provider Participation", "A scope of work for the TMO was prepared for issuance of the Request for Proposals. The scope included a requirement that the TMO contractor provide a minimum of 40 hours per week in Santa Monica promoting the TMO services, meeting with stakeholders, administering core services and holding events. The TMO would serve as an extension of the City and the City\u2019s mobility initiatives, and the City would provide the TMO office space, data, staff support, and access to programming. The vendor would launch the TMO Advisory Committee, develop a work plan, create and implement a marketing plan, administer an online TDM platform, hold events and attend community meetings (17 in the first year and 25 in the second year), administer related grant and incentive resources, and provide additional services on an as-needed basis to enhance the City\u2019s mobility initiatives and increase awareness of transportation options available in the City for employees, residents, and visitors. The TMO provider would need to provide the described scope of work per the evaluation criteria prepared by the City in the Request for Proposals.", "Consultant Selection", "On September 15, 2015, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for professional services for a Transportation Management Organization Consultant. The RFP was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. 729 vendors were notified, 76 vendors downloaded the RFP. Four firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from Planning and Community Development, Housing and Economic Development, Office of Sustainability, Big Blue Bus, Santa Monica College, Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center, Downtown Santa Monica Inc., and the Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce.", "Proposals were received from UrbanTrans, Acire Inc., Steer Davies Gleave, and DeAngelos Design. The selection panel interviewed three shortlisted firms. Staff recommends Steer Davies Gleave as the best qualified firm to provide TMO services to the City of Santa Monica due to their experience in the region, the team\u2019s depth of experience, the quality of related marketing materials provided, ability to provide TMO consultant services within the established budget.", "SDG is an independent transportation consulting firm focused on the planning and development of transportation programs that encourage the use of sustainable transportation modes and reduce drive alone trips and vehicle miles travelled (VMT). SDG is well regarded throughout the world as a leader in providing strategic advice and expertise in the field of travel behavior change. In the Los Angeles area, SDG serves as the Executive Director for the Go Glendale TMA, and they have prepared TDM Plans for Mount Saint Mary\u2019s University, Loma Linda University, and Children\u2019s Hospital, Los Angeles. In San Diego County, SDG has been supporting TDM strategic development and program implementation for the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG) since 2012. In 2014, SDG developed an Employer outreach Strategy for SANDAG\u2019s iCommute program, their local TDM program. Most recently SDG has commenced work for the Orange county Transportation Commission to develop a Complete Streets Initiative for the County, and they are working with Southern California Association of Governments to develop training and toolkits to support their Active Transportation Campaign. Steer Davies Gleave will engage in coordinating and marketing transportation options and incentive programs aimed at increasing the use of transit, carpooling, vanpooling, bicycling, walking, telecommuting, and alternative work week schedules by employers, employees, visitors, and Santa Monica residents for three years.", "Next Steps", "A contract for a three-year operation would be negotiated and executed. Staff would work with the consultant to complete initial launch of the TMO within the first four months of the contract in conjunction with the opening of Expo Light Rail.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract to be awarded to Steer Davies Gleave is for an amount not to exceed $1,285,000. Funds in the amount of $250,000 are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in the Planning and Community Development Department. The contract will be charged to account 04267.555010 Contractual Services.", "An additional $35,000 in one-time funding from the St. John\u2019s Development Agreement is available for the formation and operation of the TMO. Award of this contract requires the following FY2015-16 budget changes:", "\u00b7 Release of $35,000 in restricted fund balance \u2013 4.365509 Transportation Management Association", "\u00b7 Appropriate the following expenditures - $35,000 to account 04267.555010"]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading And Adoption Of An Ordinance Adding Chapter 4.62 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code Requiring A Minimum Wage For Employees, And Adding Chapter 4.63 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code Requiring A Living Wage For Hotel Workers", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on January 12, 2016, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance adding Chapter 4.62 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code requiring a minimum wage for employees, and adding Chapter 4.63 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code requiring a living wage for hotel workers.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}], [{"Title": "Recommendation to Name Buffer Park", "Department": "Community & Cultural Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council consider recommendations from the Recreation and Parks Commission for a permanent name for Buffer Park and move forward with the name Gandara Park.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "A 2.35 acre park will be developed on Exposition Boulevard between Stewart Street and Dorchester Avenue. Community outreach was conducted during the month of October 2014 to solicit formal name recommendations for this park, which has been nicknamed Buffer Park. The Recreation and Parks Commission considered survey results and public comment at their November 20, 2014 meeting and recommended the name Gandara Park with an alternative suggestion of Heroes Park. Staff recommends that Council accept the Commission\u2019s proposed name of Gandara Park.", "Background", "Council adopted a policy for naming City-owned land, buildings and facilities on July 9, 2002 (Attachment A) which established formal guidelines and a procedure for considering appropriate names (Attachment B for a summary of these guidelines). As required by policy, Council seeks recommendations from \u201crelated advisory bodies such as the Recreation and Parks Commission, the Library Board and the Landmarks Commission.\u201d Council then makes its determination at a regularly scheduled meeting at which staff, representatives of advisory bodies and civic organizations, and the general public may offer testimony. Since the Recreation and Parks Commission has purview over parks, it is appropriate that the Council consider the Commission\u2019s recommendations for a proposed permanent name for Buffer Park, a 2.35 acre site located on Exposition Boulevard between Stewart Street and Dorchester Avenue.", "On November 23, 2010 (Attachment C), Council directed staff to work with the community to create a buffer area facing the residential neighborhood along Exposition Boulevard, adjacent to and south of the new Expo Maintenance Facility. On January 24, 2012 (Attachment D), Council approved use of the buffer site as open space and directed staff to issue a Request for Proposals for design services. On September 11, 2012 (Attachment E), Council awarded an agreement to Mia Lehrer + Associates to provide design services for the park. Council approved the proposed design of Buffer Park on April 22, 2014 (Attachment F), which included a plan for conducting community outreach to name the park.", "Discussion", "Public Outreach", "Staff met with the Pico Neighborhood Association on September 11, 2014 to discuss proposed outreach strategies and received additional input from the membership, including a suggestion to reach out to local churches in the neighborhood. Staff launched a survey that was available the entire month of October 2014 to solicit name suggestions for Buffer Park. Surveys in English and Spanish were available online and paper surveys were available at Virginia Avenue Park and the Pico Branch Library (Attachment G). Additionally, staff hosted a table at the Pico Farmers\u2019 Market each Saturday in October 2014 to speak to residents about the project and to solicit name suggestions.", "Staff conducted further outreach by sending email campaigns in the first and fourth weeks of October 2014 to those on the Buffer Park interest list as a reminder to submit their recommendations for a formal park name. Furthermore, emails containing general project information and links to the park naming survey were sent to seven churches in the Pico Neighborhood, and surveys in English and Spanish were sent home with all Edison Language Academy students.", "The community submitted a total of 135 park name suggestions. The full list of recommended names is quite divergent (Attachment H). The most commonly suggested names were as follows:", "\u00b7 Toypurina Park (16 submissions)", "\u00b7 Exposition Park (or similar variation; 9 submissions)", "\u00b7 George Ishihara Memorial Park (or similar variation; 6 submissions)", "\u00b7 Santa Monica Park (5 submissions)", "\u00b7 People\u2019s Park (4 submissions)", "\u00b7 Hachi Park (3 submissions)", "\u00b7 Nisei Park (3 submissions)", "\u00b7 Vida Park (3 submissions)", "Subsequent to the survey closing, a few community members sent emails to the Recreation and Parks Commission recommending an additional name, Gandara Park. Further information regarding each of the aforementioned suggested names is available in Attachment I.", "Commission Action", "The Recreation and Parks Commission considered the full list of Buffer Park name recommendations at its regularly scheduled meeting on November 20, 2014 (Attachment J). Following public comment and discussion, the Commission adopted a motion to recommend to Council the consideration of two potential names for the park currently known as Buffer Park: Gandara Park and Heroes Park.", "The name Gandara Park is recommended by the Recreation and Parks Commission to memorialize and honor Private Joe Gandara, a Santa Monica native who was fatally wounded by enemy fire in World War II at the age of 20. Although hailed a war hero, he was passed over for awards and medals at the time of his death due to his Hispanic heritage. In March 2014, Private Joe Gandara was posthumously awarded the Medal of Honor by President Obama in recognition of his heroism and valor.", "The naming of Buffer Park was postponed until this time as Private Gandara\u2019s family preferred to wait until Metro considered a request to name the 26th Street/Bergamot Station in his honor. On September 24, 2015 (Attachment K), the Metro Board of Directors voted unanimously to dedicate the station in memory of Private Gandara, by placing a plaque at the station recognizing his heroism and sacrifice for our country. Subsequently, on October 27, 2015, Private Gandara\u2019s niece, Miriam Adams, formally expressed her support for naming Buffer Park in honor of her uncle (Attachment L). Staff recommends supporting the Commission\u2019s recommendation to name the park Gandara Park.", "As an alternative to Gandara Park, the Recreation and Parks Commission recommends considering the name Heroes Park to honor all Santa Monica military servicemembers, war heroes, and veterans, with the possibility of certain areas of the park being separately named in honor of individuals (e.g. Private Gandara and George Ishihara).", "Alternatives", "Council could reject both name options suggested by the Recreation and Parks Commission and choose an alternative name for Buffer Park or seek additional public input.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}, {"Title": "Approval of minutes for the September 8, 2015 Redevelopment Successor Agency meeting.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item"}, {"Title": "Financial Status Update and FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget, Position and Compensation Changes", "Department": "Finance Department, Budget Division", "Sponsors": "Director Martin Pastucha, Director Donna Peter", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council, Housing Authority, and Successor Agency to the Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency:1. Appropriate FY 2015-16 midyear revenue and expenditure budget adjustments and approve corresponding adjustments to the FY 2016-17 budget plan as detailed in Attachment A.Staff also recommends that the City Council:1. Receive the FY 2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Financial Status Update;2. Adopt a resolution establishing classification and salary rates for various positions detailed in Attachment B;3. Approve the position and classification changes detailed in Attachment C;4. Adopt a resolution of the City of Santa Monica setting forth the administrative citation schedule of fines for certain violations of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, setting civil penalties for parking violations and for the late payment of penalties, setting fines for Police and Fire Department responses to excessive false fire alarms, and setting fines for the Santa Monica Public Library detailed in Attachment D; 5. Approve the discontinuance of the $25 non-resident library card fee; 6. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $1,613,000 from the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) Active Transportation Program for the Expo Station 4th Street Linkages project, and to accept all grant renewals;7. Authorize the City Manager to accept a grant awarded in the amount of $987,000 from the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) Active Transportation Program for the Michigan Avenue Greenway project, and to accept all grant renewals; 8. Provide direction on expansion of the City\u2019s aquatics program to include programing at Lincoln Middle School; and9. Receive public comment on federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program funds.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The FY 2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Financial Status Update informs the City Council and community of the City\u2019s current and projected fiscal status as the City enters the FY2016-17 exception based budget preparation process. Taking into account the adjustments recommended in this report, the January 2016 General Fund Financial Status Update is slightly more positive in the first two years of the forecast period than the Update presented to Council on May 27, 2015 (Attachment E), but slightly worse in the latter years. The revised update shows a potential shortfall of approximately $2.2million (0.6% of the General Fund budget) in FY 2019-20. The revised update includes midyear revenue and expenditure adjustments that are recommended for approval and detailed in Attachment A. The financial status of non\u2011General funds remains stable. Proposed FY 2015-16 midyear budget adjustments result in a $9.5million, or a 1.7% increase over the adopted citywide revenue budget, and expenditure adjustments result in a net $4.9 million or a 0.9% decrease over the adopted citywide expenditure budget.", "In this report, staff also proposes adjustments to the City\u2019s master fine resolution and discontinuance of the $25 non-resident library card fee.", "At its meeting on June 23, 2015, Council requested a midyear update on the renovation of the Lincoln Middle School athletic field, the feasibility of aquatic programming at the Lincoln Middle School and Santa Monica High School (SAMOHI) pools, and the feasibility of opening Mt. Olivette for public use. An update is included in this report.", "Finally, the City must hold two public hearings prior to the adoption of a One-Year Action Plan allocating federal CDBG and HOME Program funds. This public hearing will satisfy one of the two meeting requirements to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY 2016-17 Action Plan. The City will hold another public hearing prior to the adoption of the Proposed FY 2016-17 Action Plan.", "Background", "On January 27, 2015 (Attachment F), Council reviewed and commented on the FY2015-16 through FY 2019-20 Five-Year Financial Forecast and directed staff to develop a fiscally sustainable budget based on a controlled spending plan. During two budget study sessions, held on May 27 and 28 (Attachment G), staff presented the Proposed FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget, the Capital Improvement Program Budget for FY 2015-16, and the May 2015 Financial Status Update for the General Fund for Fiscal Years 2015-20.", "On June 23, 2015 (Attachment H), Council adopted the first year and approved the second year of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget. Council also adopted the second year of the FY 2014-16 Capital Improvement Program Budget. First modifications to the Adopted FY 2015-16 Budget and FY 2016-17 Budget Plan were approved by City Council on October 27, 2015 (Attachment I). The modifications were related to staffing changes, expenditure control savings allocations associated with FY2014-15 departmental savings, and appropriation of one-time General Fund savings to advance the City\u2019s Strategic Goals. Since October, staff completed a midyear review of all revenues and expenditures and is proposing budget adjustments for programs, activities, and revenues that have changed significantly. These adjustments will align the FY 2015-16 Revised Budget with current operations.", "Discussion", "Economic Update", "The national economy continues to grow at a slow pace. Economic growth has averaged only 2.1% annually since the end of the economic downturn, well below typical rates for periods of economic recovery, and the anticipated growth over the next two years is anticipated to only be slightly higher at 2.5% annually \u2013 and there are certainly global economic concerns that may affect the national economy. However, the labor market has improved, with over 5 million jobs added during the last two years helping to drop the national unemployment rate to 5%. The housing market has continued to improve; recent economic forecasts project continued increases in home prices and sales are anticipated to continue to grow over the next few years. Inflation is expected to remain relatively low. In December, the Federal Reserve indicated its confidence in the economy by raising short term interest rates for the first time in nearly a decade.", "Like the national economy, the State economy is expected to show modest improvement over the next few years. Unemployment in the State has fallen to 5.7% after peaking at 12.4% in 2010, and is projected to drop below 5% by the end of 2017. Housing sales and median prices as well as the commercial real estate market remain strong and are expected to continue the recent trend over the next few years. The Governor has submitted a balanced budget for the fourth year in a row. Income tax and corporation tax revenues are expected to show solid growth and, as mandated by Proposition 2, any temporary spikes in revenue will be set aside for future recessions. However, sales taxes appear to be moderating.", "Santa Monica\u2019s diversified tax base and geographic location have led to a strong recovery from the most recent economic downturn. The City\u2019s economically driven tax sources have recovered significantly to reach or exceed pre-recession levels. However, the local recovery has shown some signs of moderating over the last nine months.", "Property values remain the third highest in Los Angeles County. Assessed values are expected to increase by 4% in FY 2016-17 and 3% annually in future years. Sales tax growth is expected to moderate going forward, reflecting a continued shift of sales to online platforms. Tourism, which provides a strong stimulus to the local economy by creating jobs and producing revenues, continues to be one of the strongest performing components of the local economy. Transient Occupancy Tax revenue growth continues to be strong, but the rate of increase is moderating as FY 2015-16 growth of 5% is projected to be about half of the average annual increase over the last five years. Moderate growth is expected over the forecast period as average room rates continue to increase and two new hotel properties are scheduled to come online in FY 2016-17. Business license taxes are expected to decrease by 1.25% in FY 2016-17, reflecting the loss of several large taxpayers, and then grow slowly over the forecast period. Utility Users Taxes are expected to grow about 3.1% due to additional UUT from prepaid phone charges per AB 1717, then grow about 1.4% annually over the forecast period as non-taxed internet-enabled telecommunications services gain ground over the more traditional services that are currently taxed, and as water conservation measures lower the amount of water consumed and therefore taxed.", "General Fund Financial Status Update", "The General Fund Financial Status Update reflects revised revenue projections as well as staff\u2019s proposed operating and capital budget changes included in this staff report. Also reflected is the creation of an enterprise fund related to Community Broadband Services beginning in FY 2016-17; revenues and expenses related to these services, currently included in the FY2015-16 General Fund budget, will be accounted for in the new enterprise fund.", "Under the Probable Case Scenario, the General Fund shows positive balances until FY2019-20, at which point a shortfall of $2.2million (0.6% of the General Fund budget) is projected. Revenue growth rates are expected to increase at an average rate of 2.4% during the forecast period. Expenditure growth rates, anticipated to average 3.1% during this period, will exceed revenue growth, gradually lowering the surplus each year. The reason for the larger dip in FY 2016-17 is due to annualized costs for FY2015-16 Midyear staffing changes and projected cost of living costs, while the dip in the last year is due to the end of contributions made from General Fund savings to self- insurance reserves in the face of higher workers\u2019 compensation claim activity.", "The Best Case Scenario reflects slightly higher revenues than are projected in the Adopted Budget as well as lower healthcare costs. In the best case, the General Fund fiscal condition would be positive throughout the forecast period, with a positive balance of $9.6million in FY 2019-20.", "The Worst Case Scenario reflects lower revenues than are projected in the Adopted Budget (reflecting the effects of a potential recession) as well as continued increases in workers\u2019 compensation claims and the impact of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act\u2019s \u201cCadillac Tax\u201d, an excise tax on high-cost health plans, in the last year of the forecast. The implementation of the Cadillac Tax reflects the recent decision to delay it by one year. Ultimately, the worst case shows a potential shortfall of approximately $5.4million, or 1.5% of the City\u2019s General Fund budget, in FY 2016-17, increasing to $16.1 million (4.6% of the General Fund budget) in FY 2019-20. Since deficit spending is prohibited under California law, any revenue shortfall would be offset by reductions in expenditures or use of reserves.", "Other Funds", "Other major funds included in the Financial Status Update fall into two categories: 1)funds that operate with sufficient revenues to sustain necessary operation and capital needs, and 2) funds that have a structural deficit where ongoing revenues are not sufficient to cover ongoing expenditures.", "Self-Sustaining Enterprise Funds", "The Resource Recovery and Recycling (RRR), Water and Wastewater Funds have sufficient revenues to cover current operations, due to rate increases in the Water and RRR Funds that will allow the implementation of the Sustainable Water Master Plan and the Zero Waste Master Plan, respectively, while also maintaining reserve levels. Water rates are projected to increase annually by 9% pending Council\u2019s annual review of the State of the Water Fund report in 2016. The Wastewater Fund continues to have adequate revenues and reserves to meet current operational and capital expenditures.", "The Big Blue Bus Fund will maintain a positive fund balance over the next five years, aided by the projectedincrease in passenger revenues due to the recent fare restructuring, a projected increase in ridershipassociated with Expo, ongoing revenues from the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program, the use of Measure R deferred revenues, Prop C Municipal Operator Bus Service Improvement Program (MOSIP) funds, and the two year extension of the alternative fuel tax credit. At the April 28, 2015 Council meeting, staff presented \u201cEvolution of Blue,\u201d the Big Blue Bus service integration plan for first-last mile connectivity to the Expo Light Rail line. The expenditures included in the forecast reflect the cost associated withapproximately 56,000 additional revenue service hours, the purchase of additional buses, employment of 18 new motor coach operators and 8 additional staff dedicated to service expansion,and 2 additional positions to align with workload. Staff will continue to closely monitor ridership levels throughout the forecast period (they are currently down in line with national and regional trends) and return to Council if specific actions are required in the future.", "The Beach and Airport Funds will also generate adequate revenues to sustain their operations throughout the next five years.", "Staff projects the Pier Fund to be self-sustaining through the end of FY 2017-18, contingent on capital project expenditures and timing. The FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget includes $3 million in General Funds for the Pier Electrical Upgrades project. Pier capital needs that are unable to be funded by the Pier Fund during the forecast period would need to compete with other capital needs to be addressed through the General Fund.", "Funds Requiring General Fund Subsidies", "The Cemetery Fund is anticipated to require a General Fund subsidy of approximately $66,000 in FY2015-16. However, with the implementation of a green burial program by June 2016, staff projects a positive fund balance beginning in FY 2016-17 through the end of the forecast period.", "The Housing Authority Fund also has a projected operating structural deficit of approximately $0.5 million annually due to the loss of redevelopment funding for the administration of the senior voucher program, and the reduction of U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) allocations.", "FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget Adjustments", "As part of the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget, Council adopted the FY 2015-16 Budget and approved the FY 2016-17 Budget Plan. The proposed midyear budget adjustments amend the FY 2015-17 Biennial Budget and reflect position changes related to reorganizations, changes in revenue projections and administrative corrections. Midyear revenue and expenditure adjustments are summarized below.", "Revenue Adjustments \u2013 General Fund", "The FY 2015-16 Midyear Review includes a number of recommended revenue adjustments, netting to approximately $2.1 million. Significant increases include: $1.6million in higher than anticipated parking revenues; $0.7 million in higher than anticipated plan check fees; $0.6 million in Investment Income as a result of portfolio rebalancing and slight increases in interest rates; $0.5million from greater than anticipated unsecured and supplemental property taxes; $0.4million in documentary transfer taxes due to sales of large-scale properties and the continuing improvement in the local real estate market; $0.4 million in Sales Taxes; $0.4 million in sponsorship revenue for the Breeze Bikeshare Program that had not been identified during the adopted budget preparation; $0.3 million in higher than anticipated parking citation revenue; $0.3 million from State payment of old SB 90 claims put on hold during the State budget crisis; and a $0.3 million reimbursement from Santa Monica College for their share of Municipal Pool renovations expenses. Partially offsetting are decreases in Utility Users Taxes (-$1.7 million); Transient Occupancy Taxes (-$1.3 million); and Business License Taxes (-$0.4 million). All revenues recommended for adjustments are identified in AttachmentA.", "Revenue Adjustments \u2013 Other Funds", "Significant revenue adjustments in other funds include:", "\u00b7 Special Revenue Source (04) Fund - increase of $1.0 million due to unanticipated developer fee payments reflecting timing changes.", "\u00b7 Pier (30) Fund - increase of $1.3 million correcting the budget to be essentially the same as prior year actuals.", "\u00b7 Wastewater (31) Fund - increase of $2 million from budget. Decrease from prior year will be less than anticipated as much of water savings is being achieved from decreased use of water for landscaping, which does not use the sewer system.", "\u00b7 Airport (33) Fund - increase of $0.7 million due to renegotiated leases with higher lease rates. Revenues could be impacted by significant vacancies.", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus (41) Fund - increase of $2.6 million primarily due to the General Fund providing funding for the Fare Incentive Program, Buy One \u2013 Get One Free; Alternative Fuel Tax Credit; Cap and Trade revenues; and lease rental revenue increases due to transit store sublease.", "\u00b7 Vehicle Management (54) Fund \u2013 decrease of $0.5 million reflects recent reconciliation of the internal service fund that corrected vehicle replacement contribution amounts from all funds.", "Operating Expenditure and Staffing Adjustments \u2013 General Fund", "Proposed General Fund operating expenditure adjustments result in a net appropriation of $1.3 million at midyear. Significant appropriations include:", "\u00b7 $0.7 million to reflect cost of living adjustment associated with FY 2015-16 bargaining unit agreements (this amount is budgeted in non-departmental);", "\u00b7 $0.4 million to reflect staffing changes, including:", "o the addition of a 1.0 FTE Director of Special Projects for Information Services to lead the expansion of the City\u2019s revenue-generating enterprise, CityNet, and the City\u2019s integration into the regional interoperable radio consortium;", "o the addition of a 1.0 FTE Assistant Chief Information Officer to support the Information Systems Department\u2019s shift to being a coordinator, catalyst and consultant for user departments as they incorporate the internet, digital technology and a mobile workforce into their business and communications processes;", "o the addition of a 1.0 FTE Senior Advisor \u2013 Municipal Policies, Procedures and Innovation in the City Attorney\u2019s Office; and", "o minor adjustments in the Planning and Community Development and Housing and Economic Development Departments, totaling 0.5 FTE, to reflect operational changes.", "\u00b7 $0.3 million to correct budget for Community and Cultural Services Department\u2019s contract and enrichment class instructor payments;", "\u00b7 $0.2 million to assist the Pier Corporation with 2015 Twilight Concert Series costs;", "\u00b7 $0.2 million to reflect ongoing maintenance costs related to the upgrade of the City\u2019s electronic plan review software;", "\u00b7 Reduction of $1.1 million in General Fund subsidies to the Cemetery and Pier Funds.", "The Salary Resolution detailing the addition of new positions and salary rates is reflected in Attachment B. Staffing adjustments are detailed in Attachment C.", "Operating Expenditure and Staffing Adjustments \u2013 Other Funds", "Proposed operating expenditure adjustments for other funds result in a net decrease of $2.7 million. Significant changes include:", "\u00b7 All other fund expenditures will increase by $0.6 million to reflect cost of living adjustments associated with FY 2015-16 bargaining unit agreements.", "\u00b7 The RRR Fund expenditures will increase by $0.1 million to reflect the addition of 2.0 FTE RRR Equipment Operator positions required to maintain operation levels.", "\u00b7 Certain changes are needed to account for the $1.2 million annual set aside of post-RDA residual revenue funds in the Special Revenue Source Fund. These include a transfer of $2.4 million into the Fund: $1.2 million from the General Fund for the FY 2014-15 set-aside amount, and $1.2 million from the Low-Moderate Income Housing Fund, representing the FY 2015-16 amount. This also results in an expenditure increase of $1.2 million in the Low-Moderate Income Housing Fund.", "\u00b7 The Airport Fund expenditures will decrease by $0.6 million to reflect an accounting adjustment to record the repayment of the principal balance on loans from the General Fund as a balance sheet transaction, offset by the conversion of 0.5 FTE as-needed Staff Assistant II position to permanent status.", "\u00b7 The Pier Fund expenditures will increase by $0.9 million to reflect the elimination of the General Fund subsidy.", "\u00b7 The Wastewater Fund expenditures will decrease by $1.6 million to reflect transfer of funds from operating to Capital Improvement Program to fund the capital portion of the payment for the use of City of Los Angeles sewer infrastructure.", "\u00b7 The Cemetery Fund expenditures will increase by $0.2 million to reflect the reduction of the General Fund subsidy.", "The Salary Resolution detailing the addition of new positions and salary rates is reflected in Attachment B. Staffing adjustments are further detailed in Attachment C.", "Capital Improvement Program Budget Adjustments", "The Midyear changes to the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget are largely cleanup measures that result in a total net reduction to the CIP budget of approximately $3.3 million. The changes do not include any major new projects, as the new FY 2016-18 Biennial Capital Improvement Program will come before Council in May and June. Budget changes are detailed in Attachment A, and the most significant changes are summarized below.", "Fleet Vehicle Replacement Internal Service Contributions", "Midyear changes reflect updated depreciation charges and enhancement vehicle costs that various funds pay into the Fleet Vehicle Replacement program for the purchase and replacement of their fleet vehicles, identified through a recent reconciliation of the Fund. The total net budget change is approximately $910,000, with some funds receiving budget increases and others budget decreases depending on their vehicle inventory and acquisition costs.", "General Fund", "The net increase in the General Fund capital budget is approximately $267,000, with total budget increases largely offset by budget reductions. Significant budget increases include the following:", "\u00b7 An increase to the General Fund\u2019s contribution to the Fleet Vehicle Replacement program described above (approximately $840,000).", "\u00b7 Reed Park Improvements require additional budget due to increasing project scope and construction costs ($350,000).", "\u00b7 The Palisades Park Landscape Modification project requires funding due to the need to incorporate guard rails in project design ($50,000).", "\u00b7 The first phase of the City Yards project requires additional funding for further feasibility analysis, additional public meetings, and geotechnical borings ($30,000).", "\u00b7 The Downtown Specific Plan requires additional funding to ensure completion ($150,000).", "\u00b7 Project Dox software and Kronos software require upgrades (for $160,215 and $70,000 respectively).", "\u00b7 The Public Landscape Tenant Improvement requires additional budget due to scope changes to meet revised building code requirements ($225,000 to be funded by Departmental Expenditure Control Savings).", "Affordable Housing Funds", "Affordable housing revenues are being budgeted so they are available to spend on future production and preservation projects. Approximately $12 million in revenues are being budgeted at Midyear, including legal settlement revenues, developer fees, residual receipts, TORCA loan repayments, and funds related to former redevelopment tax revenue to be set aside annually for affordable housing.", "Miscellaneous Grant Fund", "There is a reduction of the California Incline Bridge Replacement budget to reflect the adjustment of the final grant award amounts to match final project costs, which are lower than originally estimated (reduction of approximately $3.9 million). Prop A Reserve funds are also being appropriated to install a bus pad and enhance a bus stop located at eastbound Pico at Lincoln ($50,000).", "Water and Wastewater Funds", "Staff reviewed all Water and Wastewater Fund CIP budgets and recommends releasing approximately $6.3 million in Water Fund and $1.6million in Wastewater Fund budgets not needed at this time. The State of the Water Fund report will be presented to Council on February 23, 2016. The Wastewater Fund reduction is offset slightly by a budget increase to fund a Sanitary Sewer Master Plan that will quantify how future development will impact the sewer system and calculate fair share costs for developers.", "Big Blue Bus Fund", "Staff also examined all Big Blue Bus capital accounts and found that budgets could be reduced by a total of approximately $6.3 million. The reductions will not impact service delivery, and funds will be released back to the Big Blue Bus Fund to be budgeted for future capital needs.", "Update of Master Fine Resolution", "Attachment D provides proposed adjustments to the City\u2019s master fine resolution. The primary reason for the proposed adjustments is the June 23, 2015 Council action repealing the prior zoning ordinance and adopting the new zoning ordinance. There are a myriad of fines and penalties associated with specific zoning code violations which reference sections of the zoning ordinance that are now obsolete and no longer exist. This update will correct this by realigning the zoning violations found in the new zoning ordinance to citations included in the master fine resolution. No revisions to fine amounts are required by this action.", "There is one new transportation-related fine outlined in Division VI of the Zoning Ordinance associated with violations of Developer Transportation Demand Management (TDM) Plans. Developers found to be in violation of the Developer TDM Plan shall be subject to a fine of $5 per residential unit per day and $5 per employee in the project per day. The fine shall be deposited in accordance with Section 9.53.110. In the case of mixed-use projects that include both residential units and employees, the fine shall be calculated separately for each use.", "In addition, staff proposes a revision to the administrative fine for advertising, facilitating, or operating a vacation rental (SMMC 6.20.030) from $75 to $500. On May 12, 2015 Council adopted the Home Sharing Ordinance and provided funding for additional staff to address the growing number of vacation rentals in Santa Monica. Vacation rentals contribute to a reduction in the City\u2019s available and affordable housing stock and alter the character of residential neighborhoods. Due to the potential for significant financial benefits resulting from hosting vacation rentals, the current fine amounts do not serve as an effective deterrent.", "Discontinuance of Library Non-Resident Fee", "Staff proposes to eliminate the $25 non-resident library card fee and sustain the Library\u2019s budget at current levels. The fee was adopted as part of the FY 2013-15 Biennial Budget to help offset projected budget shortfalls. Revenues in the amount of $139,000 were included in the FY 2015-16 budget. However, revenues have been decreasing each year since the fee was implemented.", "The non-resident fee is an issue that came up frequently during the Library\u2019s strategic planning process. Local organizations including the Library Board, the Innovation Tech Task Force and the Friends of the Library Board have all overwhelmingly advocated for dropping the fee.", "Ninety percent of libraries in California provide free library cards to all state residents. The City\u2019s current practice of assessing a non-resident fee is broadly perceived as exclusionary, especially by neighboring library systems such as Los Angeles Public Library and the County of Los Angeles Public Library, who both offer Santa Monica residents free cards to access their large library networks. Additionally, the Library is disqualified from membership in the Southern California Library Consortium (SCLC) because it does not provide free library cards to non-residents. SCLC is the local consortium of library systems supported by the California State Library in accordance with the California Library Services Act. It is a valuable source for professional development and resource sharing for its member libraries.", "On December 10, the Library Board passed a motion to eliminate the non-resident library card fee and sustain the Library\u2019s budget at current levels. Staff requests that Council authorize the discontinuance of the fee effective February 1, 2016. If the discontinuance is approved, staff will formally revise the master fee resolution to reflect this change when it is presented to Council as part of the FY 2016-17 exception based budget.", "California Department of Transportation Active Transportation Program Grants", "On June 1, 2015, staff submitted four applications to the California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) Active Transportation Program (ATP) Cycle II. Of the four applications, two projects were selected for funding.", "Expo Station 4th Street Linkages to Downtown and Civic Center", "This project would design and construct pedestrian and bicyclist improvements along a 0.2-mile segment of 4th Street between Colorado Avenue and Olympic Drive to support safer first- and last-mile access and connectivity to the future Expo terminus station, central business district, Civic Center, and other local destinations. Staff is requesting authorization to accept grant funds of $1,613,000 for this project. A local match of $403,175 is already included in the CIP budget, as this grant was originally awarded through Metro\u2019s Call for Projects and then staff was instructed that funding had to be applied for through the new ATP process.", "Michigan Avenue Greenway: Completing Bike/Ped Expo Connection Over the I-10", "The project would design and construct bike path improvements and a new bike/ped path to close the gap in the bike network and enhance pedestrian access by connecting discontinuous segments of Michigan Avenue across the I-10 Freeway at the 20th Street overcrossing and linking to Expo light rail. Staff is requesting authorization to accept grant funds of $987,000 for this project. A local match of $247,000 will be required, and will be requested from Council in the FY 2016-18 Biennial CIP Budget. Funds are available from the Transportation Impact Fee revenues and from Transportation Development Act, Article III revenues.", "Lincoln Middle School Fields", "Staff has met with SMMUSD personnel to discuss the timing for the renovation of the Lincoln Middle School athletic field. The plan is to replace the grass with synthetic turf and operationalize the field lights. At this time, SMMUSD is anticipating implementing this project during summer 2017. City staff will continue to cooperate with the District to support this project.", "Lincoln Middle School Pool", "Per Council\u2019s direction, staff conducted an analysis of current and projected SMMUSD scheduling to analyze the feasibility of aquatic programming at the Lincoln Middle School and Santa Monica High School (SAMOHI) pools. Staff found that, due to the district\u2019s impacted facility scheduling, it is not feasible to expand City aquatic programming at SAMOHI. There is, however, an opportunity to pilot new programming at the Lincoln Middle School pool.", "Staff reviewed program demand for youth swim lessons, lap swim and unmet demand for various private user groups for pool permits. Based on this review, the ongoing and consistent demand for swim lessons, both group and semi-private, have been determined to represent the most significant public need. Given the availability of the Lincoln Pool (seasons available and time of day), staff estimates that approximately 360 youth would be served in more than 240 classes. The vast majority of these new classes would be offered during the summer. Due to the popularity of swim lessons at the Swim Center, there are typically waiting lists. Piloting swim lessons at Lincoln Middle School pool would provide an opportunity to examine how much these lessons help to reduce the size of the waiting lists, and would increase the number of young people in Santa Monica who are water safe and able to swim. In addition, staff recommends piloting lap swimming, family special events, and splash ball (youth water polo). These proposed activities are estimated to serve 1,590 people annually, would reduce the demands on the Santa Monica Swim Center, and would provide expanded aquatic programming to the community.", "An annual expenditure budget of approximately $135,000 would be needed to support equipment and supplies, on-duty lifeguards, swim lesson instructors, and staff supervision.The estimated revenue generated annually by these activities is projected to be approximately $58,000, for a net annual cost of $77,000. There will be a one-time cost of $21,000 in the first year to implement the program. Staff is seeking Council\u2019s direction on whether to provide a funding proposal for a pilot program during FY 2016-17 as part of the FY 2016-17 Exception Based Budget.", "The School District intends to make some minimal physical improvements to the facility this coming summer and is evaluating long term capital improvements for the pool in the context of their other capital projects. Staff will continue to monitor these efforts.", "Mt. Olivette", "Per Council\u2019s direction, staff has analyzed the feasibility of opening Mt. Olivette, an approximately 3.0 acre space, for public use. Staff has determined that providing public access to the west parcel is not feasible due to existing equipment, existing reservoir, and other site limitations, but recommends conducting outreach through a public survey or other means to assess the community\u2019s desire to open the east parcel of this space.", "The east parcel of Mt. Olivette is 2.25 acres but only a portion of the site could potentially be developed due to the existing reservoir and other infrastructure and equipment on site. If the site is opened for public use, staff recommends that Mt. Olivette be utilized as a passive park with minimal amenities, such as seating, a walking path, trash receptacles, and possibly modest lighting improvements. If the public process validates public receptivity to this approach, staff has provided two possible options for the site with approximate cost estimates.", "A small portion (.30 acres/13,000 square feet) of the east parcel surrounding the existing trees could be improved and opened to the public at a cost of $656,500. Alternatively, a larger area of the site measuring just over one acre at 45,000 square feet could be opened to the public at an estimated cost of $2,157,300. Both cost estimates were determined using an industry standard of $35 per square foot for construction, with additional allotments for community outreach and design, and miscellaneous costs such as permits, testing and inspections, and project/construction management. (Please see Attachment J for a map of the site and the proposed project areas.)", "Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program", "To receive federal Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) and Home Investment Partnership Act (HOME) Program grant funds, the City must prepare and submit a Council-approved One-Year Action Plan to HUD by May 15, 2016. The Action Plan outlines how the funds will be expended and confirms that the funded activities are consistent with the City\u2019s Five-Year Consolidated Plan adopted by Council on May 12, 2015. The City must hold two public hearings prior to the adoption of a One-Year Action Plan allocating federal CDBG and HOME Program funds. This public hearing will satisfy one of the two meeting requirements to receive public input and recommendations for the Proposed FY 2016-17 Action Plan. The City will hold another public hearing prior to the adoption of the Proposed FY 2016-17 Action Plan.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "Recommended FY 2015-16 midyear budget adjustments result in a $9.5million, or a 1.7% increase over the adopted citywide revenue budget, and expenditure adjustments result in a net $4.9 million or a 0.9% decrease over the adopted citywide expenditure budget. Detail for FY 2015-17 adjustments is included in Attachment A."]}, {"Title": "Discussion of Concept Plans and Conceptual Business Terms associated with a Development Agreement (15ENT-0225) for the development of a new multi-screen movie theater and retail/restaurant project located at 1318-1320 Fourth Street.", "Department": "Planning Commission Agenda (PCD)", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Discuss the applicant\u2019s Development Agreement Concept Plans and direct staff to initiate the Development Agreement negotiation process;2. Provide direction for negotiating potential community benefits, parameters for site redevelopment, and design alternatives identified by the Planning Commission and staff;3. Review and comment on the conceptual business terms and direct staff to initiate the negotiations on the Disposition and Development Agreement and Ground Lease Agreement for the project.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The applicants, Pacific Theatres Exhibition Corp. and Macerich G3, LLC, propose a Development Agreement to construct a new 4-story (84 feet), 100,000-square-foot mixed-use cinema and retail/restaurant project at the site of Downtown Parking Structure No. 3 located at 1318-1320 Fourth Street. The property is located within the Bayside District Specific Plan area and the Downtown Core LUCE designation. The proposed project consists of:", "\u00b7 Demolition/removal of Downtown Parking Structure No.3 and its 344 existing public parking spaces.", "\u00b7 Construction of an approximately 100,000\u2212square-foot building, which includes 90,000 square feet of theater floor area with up to 16 auditoriums/screens; approximately 2,700 theater seats; interior restaurant/lounge space available to theater patrons as well as to the public; and approximately 10,000 square feet of ground floor retail/restaurant tenant space leased separately from the theater use.", "The City has sought the redevelopment of Parking Structure No. 3 since 2007 and has conducted multiple efforts since that time to implement a mixed-use cinema at the site in an effort to restore opportunities for the Santa Monica community to see a wide range of movies in a contemporary setting without leaving Santa Monica. Since the site is City-owned, a Disposition and Development Agreement (DDA) and Ground Lease Agreement would govern the City\u2019s proprietary interests in the development of the property. The applicant (Development Team), Pacific Theaters/Arclight Theaters (Exhibitor) and Macerich (Developer), have been working with staff and the City\u2019s consultants to develop foundational conceptual business terms for the project. Staff seeks Council\u2019s direction on the conceptual business terms.", "A Development Agreement is requested because the proposed design of the structure does not comply with the applicable Bayside District Specific Plan and Zoning Code development standards related to building height, stepbacks, and building volume. The draft Downtown Specific Plan (DSP) is contemplating an 84-foot height limit for the site; however, until the DSP is adopted, the Bayside District Specific Plan, Interim Zoning Ordinance No. 2490 (CCS), and the 1988 Zoning Ordinance govern development on the site. The draft DSP will serve to inform and assist staff in its processing of the Development Agreement.", "While a Development Agreement is exempt from compliance with existing zoning standards, such agreements must comply with the General Plan and any applicable specific plans. As such, an amendment to the Bayside District Specific Plan is necessary prior to the final consideration of this Development Agreement by the Council to achieve consistency with the Specific Plan\u2019s height standard for the property. The project shall be consistent with the goals and policies set forth in the LUCE so that its design, use, and features will contribute to the community in accordance with the property\u2019s Downtown District General Plan designation.", "The following is a summary of key issues recommended for consideration by Council in its discussion of the proposed Development Agreement and its formulation of direction to staff and the applicant regarding the proposal:", "\u00b7 Consider whether the proposed project is consistent with the neighborhood context and the LUCE vision for the Downtown District.", "\u00b7 Consider how the schematic project design fits into the overall streetscape and whether it is responsive to its neighborhood context.", "\u00b7 Identify potential negotiation points and/or community benefits that would be appropriate for the broader neighborhood and community.", "\u00b7 Identify potential negotiation points and/or public benefits related to additional Transportation Demand Management (TDM) measures in excess of the baseline TDM requirements to reduce future vehicle trips in the area associated with the project and/or increase use of public transit for both project employees and patrons.", "As part of the project review, a parking study would be prepared that analyzes parking utilization and demand within the context of the City\u2019s broader Downtown Parking Program. The study will include collection and analysis of current parking utilization data and provide recommendations to maximize the efficiency of the public and private parking supply in the Downtown. Economic analyses will also be prepared to analyze the project\u2019s revenue and costs to the City, and a value enhancement analysis will be prepared based on a project proforma and the effects of the cost of development on the residual land value.", "The Planning Commission conceptually reviewed the project at a float-up meeting on August 19, 2015. The project was not viewed favorably by the Planning Commission primarily due to the three issues of parking, building height/mass, and a passageway through the alley to Fourth Street, as summarized in Attachment A. The Planning Commission recommended that City Council pay particular attention to items related to the project\u2019s impact to parking in the downtown, building mass and height, community benefits, and neighborhood compatibility.", "Background", "In 2001, Council established the Promenade Uses Task Force (PUTF) to address community concerns regarding the Third Street Promenade losing some of its signature diversity and vitality. The PUTF held a series of public meetings during 2002 and 2003 and concluded its work with a set of recommendations for ensuring the continued appeal of the Promenade and surrounding downtown area to residents, employees and visitors. Among the PUTF\u2019s recommendations was a focus on creating high-quality downtown movie theaters. The PUTF\u2019s recommendation recognized that movie theaters play a critical role in Downtown Santa Monica, both in terms of enriching the downtown experience beyond shops and restaurants and in creating local venues that allow the Santa Monica community to enjoy everything from Hollywood blockbusters to foreign films. The PUTF acknowledged that Santa Monica\u2019s cinemas were becoming outdated, particularly with respect to essential amenities such as stadium seating. The PUTF also recognized that the existing cinemas within the downtown were located on sites too small to accommodate stadium seating and that the cinemas had become less appealing to movie-goers and would continue to do so. The PUTF recommended that the Council consider larger sites beyond the Promenade that could accommodate contemporary cinemas while expanding the associated pedestrian energy to the larger downtown beyond the Promenade. Council accepted the PUTF\u2019s recommendation on June 10, 2003 (Attachment D), and on September 9, 2003 (Attachment E), Council directed staff to pursue a work plan for implementing the PUTF recommendations.", "The PUTF\u2019s predictions were correct. At its height in the late 1980s, the downtown Santa Monica cinema market included 5,690 seats which generated over two million cinema attendees annually. Since that time, cinema attendance has continued to decline, with market attendance now at approximately 600,000 patrons peryear due to aging facilities and the establishment of contemporary cinemas in neighboring areas. Inaddition, the Criterion 6, with 1,526 seats, has closed, the AMC 7 and AMC Broadway 4 have both reduced their auditoriums by 1,945 seats, and the Laemmle Monica 4 is in the process of reducing its seat count by 719 seats. The only new downtown cinema is the Arclight at Santa Monica Place, which was approved by the City Council on April 22, 2014 (Attachment J), and recently opened with 1,500 stadium seats; however, with other cinema closures and seat reductions there has been a net loss of 2,690 seats (47%) relative to downtown\u2019s seat count of approximately 5,700 for over 20 years.", "At about the same time that the PUTF was conducting its work, another Council-appointed group, the Downtown Parking Task Force (DPTF), was developing a strategic parking plan for Santa Monica\u2019s downtown. The task force\u2019s recommendations included the demolition and replacement of Parking Structures 1, 3 and 6. When the work of both Council-appointed groups was completed, many community members identified the potential confluence of the parking plan and the cinema plan. Thosediscussions eventually focused on the opportunity to demolish Parking Structure3 on Fourth Street and replace it with a contemporary cinema. Structure 3 was identified as a prime opportunity because of its relatively central location within thedowntown. Community members advocating for the opportunity also recognized that cinemas generally operate as loss leaders within shopping malls, much like department stores. Cinemas and department stores are essentially underwritten by mall owners because they draw foot traffic that supports the other shops and restaurants within the center. Santa Monica\u2019s downtown contains only one shopping mall, Santa Monica Place, and there was concern about focusing too many cinema seats at one location, particularly a location at a gateway edge of downtown. As a result, community members expressed a desire for the City to use its land resources to support cinema development in order to benefit the diversity of uses downtown and provide the broader community with a breadth and depth of movie-going options throughout the downtown.", "Council agreed with the approach and on November 13, 2007 (Attachment F), authorized the solicitation of proposals to redevelop the City-owned site of Parking Structure No. 3 into a cinema. On September 8, 2009 (Attachment H), Council authorized staff to enter into exclusive negotiations with AMC Entertainment Inc., in partnership with Metropolitan Pacific Capital Inc., (AMC Development Team) to develop and operate a multiplex cinema on the site. At that meeting, Council directed staff to move forward with the cinema proposal without providing parking on the site, in accordance with the findings in the Downtown Walker Parking Study, as detailed further in the \u2018Downtown Parking Program\u2019 section of this staff report below. During the exclusive negotiating period with the AMC Development Team, a draft EIR was prepared and publicly circulated in October 2012.", "The Exclusive Negotiation Agreement (ENA) with the AMC Development Team expired on November 26, 2012, and AMC informed staff that the development team would not seek an extension to continue exclusive negotiations due to the financial infeasibility of the proposed project. On December 11, 2012 (Attachment I), Council directed staff to negotiate in the open market with prospective cinema exhibitors and developers. At its April 22, 2014, meeting (Attachment K), Council authorized staff to negotiate and enter into an ENA with the Development Team of ArcLight Cinemas and Macerich (Applicant) to develop and operate a contemporary multiplex cinema project on the site. The City and Development Team have executed the ENA and are currently negotiating the conceptual business terms for the project. During the term of the ENA, the applicant will seek discretionary entitlements for the project that will be subject to review pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA); concurrently the City and Development Team will finalize the business terms to the Disposition and Development Agreement and Ground Lease Agreement.", "Discussion", "Because the proposed project is located on City land, Council has regulatory responsibilities (as reflected in a potential Development Agreement) and proprietary responsibilities (as reflected in a potential Disposition and Development Agreement and Ground Lease) related to the project, as discussed below.", "Development Agreement", "Development agreements are negotiated contracts between the City and an applicant that specify the design parameters, development standards, and requirements of a project. Development agreements provide some flexibility from the development standards of the Zoning Code in return for some level of public benefit. A development agreement is an alternative to the standard development approval process; in practice it is similar to other public review processes where Council makes the final decision; with the exception that Council has more discretion in imposing conditions and requirements on the proposed project since development agreements are negotiated contracts and adopted by ordinance. On October 13, 2015, Council explicitly enacted new policy direction to de-emphasize discretion for Development Agreements, with clear and specific parameters to be included in the future Downtown Specific Plan \u2013 and in fact deferred consideration of most applications for Development Agreements until the DSP was in place. However, this project was explicitly included for continued Council consideration pending the DSP adoption, expected this June. Council direction as part of the float-up review will provide initial direction to staff, and inform the applicant of potential project-related issues in moving forward with the project design and development agreement negotiation, with final approval taking place after the adoption of the DSP.", "Project Description", "The applicant proposes to demolish the City-owned Downtown Parking Structure No. 3 (344 spaces) to redevelop the project site with an approximately 100,000 square-foot multi-screen theater and retail/restaurant building (Arclight Santa Monica). The concept includes up to 16 screens and 2,700 seats in 90,000 square feet of theater floor area. Retail and restaurant uses are proposed within 10,000 square feet of ground floor tenant spaces to be leased separately from the theater. The proposal is consistent with the Council-adopted criteria for the development of a state-of-the-art cinema at the site, including the preservation or modest increase in the total number of cinema seats that have historically existed in the Downtown.", "The original design proposed for this project is shown in the rendering below, one that was sharply critiqued by the Planning Commission at its Float Up \u2013 and a new design responsive to those concerns is detailed below. Both designs called for four stories that measures approximately 84 feet in height, not including parapets and roof appurtenances. Pedestrian access to the theater would be provided on the ground floor from Fourth Street where patrons will access escalators and a grand staircase to the third floor theater lobby and associated theater services (i.e. restaurant, lounge, admission to auditoriums). The theater entrance and ground floor retail/restaurant lease spaces are preliminarily designed with a glass fa\u00e7ade that allows transparency into the retail/restaurant uses as well as into the theater lobby and restaurant/lounge area on the third floor. The structure is a zero lot line design so no landscaping is proposed.", "Arclight 4th Street Cinema: Original Rendering", "The development of cinemas in the Downtown District was a key strategy in the revitalization of the downtown and its evolution as a retail, dining, and entertainment destination. The development of new theaters in neighboring jurisdictions over the past 15 years that offer more choices and modern cinema amenities have caused many residents to leave Santa Monica for their entertainment needs. The current upgrades to the existing AMC and Laemmle theaters will provide some modernized amenities and technologies to compete with the surrounding cinema market, but the scope of the improvements are limited due to site and building constraints. Additionally, the upgrades are occurring at the cost of a significant reduction in the number of seats.", "Features of the proposed concept include state-of-the-art amenities including at least one Premium Large Screen Format auditorium (i.e. IMAX-style auditorium) with premium immersive sound, stadium seating, 3D format technology, reserved seating, hearing loop technology, and digital projection and sound; a cinema cafe and lounge that can be accessed by the general public as well as theater patrons; enhanced food and beverage service with specialized food areas; and additional ground-floor commercial space fronting Fourth Street for unaffiliated retail or restaurant uses.", "Community Benefits", "As part of the entitlement process, a fiscal impact analysis will be prepared to estimate potential project generated revenue to the City as well as any additional municipal service costs. Additionally, a value enhancement analysis on the project will be conducted based on a project proforma to study the effects of the cost of development on the residual land value to determine the potential for community benefits.", "Potential community benefits preliminarily identified by City staff include the following points that will be included in discussions with the applicant once the development agreement negotiations have commenced:", "\u00b7 Require some auditoriums to be available for use by community groups during certain day and/or at non-peak attendance times;", "\u00b7 Availability of screens for use during the American Film Market (AFM) or other film markets or festivals that may be hosted in Santa Monica;", "\u00b7 Provide public art at the project site (1318-1320 Fourth Street);", "\u00b7 Establish and implement a Transportation Demand Management (TDM) Plan in excess of the baseline TDM requirements to reduce the number of vehicle trips associated with the project and to encourage alternative forms of transportation to and from the site for both employees and patrons;", "\u00b7 LEED v4 Platinum certification;", "\u00b7 Local hiring provisions for theater and concessions.", "Community benefits that support transportation that may be considered include, but are not limited to:", "\u00b7 Additional Contributions to the Transportation Impact fee fund to support pedestrian enhancements in the Downtown.", "\u00b7 Pedestrian-oriented, placemaking public art to be located on the site, or participation in combining publicarts fees contributions with other development projects to provide a signature piece of art in the immediate vicinity", "\u00b7 Build or fund an enhanced crosswalk.", "Based on feedback from the Planning Commission, Council, and the community, staff will identify additional community benefits for potential implementation in conjunction with the proposed development during development agreement negotiations.", "Downtown Parking Program", "On May 9, 2006, Council adopted the Downtown Parking Program (Program), which was developed by the Downtown Parking Task Force to evaluate and improve parking resources in the Downtown. The Program set forth a goal to add 1,712 net new public parking spaces to the Downtown parking supply through the seismic retrofitting of two nine-story parking structures, the demolition and reconstruction of three five-story parking structures, and the addition of up to two new parking structures. The Program recommended that occupancies and projected demand should be evaluated prior to the construction of any new parking facilities Downtown. As a result, the City hired Walker Parking consultant in 2007 to evaluate the current parking demands, anticipated parking demands, and financing options to better manage Downtown parking resources.", "The Downtown Walker Parking Study (Study) was endorsed by Council on September 8, 2009 (Attachment G). The Study concluded that the construction of new parking structures is not necessary to achieve the increase of 1,712 spaces sought by the Program, provided that Parking Structure Nos. 1 and 6 are reconstructed and other recommendations such as improved pricing strategies and enhanced operational, technological and informational strategies are implemented. However, the Study goes on to state that potential commercial redevelopment of the Parking Structure 3 site could negatively impact the Downtown supply of parking in two ways, by increasing the demand for parking in the area and eliminating several hundred parking spaces at the same time. Updated parking analyses will be conducted as part of this project\u2019s review to determine existing utilization rates of parking in the downtown, anticipated parking demand for a new cinema use at this location, and to develop recommendations based on its findings.", "The Study did not foresee nor account for the significant reduction in cinema seats in the Downtown District. However, the Study was cited and discussed by Council on September 8, 2009 (Attachment H), when authorization was given to enter into exclusive negotiations with AMC to develop a movie theater on the site of Parking Structure No. 3 without providing any on-site parking. Council direction was based on the following:", "\u00b7 With the implementation of the Walker Parking Study (2009) recommendations, there will be sufficient parking availability in the Downtown to support the demolition of Parking Structure #3 and its replacement with a movie theater;", "\u00b7 Providing parking on-site would require a much taller structure than what is currently proposed;", "\u00b7 Providing parking on the site would interfere with the pedestrian-oriented design of the proposed cinema;", "\u00b7 Providing parking on the site would discourage the pedestrian activity that occurs when significant destinations and primary parking resources are not co-located.", "One of the key measures identified in the Study to increase parking supply was completed in 2013 in the reconstruction of Parking Structure No. 6, which increased its capacity from 345 spaces to 744 spaces (i.e. 399 parking space increase). At this time, the timing of the reconstruction of Parking Structure #1 is uncertain; however the potential development at Arizona Avenue and Fourth Street may provide public parking spaces as a community benefit that will effectively replace the additional public parking spaces contemplated in the Walker Parking Study as part of the reconstruction of Parking Structure No. 1.", "As part of the ongoing review of parking needs and demand in the Downtown, the City has contracted with two traffic consultants (SP+ Municipal Services and Nelson\\Nygaard Consulting Associates) to prepare a study to update and augment the Walker Parking Study findings. The scope of the new study includes an updated assessment of current inventory and utilization of all parking within the Downtown (public and private), an analysis of the anticipated parking demand for the proposed development, an estimation of potential parking demand of new developments expected in Downtown, and offering of recommendations and strategies to improve parking operations throughout the entire Downtown district. The findings and recommendations of these studies will be used to supplement technical data for the theater project\u2019s EIR, and in staff\u2019s analysis of the project and subsequent recommendation to the Planning Commission and Council as part of the Development Agreement review process.", "Zoning Ordinance, Specific Plan, & General Plan Consistency", "Bayside District Specific Plan & 1988 Zoning Ordinance", "Until such time as the draft Downtown Specific Plan (DSP) is adopted, Interim Ordinance No. 2487 (CCS) provides that the Bayside District Specific Plan and development standards of the 1988 Zoning Ordinance are applicable to development in the Downtown. Movie theaters are a permitted use in the BSC-2 zoning district. The maximum height permitted is 56\u2019-0\u201d (four stories) with a maximum allowable Floor Area Ratio (FAR) of 3.0. The project\u2019s proposed 84\u2019-00\u201d building height and approximate 3.4 FAR do not comply with the respective development standards of the applicable Bayside District Specific Plan and 1988 Zoning Ordinance. Furthermore, the massing of the proposed structure does not comply with zoning code development standards addressing building stepbacks and building volume envelope requirements above 30\u2019-0\u201d in height. More specifically, Bayside Commercial District standards (SMMC Section 9.04.08.15.060) require that new buildings be stepped back at a 36.9 degree angle measured from the horizontal above 30 feet in height. Additional Project Design and Development Standards (SMMC Section 9.04.10.02.040) in the Zoning Code establish building volume envelope requirements that require a 9\u2019-0\u201d average setback for any portion of a structure between 31\u2019-0\u201d and 35\u2019-0\u201d in height and an 18\u2019-0\u201d average setback between 46\u2019-0\u201d and 56\u2019-0\u201d in height.", "Due to the unique building requirements for movie theater development, a larger building volume envelope is a typical feature of its design. By eliminating the requirement for upper level building stepbacks above 30\u2019-0\u201d and allowing the additional building height, the building volume necessary for auditoriums with state-of-the-art movie screens and stadium-style seating can be achieved; otherwise, some theater auditoriums would have to be placed below grade. While the proposal will require modification to the development standards outlined above pertaining to building volume and upper level stepbacks, the project will comply with other Bayside Commercial District and general project design and development standards, including those that address the building\u2019s relationship to street frontage and require ground floor levels to be designed with pedestrian orientation. Furthermore, the draft Downtown Specific Plan (DSP) is contemplating an 84-foot height limit for a Tier 3 project at this site, which was authorized by Council for use in studying the upper height limits for the DSP EIR.", "Consistent with the City\u2019s formal design review process, the Architectural Review Board will be required to review and approve the final building design, materials, colors, and signage for the project.", "Consistency with the Draft Downtown Specific Plan", "The project is located within the City\u2019s Downtown Core where the draft DSP envisions enhanced public spaces and improved pedestrian accessibility. Project design considerations should occur in consultation with the designers of the project at Arizona Avenue and Fourth and Fifth Streets to ensure optimal pedestrian access between the two projects, and to provide a seamless transition atthis vital corner of the Downtown. This project should provide an enhanced pedestrian relationship to the street, the corner, and the City plaza and public spaces across thestreet. These types of enhancements support the pedestrian oriented vision of the draft DSP and could include features such as enhanced street crossings, additional pedestrian storage space, and on-site bicycle parking. In particular, an enhanced crosswalk at the same level of design as the crosswalk between Tongva Park and City Hall, or the design for the new crosswalk between Santa Monica Place and Searsshould be considered. In accordance with the current draft of the proposed DSP, the project should be set back by three feet along the 4th Street frontage for a total width of 15 feet, and provide convenient short-term bicycle parking nearby the building\u2019s main entrance.", "Downtown Core District Land Use Designation & Bayside Specific Plan", "The subject property is located in the Downtown Core District of the adopted General Plan Land Use Element. Policies in this District are geared primarily toward reinforcing the Downtown as the focus of the City, encouraging the concentration of land uses and activities which create activity in both the daytime and evening hours.", "The proposed movie theater and retail/restaurant building is consistent with Land Use Policy 1.3.3 which encourages the construction of major entertainment or cultural uses Downtown and with Bayside Specific Plan Policies 4.1.1 and 4.1.3 which support retail and other complementary uses on or near the Third Street Promenade as necessary to maintain a vibrant downtown environment and provide for the development of uses necessary to maintain the economic viability of the Bayside District, including entertainment facilities such as theaters.", "Consistency with the Land Use and Circulation Element Update (LUCE)", "The LUCE Downtown District land use designation supports the area as a thriving, mixed-use urban environment for people to live, work, be entertained and be culturally enriched. The Downtown District designation capitalizes on Downtown being the terminus of the Expo Light Rail with a station planned for Fourth Street and Colorado Avenue, located within walking distance of the subject property.", "The LUCE also encourages development that will capitalize on Downtown as an already transit rich environment, in particular the presence of major bus routes on Fourth Street. As well, the LUCE vision for the Downtown District addresses the provision of parking:", "\u201cA parking management approach for the Downtown, the Expo Light Rail station and the Civic Center areas, and potentially the Beach and Oceanside Districts utilizes a shared pool of parking resources, creating a true shared parking district, which balances variable parking demand and economic return. This will require an optimal mix of investment in new parking, coordinated management of existing parking, access improvements and transit augmentation.\u201d", "With respect to land uses, Downtown District Policy D7.1 encourages a broad mix of uses that create dynamic activity in both the daytime and evening hours including retail, hotels, office, high-density residential, entertainment and cultural uses in the Downtown. Downtown District Policy D1.2 encourages the construction of new or rehabilitated movie theaters in the Downtown to assure that these entertainment venues are competitive in the marketplace.", "Finally, the Downtown District\u2019s Land Use Parameter Policy D8.3 states that buildings should be constructed with a variety of heights, architectural elements and shapes to create visual interest along the street. The proposed building will create a new entertainment venue on Fourth Street, and provide a use that will generate activity and enhance the pedestrian environment, in particular during the evening hours.", "Planning Commission Float-Up Review", "The Planning Commission conducted a float-up review of the project on August 19, 2015. The project was not viewed favorably by the Planning Commission primarily due to three issues (parking, building height/mass, passageway through alley). Ultimately, the Planning Commission approved a motion to recommend to Council that negotiations proceed with attention to a number of items related to parking, building design, community benefits, and neighborhood compatibility. A detailed summary of Planning Commission comments is provided in Attachment A.", "Height and Design Considerations", "As a result of the Planning Commission\u2019s comments, the Development Team has reviewed design alternatives reducing the height and overall massing of the building. Oneoption to reduce the height significantly is to excavate approximately 30 feet below grade. Doing so would add several million dollars to the tight project budget and cause it to become economically infeasible. The City\u2019s economic consultant concurs with the conclusion. Staff also notes that AMC employed a similar approach to a project that they ultimately determined to be infeasible.", "A second option for reducing the height is to significantly reduce the number of seats and auditoriums in the cinema. However, a reduced-sized project presents a series of challenges for the Development Team and for the City. For the Development Team, it creates a project that could struggle operationally since cinema complexes cannot compete effectively for either film or audience without a critical mass of screens and seats. (Staff notes that the proposed cinema and the cinema at Santa Monica Place would operate as one from a market standpoint and are expected to be large enough to allow ArcLight to show virtually every current film across its large number of screens.) For the City, a reduced-size cinema means that Downtown would be unable to serve the full movie-going needs of Santa Monica, including the ability to see most, if not all, films in current release in a variety of seating formats (both stadium seating and sloping auditoriums with wide seats.) It could also affect the inclusion of a premium large-format (IMAX-style) auditorium, which is an important feature for many Santa Monica movie-goers. (See the discussion below of the Santa Monica movie-going market.)", "While either scenario for reducing the height of the cinema to 56 feet has significant negative implications for the feasibility of the project, in response to Planning Commission concerns, the Development Team has considered concepts intended to reduce the perceived building massing by creating an upper-level set-back of the top-floor auditoriums, as well as incorporating additional architectural elements to address the building volume. At this point, the alternative design concept is largely schematic, as shown in the rendering below. Specific colors and materials have not yet been identified, but the concept does provide a general idea of an alternative direction for the project design.", "The alternative design maintains the overall 84-foot height while scaling back elements of the building massing at the upper levels, where permitting, to maintain a project objective of providing large screen format auditoriums. The alternative design replaces the very modern, highly visible design with a more traditional, classic concept that is more compatible with the existing context along Fourth Street in terms of both design and massing, which were expressed as significant concerns by the Planning Commission. The new design reinforces compatibility with the immediate area in how it references and relates to adjacent structures more effectively than the previous design, and achieves more consistency in street wall height.  Staff and the Development Team seek Council feedback on the alternative design direction illustrated below.", "Arclight 4th Street Cinema: Alternative Design Concept", "Disposition and Development Agreement", "Disposition and development agreements (DDAs) are negotiated contracts between the City and a developer that specify and govern the City\u2019s proprietary interests in the development of City-owned property. A DDA sets forth the terms of the development of a property and is considered following Council\u2019s approval of a project\u2019s entitlements and development agreement. An approved DDA remains in place while a developer is pursuing building permits and construction financing and establishes a developer\u2019s performance requirements that must be met in order to execute a ground lease agreement, which controls the use of the property and project and stipulates the business terms and obligations such as the amount of ground rent, the term of the ground lease, permitted uses and assignment, and other project requirements.", "Project Financing and Feasibility", "To supporting the City in its proprietary capacity, consultants with expertise in public- private partnerships and cinema development and operations have reviewed the proposed project to understand it development and operational feasibility. The following are some of the key findings as the conceptual stage of the project.", "The estimated cost of the structure, exclusive of furniture, fixtures and equipment (FF&E) and tenant improvements to the retail space, is estimated at $40 million to $42 million, excluding City development impact fees. Traditionally, cinema complexes are built on development-ready pads as single-story projects on large contiguous parcels. However, due to the constrained site of the proposed cinema project and the need to have a sufficient number of seats and screens to be operationally and economically feasible, the project must be built as a multi-level cinema. The primary factor contributing to the project\u2019s cost is the building\u2019s inefficiencies created by the site conditions and constraints.", "The construction of a multi-level cinema requires, among other things:", "(1) Significant additional costs for duplication of concession, restroom facilities, and internal circulation on each level;", "(2) Construction of expensive vertical transportation systems (i.e. elevators, escalators) normally not needed within a cinema complex; and", "(3) The general increase in construction cost associated with multi-story buildings.", "Another major and atypical source of additional cost is the substantial cost of demolition of the existing parking structure and preparation of the site, as most cinema projects occur within larger buildings such as a mall or on \u201cdevelopment-ready\u201d pads.", "The inefficiency of the multilevel cinema also significantly impacts the costs of FF&E and operations because of the inherent duplication of many facilities on multiple levels. While a single-level theater requires essentially one bank of restrooms and one set of concession stands, a multilevel theater requires them for each level as well as additional ushers and circulation personnel. This adds materially to both labor and utility costs. Additionally, because the proposed cinema will be in a free standing building and not within a shopping center or other developer-owned complex, the stand-alone cinema has to cover the majority of the associated common area maintenance expenses. These additional and non-typical costs include maintenance of exterior walls, miscellaneous cleaning, and restoration charges not typically borne by cinema operators.", "Demolition of the parking structure and construction of the mixed-use cinema is estimated to cost between $40 million and $42 million. With the inclusion of development impact fees, including a parking in-lieu payment, the total project cost rises to $57 million to $59 million. The City\u2019s economic consultant has estimated that a total project of approximately $40 million is just minimally economically feasible (Attachment O). However, with the addition of development impact and parking in-lieu fees, the project quickly becomes infeasible. If Council authorizes staff to continue negotiations, one option is to give the developer a credit against development impact fees for the cost of demolishing the existing public improvements, in order to help make the project feasible.", "Conceptual Business Terms", "Staff from Economic Development and the City Attorney\u2019s Office, with the assistance of economic development and cinema consultants, have been conducting a high-level evaluation of the economics of the project. A critical issue in the evaluation is the market reality that a cinema is generally unable to pay full market rent due to the inherently high cost of constructing and operating a multi-level, mixed-use cinema project. The City\u2019s consultant evaluated the project\u2019s proforma and has preliminary opined that the economics of the project would not support a traditional market-rate land rent. Staff seeks Council\u2019s direction on the proposed conceptual business terms to assist staff in further negotiations as the project\u2019s design is refined and the entitlement process continues, if authorized.", "The project\u2019s scope and conceptual business terms reflect the broad goals for Downtown cinema revitalization which includes a contemporary multi-screen cinema complex that provides such amenities as stadium seating, at least one large screen format (IMAX-style) auditorium, state-of-the-art technology and limited in-theater food and beverage sales. If Council authorizes staff to proceed with further negotiations of the DDA and Ground Lease Agreement, staff will return to Council with a detailed financial evaluation and recommendation of business terms for consideration as part of the DDA and Ground Lease. The conceptual business topics discussed to date for the project are described below and are defined further in Attachment N.", "Staff and the Development Team are in general agreement regarding many of the conceptual business topics, including specific terms involving the base rent formula, terms of the ground lease, cinema participation formula, changes in use, and requirements upon closing. However, staff and the Development Team have been unable to agree on the term of a cinema operating covenant and whether the retail space should include a participation formula. With respect to the areas of agreement, staff recommends a ground lease with a base term of 35 years with four, five-year option periods for a total ground lease term of 55 years. In addition, staff recommends a base ground rent of $100,000 annually, plus additional rent if the cost of the project that is less than a pre-specified amount. The rent payment would adjust annually every five years by ten percent beginning on the sixth year of the lease. The City would receive percentage rent if attendance exceeds one million tickets sold annually and an additional rent for every ticket sold in excess of 1.25 million annually. The Development Team could not change the primary use from cinema to an alternative use without presenting compelling evidence that a cinema use is no longer financially feasible in the space. If a new use is proposed, the ground rent would be adjusted to reflect the new use. Finally, once the ground lease was executed, the Development Team would be required to proceed with the project, other than for defined, unforeseen site conditions.", "Staff also recommends that any change in use would trigger a revaluation of rent with the understanding that no use would be allowed other than as an ArcLight Cinema during the cinema operating covenant period and any change in use contemplated after the cinema operating covenant period expires would be subject to the condition that Macerich demonstrate compelling evidence that cinema use is no longer feasible. While details have yet to be fully negotiated, the Development Team is in general agreement.", "There are two primary areas of disagreement as to the conceptual business terms. Thefirst area of disagreement relates to the term of the cinema operating period. Staffrecommends a 15-year operating covenant period for the use of the cinema space as an ArcLight Cinema. ArcLight has countered with a 10-year operating period.", "The second area is disagreement relates to whether Macerich should pay percentage rent for the retail space after Macerich has achieved a fair return on capital. Staff recommends additional rent to the City in the event the retail space achieves a certain level of success. Macerich does not support the concept of percentage rent. Staff seeks Council direction to continue to negotiate the two open issues.", "Cinema Market Evaluation", "Staff engaged Alan D. Kotin and Associates (ADK) and Economic and Planning Systems (EPS) to complete a market evaluation of the proposed cinema (see AttachmentP.) While it is atypical for the City to commission a market evaluation of a proposed development, the study was completed because the City is the landowner and can benefit from understanding whether demand exists for a use proposed for valuable City property. Amarket study can also help identify the locations of the likely users of the cinema. The study prepared by ADK and EPS concludes that there is sufficient market demand to support the proposed cinema, based on a market area that is primarily composed of Santa Monica and the immediately adjacent areas. Understanding the primary market area helps answer the question of whether the cinema would need to be a regional draw in order to be successful. Thestudy finds that the cinema can be successful drawing upon the local market. The conclusion is understandable from an intuitive standpoint as well, given that ArcLight cinemas serve the different parts of the region, including the San Fernando Valley / Sherman Oaks, Central Los Angeles / Hollywood, San Gabriel Valley / Pasadena, Southwest Los Angeles / Culver City, and South Bay / El Segundo. The study also confirms that even with the opening of the ArcLight at Santa Monica Place, the local market is underserved by cinemas and will continue to be underserved unless a cinema of the approximate size proposed in the project is built. Until then, movie-goers in Santa Monica will have to leave Santa Monica to see a full range of films in a contemporary setting.", "Public Outreach & Community Meeting", "A community meeting was held for the project on May 28, 2015, at the Santa Monica Main Library. The only attendee present at the meeting outside of the development team and City staff was a representative from Downtown Santa Monica, Inc.", "Environmental Analysis", "CEQA review is not required for the purpose of a preliminary discussion of the feasibility of a potential project and the appropriateness and potential community benefits of a Development Agreement for the site (State CEQA Guidelines Section 15262). Environmental factors will be considered and analysis will be completed and circulated for public review, in accordance with CEQA Guidelines, prior to consideration of the formal Development Agreement application by the Planning Commission and City Council.", "Conclusion", "The Planning Commission\u2019s recommendations regarding the appropriateness of the applicant\u2019s proposal and any potential public benefits and project requirements will help inform Council\u2019s discussion and direction regarding the Development Agreement review and negotiation process for the development of a new multi-screen movie theater and retail/restaurant building at 1318-1320 Fourth Street. Direction regarding the conceptual business terms will assist staff in negotiating the Disposition and Development Agreement.", "In addition to the recommended action, the Council could consider the following with respect to the project:", "\u00b7 Continue discussion with the applicant regarding additional project options", "\u00b7 Do not initiative DA negotiations and conclude ENA negotiations.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There are no immediate financial or budget impacts associated with the actions recommended in this report."]}, {"Title": "Annual Development Agreement Compliance Review", "Department": "Planning Commission Agenda (PCD)", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1) Review the status of Development Agreement compliance2) Determine good faith compliance for those that are in compliance", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This report provides an annual summary of the status of compliance for each of the 31 Development Agreements that are currently in effect and subject to annual compliance report submittals. Council reviewed the status of Development Agreement compliance most recently at its January 27, 2015 meeting. This year\u2019s summary includes review of all 19 completed projects, five projects that are under construction, and the status of the remaining seven Agreements where construction has not commenced. Attachment \u201cA\u201d to this staff report provides a summary of the Transportation Demand Management (TDM) Program requirements that have been imposed on new and amended Development Agreements since 2010.", "Based on staff\u2019s review of each of the 19 projects already built and the annual reports submitted by the developers or successors-in-interest to demonstrate good faith compliance, staff recommends Council determine that 18 of these Agreements are in good faith compliance with requirements specified for each property. As discussed more fully in this report, compliance for one completed project is still under review and staff will provide a report to Council on this property during the second quarter of 2016. This report also summarizes staff\u2019s work with three other properties that are, consistent with development agreement requirements, implementing additional transportation demand management measures to achieve the numeric peak-hour Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) targets identified in each Agreement.", "Staff will continue its ongoing and annual review of compliance reports for each Agreement submitted by the developers or successors-in-interest to demonstrate good faith compliance. The next annual report to Council for all Development Agreements subject to annual compliance reporting is scheduled for January 2017.", "Background", "Chapter 9.48 of the Municipal Code (recodified as Chapter 9.60) establishes the processes and requirements for the City to enter into a Development Agreement. One of the provisions is annual review by the City Council of each approved Development Agreement to determine good faith compliance with the terms and conditions of the Agreements. Since the passage of this ordinance in 1982, 31 Development Agreements have been enacted that are still in effect. Each Development Agreement contains unique time frames, obligations, and requirements. The obligations can be one-time or ongoing; some are fees, some are actual physical improvements, and some are ongoing services.", "The 31 Development Agreements monitored by the Planning and Community Development (PCD) Department are listed below and include five properties under construction and seven properties where construction has not yet commenced. This includes three projects approved since Council\u2019s last annual review of Development Agreement compliance in January 2015: 1415 5th Street, 1560 Lincoln Boulevard, and 1601 Lincoln Boulevard. All three are mixed-use commercial/residential projects in the Downtown District.", "PCD staff works closely with other City departments and divisions to confirm compliance with agreement terms that fit within those departments\u2019 areas of expertise. For example, Housing and Economic Development performs the annual compliance review of affordable housing obligations in Agreements and Community and Cultural Services performs the annual compliance review of child care program obligations.", "Development Agreements (31)", "Good Faith Compliance (18)", "Staff Review Pending (1)", "Under Construction (5)", "Construction Has Not Commenced (7)", "2401-2525 Colorado Avenue - Colorado Place II & II (Colorado Center) (1981)", "\u2022", "1541 Ocean Ave - Paseo Del Mar (1982)", "\u2022", "2700 Colorado Ave - National Medical Enterprise (Viacom) (1982)", "\u2022", "530 Pico Blvd - Bayview CA Unlimited Partnership (Le Meridien Delfina) (1983)", "\u2022", "Development Agreements (31)", "Good Faith Compliance (18)", "Staff Review Pending (1)", "Under Construction (5)", "Construction Has Not Commenced (7)", "2000-2200 Colorado Ave - Arboretum (AO Santa Monica) (1987)", "\u2022", "1620 26th Street & 2425 Olympic Blvd - Water Garden (1988)", "\u2022", "1733 Ocean Ave - Maguire Thomas (1990)", "\u2022", "2221 Santa Monica Blvd - Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center (1998)", "\u2022", "1776 Main Street - Rand (2000)", "\u2022", "3030 Olympic Blvd - Lantana East (2004)", "\u2022", "3030 Olympic Blvd - Lantana South (2004)", "\u2022", "1725 Ocean Ave - The Village (2008)", "\u2022", "725 California Avenue - Saint Monica\u2019s Catholic Community (2010)", "\u2022", "1800 Stewart St - Agensys (2010)", "\u2022", "2834 Colorado Avenue - Colorado Creative Studios (2011)", "\u2022", "702 Arizona Avenue (2011)", "\u2022", "1317 7th Street (2011)", "\u2022", "401 Broadway (2011)", "\u2022", "710 Wilshire Boulevard (2012)", "\u2022", "1548 6th Street (2012)", "\u2022", "2930 Colorado Avenue (2013)", "\u2022", "1318 2nd Street (2013)", "\u2022", "1731 20th Street - Crossroads School (2013)", "\u2022", "1554 5th Street - Courtyard by Marriott (2013)", "\u2022", "501 Colorado Avenue - Hampton Inn & Suites (2013)", "\u2022", "315 Colorado Avenue - Arclight Cinemas at Santa Monica Place (2014)", "\u2022", "1402 Santa Monica Blvd - Mini Automobile Dealership (2014)", "\u2022", "1112-1122 Pico Blvd (2014)", "\u2022", "1415 5th Street (2015)", "\u2022", "1560 Lincoln Blvd (2015)", "\u2022", "1601 Lincoln Blvd (2016)", "\u2022", "1333-1337 Ocean Avenue - Hill Street Partners III (2007)", "Expired in 2012", "1900 Pico Blvd - Santa Monica College Parking & Pool (1989)", "Expired in 2014", "As explained in the compliance reports submitted to Council in 2010-2015, there are also five very early Development Agreements:", "\u00b7 Lincoln Property/Phase II of the Ocean Park Redevelopment Area", "\u00b7 1426 California Avenue", "\u00b7 2823-2825 Santa Monica Boulevard", "\u00b7 1040 4th Street (Dorchester)", "\u00b7 701 Santa Monica Boulevard", "In general, these early Development Agreements required certain street improvements and, in some cases, the payment of fees. For example, the Agreement for 701 Santa Monica Boulevard required the payment of an Arts and Social Service Fee and an In-Lieu Housing Fee. Such fee obligations were satisfied when the projects were completed. Thus, compliance and monitoring have not, in general, been an issue.", "The Dorchester, which was one of the City\u2019s earliest efforts to create affordable housing, is the only project in the City that includes affordable units that are condominiums, instead of apartments. The model proved to be problematic in several ways. There were problems with recordation and notification of the affordability requirement. Some of the unit owners purchased intending to live there themselves or house a family member. Many purchased with arguably insufficient notice of the restrictions. Most had no experience in property management, much less the management and financing of a lone affordable unit. For the Housing Division\u2019s monitoring period in 2015 of the fifteen units, ten of the owners filed compliance reports pursuant to the Development Agreement. Four of the unaccounted units are part of settlement agreements with the City, and the matter of the remaining unit has been referred to the City Attorney\u2019s office.", "Discussion", "As noted above, as a result of staff\u2019s review of all 31 Development Agreements subject to compliance reporting, 18 of the 19 constructed projects have been determined to be in good faith compliance. This report summarizes all Agreements where annual compliance reports have been submitted for the current review period, and provides a brief status update on the projects under construction, those properties where construction has not yet commenced, and the one property that is still under staff review. Once City review is completed for this remaining property, a recommendation regarding the status of compliance will be provided to Council during the second quarter of 2016.", "Attachment \u201cA\u201d to this report also provides a summary of TDM program measures that have been incorporated in newly-approved or amended Development Agreements since 2010 in conjunction with the City\u2019s Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE) implementation.", "Recommend Finding of Good Faith Compliance: Completed Projects", "Colorado Place I & II (Colorado Center)", "2500 Broadway and 2501 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 10/27/1981", "Expires: 9/15/2036", "Amended: 4/1984; 7/1984; 5/1985; 12/1987; 6/2011", "Reporting Period: 10/27/2014 to 10/27/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The project was approved for approximately 900,000 SF of office uses along with a daycare center, park, health club, food services and community rooms. Building heights range from 65\u2019 to 80\u2019. On-site parking structures currently contain 3,085 parking spaces.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Child care center (Hill \u2018N Dale)", "\u00b7 Public park with tennis courts, children\u2019s play structure, basketball court, and public gathering space", "\u00b7 51 units of affordable housing located off-site which per an agreement between the City Housing Authority and the County, are monitored by the County and a contribution of $2,652,909 to the City\u2019s Affordable Housing fund", "\u00b7 Community rooms open to the public and available free of charge for community & neighborhood groups", "\u00b7 Nearly $3 million worth of art and social service benefits through Park & Community room maintenance", "\u00b7 TDM Program (enhanced by Amendment No. 5)", "\u00b7 Off-site traffic signal, street lighting, and turn lane improvements", "Status of Compliance", "The required annual compliance report for Colorado Center was received from Equity Office on October 27, 2015. The property owner is in good faith compliance with all Development Agreement fee payments and community benefits associated with requirements in effect during the October 2014 to October 2015 reporting period.", "The property owner has undertaken the enhanced Transportation Demand Management Program that was approved by Council on June 28, 2011 as a requirement of the Fifth Amendment to the Development Agreement that permits leasing of up to 1,035 parking spaces to off-site parties. Some of these measures include implementing a Transportation Management Association that serves all employers on site, establishing baseline Average Vehicle Ridership data for the entire site by conducting transit surveys and collecting data from both large and small employers, creating a transit/rideshare information center and website, and increasing on-site bicycle parking. The Fifth Amendment identifies a 1.5 Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) target for both the a.m. and p.m. peak periods starting in November 2013.", "The amended Colorado Center Development Agreement specifies that the 1.5 AVR during the peak-periods is a target, rather than a requirement. Per the amended Development Agreement, the owner\u2019s inability to achieve the AVR target for the peak periods shall not constitute a default within the meaning of the Agreement, provided that the owner is taking all reasonable and feasible steps to meet these targets, including implementing additional transportation demand management measures designed to achieve these stipulated AVR targets.", "Colorado Center management collects survey data for both large and small employers to determine its site-wide average vehicle ridership during the a.m. and p.m. peak periods. This expanded survey effort includes employers with more than 50 employees, as well as employers with fewer than 50 employees; the latter are not currently required to perform employee trip surveys per the City\u2019s Trip Reduction Ordinance.", "The combined survey data for all Colorado Center employers in September 2015 yielded a 1.27 AVR during the a.m. peak period and a 1.26 AVR during the p.m. peak period. Though the site has not yet reached its AVR targets, and these results reflect a decline over the data collected from the 2014 reporting period, a number of new measures were implemented over the past year. Efforts to increase average vehicle ridership for all employees at Colorado Center during the past year centered on implementation of additional TDM measures required by the City starting in early 2015.", "Colorado Center significantly expanded its \u201cEvolve Your Commute\u201d marketing plan to all tenants to promote alternative modes of transportation and car/vanpools to and from the property. The marketing plan reaches small and large tenants with weekly, monthly, and quarterly communications via newsletter, website, and social media. The topics include rideshare promotional events, bike-to-work and other commute challenges, and trip planning assistance and coordination. Colorado Center\u2019s Transportation Coordinator works with CommuteSM (Ride Amigos) and VRide to assist tenants and employees in forming new vanpools and in filling vacant seats in existing vans with Water Garden, a neighboring commercial property.", "In summer 2015, Colorado Center launched its own Zagster Bikeshare Program for free use by all Colorado Center tenant employees. Equity Office also contracts with Zipcar and provides two car-share vehicles and parking on site for use by both members of the public Colorado Center tenants.", "To address this year\u2019s survey results, staff met with Equity Office on December 16, 2015 to discuss new single-occupancy vehicle trip reduction measures to implement at Colorado Center during the next reporting cycle. In order to achieve the property\u2019s AVR targets, additional incentives and trip reduction measures are necessary. These measures build on Equity Office\u2019s 2015 plan improvements and focus on the following:", "\u00b7 Increase number of rideshare/bicycle/commuter events and challenges hosted by Colorado Center for all tenants", "\u00b7 Purchase, install, and maintain real-time transit arrival/departure information screens", "\u00b7 Continue outreach with individual tenants\u2019 transportation coordinators and contacts and join the Citywide Transportation Management Organization when formed later this year", "\u00b7 Develop, in consultation with City staff, a comprehensive transit information packet and outreach plan specifically for new tenants as vacant office spaces are leased at Colorado Center", "\u00b7 Host Expo Light Rail information/outreach meetings for tenants with a Metro representative in conjunction with the Expo Light Rail line opening", "Equity Office will be required to update and expand its TDM plan by the end of February 2016, subject to approval by the Planning Director. Implementation will begin immediately thereafter through Colorado Center\u2019s site-wide Transportation Management Association and Transportation Coordinator. City staff will continue its bimonthly discussions with Equity Office to monitor TDM plan implementation over the next calendar year.", "In accordance with the Fifth Amendment, the property owner held its sixth annual community meeting on September 16, 2015 to discuss Development Agreement compliance with residents in the vicinity of the project site. Ten members of the public attended. The ownership will continue to collaborate with Santa Monica Mid-City Neighbors on annual community events that may be hosted at the property. Mid-City Neighbors worked with Equity Office and held its second annual Make Music Day at the Colorado Center park on June 21, 2015.", "Paseo Del Mar", "1541 Ocean Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 1/26/1982", "Expires: 10/1/2031", "Reporting Period: 1/26/2015 to 1/26/2016", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The project consists of approximately 54,000 SF in two buildings ranging in height from 28 to 36 feet. Uses include restaurant, office, retail, and 10 units of low, median, and moderate income housing. The subterranean parking garage contains 72 spaces.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 10 deed-restricted affordable housing units at a prime oceanfront location", "\u00b7 $75,000 Art and Social Service fee or in-kind provision of art on-site", "\u00b7 Parking, Carpool, and Transit Incentive Program", "Status of Compliance", "The required annual compliance report was received by Planning staff with additional annual documentation provided to the Housing and Economic Development Department as part of its work performed to confirm compliance with inclusionary housing obligations. Both Planning and Housing Division staff reviewed the information for the 2015 reporting period and verified that the property owner is in good faith compliance with Agreement requirements, including affordable housing obligations.", "National Medical Enterprise (Viacom)", "2700 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 4/16/1982", "Expires: 4/16/2037", "Amended: 1/1987; 4/1987; 5/1988", "Reporting Period: 4/16/2014 to 4/16/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The project consists of a five-story, 312,000 square foot building with creative offices. The site also contains a child care center, a public park, and a 1,000 space subterranean parking garage.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Provision of 30 affordable rental units, later amended to require the payment of a $1,500,000 in lieu fee", "\u00b7 On-site child care center", "\u00b7 Payment of $25,000 to Santa Monica Arts Foundation", "\u00b7 Park of approximately 7,200 square feet to be open to the public during reasonable hours", "Status of Compliance", "The required annual compliance report was received in April 2015. Staff has verified compliance with all Development Agreement requirements for the 2014-2015 reporting period. In addition, the child care facility has continued their outreach efforts by hosting an open house for tenant employees to ensure the facility continues to provide child care programming that meets the needs of children of employees who work at the project site. Accordingly, staff\u2019s review of the Agreement indicates that the property is in good faith compliance with all requirements.", "Bayview CA Unlimited Partnership (Le Meridien Delfina Hotel)", "530 Pico Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: 6/29/1983", "Expires: 12/1/2022", "Reporting period: 6/29/2014 to 6/29/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "This Agreement allowed for the 72,400 square foot expansion of an existing Holiday Inn hotel. The development included the addition of 134 hotel rooms and 282 parking spaces. The hotel is currently operated by the Le Meridien Delfina.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Hiring priority to Ocean Park and Pico neighborhood residents, and then to other City residents", "\u00b7 Job Training Program, with priority given to Santa Monica High School Students and City residents (requirement expired in 2011)", "\u00b7 Hotel Room Voucher Program (requirement expired in 1996)", "\u00b7 Free Hotel Parking with sign denoting this in parking area", "\u00b7 Valet parking tipping prohibition with sign denoting this in parking area", "\u00b7 Relocation of on-site, rent-controlled apartment buildings (five of these units were subsequently converted through the TORCA process)", "\u00b7 $50,000 annual contribution to the Big Blue Bus for the Tide Shuttle operation (expired in 2011)", "\u00b7 Six rent controlled units added to the existing building at 1920 6th Street", "\u00b7 Installation of public art piece approved by the Arts Commission", "Status of Compliance", "The required annual compliance report was received on October 23, 2015. Staff has reviewed the annual report and determined that the property owner is in good faith compliance with all reporting year requirements, including provisions addressing operational requirements, community benefits, and fees.", "During the reporting year, the hotel continued its commitment to both its Job Training Program and local employment recruitment goal through partnerships and outreach with organizations such as Santa Monica High School, Santa Monica College, the Art Institute of California (Culinary School), and the Santa Monica Chamber of Commerce. This year, Le Meridien Delfina participated in the Santa Monica College Job Fair and implemented its own colleague referral program by providing incentives to current employees for referring new employees who are Santa Monica residents. There are currently a total of eleven Santa Monica residents employed by the hotel (as of Fall 2015) compared to eight employees as noted in the 2013 Council report.", "Arboretum - Previously Colorado Place III (AO Santa Monica)", "2000-2200 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 12/16/1987", "Expires: 1/1/2042", "Amended: 12/1988; 2/1995", "Reporting Period: 12/16/2014 to 12/16/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "This Development Agreement involves the construction of Phase III of Colorado Place, a 12.7 acre parcel located on Colorado Avenue. The Agreement initially allowed for the construction of 1,040,490 square feet of floor area, with a Floor Area Ratio of 1.85, and allowed 25,000 square feet of restaurant space, 10,000 square feet of retail, 35,000 square feet medical office, 20,000 square feet for banks, up to 720,490 square feet for commercial office space, a 270,000 square foot hotel, and 60,000 square feet for a health club. However, subsequent modifications to the Development Agreement removed the hotel as a permitted use, and allowed for a general market/grocery use (not to exceed 50,000 square feet), and multi-family residential development that includes 97 affordable units.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 TDM Program/Traffic Emission Abatement Program", "\u00b7 $721,318 Housing Parks Mitigation Fee", "\u00b7 $5,000,000 Traffic Improvement Fee", "\u00b7 On-site art installation", "\u00b7 $250,000 child care contribution", "Status of Compliance", "The property owner\u2019s annual compliance report was submitted on December 2, 2015. After reviewing Agreement terms and all of the supporting documentation provided to the City, staff has determined that the Arboretum is in good faith compliance with Development Agreement fee payments, remaining community benefits, and operational requirements. Housing and Economic Development Department staff monitors the property\u2019s compliance with affordable housing requirements and confirmed that the property is in compliance with its inclusionary housing obligations.", "Water Garden", "1620 26th Street and 2425 Olympic Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: 3/23/1988", "Expires: 3/23/2043", "Reporting Period: 3/23/2014 to 3/23/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The project was constructed in two phases and consists of four, six-story buildings, totaling approximately 1,259,577 SF. The development contains commercial office, medical office, retail space, restaurants, health club, child care facility, and subterranean parking for 4,035 vehicles. The development also includes an open space area and man-made lake.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $3,811,307 Housing and Parks Mitigation Fee payment", "\u00b7 On-site child care facility for 54 children", "\u00b7 $6,408,486 Traffic Improvement Fee payment", "\u00b7 Annual preferential Parking District fee payment to cover permit and district administration costs", "\u00b7 $150,000 fee payment to the Santa Monica Arts Foundation", "\u00b7 $300,000 fee payment to the City for homeless services", "Status of Compliance", "After reviewing Agreement terms and all supporting documentation provided to the City on September 28, 2015, staff has determined that the Water Garden is in compliance with all Agreement fee payments, community benefits, and operational requirements.", "On November 17, 2014, the Architectural Review Board (ARB) approved plans to update and modernize the property grounds and sign program for the existing office building complex. The proposal included a reduction in the size of the existing water feature and redesign of the exterior space to improve the property\u2019s park-like setting and provide more connection to the adjacent 26th Street/Bergamot Expo Light Rail Station. The ARB approved new landscape plans, hardscape and paving, exterior lighting, open air pavilions, amenity and recreation areas, reconfigured pedestrian drop-off zone, and an updated sign program for the office complex. All work was confirmed to be in good faith compliance with Development Agreement requirements. These site improvements are currently under construction.", "Maguire Thomas", "1733 Ocean Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 10/18/1990", "Expires: 10/18/2045", "Amended: 12/1995", "Reporting Period: 07/01/2014 to 07/01/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Agreement for the property at 1733 Ocean Avenue authorizes construction of a four-story, 56 foot tall commercial development. It allows for a 68,040 square foot building, including a maximum 5,983 square foot/250 seat restaurant and a maximum of 8,040 square feet of retail space. Three levels of subterranean parking provide 267 parking spaces.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $250,000 contribution to the Civic Center/Oceanfront Improvement Special Fund", "\u00b7 $403,399 Housing and Parks Impact Mitigation Fee", "\u00b7 $820,854 Affordable Lodging Mitigation Fee", "Status of Compliance", "City staff received the annual Development Agreement Monitoring Report from the property owner on September 9, 2015.  Based on staff\u2019s review of the Agreement and a staff site visit, the property is in good faith compliance with the provisions of its Development Agreement.", "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center", "1328 22nd Street / 2121 Santa Monica Blvd", "Agreement Effective: 7/9/1998", "Amended: 7/12/2011", "Expires: 7/9/2053", "Reporting Period: 1/1/2014 to 12/31/2014", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "Project Summary: Phase One", "As amended in July 2011, the Saint John\u2019s Health Center Development Agreement grants approval for construction of new hospital facilities that would occur in two phases. Phase One consists of vested rights, subject to extension, for the construction of a new 475,000 square foot hospital and was completed by the end of the Phase One vesting period on January 31, 2014:", "\u00b7 Below-grade central plant", "\u00b7 Inpatient Center (205,000 SF & maximum height of 75 feet)", "\u00b7 Outpatient and Diagnostic & Treatment Center (265,000 SF & maximum height of 58 feet) with ambulance entrance and North Lawn", "\u00b7 Provide on- and off-site parking to meet peak facility demand and construct an Entry Plaza on Santa Monica Boulevard", "Project Summary: Phase Two", "Phase Two has a 17-year vested rights term until July 2015, subject to extension and requirements for timely submittal of certain applications to maintain vested rights beyond the July 2015 term, to implement a Phase Two South Campus health center master plan with sufficient floor area for health care-related uses and parking as outlined in the Agreement. Consistent with Development Agreement requirements, applications for a South Campus Master Plan and Development Review Permits for associated buildings were timely submitted prior to the Phase Two vesting deadline in July 2015 as outlined below:", "\u00b7 Up to 799,000 SF of Phase Two development authorized by the original Development Agreement approved in July 1998", "o Up to 396,500 SF on South Campus and 402,500 SF on North Campus", "\u00b7 All Phase Two buildings on the north and south campuses require City review and approval of Development Review (DR) Permit Applications", "\u00b7 CEQA environmental review is required for Phase Two development", "\u00b7 South Campus Master Plan Application filed on 2/5/2015", "o Process: Review by Planning Commission or Council on appeal", "\u00b7 DR Permit Applications for eight Phase Two buildings filed on 3/31/2015", "o Process: Review by Planning Commission or Council on appeal", "\u00b7 Development Agreement Amendment Application filed on 3/31/2015", "o Process: Review by Planning Commission; Council approval required", "\u00a7 Request to amend Development Agreement: Allow more time to obtain building permits for each of the eight Phase Two buildings; modify existing entry plaza design in response to staff comments to improve Phase Two vehicle circulation", "\u00a7 Proposed time frames to obtain building permits would be established with the DR Permits for each of the eight buildings", "\u00a7 Requested time frames range from 21 months to 233 months following approval of the associated South Campus Master Plan and DR Permits", "Phase Two Process", "\u00b7 First applicant-hosted community meeting held on July 30, 2015", "\u00b7 Planning Commission and City Council \u2019float-up\u2019 review for proposed Development Agreement Amendments", "o Phasing and requested time to pull building permits (21-233 months)", "o Community benefits negotiations", "o Circulation concepts - new streets and alignment, parking", "\u00b7 CEQA Environmental Impact Report (EIR) preparation", "\u00b7 Public hearings at Planning Commission and City Council after Draft EIR is prepared for Development Agreement Amendment, Phase Two South Campus Master Plan, and associated DR Permits", "Phase One Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 2014 Community Benefit Program and Annual Plan: Program to support the health and well-being of Santa Monica residents and community; the annual plan summarizes benefits provided and economic valuation.", "2014 calendar year: Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center (PSJHC) provided services and cash support equal to $11,873,016 in 2014 plus an additional $38,444,645 in unreimbursed Medicare costs.", "Based on the 2014 community benefit data self-reported from non-profit Catholic hospitals throughout the state to California\u2019s Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, the five-year average dollar value of community benefits provided by these facilities was $40,805,734.", "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center reported a five-year average of $44,663,564, a value that exceeds the five-year average value of benefits provided by other non-profit Catholic general acute hospitals that self-reported data to OSHPD by approximately 9.3%.", "In addition to the five-year average data provided, the calendar year 2014 value of benefits provided by the Health Center was $50,320,680.", "\u00b7 2014 Santa Monica Community Access Plan: A component of the annual Community Benefit Program requiring the following health service activities:", "o In-kind and cash support to local non-profit agencies that service Santa Monica residents and to the Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District", "o Charitable medical and mental health services provided to patients that are clients of and directly referred by local non-profit organizations", "o Charitable medical and mental health services provided to patients that are students and directly referred by the School District", "o Free community services available to the general Santa Monica community that promote health education and preventative health services.", "Annual minimum level of support: $732,000 dollar value subject to 1.5% compounded annual adjustment ($928,897 required for calendar year 2014).", "Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center provided health services valued at $5,876,605 during calendar year 2014 through its Santa Monica Community Access Plan, an amount that is over six-times greater than its annual requirement for 2014.", "\u00b7 Child Care Program: Non-therapeutic child care for 47 children provided, including 21 infant and toddler spaces.", "\u00b7 North Lawn: 41,000 SF public open space, including landscaping and walkways.", "\u00b7 Off-site public works improvements: payment of $641,000 in fees to the City to construct sidewalks, curbs, streetlights, and street paving in the project area; payment made in July 1998.", "\u00b7 Transportation Demand Management Program: enhanced by First Amendment.", "\u00b7 Light rail shuttle: 15-month requirement to operate shuttle to/from Memorial Park light rail station starting within six months of the Expo light rail opening (required by First Amendment) unless duplicative public transit service is provided by the City.", "\u00b7 Off-site transit improvements: $100,000 contribution for Memorial Park light rail station upgrades paid to the City in December 2012 (required by First Amendment).", "\u00b7 Neighborhood protection measures: eleven requirements including establishing a community Ombudsperson, providing a reduced valet rate for parking 90 minutes or less, and payment of $30,000 for installation of a crosswalk at 21st Street/Arizona Avenue and payment of $15,000 for a pedestrian safety study (required by First Amendment; both amounts paid to the City in Spring 2013; City installation of the crosswalk anticipated during first quarter 2016).", "Status of Compliance", "Providence Health and Services (Providence) assumed full sponsorship of Saint John\u2019s Health Center from the Sisters of Charity of Leavenworth in early 2014. Providence is now the sole sponsor of the Saint John\u2019s Health Center (renamed Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center), the John Wayne Cancer Institute, and all clinics and centers associated with the Health Center. City staff worked with Providence during its due diligence process and sponsorship transition to review the requirements of the Development Agreement and provide a detailed overview of the key issues and community concerns that were associated with Phase One development and the First Amendment. City staff also reviewed Phase Two procedural requirements with Providence. With respect to compliance with Development Agreement terms for the January 1, 2014 to December 31, 2014 review period, the annual compliance report was received from PSJHC on July 1, 2015.", "Phase One Completion", "The new Health Center Entry Plaza on Santa Monica Boulevard opened to the public in October 2013 with ancillary repaving and signage installation in and nearby the Entry Plaza completed in January 2014.", "Annual Community Meeting", "The hospital held its annual community meeting to discuss Development Agreement compliance on June 29, 2015. The Health Center\u2019s Community Ombudsperson provided the City with a summary of the issues and questions discussed at the meeting, the annual Ombudsperson record of calls/correspondence from community members, and a summary of the Health Center\u2019s responses to those inquiries.", "Transportation Demand Management", "With respect to compliance with vehicle trip reduction measures, staff has verified that Saint John\u2019s Health Center is implementing its TDM program in accordance with Agreement terms, including the additional measures and incentives required by the First Amendment in 2011 and by City staff in 2014 and 2015. The First Amendment identifies a 1.5 Average Vehicle Ridership (AVR) standard for both the a.m. and p.m. peak periods starting in November 2013. Non-achievement of the AVR standard does not constitute a default within the meaning of the Development Agreement so long as the Health Center is taking all feasible steps to achieve compliance, including implementing additional transportation demand management measures designed to achieve the 1.5 peak-period AVR standards.", "In 2015 the Health Center was required to implement a series of additional measures and incentives to increase the effectiveness of its TDM program which, in conjunction with existing TDM measures, were designed to achieve the AVR standard established by the amended Agreement. Over the past year, City staff has worked with PSJHC on a bimonthly basis to discuss TDM plan enhancements and review implementation status. Prior to the Health Center\u2019s May 2015 AVR survey, the following additional trip-reduction incentives were implemented subject to City staff approval:", "\u00b7 Six month free paid vanpool lease for all newly formed vanpools", "\u00b7 Free 13 Ride Pass for Big Blue Bus for all new employees (regardless of their commute method)", "\u00b7 Enrollment in Metro Rewards Program to all employees who qualify", "\u00b7 Quarterly Rideshare \u201cSpotlight on Green Commuting Superstar\u201d article highlighting a caregiver who uses alternative transportation and their commuting experience", "\u00b7 New bike racks at the north side of the Health Center", "Following the Health Center\u2019s May 2015 AVR survey, expanded TDM Plan measures were also implemented, subject to City staff approval:", "\u00b7 100% free vanpool for all caregivers outside 15-mile radius. Increased internal marketing provided for this enhanced incentive", "\u00b7 Increased financial incentive to $3/day for all employees reporting they use a non-single-occupancy-vehicle (SOV) mode as their primary commute method", "\u00b7 The PSJHC Green Commute marketing plan to Health Center employees was redesigned and improved to feature the new incentives", "\u00b7 A 90-day trial for all new employees to receive $3/day financial incentive to use non-SOV mode even if they have not committed to non-SOV mode as their primary commute method", "\u00b7 Hosted a self-defense class that discussed safety as potential barrier to walking, biking, public transportation use; this class will also be held in spring 2016", "\u00b7 Bike maintenance education workshop was held on December 17, 2015", "In Fall 2015, the PSJHC Transportation Coordinator submitted to the City its annual AVR survey results with and without South Coast Air Quality Management District (AQMD) off-peak hour trip credits used in the AVR calculation. The term \u2018off-peak hour trips\u2019 refers to those employee arrival/departure trips that occurred outside of the a.m. and p.m. peak hours:", "\u00b7 1.34 AVR during the a.m. peak period and 1.36 AVR during the p.m. peak period", "\u00b7 1.45 AVR during the a.m. peak period and 1.48 AVR during the p.m. peak period with off-peak hour trip credits", "In either case, the Health Center\u2019s survey results do not meet the 1.5 AVR goal for the peak periods, despite the facility implementing new TDM measures in 2014 and 2015, its recognition in May 2014 as a Metro Diamond Award recipient for Outstanding Rideshare Leadership for 2013-2014, and no significant work shift changes for Health Center employees.", "City staff, PSJHC Administration, and its Transportation Coordinator reviewed in detail the survey results, methodology, and aggregate employee shift data and identified employee response errors that may have affected the Health Center\u2019s overall AVR calculation. Based on this review, due to the non-traditional schedules worked by many Health Center employees, survey response errors appear to have affected the peak-hour AVR calculations during the last reporting cycle.", "More specifically, the Health Center\u2019s compressed work schedules for nurses and other employees have proven to be difficult to record accurately in the AQMD survey format applicable to large employers (250+ employees) as it is structured for traditional office-type employee schedules. For example, during the five-day survey period in May 2015, there was an average of 107 employees each day working a compressed work week schedule, however, on any day, only 8-17 employees reported their shift accurately.", "While this evaluation of the Health Center\u2019s data collection and reporting procedures does not change the results of its 2015 AVR survey, it does provide context for the AVR calculations in light of the Health Center\u2019s on-going efforts to improve its Transportation Demand Management Plan and reduce single-occupancy vehicle trips associated with Health Center employees.", "The City has had a series of meetings with Health Center Administration to formulate the additional TDM Plan measures that will be necessary, building on the enhanced plan adopted as part of the First Amendment, and the measures implemented last year. Most recently on December 15, 2015, City staff and the Health Center also discussed its plan to reevaluate its AVR survey methodology and employee education plan to ensure that the next AVR survey results more accurately reflect typical, weekday employee travel and work shift patterns at the Health Center.", "To date, City staff and the Health Center have identified the following additional measures for implementation in 2016. Some of these additional measures and obligations have been under discussion since Spring 2015 to ensure the financial incentives, operational requirements, and information are in place for the opening of the Expo Light Rail later this year, and are incorporated in the Health Center\u2019s annual budget cycle:", "\u00b7 Execute Service Agreement with Big Blue Bus (BBB)", "o PSJHC to pay for Big Blue Bus public transit service enhancements from the Memorial Park Expo Light Rail Station to PSJHC with 15-minute frequency of service and an estimated six-minute travel time that matches Health Center peak employee shift times.", "o Routes 41 and 42 would be adjusted to travel between the corner of Santa Monica Boulevard and 20th Street and the station entrance at 17th Street and Colorado Avenue, stopping only one time in between the Health Center and the station, at or near the corner of Broadway and 20th Streets.", "o PSJHC to pay for Big Blue Bus Transit Pass Program for all Health Center employees and contract employees with unlimited BBB use.", "o This Service Agreement is in lieu PSJHC\u2019s 15-month employee shuttle requirement between the Memorial Park Expo Light Rail Station and the Health Center; it provides transit service enhancements available to the broader community and establishes the BBB transit pass program for all Health Center employees.", "\u00b7 Continued participation and leadership role in Santa Monica Transportation Management Association (TMA) formation. PSJHC recently participated in the City\u2019s selection committee for the consultant team that will form and staff the Citywide TMA.", "\u00b7 Provide direct outreach to all Health Center employees who request a RideGuide guide and who live in Santa Monica zip codes offering personal assistance to set up alternative transportation.", "\u00b7 Provide $35,000 for Transportation Management Association formation, as required by the First Amendment.", "The Health Center\u2019s TDM plan modification will be finalized by end of February 2016 and is subject to approval by the Planning Director. Staff will require PSJHC to implement the new measures before the Health Center\u2019s annual employee AVR survey in May.", "Parking Obligations", "The Health Center provided its annual Parking Management Plan in February 2015. Staff has reviewed the documentation and periodically monitored changes in the Health Center\u2019s overall parking supply during the reporting year. Based on this review, City staff determined that the facility\u2019s effective parking supply of approximately 1,350 spaces in February 2015 and 1,265 spaces as of June 2015 is sufficient to meet the 1,060-space peak parking demand for the Health Center.", "The parking demand summary provided in the February 2015 Walker Report is consistent with the Health Center\u2019s previous annual submittal which estimated a peak parking demand of approximately 1,126 spaces. The current data is also consistent with the parking demand assessments previously submitted during the years 2008-2013 which includes the time-period following the 2009 completion of the In-Patient Suites and Diagnostic and Treatment Center on the North Campus. The City also requires a minimum of 948 spaces that are either owned or deemed functionally-equivalent leased spaces, per the amended Agreement, which are provided.", "Therefore, in accordance with Section 2.2 of the First Amendment, PSJHC has met its requirement to provide sufficient parking to meet the peak parking demand of its various user groups and has met its requirement to provide parking that is functionally-equivalent to the originally approved North Subterranean Parking Structure.", "Summary of Compliance", "In summary, staff has reviewed the amended Development Agreement, all of the supporting documentation provided to the City for the January 1, 2014 to December 31, 2014 reporting year, including current 2015 AVR data. Accordingly, staff has determined that Providence Saint John\u2019s Health Center is in good faith compliance with the terms and conditions of its Development Agreement, including its annual and ongoing Community Benefit Program and Santa Monica Community Access Program obligations, and Phase One construction obligations and fee payments for neighborhood protection measures approved with the First Amendment in 2011.", "Rand Corporation", "1776 Main Street", "Agreement Effective: 11/23/2000", "Expires: 11/23/2055", "Reporting Period: 11/23/2014 to 11/23/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Rand Corporation Agreement involved the demolition and remediation of the existing buildings on the 3.7 acre project site located at 1776 Main Street and the construction of a 308,869 SF headquarters for Rand Corporation. The new five-story, 69\u2019 tall building houses research-related facilities, management, staff cafeteria, fitness room, and meeting/conference rooms. Parking is provided in a four-level, 825-space subterranean parking garage.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Land dedication and construction of Vicente Terrace", "\u00b7 Land dedication for Main Street Circle should this be constructed", "\u00b7 TDM Program implementation", "\u00b7 Policy Analysis Partnership on Childhood Development and Education including pursuing research funding for early childhood development", "\u00b7 Early Childhood Development Research, including organizing conferences and maintaining a child policy website", "\u00b7 $500,000 contribution to Early Childhood Development Programs/Early Child care Education in the Civic Center", "Status of Compliance", "The required annual compliance report was received by staff in November 2015. The required annual compliance report was received in November 2015. Based on staff\u2019s review of Rand\u2019s Development Agreement, including the ongoing compliance with their Transportation Demand Management Program and activities relating to early childhood programs, the project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with all requirements.", "Lantana East", "3030 Olympic Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: 10/28/2004", "Expires: 10/28/2024", "Amended: 08/2008", "Reporting Period: 10/28/2014 to 10/28/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "Lantana East consists of a 3-story, 64,105 SF building with entertainment production/post-production studio space and 433 subterranean and surface parking spaces.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $356,200 joint use improvement fee for capital improvements to Edison Language Academy, plus $35,600 paid annually for five years (requirement shared with Lantana South)", "\u00b7 $266,650 child care contribution", "\u00b7 $90,000 arts contribution", "\u00b7 New public restrooms at Stewart Park", "\u00b7 Construction of neighborhood traffic protection & off-site roadway improvements", "Status of Compliance", "The annual Development Agreement Compliance Report was submitted in August 2015 for the 2014-2015 reporting year. Based on staff\u2019s review of the Agreement, the project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with all Development Agreement fee payments, community benefits, and operational requirements. The Santa Monica Malibu Unified School District (\u201cSchool District\u201d) approved construction of a new school facility and associated playground area for the Edison Language Academy.  The Joint Use Improvement Fees collected from the Lantana East and Lantana South Development Agreements funds a small portion of the School District\u2019s overall capital cost for the school campus improvements and outdoor areas that are utilized, in part, through the Playground Partnership with the City where by the City may use School District facilities for outdoor activity programs. A total of $356,200 for capital costs and $178,000 for a program operating subsidy was required as a shared obligation between the Lantana East and Lantana South Development Agreements. These payments were made to the City per the amended Agreement and the School District anticipates that the Edison Language Academy playground improvements will be completed and in use by January 2016.", "Lantana South", "3131 Exposition Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: 10/28/2004", "Expires: 10/28/2024", "Amended: 8/2008", "Reporting Period: 10/28/2014 to 10/28/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "Lantana South consists of a 3-story, 130,000 SF building for entertainment production/post-production studio space with a total of 456 subterranean and surface parking spaces.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $356,200 joint use improvement fee for capital improvements to Edison Language Academy, plus $35,600 paid annually for five years (requirement shared with Lantana East)", "\u00b7 $133,350 child care contribution", "\u00b7 $60,000 arts fee", "\u00b7 Off-site roadway improvements", "Status of Compliance", "The annual Development Agreement Compliance Report was submitted in November 2015 for the 2014-2015 reporting year. Based on staff\u2019s review of the Agreement, the project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with all Development Agreement fee payments, community benefits, and operational requirements.", "The Village", "1725 Ocean Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 5/27/2008", "Expires: 12/31/2028", "Reporting Period: 10/1/2014 to 10/1/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Village development provides six residential buildings with approximately 324 residences, and approximately 20,000 square feet of commercial retail on three separate development sites. The following summarizes key project components:", "Site A:", "\u00b7 Two condominium buildings, with ground floor retail on Ocean Avenue", "\u00b7 Olympic Drive and Main Street frontages with approximately 66 residences", "\u00b7 Maximum 65\u2019 building height", "\u00b7 109,346 gross square feet (GSF) of residential and 9,930 GSF of retail uses", "\u00b7 180 parking spaces", "Site B:", "\u00b7 Four affordable apartment buildings with ground-floor live/work space", "\u00b7 Approximately 28 one-bedroom, 56 two-bedroom, and 66 three-bedroom units", "\u00b7 10 affordable units of live/work space intended for artists", "\u00b7 Maximum 60\u2019 building height", "\u00b7 191,549 GSF", "\u00b7 197 parking spaces", "Site C:", "\u00b7 One condominium building (96\u2019 height) with ground floor retail", "\u00b7 Approximately 98 one-bedroom and 98 two-bedroom residences", "\u00b7 159,288 GSF of residential and 7,400 GSF of retail uses", "\u00b7 237 parking spaces", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 160 affordable units, including 10 units of live/work space intended for artists", "\u00b7 LEED Silver certified buildings", "\u00b7 Completion of the Olympic Drive Extension, including signalization at the intersections of Olympic Drive with Main Street and with Ocean Avenue, with new sidewalks and landscaping", "\u00b7 $500,000 toward design, construction, operation and/or maintenance of a Civic Center Child Care Facility prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy for project buildings", "\u00b7 $700,000 Transit Service Enhancement Fund payable in two installments prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy for project buildings", "\u00b7 Provide two public art pieces on site, valued at approximately $920,000 with a minimum value of $460,000 for the art work itself and pay an in-lieu Private Developer Cultural Arts contribution for a portion of the site\u2019s square footage prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy", "Status of Compliance", "The Village project completed construction in late 2014. Based on staff\u2019s review of the Agreement and the owner\u2019s annual report, the project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with Agreement requirements. Examples of these requirements include public infrastructure improvements, payment of the Transit, Cultural Arts, and Child care contributions outlined above, and operational requirements such as allocating 50% of the retail square footage to neighborhood-serving uses and providing a minimum of two spaces on site for a carshare service available to the public.", "Saint Monica\u2019s Catholic Community", "725 California Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 5/27/2010", "Expires: 5/27/2030", "Reporting Period: 5/27/2014 to 5/27/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Saint Monica\u2019s Catholic Community Development Agreement consists of construction of a single-phase Campus enhancement and parking improvement plan on St. Monica's property. The project includes the following key components:", "\u00b7 Demolition of existing Pastoral Center", "\u00b7 Construction of a new Community Center (27,500 SF) with three levels of subterranean parking (154 parking spaces)", "\u00b7 Construction of a 7,700 SF addition to the High School East building", "\u00b7 Renovation of the existing auditorium, gymnasium and other facilities", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 TDM Program for students, employees, and parishioners", "\u00b7 Shared parking allowing neighborhood use of 15 parking spaces located at the off-site surface parking lot at 1140 7th Street during off-peak hours", "\u00b7 Availability of a community meeting space to city departments, community groups, and nonprofit organizations", "\u00b7 Public use of the Bookstore/Coffee Bar during all operating hours", "Status of Compliance", "Pursuant to the Development Agreement, St. Monica\u2019s plans for interior renovations to the gymnasium, and interior/minor exterior improvements to the Trepp Center located on-site are currently being reviewed by the City, with anticipated construction commencing in 2016. St. Monica\u2019s Catholic Community is in good faith compliance with Development Agreement requirements for the 2014-2015 reporting year.", "1548 6th Street", "Agreement Effective: November 22, 2012", "Expires: November 22, 2022", "Reporting Period: 11/22/2014 to 11/22/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The 1548 6th Street Development Agreement was approved by Council on October 23, 2012 and authorizes the conversion of 3,038 square feet of non-usable space into four residential units within an existing mix-use, market-rate rental housing project.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 One one-bedroom deed-restricted very low income unit", "\u00b7 TDM Plan with measures that include a 1.75 AVR by the second year after Certificate of Occupancy issuance", "\u00b7 $75,000 contribution towards transit and circulation infrastructure in the Downtown area prior to issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy", "\u00b7 Residential tenant bicycle repair station and bicycle racks", "Status of Compliance", "Construction for this project is completed. A Minor Amendment to the Development Agreement was approved on February 14, 2014, to reduce the number of publicly-accessible bicycle racks from 28 to 24. The bicycle racks and required residential tenant bicycle repair station have been installed. The final inspection on the building permit was completed on September 24, 2014. Compliance has been verified for the requirement to provide one one-bedroom deed-restricted, very-low income residential unit and the applicant has paid the $75,000 contribution towards transit and circulation infrastructure in the Downtown area.", "Arclight Cinemas at Santa Monica Place", "315 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: May 23, 2014", "Expires: May 23, 2034", "Reporting Period: 5/23/2014 to 5/23/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Arclight Cinemas at Santa Monica Place project consists of conversion of approximately 50,000 square feet of existing entitled, vacant retail space on the third level of the Bloomingdale\u2019s building located on the property into a multi-screen movie theater complex with up to 13 screens, up to 1500 seats (including stadium-style seating), related ticketing, lobby and concession space. The approved project does not include new floor area. The project includes bar/caf\u00e9/retail space and/or a lounge area each with food and beverage service, including alcoholic beverages. Alternatively, the lounge area could be used for additional theater space or theater concession areas, depending upon the needs of the theater operator. To accommodate the theater, the existing roof of the Bloomingdale\u2019s building was raised by up to approximately 36 feet, from a current height of 48 feet, to up to approximately 84 feet above existing grade. The project was approved by Council in April 2014.", "Project and Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $140,820 Colorado Esplanade Contribution for design and physical improvements", "\u00b7 $100,000 Downtown Wayfinding Metro Grant project Contribution", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Gold certification per the LEED Rating System", "\u00b7 Theater Operator to make up to three movie screens available to the American Film Market during its annual film festival", "\u00b7 Local Hiring Provision: job fair targeted toward recruitment of local residents for theater services employment", "\u00b7 Transportation Demand Management Program including a 2.0 AVR target commencing one year after opening theater to public (or 1.75 AVR until the Fourth Street Station for the Exposition Light Rail Line is fully operational), and transit subsidies", "Status of Compliance", "The Arclight Cinemas Project completed construction and opened to the public in November 2015. All community benefits and construction-related requirements have been met.  The Colorado Esplanade contributions ($140,820) and wayfinding program contribution ($100,000) were paid to the City as stipulated by the Agreement and prior to commencement of construction. The required wayfinding signs in Santa Monica Place to direct members of the public to areas outside Santa Monica Place, including Santa Monica Pier and the Third Street Promenade were installed prior to opening the theater in November.", "Arclight submitted its required local hiring plan to the Director of Planning in August 2015. This plan was approved and Arclight implemented its outreach and on-site job fair targeted towards recruitment of local resident candidates for employment at the theater. Based on staff\u2019s review of the Agreement, the project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with its Development Agreement requirements.", "702 Arizona Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 12/8/2011", "Expires: 12/8/2021", "Reporting Period: 12/8/2013 to 12/8/2014", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Development Agreement for 702 Arizona Avenue authorizes construction of a new, four-story mixed-use building with approximately 6,276 SF of neighborhood-serving commercial space on the ground floor, 49 residential units on the upper floors, and two levels of subterranean parking.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 TDM Program that includes secure bicycle storage for residents, employees, and visitors", "\u00b7 $50,000 contribution towards transit infrastructure in the Downtown area", "\u00b7 Infrastructure for potential future installation of electric vehicle charging stations", "\u00b7 Achievement of a minimum LEED Silver certification or a demonstrated equivalent sustainable design status", "\u00b7 Local hiring program", "\u00b7 Urban design features including a small pedestrian courtyard and walkway", "Status of Compliance", "Project construction completed during the last reporting period and residential and commercial occupancy of the building has begun with one of the two ground floor commercial spaces occupied to date. The annual compliance report was submitted for the property on December 2, 2015. Transit ($50,000), Cultural Arts ($66,030), and Child care ($5,873.12) contributions were paid to the City in August 2012. Some of the community benefits that have been provided during the last reporting period include the following:", "\u00b7 Transportation information center is located in the lobby of the leasing office, and transportation information welcome packets are provided to all new residents", "\u00b7 On-site transportation coordinator is located on site", "\u00b7 Residents are charged for unbundled parking on site", "\u00b7 Transit passes are offered to employees and residents in lieu of parking", "\u00b7 Secure bicycle storage and shower and locker facilities are provided on site", "\u00b7 Property owner has been marketing the residential component of the project to Downtown employers as well as employers throughout the City to encourage those that work in the area to consider residing in the project", "\u00b7 AVR requirement of 1.75 is required for the employees of the commercial tenant spaces by the third year after the issuance of the Certificate of Occupancy for the project", "Based on staff\u2019s review of the property, the 702 Arizona Avenue project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with its Development Agreement requirements.", "1317 7th Street", "Agreement Effective: 12/8/2011", "Expires: 12/8/2021", "Reporting Period: 12/8/2014 to 12/8/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "This Development Agreement authorizes construction of a new, five-story mixed-use building with approximately 2,929 SF of neighborhood-serving commercial space on the ground floor, 57 residential units, and two levels of subterranean parking.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 One extra on-site affordable housing unit", "\u00b7 TDM Program with secure bicycle storage for residents, employees, and visitors", "\u00b7 $50,000 contribution towards transit infrastructure in the Downtown area", "\u00b7 Infrastructure for potential future installation of electric vehicle charging stations", "\u00b7 Achievement of a minimum LEED Silver certification or a demonstrated equivalent sustainable design status", "\u00b7 Local hiring program", "\u00b7 Urban design features including a small pedestrian courtyard and walkway", "Status of Compliance", "Project construction completed during the last reporting period. The property owner is operating in good faith compliance with Agreement. Requirements including Transit ($50,000), Cultural Arts ($77,524), and Child care ($6,807.48) contributions were paid to the City in August 2012. The following are some of the community benefits that have been provided during the last reporting period:", "\u00b7 Transportation information center is located in the lobby of the leasing office, and transportation information welcome packets are provided to all new residents", "\u00b7 On-site transportation coordinator is located on site", "\u00b7 Residents are charged for unbundled parking on site", "\u00b7 Transit passes are offered to employees and residents in lieu of parking", "\u00b7 Secure bicycle storage and shower and locker facilities are provided on site", "\u00b7 Property owner has been marketing the residential component of the project to Downtown employers as well as employers throughout the City to encourage those that work in the area to consider residing in the project", "\u00b7 AVR requirement of 1.75 is required for the employees of the commercial tenant spaces by the third year after the issuance of the Certificate of Occupancy for the project", "Based on staff\u2019s review of the property, the 1317 7th Street project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with its Development Agreement requirements.", "Crossroads School", "1731 20th Street", "Agreement Effective: August 8, 2013", "Expires: August 8, 2033", "Reporting Period: 8/8/2014 to 8/8/2015", "Good Faith Compliance Confirmed", "The Crossroads School Science Learning Center project permits development of a new three-story (41\u2019), 23,856 SF science learning center and temporary modular classrooms and 50 bicycle parking spaces. The project was approved on June 25, 2013.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Development of an educational facility that provides enhanced educational opportunities for students", "\u00b7 Bicycle Path Easement Agreement with for establishing a public bicycle path", "\u00b7 Photovoltaic Panels and Photovoltaic Panel-Ready Roof", "\u00b7 Pico Neighborhood Outreach and Prioritization for Summer Program", "Status of Compliance", "Project construction recently completed for the beginning of the 2015-2016 school year. The school operated in full compliance with Agreement requirements for project\u2019s construction phase. The required annual compliance report was received from Crossroads School on November 18, 2015. The property owner is in good faith compliance with Development Agreement requirements. The following are some of the community benefits that have been provided during the last reporting period:", "\u00b7 Representatives from Crossroads admissions and summer programs held informational sessions in February 2015 at the Pico Youth and Family Center and in September 2015 at Virginia Avenue Park for Pico neighborhood residents", "\u00b7 Crossroads continues to prioritize residents of the Pico neighborhood for both enrollment and financial aid and offers some free enrollment for Pico neighborhood residents to classes that are not fully enrolled", "\u00b7 Employees and students are required to pay for parking, and employees who ride a bike, walk, or take public transit to Crossroads receive financial and other incentives (bus passes, TAP cards, gift certificates, etc.)", "\u00b7 Crossroads maintains a full time employee transportation coordinator and transportation information center", "Crossroads School is meeting with City staff to review its TDM Plan and implement additional measures to achieve its AVR goal of 1.6 for both a.m. and p.m. peak periods. Their latest report indicates an a.m. AVR of 1.54 and p.m. AVR of 1.5. City staff is currently working with Crossroads on these revisions to their plan and anticipates approving the TDM plan revision by the end of February.", "Completed Projects - Recommendation on Compliance Pending", "Agensys", "1800 Stewart Street", "Agreement Effective: 10/28/2010", "Expiration: at termination of ground lease", "Reporting Period: 10/28/2014 to 10/28/2015", "Recommendation on Compliance Pending Completion of Staff Review", "The Agensys Agreement permits a project including the following key components:", "\u00b7 24,625 square feet for administration offices and entry lobby", "\u00b7 45,590 square feet for manufacturing of new cancer treatments", "\u00b7 72,050 square feet for research and development", "\u00b7 11,390 square feet of meeting rooms, employee amenities including a cafeteria open to the public during lunchtime hours", "\u00b7 5,140 square-feet of publicly accessible open space", "\u00b7 Publicly-accessible pedestrian path to allow access to the Bergamot Station site and future Expo Line light rail station", "\u00b7 Surface parking for 200-220 cars", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Publicly-accessible pedestrian path", "\u00b7 Publicly-accessible passive open space along Stewart Street", "\u00b7 Widened sidewalk along Stewart Street", "\u00b7 Caf\u00e9 open to pedestrians during limited daytime hours", "\u00b7 TDM Program geared to the project site\u2019s location within a \u201cHigher Goal\u201d District designated by the Land Use and Circulation Element (LUCE)", "\u00b7 Sculpture garden with up to 10 sculptures adjacent to the pedestrian path", "\u00b7 Local hiring program including a job fair and a local hiring policy", "\u00b7 Student internship program", "\u00b7 Student tours", "\u00b7 Signage and way-finding system", "\u00b7 Shared parking for events at Bergamot Station", "\u00b7 Continued community outreach", "\u00b7 Transit contribution toward improved transit infrastructure focused on bicycle access at the light rail station", "Status of Compliance", "Construction for the Agensys project began in Spring 2011 and was completed in January 2013. Staff received the facility\u2019s annual compliance report on December 2, 2015. All of the site community benefits such as the pedestrian path linking Bergamot Station to Stewart Street, the Sculpture Garden, Pedestrian Caf\u00e9 (LIME), public open space, and widened sidewalk were complete with the construction of the project site.", "Operational community benefits such as a local hiring program; internship program for Santa Monica College students or Santa Monica residents; Santa Monica-Malibu Unified School District student tours; providing shared parking for special events at Bergamot Station; and continuing community outreach are on-going benefits. Agensys is in good faith compliance with these Agreement requirements. Financial payments of $70,350 for the project\u2019s required Bergamot Station Transit Infrastructure Contribution and $20,000 for bicycle access improvements in the area were verified in January 2014.", "In contrast to other development agreements where AVR rates are structured as targets or goals, the Agensys Development Agreement specifies that Agensys\u2019 initial employee average vehicle ridership requirement shall be 1.6 until such time that the Expo light rail is operational. More specifically, Agensys is required to achieve a 1.6 AVR rate for the a.m. and p.m. peak-hour periods (6:00 a.m. to 10:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m. to 7:00 p.m., respectively). This is due to the project site\u2019s location within a \u201chigher goal\u201d LUCE District for achieving vehicle trip reduction.", "The Agensys Agreement also provides that in the event the applicable AVR requirement is not reached in any annual Employee Trip Reduction Plan (ETRP), Agensys shall propose modifications to the TDM program to achieve the AVR requirements by the next ETRP submittal. This issue of non-compliance with the AVR requirement was also reported on during the last compliance review cycle for 2014. As a result, staff met with Agensys in March 2015 to review the additional TDM measures required to achieve the AVR requirement.", "The annual Emission Reduction Plan submitted by Agensys to the City in September 2015, in accordance with the City\u2019s Employee Trip Reduction Ordinance (SMMC Chapter 9.53), contains the numeric AVR calculation for the last reporting period and indicates that the property complies with the 1.6 AVR requirement. However, the City disagrees with the methodology used for Agensys\u2019 2015 AVR survey and consequently the validity of the survey results. This disagreement is being addressed in accordance with the procedures established in SMMC Chapter 9.53 for employer monitoring, enforcement, and administrative appeals. Staff is also working with Agensys to clarify how several of its TDM Plan requirements have been implemented. Therefore, determination of Agensys\u2019 compliance with all Development Agreement requirements is still under City review pending the outcome of the SMMC Chapter 9.53 process. Staff anticipates providing a report to Council on the status of compliance for the property during the second quarter of 2016.", "Projects Under Construction", "1318 2nd Street", "Agreement Effective: July 25, 2013", "Expires: July 25, 2023", "Reporting Period: 7/25/2013 to 7/25/2014", "Project Under Construction", "The 1318 2nd Street project consists of a four-story (45\u2019) and 46,421 SF mixed-use development with 6,664 SF of commercial space; 53 residential units, 6,664 SF of retail space, 66 subterranean parking spaces, and 132 bicycle parking spaces. The project was approved by Council on June 25, 2013.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $125,493 Transportation Infrastructure contribution", "\u00b7 $125,000 Colorado Esplanade contribution", "\u00b7 $225,000 Open Space contribution", "\u00b7 $25,000 Big Blue Bus contribution", "\u00b7 $25,000 Historic Preservation contribution", "\u00b7 TDM Plan that exceed Zoning Ordinance requirements", "\u00b7 24 Solar panels", "\u00b7 Five electric vehicle charging stations", "\u00b7 Local Hiring Provision to facilitate the hiring of local workers during construction and for permanent commercial employees", "Status of Compliance", "Building permits for the project were issued in October 2014. Required Development Agreement contributions towards Historic Preservation ($25,000), Transportation Infrastructure ($125,493), Colorado Esplanade $125,000, Big Blue Bus $25,000, and Open Space ($225,000) were paid to the City prior to building permit issuance. Building completion is anticipated for Summer 2016. The project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with Development Agreement requirements, including construction-period monitoring such as construction mitigation and local hiring (construction employees), at this current phase of the development.", "Courtyard by Marriott Hotel", "1554 5th Street", "Agreement Effective: December 26, 2013", "Expires: December 26, 2038", "Project Under Construction", "The Courtyard by Marriot Hotel project consists of development of a new six-story, 78,750 SF hotel with 136 guest-rooms, and 78 subterranean parking spaces. The project was approved by Council on November 26, 2013.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Permanent Historic Commemorative Installation on the property in a publicly accessible location", "\u00b7 Artistic Exhibition Program for the purpose of showcasing different forms of art in periodic exhibitions at the hotel, including art sourced from professional galleries, local artists, and Santa Monica students", "\u00b7 Community access to on-site meeting space", "\u00b7 Physical space dedicated for a future bicycle sharing program station", "\u00b7 $294,000 Colorado Esplanade contribution", "\u00b7 $50,000 Hospitality Training Academy contribution", "\u00b7 $75,000 Historic Preservation contribution", "\u00b7 Fourth Court Alley Improvement contribution (or if not implemented, contribution would become a Parks & Recreation/Open Space contribution of $210,000)", "\u00b7 Affordable Housing contribution of $21,000", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Gold certification as established by the LEED Rating System", "\u00b7 Solar energy systems including photovoltaic solar panels", "\u00b7 One electric vehicle charging station and seven stub-outs for charging stations", "\u00b7 Minimum 30% water reduction for the hotel\u2019s total water use", "\u00b7 Local Hiring provision: internship program, job fair, and 40% hiring goal", "\u00b7 TDM Program including a 2.0 AVR target, bicycle parking, bicycle rentals, car-share spaces, transit subsidies, etc.", "\u00b7 Physical Improvements consisting of expanded sidewalks", "\u00b7 Shared parking provision", "Status of Compliance", "The demolition permit for this project was issued in September 2014, with overall building permit issuance in March 2015. The project is currently under construction. Required contributions towards Historic Preservation, Colorado Esplanade, Fourth Court Alley Improvements, Affordable Housing Linkage, and the Hospitality Training Academy were provided to the City prior to building permit issuance.", "The Director of Planning issued a minor modification in February 2015 during plan check review to allow a 47% compact parking percentage whereas a maximum of 40% is required by the Development Agreement due to placement of required structural columns within the subterranean garage levels, and to reduce the driveway openings into a single curb cut, resulting in a reduction of the overall driveway width along 5th Street.", "The developer presented the project\u2019s Historic Commemorative Installation to the Santa Monica Landmarks Commission in December 2015 as a courtesy review to invite comments and suggestions on the proposed installation. Building completion is anticipated for Summer 2016. The project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with Development Agreement requirements, including construction-period monitoring such as construction mitigation and local hiring (construction employees), at this current phase of the development.", "Hampton Inn & Suites Hotel", "501 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: December 26, 2013", "Expires: October 31, 2035", "Project Under Construction", "The Hampton Inn & Suites Hotel project consists of development of a new six-story, 78,750 SF hotel with 143 guest rooms, and 78 subterranean parking spaces. The project was approved by Council on November 26, 2013.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $294,000 Colorado Esplanade contribution", "\u00b7 $50,000 Hospitality Training Academy contribution", "\u00b7 $25,000 Historic Preservation contribution", "\u00b7 $69,343 Transportation Impact contribution", "\u00b7 $196,657 Parks & Recreation/Open Space contribution", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Gold certification as established by the LEED Rating system", "\u00b7 Solar energy systems including photovoltaic solar panels", "\u00b7 One electric vehicle charging station and seven stub-outs for charging stations", "\u00b7 Minimum 30% water reduction for the hotel\u2019s total water use", "\u00b7 Artistic Exhibition Program showcasing different forms of art in periodic exhibitions at the hotel, including art sourced from professional galleries, local artists, and Santa Monica students", "\u00b7 Community access to on-site meeting space", "\u00b7 Local hiring provision: internship program, job fair, and 40% hiring goal", "\u00b7 TDM Program including a 2.0 AVR target, bicycle parking, bicycle rentals, car-share spaces, transit subsidies, etc.", "\u00b7 Physical Improvements consisting of expanded sidewalks", "\u00b7 Shared parking provision", "Status of Compliance", "The demolition permit for this project was issued in September 2014, with overall building permit issuance in September 2015. The project is currently under construction. Required contributions towards Historic Preservation, Colorado Esplanade, Transportation Infrastructure, Parks and Recreation, and the Hospitality Training Academy were provided to the City prior to building permit issuance. Building completion is anticipated for Summer 2016. The project has been determined to be in good faith compliance with Development Agreement requirements, including construction-period monitoring such as construction mitigation and local hiring (construction employees), at this current phase of the development.", "Colorado Creative Studios", "2834 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: 9/22/2011", "Expires: 9/22/2026", "Project Under Construction", "This Development Agreement authorizes the construction of a four-story, 191,982 square foot mixed-use creative arts/entertainment production building over a three-level subterranean parking garage with up to 640 parking spaces. The site includes landscaping and seating areas and the building also features ground floor neighborhood serving uses.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Dedicated 62-foot wide surface easement for the extension of Pennsylvania Avenue and construction of roadway, curb, and gutters", "\u00b7 Contribution to Expo station enhancement at Bergamot of approximately $363,000", "\u00b7 Widened sidewalks along Stewart Street to enhance the pedestrian environment", "\u00b7 Community caf\u00e9", "\u00b7 Internships to Santa Monica College students or Santa Monica residents", "\u00b7 Shared parking program", "\u00b7 TDM Program implementation", "\u00b7 Local hiring program for construction-related jobs", "Status of Compliance", "A building permit for the project was issued on July 1, 2015 and it is currently under construction. Compliance with the construction-related requirements of the Development Agreement are ongoing and will be continually monitored by the Building & Safety Division, Public Works Department, and City Planning Division throughout the duration of construction. The payment of the contribution to the Expo station enhancement at Bergamot is required prior to the issuance of a Certificate of Occupancy.", "MINI Automobile Dealership", "1402 Santa Monica Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: August 22, 2014", "Expires: August 22, 2024", "Project Under Construction", "The project at 1402 Santa Monica Boulevard consists of the construction of a 33,400 square foot, 35-foot tall automobile (MINI) dealership that would include a 6,144 square-foot sales floor and offices, 507 square-foot caf\u00e9, 21 service bays, and 135 parking spaces within an enclosed surface parking area and a two-level subterranean parking garage The project was approved by Council on July 22, 2014.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 $20,000 Historic Preservation contribution", "\u00b7 $189,424.74 Transportation Infrastructure contribution", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Platinum certification as established by the LEED Rating system", "\u00b7 Photovoltaic solar panels", "\u00b7 Two electric vehicle charging stations and two conduits for charging stations", "\u00b7 Local hiring provision", "\u00b7 Internship program", "\u00b7 TDM Program including a 1.6 AVR target (1.75 AVR with Memorial Park Station fully operational for at least one year), bicycle parking, employee transportation allowance and parking cash out, free on-site shared bicycles for employees, etc.", "\u00b7 Caf\u00e9 at corner of the project site open to the public during hours no less than 8:30 a.m. to 4:00 p.m., Monday through Saturday, with a minimum of 10 seats", "Status of Compliance", "The project is currently under construction with completion anticipated by 2017. The property owner is operating in good faith compliance with Agreement requirements for the project\u2019s construction phase. Examples of these requirements include work in progress for compliance with sustainable design requirements; implementation of local hiring program goals; and work performed in compliance with the required construction mitigation plan. Transportation Infrastructure contribution ($189,424.74) and Historic Preservation contribution ($20,000) were paid prior to the issuance of a building permit in September 2015.", "Update on Projects Not Under Construction", "401 Broadway", "Agreement Effective: February 9, 2012", "Expires: February 9, 2022", "Amended: October 22, 2013", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "This Development Agreement was approved by Council on January 10, 2012 and authorizes construction of a new, five-story mixed-use development project consisting of 56 residential units and 4,159 SF of ground floor commercial space. An amendment to the Development Agreement was approved on October 22, 2013 to permit 49 subterranean parking spaces accessed by a car elevator and minor modifications to the ground floor plan.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 TDM plan with measures applicable to both the commercial and residential components of the project", "\u00b7 $125,000 contribution for transit/circulation infrastructure in the Downtown area", "\u00b7 Ground floor arcade providing additional space for pedestrians at the street", "\u00b7 One on-site affordable housing unit exceeding the minimum five units required", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Silver certification per the LEED Rating System or a demonstrated equivalent sustainable design status", "\u00b7 Roof-mounted photovoltaic solar panels", "\u00b7 Local hiring provision to facilitate the employment of local workers during construction", "Status of Compliance", "The 401 Broadway project has not advanced to issuance of a building permit, therefore, community benefits have yet to be realized and there are no compliance issues to report. An Administrative Approval and Architectural Review Board approvals were issued for a 7,500 SF commercial building in 2015. This commercial building is currently in plan check review and is not associated with the approved Development Agreement.", "710 Wilshire Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: May 10, 2012", "Expires: May 10, 2022", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "This Development Agreement was approved by Council on April 10, 2012 and authorizes adaptive re-use of a six-story Landmark building located at 710 Wilshire Boulevard for a new hotel with 55 rooms and 6,950 SF of ground floor retail/restaurant space. The project also includes construction of new six-story hotel building on site with 230 rooms; 8,700 SF of ground floor retail/restaurant; a ground floor, open-air paseo; and up to 325 subterranean parking spaces. The project also includes a living wage provision, including health benefits, for covered hotel workers.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Preservation and rehabilitation of a City Landmark building", "\u00b7 TDM Program that includes a 1.75 AVR target for employees of the project achieved by the third year after the City\u2019s issuance of a certificate of occupancy, bicycle parking for employees and guests, shared bicycles for guest use, and transit subsidies for employees", "\u00b7 $244,000 transportation infrastructure fee", "\u00b7 Bicycle sharing area", "\u00b7 Electric vehicle infrastructure in parking garage for 30 electric vehicles", "\u00b7 Provide meeting space for non-profits and community organizations on a reduced cost basis at least 12 times a year", "\u00b7 Paid internship program for at least two Santa Monica residents who attend Santa Monica High School or Santa Monica College", "\u00b7 Local hiring for permanent and construction employees", "Status of Compliance", "The 710 Wilshire Boulevard project foundation-only permit issued for foundation and subterranean garage only last year. The $244,000 Transportation Infrastructure fee paid on September 15, 2015 as a prerequisite to issuance of permit for foundation permit. The applicant indicates that there have been no job openings related to the foundation-only permit (shoring and excavation). Morley is the contractor for the main construction but their contract has not been executed yet pending outcome of design review process.", "The project design was reviewed by the Joint Design Review Body (JDRB), a single-purpose body created by the development agreement and consisting of members from the Architectural Review Board and Landmarks Commission. The property owner\u2019s appeal of the JDRB\u2019s denial of the ARB application for the new hotel building was heard by Council on December 8, 2015. The appeal was denied and a revised design and new ARB application will need to be filed for future review by the Joint Design Review Body.", "2930 Colorado Avenue", "Agreement Effective: May 9, 2013", "Expires: May 9, 2023", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "The 2930 Colorado Avenue project consists of an approximately 341,290 SF total Mixed-use development with approximately 24,940 SF of commercial space, 377 residential units, including 38 affordable units, and 705 subterranean parking spaces. The project was approved on April 9, 2013.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Two new streets (Pennsylvania Avenue and New Road) that will be dedicated to the City as surface easements", "\u00b7 $1,650,000 Transportation Infrastructure Fee", "\u00b7 $179,000 contribution to trust fund to be used for child care subsidies for low income families (includes voluntary assignment of required child care linkage fee)", "\u00b7 $350,000 contribution to trust fund to be used for services for seniors, disabled persons, and families with minor children with priority given to entities who are providing services to Village Trailer Park residents", "\u00b7 Approximately 27,000 SF of general public open space including expanded sidewalks for outdoor dining and gathering on Colorado Avenue, smaller on-site plazas, pedestrian pathways, and green space at the intersection of New Road and Pennsylvania Avenue", "\u00b7 Approximately 15,000 SF of residential public open space including pedestrian pathways and courtyards", "\u00b7 Local hiring program for construction", "\u00b7 Local hiring program for permanent employment for commercial uses greater than 1,500 SF", "Status of Compliance", "The project is currently in plan check review for subterranean concrete work and the first floor slab. The required $350,000 contribution for Senior and Disabled Services was paid on May 12, 2015. The funds were disbursed as part of the Community Cultural Services Department - Human Services Division grant cycle. These funds will be distributed over the next four years to the following agencies:", "\u00b7 Meals on Wheels West - More than a Meal: Home Delivered Meals", "\u00b7 OPCC - Interim Housing and Wellness Program", "\u00b7 Westside Center for Independent Living - Independent Living Services", "\u00b7 WISE & Healthy Aging - Care Management", "\u00b7 Federal Transit Administration - New Freedom Program (Cash Match)", "\u00b7 Human Services Division - Senior Housing Task Force", "1112-1122 Pico Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: December 26, 2014", "Expires: December 26, 2024", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "The 1112-1122 Pico Boulevard project consists of construction of a 32,088 square-foot, 45-foot-tall residential building consisting of 32 two-bedroom rental units and a two-level subterranean parking garage with 64 parking spaces, Four of the residential units are deed-restricted as affordable for occupancy by 50% Income Households and 11 additional units are price-restricted. The project was approved by Council on November 25, 2014.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 Four residential units deed-restricted as affordable for occupancy by 50% Income Households", "\u00b7 11 price-regulated residential units", "\u00b7 $77,453.55 Transportation Infrastructure contribution", "\u00b7 $149,980.50 Parks and Open Space contribution", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Platinum certification as established by the LEED Rating system", "\u00b7 Photovoltaic solar panels", "\u00b7 Two electric vehicle conduits for charging stations", "\u00b7 Local hiring provision", "\u00b7 TDM Program including a 2.0 AVR target, carshare parking space, long- and short-term bicycle storage/parking, bicycle rentals, two free on-site shared bicycles for resident and visitor use, car-share spaces, transit subsidies, etc.", "\u00b7 Physical Improvements consisting of expanded sidewalks", "\u00b7 Shared parking provision", "Status of Compliance", "The project has not advanced to issuance of a building permit, therefore, community benefits have yet to be realized and there are no compliance issues to report.", "1415 5th Street", "Agreement Effective: November 27, 2015", "Expires: November 27, 2018", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "The 1415 5th Street project mixed-use project involving construction of a six-story (84 feet) building consisting of approximately 52,545 total square feet: 6,345 square-feet of ground floor commercial space, 64 residential units, and 105 parking spaces within a three-level subterranean parking garage. The project was approved by Council on October 13, 2015.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 14 deed-restricted affordable units", "\u00b7 Minimum LEED Platinum certification as established by the LEED Rating System", "\u00b7 Water conservation requirement fifty percent (50%) below the CALGreen (Title 24) baseline for exterior water use and landscaping, and (ii) 30% below the CALGreen (Title 24) baseline for interior building water use", "\u00b7 Energy conservation designed to use and shall achieve 15% less energy than required by the California Energy Code", "\u00b7 TDM Program including a Transformation Information Center, employee secure bicycle storage, employee showers and locker facilities, short-term bicycle parking, unbundled parking, AVR target of 2.2, parking cash out and 100% transportation allowance", "\u00b7 $20,000 Transportation Management Association contribution", "\u00b7 $40,000 Big Blue Bus contribution", "\u00b7 $90,000 Enhanced Transportation Impact Fee", "\u00b7 $280,000 Enhanced Parks and Recreation Fee", "\u00b7 $100,000 Early Childhood Initiatives contribution", "\u00b7 $50,000 Historic Preservation contribution", "\u00b7 $300,000 Water Conservation Program contribution", "\u00b7 Local hiring provision", "\u00b7 Shared parking provision", "\u00b7 Local preference marketing plan", "Status of Compliance", "The project has not advanced to issuance of a building permit, therefore, community benefits have yet to be realized and there are no compliance issues to report.", "1560 Lincoln Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: November 27, 2015", "Expires: November 27, 2018", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "The 1560 Lincoln Boulevard project was approved by Council on October 13, 2015 for a new five-story, 102,500 square-foot mixed-use project consisting of 100 residential units, 13,800 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 232 parking spaces within a three-level subterranean parking garage. It is anticipated that Architectural Review Board consideration of the building\u2019s design, colors, and materials will occur later this year.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7 20% On-Site affordable housing: 20 residential units", "o 50% income households: 10 one-bedroom units & 5 two-bedroom units", "o 80% income households: 5 two-bedroom units", "\u00b7 Enhanced impact fees", "o Transportation Impact Fee: $750,000", "o Parks and Recreation Fee: $745,000", "o Affordable Housing Commercial Linkage Fee: $175,000", "\u00b7 Early Childhood Initiatives contribution: $150,000", "\u00b7 Historic Preservation contribution: $50,000", "\u00b7 Big Blue Bus contribution: $80,000", "\u00b7 Transportation Management Association contribution: $50,000", "\u00b7 Transportation Demand Management Plan including a 2.2 AVR target, short and long-term bike parking, and a 100% transportation allowance", "\u00b7 Sustainability elements", "o LEED\u00ae for Homes Platinum Certification", "o Solar panels", "o 15% less energy than required by California Energy Code", "o Interior building water usage 30% below CALGreen baseline standards", "o Non-potable water for landscape irrigation and exterior water usage of 50% below CALGreen baseline standards", "o Water Conservation contribution of $300,000", "\u00b7 Bioswale infiltration system that would capture, treat, and infiltrate stormwater along Lincoln Bouevard", "\u00b7 Electric vehicle parking", "\u00b7 Shared parking for City use: 20 parking spaces", "\u00b7 Community meeting space", "\u00b7 Local hiring program", "Status of Compliance", "The project has not advanced to issuance of a building permit, therefore, community benefits have yet to be realized and there are no compliance issues to report.", "1601 Lincoln Boulevard", "Agreement Effective: February 12, 2016", "Expires: February 12, 2019", "Compliance Not Required at this Time", "The 1601 Lincoln Boulevard project was reviewed by Council on December 8, 2015 and the project was approved on second reading of the ordinance on January 12, 2016. The project consists of a new five-story, 77,758 square-foot mixed-use project consisting of 90 residential units, 10,617 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 168 parking spaces within a two-level subterranean parking garage. It is anticipated that Architectural Review Board consideration of the building\u2019s design, colors, and materials will occur later this year.", "Community Benefits Summary", "\u00b7  21% On-Site affordable housing: 19 residential units", "o 50% income households: 11 one-bedroom units, 2 two-bedroom units, and 1 three-bedroom unit", "o 80% income households: 2 one-bedroom units & 2 two-bedroom units", "o Moderate income households: 1 studio unit", "\u00b7  Enhanced Impact Fees", "o Transportation Impact Fee: $820,000", "o Parks and Recreation Fee: $600,000", "o Affordable Housing Commercial Linkage Fee: $175,000", "\u00b7  Early Childhood Initiatives contribution: $150,000", "\u00b7  Historic Preservation contribution: $50,000", "\u00b7  Big Blue Bus contribution: $80,000", "\u00b7  Transportation Management Association contribution: $50,000", "\u00b7 Transportation Demand Management Plan including a 2.2 AVR target, short and long-term bike parking, and a 100% transportation allowance", "\u00b7  Sustainability elements", "o LEED\u00ae for Homes Platinum Certification", "o Solar panels", "o 15% less energy than required by California Energy Code", "o Interior building water usage 30% below CALGreen baseline standards", "o Non-potable water for landscape irrigation and exterior water usage of 50% below CALGreen baseline standards", "o Water Conservation contribution of $300,000", "\u00b7  Electric vehicle parking for 20% of the parking spaces (i.e. 34 spaces)", "\u00b7  Shared parking for City use: 15 parking spaces", "\u00b7  Local hiring program", "Status of Compliance", "The project has not advanced to issuance of a building permit, therefore, community benefits have yet to be realized and there are no compliance issues to report.", "Public Outreach", "The Municipal Code requires that that the City provide at least 10 days\u2019 notice to the Developer or successor-in-interest of the City Council\u2019s scheduled meeting to review Development Agreement compliance. This notice has been provided.", "Next Steps", "Staff will provide an update to Council at a future meeting during the second quarter of 2016 to make a recommendation regarding the status of Development Agreement compliance for the property still under City review. Staff will continue its ongoing Development Agreement compliance review; reports will be made to Council annually in January.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one annual vacancy on the Clean Beaches Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee for a term ending on 12/31/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Vazquez, Mayor Pro Tem Winterer, and Councilmember McKeown that Council direct staff to explore an ordinance denying new discretionary permits or entitlements on properties where ongoing violations of previous permits or conditions of entitlement remain unresolved.", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Commission on the Status of Women for a term ending on 6/30/2016.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Commission on the Status of Women for a term ending on 6/30/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]], "1515807000": [[{"Title": "Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement to Airport Avenue from Santa Monica College Bundy Campus", "Department": "Public Works, Airport Division", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a five-year Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement with Santa Monica Community College District (\u201cSMC\u201d) to allow for pedestrian ingress and egress, and continued vehicular egress from the north vehicle gate at SMC\u2019s Satellite Campus to the intersection of Donald Douglas Loop South and Airport Avenue.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The recommended five-year Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement with Santa Monica College (SMC) would allow pedestrian ingress and egress, and continued vehicular egress via an access route which would extend from the north vehicle gate at SMC\u2019s Satellite Campus (located at 3171 South Bundy Drive) to the intersection of Donald Douglas Loop South and Airport Avenue. Vehicular traffic would remain unchanged. Vehicular egress would continue to be restricted to right turns only, allowing vehicles to continue east on Airport Avenue to Bundy Drive. There would continue to be no vehicular ingress allowed from Airport Avenue onto the access route. Under the agreement, SMC would be responsible for all costs for any necessary improvements made to the property for the purpose of facilitating motor vehicle and pedestrian access.", "Background", "Since 2004, SMC has operated an independent college Satellite Campus located at 3171 South Bundy Drive in Los Angeles. The Satellite Campus property is adjacent to Santa Monica Airport\u2018s southeast boundary. On November 8, 2004, Santa Monica College released a Bundy Campus Site Access and Circulation Plan (\u201cplan\u201d) addressing long-range planning issues for the site. The plan worked to meet the needs of students who benefit from programs at the Satellite Campus, while minimizing traffic impacts on surrounding neighborhoods and on the Santa Monica Airport and Airport Park. One of the concerns noted in the plan was the ability of SMC to provide their students with access between the Satellite Campus and 2800 Airport Avenue, a City-owned property which SMC has leased since July 1, 1998 and uses as an ancillary campus facility.", "On June 14, 2005 (attachment A), Council authorized a temporary pedestrian-only access agreement that converted an existing driveway into an extension of Donald Douglas Loop South at the intersection of Airport Avenue to the North Gate of the Satellite Campus. The temporary agreement was to expire on August 1, 2005, and on July 26, 2005 (attachment B), Council approved an extension of the agreement until October 15, 2005.", "On November 8, 2005 (attachment C), Council authorized a Motor Vehicle Egress and Pedestrian License Agreement with SMC with an expiration date of July 30, 2006. The agreement allowed for pedestrian and vehicular egress from the Bundy Satellite Campus onto airport property via Donald Douglas Loop South to Airport Avenue. Vehicular traffic was restricted to right turns, only allowing vehicles to continue east on Airport Avenue to Bundy Drive to address concerns from neighborhoods west of the Airport. Additionally, SMC bore the costs for any necessary improvements to the access route.", "On July 24, 2007 (attachment D), Council authorized extension of the Motor Vehicle Egress and Pedestrian License Agreement until February 2008 with an automatic extension to August 2008 if staff determined that there had been affirmative movement on the implementation of the traffic signal proposed for the Bundy Drive entrance to the Satellite Campus by the City of Los Angeles. This agreement was extended to August 2008 and the traffic signal was installed in 2009. When SMC submitted the current plans for the access road rehabilitation project, it became necessary to execute a new agreement. This proposed agreement will provide for a new five year agreement and allow for SMC to receive the required City approvals to conduct the roadway project.", "Discussion", "The recommended Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement would continue to provide pedestrian ingress and egress via an Access Route which would extend from SMC\u2019s Satellite Campus\u2019 North Vehicle Gate to the intersection of Donald Douglas Loop South and Airport Avenue (attachment E). Vehicular egress would remain unchanged wherein vehicles would be restricted to right turns, only allowing vehicles to continue east on Airport Avenue to Bundy Drive. Vehicular ingress from Airport Avenue onto the access route would not be allowed.", "The recommended Motor Vehicle and Pedestrian Access Agreement would require that SMC be responsible for all costs necessary to facilitate motor vehicle and pedestrian access. SMC has taken the necessary steps in the preparation, planning, and design to improve the access route with new pavement and sidewalks. This access agreement is necessary to obtain the required City approvals to proceed with the construction of improvements.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action; the cost of the improvements would be borne by Santa Monica College."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for Purchase of One Compressed Natural Gas Rear Broom Street Sweeper", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4225 to Ray Gaskin Service, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of one Compressed Natural Gas Rear Broom Street Sweeper.2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Ray Gaskin Service for one Compressed Natural Gas Rear Broom Street Sweeper in an amount not to exceed $339,123.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff seeks to replace one vehicle that has reached the end of its useful life through the City\u2019s Vehicle Replacement Program. In November 2015, the City solicited bids for the purchase of one Compressed Natural Gas (CNG) Rear Broom Street Sweeper. After reviewing all bids received, staff recommends Ray Gaskin Service as the lowest and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG Rear Broom Street Sweeper based on price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing a vehicle powered by CNG fuel. The purchase would be in the amount of $339,123.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program while adhering to the Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy.  The City purchases alternatively fueled vehicles whenever possible. The goals of the Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy are to reduce emissions, reduce our use of petroleum fuels, and to make the most sustainable fuel choices available that are economically practical. This rear broom sweeper would be used to support street sweeping operations in the Resource Recovery and Recycling Division by sweeping up sand in the beach parking lots and bike paths, sweeping the alleys, and sweeping dirt and mud that is difficult for other vacuum sweepers to clean.", "Example of a CNG rear broom street sweeper", "Vendor Selection", "On October 20, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver one CNG Rear Broom Street Sweeper as required by the Street and Fleet Services Division in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 365 vendors were notified and 13 vendors downloaded the bid. A total of 3 bids were received and publicly opened on November 12, 2015 (outlined in Attachment A).", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. After reviewing the bids received, staff recommends Ray Gaskin Service as the lowest and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of one CNG rear broom street sweeper in the amount of $339,123. This purchase meets the goals of the City\u2019s Reduced-Emissions Fuels Policy by utilizing a vehicle powered by CNG fuel.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Ray Gaskin Service is for an amount not to exceed $339,123. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "Purchase of 22 Police Interceptor Utility Vehicles", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Folsom Lake Ford, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of 22 Ford Police Interceptor Utility Vehicles pursuant to Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, in an amount not to exceed $701,100.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff seeks to purchase would replace 22 Public Safety vehicles that have reached the end of their useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. Staff recommends purchasing 22 Ford Police Interceptor Utility Vehicles from Folsom Lake Ford based on the validity of the competitive contract pricing that the State of California awarded to Folsom Lake Ford the vendor in an amount not to exceed $701,100.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life based on age, mileage, and repair history in accordance with the Vehicle Replacement Program. This Program would replace 22 vehicles in the following departments: 15 in the Police Department and seven in the Fire Department.", "The 15 vehicles for the Police Department would replace existing vehicles that are used for a variety of purposes and assignments, including emergency response, routine patrol, and specialized details and assignments. The seven vehicles for the Fire Department would replace existing vehicles that are used for two Assistant Fire Marshals, one Nurse Educator, one Paramedic Coordinator, one Tactical Emergency Medical Service/SWAT Medic, and two Senior Fire Inspectors.", "The Police Department considered police-package sedans offered by Dodge, Chevrolet and Ford. All three sedans are considered mid-sized vehicles and do not offer nearly the visibility for the driver, nor the capacity to carry equipment as the Ford Police Interceptor Utility (PIU) vehicle does. The Ford Police Interceptor Utility Vehicle, which is designed based on a Ford Explorer, has been built specifically for law enforcement. Ford worked closely with representatives of the Los Angeles County Sheriff\u2019s Department and Michigan State Police to design the vehicle to meet the demanding needs of law enforcement. The PIU has been widely selected as a standard vehicle by law enforcement agencies throughout the nation due to its design, safety rating and flexibility for various assignments and purposes. Therefore, the PIU vehicle has been selected as the standard vehicle for the Santa Monica Police Department to replace the legacy Ford Crown Victoria.", "Vendor Selection", "Section 2.24.080(b) of the Santa Monica Municipal Code, Exception to Competitive Bidding, allows the City to utilize a competitive bidding process that has already been completed by Federal, State, County, City or special district government agencies, to purchase the same supplies or equipment that the other entity has already purchased under an existing bid. Staff recommends utilizing this process in this case in order to obtain the most competitive pricing, expedite vehicle purchases, and ensure that vehicle specifications match those that have already been specifically developed for and utilized by law enforcement and emergency response agencies. Many local government agencies take advantage of the pricing offered under State contracts for these reasons. Using the State\u2019s bid allows the City to obtain the most competitive price as a result of discounts afforded by vendors that have established contract pricing. If Santa Monica were to conduct its own Formal Bid, staff estimates it would take at least one year, utilizing significant staff time and resources.", "Fleet Management obtained copies of the original bidding documentation for the State award and reviewed them with the Finance Department. The documentation was compared to purchasing documentation for like vehicles purchased by other agencies to confirm that pricing was below market pricing. Staff determined that Ford Police Interceptor Utility Vehicles are available through the State of California Enforcement Vehicle Contract; contract number 1-15-23-14B, awarded to Folsom Lake Ford on June 1, 2015. The contract is valid through June 29, 2017. The validity of the competitive contract pricing that the State of California awarded to Folsom Lake Ford was verified. Fleet Management also contacted another vendor who was unable to match or beat the State contract. The State contract provides discount terms of $500 per vehicle if the invoices are processed within 20 days, which the other vendor did not offer, saving the City potentially $11,000. Staff confirmed that these vehicles would be supplied to the City at the same or better price ($701,100 total) as was obtained through competitive bid procedures of the State.", "#0", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Folsom Lake Ford is for an amount not to exceed $701,100. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200."]}, {"Title": "San Vicente Emergency Generator Project", "Department": "Public Works, Civil Engineering", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to Construction Contract No. 10020 (CCS) in the amount of $300,000 with Cora Constructors, Inc., a California-based company, to provide additional services and install a required fire suppression system. This would result in a new contract amount not to exceed $2,044,205.2. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a second modification to Professional Services Agreement #9641 in the amount of $65,000 with Lee & Ro, Inc., a California-based company, to provide additional engineering services for the San Vicente Emergency Generator Project. This would result in a new total amount not to exceed $393,500.3. Authorize the budget changes as outlined in the Financial Impacts and Budget Actions section of this report.4. Authorize the Director of Public Works to issue any necessary change orders to complete additional work within contract authority.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The San Vicente Booster Pump Station is a critical component of the City\u2019s potable water distribution system for drinking water and fire protection in the northeast part of the City. The existing diesel engine installed in the 1930\u2019s to serve as power for the pump in the event of a power outage is at the end of its service life and must be replaced by a new generator to ensure reliable water service in the event of an electrical outage and to comply with SCAQMD regulations. A new diesel-engine-driven standby generator is currently being installed. Based on recent review and discussion by Fire Department staff, the current Fire Code requires the installation of a fire suppression system. Additional construction services in the amount of $300,000 are necessary for this added scope.", "Staff recommends an amendment in the amount of $300,000 to the existing contract (Contract No. 10020) with Cora Constructors, Inc., the City\u2019s contractor for the San Vicente Emergency Generator Project, to install a fire suppression system, for a new amount not to exceed contract amount of $2,044,205. Staff also recommends modifying the professional services agreement with Lee & Ro Inc., in the amount of $65,000 for a new not to exceed amount of $393,500 so that the additional engineering design services can be provided.", "Background", "The San Vicente Booster Pump Station is a critical and necessary facility, providing potable water service to the area of the city north of Montana Avenue from 4th Street to 26th Street. Approximately five million gallons of water for this area is stored underground in the San Vicente Reservoir. This facility accounts for roughly 20% of the City\u2019s total water storage and is necessary for providing drinking water and fire protection to the community.", "The San Vicente Booster Pump Station adjacent to the reservoir is utilized to extract water from the reservoir and to pressurize the water pipelines in the area. The six booster pumps are operated by electric power supplied by Southern California Edison. Currently, in the event of a power outage, a diesel engine is utilized to operate one booster pump to maintain minimum water service in the area. The existing diesel engine installed in the 1930\u2019s is at the end of its service life and must be replaced by a new back-up emergency generator to ensure reliable water service in the event of an electrical power outage and to comply with SCAQMD regulations. The San Vicente Booster Pump Station Emergency Generator Project (Project) replaces an existing, antiquated diesel engine with a new back-up electrical power source in compliance with Southern California Air Quality Management District (SCAQMD) regulations.", "On September 11, 2012 (attachment A), Council authorized a professional services agreement with Lee & Ro, Inc. to provide design services for the Project.", "On January 27, 2015 (attachment B), Council approved Construction Contract No. 10020 (CCS) in the amount not to exceed $1,744,205 with Cora Constructors, Inc. for the Project.", "Discussion", "The current construction contract with Cora Constructors, Inc. is for the replacement of the diesel engine with a modern emergency back-up power generator to ensure the integrity and reliability of the City\u2019s water system. A new diesel-engine-driven standby generator is currently being installed to provide power to the vault, drain pump, existing booster pumps, and other appurtenant fixtures to effectively supply water to the community in the event of a power outage.", "The existing vault, built in the 1930s does not have a fire suppression system. Based on recent review and discussion by Fire Department staff, the current Fire Code requires the installation of a fire suppression system. The new fire suppression system must be integrated with the new emergency back-up power generator. Cora Contractors, Inc. is capable of performing the work and having the work performed by one contractor would enable the effective coordination and installation of both systems, eliminate delays, and avoid potential conflicts related to acceptance of final work.", "Therefore, staff recommends a modification to the existing contracts with Cora Constructors, Inc. and Lee and Ro Inc., to implement the installation of a fire suppression system. The proposed modifications would result in additional construction costs of $300,000 and engineering services of $65,000.", "The added scope includes:", "\u00b7 Fire Suppression System Engineered Plans", "\u00b7 Autopulse Control System", "\u00b7 Inergen gas filled cylinders", "\u00b7 Modules, actuators, nozzles, detectors, switches, adapters/connectors, hoses", "\u00b7 Horn/strobes, bells", "\u00b7 Battery pack", "\u00b7 Installation", "Public Outreach", "Public outreach is ongoing during construction of this project and is provided by the City\u2019s design consultant, Lee & Ro Inc. and supplemented by City staff. Public outreach includes distributing notifications to adjacent properties and the surrounding community on the scope and construction schedule of the project, potential impacts, and periodic schedule updates. In addition, weekly updates on the City\u2019s \u201cKnow Before You Go\u201d (aka KBUG) website and Monday editions of the Santa Monica Daily Press are provided. If this additional work is approved, Public Works staff would prepare an updated notice, and the contractor would distribute the notice to properties within a one block radius of the project site.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The contract modification to be awarded to Cora Constructors, Inc., is $300,000 for an amended contract total not to exceed $2,044,205. The agreement modification to be awarded to Lee & Ro, Inc. is $65,000, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $393,500. Funds for both modifications are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C250784.589000, San Vicente Emergency Generator."]}, {"Title": "Third Modification to Agreement for Independent Auditing Services for the City of Santa Monica", "Department": "Finance Department, Financial Operations", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a third modification to Professional Services Agreement #9373 in the amount of $23,800 with Macias Gini & O\u2019Connell, a California-based company, to provide additional financial auditing services. This will result in a five-year amended agreement with a new total amount not to exceed $821,081.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The City of Santa Monica engages an independent auditing firm to audit its financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and to perform agreed-upon procedures in accordance with attestation standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. In 2011, the firm of Macias, Gini and O\u2019Connell was selected through a competitive process to provide these services for up to a five-year term. Since that time, the implementation of a new standard from the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, changes made to federal grant guidelines based on modifications to the United States Code of Federal Regulations, and the formation of the Audit Subcommittee have necessitated additional services. Staff recommends modifying the agreement to include that work. This would result in a new five-year not to exceed amount of $821,081.", "Background", "The City engages an independent auditing firm to perform an examination of the City\u2019s basic financial statements, as well as the City\u2019s Big Blue Bus (BBB) Fund financial statements, the City\u2019s Air Quality Improvement Program, and the City\u2019s Schedule of Expenditures of Federal Awards (Single Audit). The Auditor also performs agreed-upon procedures to test and report on the City\u2019s GANN appropriation limit calculation. At its May 10, 2011 meeting, Council awarded a contract with Macias Gini & O\u2019Connell in a five-year amount of $675,000 to perform these services (Attachment A).", "On November 13, 2012, Council authorized a first modification to the agreement in the amount of $78,281 to perform due diligence reviews for the Successor Agency (Attachment B).", "On March 18, 2014, Council authorized a second modification to the agreement in the amount of $44,000 to perform additional services related to the implementation of new Governmental Accounting Standards Board standards, including new pension reporting standards, and to re-test the National Transit Database Agreed Upon Procedures for the BBB (Attachment C).", "Discussion", "The Governmental Accounting Standards Board (GASB) has implemented changes that affect the City\u2019s auditing and reporting process and therefore require additional work by Macias Gini & O\u2019Connell.", "GASB Statement No. 68 Accounting and Financial Reporting for Pensions \u2013 an Amendment of GASB Statement No. 27 and GASB Statement No. 71 Pension Transition for Contributions Made Subsequent to the Measurement Date - an Amendment of GASB Statement No. 68 substantially changes the accounting and financial reporting requirements for governments that provide their employees with pensions. The City participates in three plans administered by the California Public Employees\u2019 Retirement System (CalPERS): Miscellaneous, Fire and Police. While the March 18, 2014 contract modification sought to accommodate the additional time and effort that would be needed to transition to the new pension reporting standards, additional work is needed to evaluate and audit the City\u2019s procedures to confirm the accuracy of employee census data provided by CalPERS and the reasonableness of retirement assumptions used to calculate total pension liability.", "Additionally, the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) and the Council of Financial Assistance Reform (COFAR) issued a new guidance for federal grant awards in the Title 2 US Code of Federal Regulations (CFR) Part 200, Uniform Administration Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards, also known as \u201cUniform Guidance.\u201d Applicable to new federal grant funds received on or after December 26, 2014, the Uniform Guidance poses a variety of potential risks and challenges for federal grant recipients, and particularly in the rules governing the procurement and subrecipient processes. Macias, Gini & O\u2019Connell will provide a four hour interactive training session for City staff and grant subrecipients to better understand the key provisions of the Uniform Guidance and provide an implementation framework based on best practices.", "Lastly on July 28, 2015, Council established the Audit Subcommittee to provide oversight responsibilities for the financial reporting processes, the framework for internal control, and the audit process (Attachment D). Macias Gini & O\u2019Connell advised Council on best practices in the establishment of an audit subcommittee and is expected to attend the January 19, 2016 Audit Subcommittee Special Meeting to report on the audit for fiscal year ending June 30, 2015 and to provide an overview of the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR).", "The additional work outlined above would increase the five-year agreement by an amount not to exceed $23,800. The current five year contract with MGO will expire in May 2016. Staff recently issued a request for proposals for external audit work and will be returning to Council with a recommendation on contractor selection in February.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In January 2011, the City issued a Request for Proposals (RFP) for an external auditor to perform independent audit work as required by Article 15 of the City Charter. Six firms responded. Responses to the RFP were reviewed by a selection panel of staff from the Finance, Housing and Economic Development, and Community and Cultural Services Departments. Evaluation was based on consultant experience, references, work plans, project team, and cost. Staff selected MGO as the best qualified firm to provide independent audit services.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The agreement modification to be awarded to Macias Gini & O\u2019Connell is $23,800, for an amended agreement total not to exceed $821,081. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget in division 01222; the contract will be charged to account 01222.577040."]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for the Purchase of Four Bin Trucks", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4223 to Reynolds Buick, a California-based company, for the purchase and delivery of four Bin Trucks for the Resource Recovery and Recycling division of the Public Works department;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Reynolds Buick for the purchase and delivery of four Bin Trucks in an amount not to exceed $234,554.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "This purchase would replace four vehicles that have reached the end of their useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program. In November 2015, the City solicited bids for the purchase of four pickup trucks with chassis and frame with bin truck bodies. Staff recommends Reynolds Buick as the best and sole bidder for the purchase and delivery of four pickup trucks with chassis and frame with bin truck bodies in the amount of $234,554.", "Discussion", "The City replaces vehicles that have reached the end of their cost-effective useful life through the Vehicle Replacement Program.", "The pickup truck chassis and frames with bin truck bodies (bin trucks) are used to support commercial refuse and recycling collection operations. They serve as auxiliary vehicles to collections by delivering, removing and collecting commercial refuse and recycling bins that are inaccessible by larger collection vehicles. The bin trucks are able to go into hard-to-service areas behind businesses and at multifamily locations, as well as underground parking structures and pull the commercial bins out so they can be emptied by the refuse collection vehicle.", "Over the years, vehicle manufacturers have steadily increased the height, width, and length of their small-size pickup trucks, but the maximum height of many underground parking structures and maximum width of many driveways has remained the same.", "The City previously went out to bid for this size vehicle with the same 1,500 load requirement in spring of 2015. No bids received met the size specifications required for operational needs. The vendors bid larger vehicles in order to meet the bid requirement for an alternatively fueled vehicle and there are few manufacturers that have a California Air Resources Board (CARB) certification for an alternately fueled engine. Resource Recovery and Recycling received an exemption from the Director of Public Works to purchase conventionally fueled vehicles as a result of their operational needs and the unavailability of an alternatively fueled vehicle that would meet their dimension and load requirements.", "Example of a bin truck", "Vendor Selection", "On October 28, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver four bin trucks as required by the Street and Fleet Services Division in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 483 vendors were notified and 24 vendors downloaded the bid. One bid was received and publicly opened on November 20, 2015 per Attachment A. Staff conducted additional outreach to vendors who downloaded the bid to see why they did not submit a bid; three no-bid responses were received. One vendor could not meet the gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) requirement of a pickup truck chassis and frame that can legally operate up to 1,500 pound loaded containers. Another vendor could not provide the chassis and frame as specified. The third vendor had a heavy work load and could not take on the additional work even if they were awarded the bid.", "The bin trucks must be able to go into hard-to-service areas behind businesses and at multifamily locations, as well as underground parking structures. The pickup chassis and frame must be designed to legally operate up to 1,500 pound loaded containers. The overall height should be as low as possible with a 71\u201d maximum. The overall width should be as narrow as possible, but no more than 75\u201d wide, excluding mirrors, with no exceptions. The size of the vehicles as specified and as bid by Reynolds Buick can accommodate the refuse collection process by accessing very tight and small, underground structures throughout the City.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Staff recommends Reynolds Buick of West Covina as the only and best bidder for the purchase and delivery of four bin trucks in the amount of $234,554.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Reynolds Buick is for an amount not to exceed $234,554. Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget in account C540167.589200.", "#1"]}, {"Title": "Bid Award for Vehicle Rental Service for Police Department", "Department": "Public Works, Street & Fleet Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4210 to Enterprise Rent-A-Car, a Missouri-based company, for Vehicle Rental Service.2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order for the Police Department with Enterprise Rent-A-Car for Vehicle Rental Service in an amount not to exceed $118,484 for one year, with two additional one-year renewal options to extend at a 3% price increase for a total not to exceed $366,223 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.3. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order for Fleet Management with Enterprise Rent-A-Car for Vehicle Rental Service in an amount not to exceed $133,700 for one year, with 2 additional 1-year renewal options to extend at a 3% price increase for a total not to exceed $413,253 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Police Department utilizes rental vehicles for specialized anti-crime operations throughout the Department. Public Works/Street and Fleet Services utilizes rental vehicles as a backup to the City\u2019s loaner vehicle program when a City vehicle is taken out of service due to long term maintenance or the expiration of the compressed natural gas fuel tank. In September 2015, the City solicited bids for vehicle rental services. Staff recommends Enterprise Rent-A-Car as the best and lowest bidder for vehicle rental services for the Police Department in an amount not to exceed $118,484 for one year, with two additional one-year renewal options to extend at a 3% price increase for a total not to exceed $366,223, and for Fleet Management in an amount not to exceed $133,700 for one year, with two additional one-year renewal options to extend at a 3% price increase for a total not to exceed $413,253. The total annual expenditure would be $252,184 for the first year and a total three-year amount not to exceed $779,476.", "Discussion", "During the past fifteen years, the Santa Monica Police Department has utilized the services of rental car companies for specialized anti-crime operations. The vehicles are used on a daily basis as the primary mode of transportation in certain units and as-needed in other units. The vehicles are a necessary element of the Department\u2019s operations; vehicles provided by the rental car service must fit the specifications necessary for operational expectations.", "Fleet Management utilizes rental vehicles if a loaner vehicle is unavailable for staff when their vehicle has been taken out of service due to long term repair (accidents) or the expiration of the vehicle\u2019s compressed natural gas (CNG) fuel tank.  CNG fuel tanks have a specific and regulated useful life at the end of which they can no longer be operated legally and need to be removed from service.  Several CNG fleet vehicles will be replaced during the first year of the contract, after which time the demand for rental vehicles should decrease.", "Rental vehicles are also utilized if a vehicle has been totaled in an accident or if the procurement process for a replacement vehicle is longer than expected.", "Vendor Selection", "On September 14, 2015, the City published Notices Inviting Bids for rental vehicles as required by the Police Department and Fleet Management in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 465 vendors were notified and 11 vendors downloaded the bid. Three bids were received and publicly opened on October 1, 2015 per Attachment A.", "Bids were evaluated based on the criteria in SMMC 2.24.072, including price, previous experience, ability to deliver, quality of product, and compliance with City specifications. Avon and Growth, Development Marketing, Inc., had much higher bid pricing in each category than Enterprise Rent-A-Car. For example, the bid amount for the monthly rental of a basic sedan is $585 as bid by Enterprise, $640 as bid by Avon, and $702 as bid by Growth, Development Marketing, Inc. Staff recommends Enterprise Rent-A-Car as the lowest and best bidder for vehicle rental services in the amount of $118,484 for the Police Department and in the amount of $133,700 for Fleet Management.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to Enterprise Rent-A-Car is for an amount not to exceed $118,484 for one year, with two additional one-year renewal options to extend at a 3% price increase for a total not to exceed $366,233 for the Police Department and an amount not to exceed $133,700 for one year, with two additional one-year renewal options to extend at a 3% price increase for a total not to exceed $413,253 for Fleet Management.", "The total annual expenditure would be $252,184 for the first year and a total three-year amount not to exceed $779,476.Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program budget and the FY 2015-16 operating budget in the Police Department.", "The purchase orders will be charged to the following accounts:", "01305.522610 $ 4,484", "01307.522610 $114,000", "C540167.589200 $133,700", "TOTAL  $252,184"]}, {"Title": "Adopt a Resolution for the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program", "Department": "Big Blue Bus, Finance & Administrative Services", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council adopt the attached resolution for the Low Carbon Transit Operations Program that was created to provide operating and capital assistance for transit agencies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve mobility.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Low Carbon Transit Operations Program (LCTOP) is one of several programs that are part of the Transit, Affordable Housing, and Sustainable Communities Program established by the California Legislature in 2014 via Senate Bill 862. LCTOP was created to provide operating and capital assistance for transit agencies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve mobility, with a priority on serving disadvantaged communities. As a requirement to qualify and receive funding through LCTOP, a City Council resolution authorizing the City Manager to execute the required documents for funding must be submitted.", "Discussion", "SB 862 (2014) established the LCTOP as a formulaic program instead of a state-level competitive program. The LCTOP uses the existing State Transit Assistance (STA) Fund formula to distribute $75 million statewide. The STA formula has two components, a population share and a revenue share. Metro receives all of the population share, while the revenue share is divided among the Los Angeles County Municipal Operators and Metro. The California Department of Transportation (Caltrans) is responsible for ensuring that the statutory requirements of the program are met in terms of eligibility, greenhouse gas reduction, disadvantaged community benefit, and other requirements of law.", "The LCTOP Guidelines describe the process that transit agency recipients must follow to qualify and receive a share of the fund. The intent of the program is to provide operating and capital assistance for transit agencies to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and improve mobility for the California public with a priority placed on serving disadvantaged communities. LCTOP is an ongoing funding source for Big Blue Bus.", "Big Blue Bus is eligible for $387,000 from the LCTOP Program which would be used for operating revenue service hours, vehicle maintenance expenditures and operating employee salaries. To qualify for funding, a resolution, certification and assurances, a project description and allocation request form must be submitted. The resolution would authorize the City Manager to execute the required documents for funding.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "There is no immediate financial impact or budget action necessary as a result of the recommended action. Staff will return to Council if specific budget actions are required in the future. Staff anticipates receiving approximately $387,000 annually from the LCTOP, which would be used to cover operating expenses. Revenue changes will be included in the FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget for Council approval."]}, {"Title": "Award of Bid for Fire Department Equipment", "Department": "Fire Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Award Bid #4231 to two vendors: L.N. Curtis, a California-based company and Allstar Fire Equipment, a California-based company for the purchase of fire hose, fire tools, and fire equipment;2. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with L.N. Curtis for the purchase of fire hose, fire tools and fire equipment in the amount not to exceed $633,000 for one year, with two additional one year renewal options in the amount of $300,000 for a total not to exceed $1,233,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval. 3. Authorize the Purchasing Services Manager to issue a purchase order with Allstar Fire Equipment for the purchase of fire tools and fire equipment in the amount not to exceed $107,000 for one year, with two additional one year renewal options in the amount of $100,000 for a total not to exceed $307,000 with future year funding contingent on Council budget approval.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "Staff seeks to purchase equipment to outfit City fire apparatus with hose, tools, and equipment for emergency response. Following a formal bid process, two vendors, L.N. Curtis and Allstar Fire Equipment are recommended as the best bidders to provide and deliver these tools and equipment. The first year\u2019s expenditure is $740,000, with two additional one-year renewal options for up to $400,000 each year for a total amount not to exceed $1,540,000.", "Discussion", "The Fire Department responded to more than 16,000 emergency calls last year and uses a variety of tools and equipment when responding to those calls. In support of this effort, staff purchases a variety of tools and equipment to ensure the Department\u2019s first responders are prepared to provide response to a variety of emergencies. Tools and equipment include items such as: fire hose, jaws-of-life, hand tools, chainsaws, rescue harnesses, ropes and webbing, search cameras, hazardous materials field testing kits, and the like.", "Vendor Selection", "In December 2015, the City published a Notice Inviting Bids to furnish and deliver fire hose, tools, and equipment as required by the Fire Department in accordance with City specifications. The bid was posted on the City\u2019s on-line bidding site, and notices were advertised in the Santa Monica Daily Press in accordance with City Charter and Municipal Code provisions. A total of 1,177 vendors were notified, of which 52 prospective vendors downloaded the bid. Two bids and one no-bid were received and publicly opened on December 23, 2015 per Attachment A. In addition to price, bids were evaluated based on ability to meet specifications, ability to deliver product, and compliance with bid specifications. L.N. Curtis and Allstar Fire Equipment, were able to provide bids that included the specified goods and each vendor was awarded those items where they were the lowest bidder. Based on these criteria, L.N. Curtis and Allstar Fire Equipment are recommended as the best bidders to provide fire hose, tools and equipment in accordance with the City specifications.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The purchase order to be awarded to L.N. Curtis is for an amount not to exceed $1,233,000 and the purchase order to be awarded to Allstar Fire Equipment is for an amount not to exceed $307,000. Funds for the first year expenditure in the amount of $740,000 are available in the FY 2015-16 Capital Improvement Program (CIP) budget at account C010170.589000. Future year funding is contingent upon Council approval.", "The purchase order with L.N. Curtis is primarily funded with 2014 Urban Area Security Initiative (UASI) grant funding, which is 100% federally funded from the Department of Homeland Security to the State of California. The City of Los Angeles acts as the core city for the UASI grant and allocates funds to the City of Santa Monica. The City of Santa Monica was recently informed that $249,033 in 2014 UASI grant funds are available now and additional grant funds may become available as the 2014 grant performance period nears completion. In order to meet specific spending and performance deadlines for the 2014 UASI grant funds, a purchase order awarded to L.N. Curtis will allow for expedited purchases as well as future purchases in the likely event that additional UASI funds become available. Purchases will not exceed the authorized 2014 UASI funding award. Once the amendment has been received from the City of Los Angeles, staff would return to Council to seek approval to accept additional grant funding, execute an amendment to the 2014 UASI grant agreement, and request additional budget appropriation. At that time, grant funding will be deposited into a specific account so that grant-related expenditures can be charged against that account thereby leaving CIP account C010170.589000 whole."]}, {"Title": "Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule: July 2016 through June 2017 and Administrative Budgets", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": "Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes", "Category": "03. Consent Calendar", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the Redevelopment Successor Agency adopt the attached resolutions approving the Agency\u2019s Draft Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule (\u201cROPS 16-17\u201d) and administrative budget for July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "The Redevelopment Successor Agency is required to prepare Recognized Obligation Payment Schedules (ROPS) and corresponding administrative budgets to be implemented in yearly increments. The ROPS 16-17 includes Successor Agency enforceable obligations of $30,839,302 and an administrative budget of $1,034,021 covering July1,2016 to June 30, 2017.", "Background", "Under AB 1484 and SB 107 which implemented the dissolution of redevelopment agencies statewide, the Agency is required to prepare a Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule (ROPS) on a yearly basis starting July 1, 2016, which identifies the former Redevelopment Agency\u2019s enforceable obligations and sources of payment for those obligations. The Agency is required to submit an approved ROPS to the Department of Finance (DOF) and Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller (CAC) for the period ending June 30, 2017 (ROPS 16-17) by February 1, 2016. In accordance with AB 1484 and SB107, the CAC has the opportunity to review ROPS and object to the inclusion of items and the proposed funding sources.", "Discussion", "Staff has prepared the ROPS 16-17 and corresponding administrative budget for the period covering July 1, 2016 to June 30, 2017.", "The ROPS 16-17 covering July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2017, includes Successor Agency legally binding and enforceable obligations covering the following categories: 1) bond payments; 2) indebtedness obligations (including loans, housing agreements, and similar obligations); 3) contracts or agreements necessary for continued administration or operation of Agency; and 4) Agency administrative cost allowance. The Agency has made its final payment in the amount of $28.39 million to the Los Angeles County Auditor-Controller per the terms of the Stipulated Judgment on Case No. 34-2013-80001382. As a result, the Agency may now seek repayments of loans made by the City to the former redevelopment agency prior to the effective date of the State dissolution laws. The proposed ROPS 16-17 seeks repayment of loans made by the City to the former redevelopment agency, including two Parking Authority loans and one City loan associated with a 1978 acquisition note made prior to redevelopment dissolution.", "Under AB 26 and SB 107, the Agency may receive an administrative cost allowance of up to three percent of the property tax allocated to the Agency each fiscal year, reduced by City loan repayments, and based upon an approved administrative budget which justifies the administrative cost allowance. The amounts of property taxes that are allocated to the Agency are based on an approved ROPS during each yearly period, commencing on July 1, 2016. The $688,523 administrative cost allowance is included as an enforceable obligation on the ROPS16\u201117 (see Attachment A, Exhibit 1, Line Item 30). The $1,034,021 administrative budget has been prepared so that the $688,523 administrative cost allowance authorized under ROPS 16-17 will reimburse the Agency partially for expenses associated with implementing the Agency\u2019s duties under AB 26, AB 1484, and SB 107.", "Next Steps", "In accordance with AB 1484 and SB 107, staff will forward the Agency-approved ROPS16-17 to the CAC for review concurrently with the submission to the Oversight Board for consideration. The CAC review may occur prior to Oversight Board submission or following Oversight Board action. Copies of ROPS 16-17, as approved by the Oversight Board, will be sent to the State Controller\u2019s Office and the Department of Finance no later than February 1, 2016, and posted on the Agency\u2019s website. DOF is required to make its determination of the enforceable obligations on the ROPS no later than April 15, 2016.", "Along with the Agency-approved ROPS 16-17, staff will also submit for approval a reconciliation statement that compares approved funding for items listed on ROPS15\u201116A (covering payments authorized during July 1 through December31,2015) against actual payments made during the ROPS 15-16A period to the CAC and the Oversight Board. If actual costs were less than authorized costs, the CAC will deduct the difference from the allocations requested by the Successor Agency during the ROPS 16-17 period. In the event that actual costs were more than projected costs during the ROPS 15-16A period, the CAC will not compensate the Successor Agency or the City for any overpayments because the Department of Finance has instructed the CAC to deny any reimbursements for payments made above previously authorizedamounts.", "Once ROPS 16-17 is approved by the Oversight Board and DOF, the Successor Agency will be eligible to submit a \"Last and Final Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule\" to the Oversight Board and DOF for approval. If this final schedule is approved by the Oversight Board and DOF, the Successor Agency will no longer need to submit an annual Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule to the Oversight Board or the DOF. Therefore, Successor Agency staff will bring back a Last and Final Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule for Successor Agency approval after the Oversight Board and DOF approves ROPS 16-17.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "On June 1, 2016 and January 2, 2017, the CAC will transfer property taxes into the Successor Agency\u2019s Redevelopment Obligation Retirement Fund (RORF) from which the Successor Agency will pay enforceable obligations listed on the approved ROPS 16-17 period.", "There are no other budgetary impacts associated with the adoption of the resolutions approving the draft ROPS 16-17 and administrative budget, unless the Prior Period Adjustments Form covering the ROPS 15-16A period July 1, 2015 through December31, 2015, identifies unallocated and available prior-period Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund (RPTTF) funds. If there is an available balance, it will offset the total amount of RPTTF requested by the Successor Agency during the ROPS16\u201117period. The ROPS 16-17 simply sets forth the Agency\u2019s existing financial obligations and administrative costs for the period July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2017."]}], [{"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance Adding Section 9.56.310 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code Designating the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments Historic District", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on December 15, 2015, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance adding Section 9.56.310 to the Santa Monica Municipal Code designating the San Vicente Boulevard Courtyard Apartments a historic district.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Second Reading and Adoption of an Ordinance adopting Development Agreement 12DEV-011 to allow a 5-story (57 feet), 77,758 square-foot mixed-use project consisting of 90 residential units, 10,617 square feet of ground floor commercial space, and 168 parking spaces within a two-level subterranean parking garage at 1601 Lincoln Boulevard.", "Department": "City Attorney's Office - Second Reading", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that City Council adopt the attached Ordinance.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "At its meeting on December 8, 2015, the City Council introduced for first reading an ordinance approving the Development Agreement between the City of Santa Monica, a Municipal Corporation, and FSTAR 1601, LLC.", "The ordinance is now presented to City Council for adoption."]}, {"Title": "Introduction for First Reading an Ordinance Setting a Minimum Wage to be Effective in the City of Santa Monica", "Department": "Finance Department", "Sponsors": "Director Andy Agle", "Category": "07. Ordinances", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council introduce for first reading the attached ordinance setting a minimum wage to be effective in the City of Santa Monica with a phased approach to reach $15 per hour by 2020 for most businesses; and to reach $15.37 per hour by July 1, 2017 for hotel workers.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "On September 29, 2015 (Attachment A), staff presented Council with a draft minimum wage ordinance based on the City of Los Angeles\u2019s ordinance, expert input, and community feedback. At the meeting, Council directed staff to meet with additional stakeholder groups, and to return with a comprehensive ordinance reflecting input from these meetings and responding to Council direction regarding service charges, seasonal jobs, paid leave, and enforcement. Council also directed staff to incorporate into the ordinance a minimum wage paid to hotel workers similar to the City of Los Angeles hotel wage, with appropriate tiers for Santa Monica hotels. Staff submitted an Information Item to Council on December 16, 2015 describing stakeholder outreach and presenting recommendations and alternatives. Staff recommends that Council introduce for first reading the Minimum Wage Ordinance (Attachment D) increasing the minimum wage in phases to reach $15 per hour by July 1, 2020 for most businesses, and setting the minimum wage for all hotel employees at $13.25 per hour starting July 1, 2016 and reaching $15.37 per hour on July 1, 2017.", "Background", "Santa Monica currently has one local wage law in effect. This is the living wage ordinance for contractors providing services to the City of Santa Monica pursuant to a contract in the amount of $54,200 or greater. This law has been in place since July 1, 2005, and the minimum wage for such contractors\u2019 employees is currently $15.37 per hour. Three development agreements for new hotels contain the same wage provision. All other businesses in Santa Monica follow the State minimum wage, $10 per hour as of January 1, 2016.", "In October 2014, the Los Angeles City Council adopted a hotel worker minimum wage ordinance, setting a phased increase to reach $15.37 per hour for hotels of 300 rooms or greater starting July 1, 2015, and for hotels of 150 rooms or greater on July 1, 2016. In June 2015, the Los Angeles City Council adopted a general minimum wage ordinance that progressively reaches $15.00 per year by 2020 and 2021 for smaller or non-profit organizations. In September 2014 and again in June 2015, the Santa Monica City Council directed staff to review the Los Angeles proposed ordinance and its potential impact on Santa Monica, including the possibility of passing a similar ordinance. At its June 9, 2015 meeting (Attachment A), Council directed staff to initiate community outreach and begin preparation of an ordinance setting a minimum wage and other terms for Santa Monica employers. Council further directed staff to conduct outreach with the community and contract with researchers from the University of California at Berkeley\u2019s Institute for Research on Labor and Employment (IRLE) to provide insight into the law\u2019s likely impact in Santa Monica", "In August 2015, Council unanimously approved the Priority Strategic Goal of preserving Santa Monica as an inclusive and diverse community, recognizing challenges from the rising cost of housing in Santa Monica, and workers\u2019 ability to afford it. According to the IRLE report on the proposed Los Angeles minimum wage, increasing the minimum wage is an effective method of increasing low wage worker income. Increasing the minimum wage thereby is one policy tool that could help to increase the chances that local workers are able to live in Santa Monica.", "On September 29, 2015 (Attachment B), staff presented Council with a report and draft ordinance reflecting community outreach and work with IRLE researchers. The report projected that Santa Monica\u2019s economy would not be significantly impacted by a minimum wage increase; slight price increases would likely be lower than those in neighboring Los Angeles as Santa Monica businesses already pay higher average wages than Los Angeles employers in most impacted industries, and Santa Monica\u2019s distinct appeal as a beach destination makes visitors less price-sensitive than those in Los Angeles. Furthermore, the report noted that the increase would benefit Santa Monica\u2019s low-wage workers; that a one-year implementation delay would help nonprofit organizations and businesses with 25 or fewer employees adjust to the wage increase; and that strong enforcement would be necessary to realize the benefits of increased wages. The report also recommended matching Los Angeles as much as possible to promote fairness, support regional policy, and simplify compliance and enforcement.", "Following testimony from workers, employers, advocacy groups, and community members, Council directed staff to conduct additional stakeholder outreach and return with amendments and clarifications to the draft ordinance that addressed the following topics: a hotel wage, service charges, seasonal workers, paid leave, and enforcement. Staff submitted an information item on December 16, 2015 (Attachment C), describing the stakeholder outreach process, outlining staff\u2019s recommendations for each area, and including formal position letters from the Santa Monica Neighborhood Restaurant Coalition (SMNRC), the Chamber of Commerce, Santa Monica Travel and Tourism (SMTT), Unite Here Local 11, the Restaurant Opportunities Center Los Angeles (ROC LA), the Housing Commission, and a group of Los Angeles hotel associations (American Hotel & Lodging Association, California Hotel & Lodging Association, Hotel Association of Los Angeles).", "Discussion", "This report presents an ordinance for first reading addressing each Council-directed topic (hotel wage, service charges, seasonal workers, paid leave, and enforcement) based on staff\u2019s recommendations. The report also includes alternatives for each topic, with associated alternative ordinance language, that would allow the Council to adopt alternatives for the first reading, if desired. For extensive changes, staff would need to return at a future Council meeting with an updated ordinance for first reading.", "The proposed ordinance, Attachment D, introduces a City minimum wage ordinance, including a hotel living wage, for Council consideration and approval. A summary of recommendations and alternatives for each of the five key issues is included as Attachment F. Ordinance language for each alternative is included as Attachment E.", "The following is a summary of each topic identified by Council for further research and outreach.", "Hotel living wage", "Council direction. Council directed staff to recommend room thresholds appropriate to Santa Monica\u2019s hotel industry, and to prepare an ordinance setting a hotel minimum wage in Santa Monica similar to that of Los Angeles.", "Background. At the September 29, 2015 meeting, Council members unanimously expressed support for matching the Los Angeles hotel wage. The Los Angeles law currently applies to hotels of 300 rooms or greater (as of July 1, 2015), and will apply to hotels of 150 rooms or greater starting July of 2016. The phase-in and application to larger hotels were mechanisms to avoid layoffs, and were recommended in prospective studies of the hotel law\u2019s impact. These studies estimated that larger hotels are likely better able to absorb a wage increase without laying off staff as a result of greater access to resources, broader marketing reach, and sources of income beyond room rental. They also suggested that providing hotels more time to adjust operations would decrease the possibility and impact of any layoffs. It is too soon to assess the impact of the most recent wage increase in Los Angeles. Early evidence from Los Angeles\u2019 previous hotel wage increase - a 2008 law affecting 13 Airport Hospitality Enhancement Zone (AHEZ) hotels - suggests that it was not harmful to the affected hotels or workers in that there were no property closures or measurable decrease in employment or visitors, even during the Great Recession.", "The Los Angeles hotel sector is significantly larger than Santa Monica\u2019s and has lower average occupancy rates and indicators of profit, including average daily room rate (ADR) and revenue per available room (RevPAR). There also more workers per room in the Santa Monica hospitality sector than there are in Los Angeles, due to the higher level of service provided in Santa Monica hotels.[1]", "Los Angeles[2]", "Santa Monica[3]", "# Hotels", "350", "38", "# Rooms", "39,000", "3,603", "# Workers", "17,000", "3,000", "Average workers per room", "0.4", "0.8", "Occupancy", "79%", "86%", "Average Daily Room Rate", "$ 147", "$ 336", "Revenue Per Available Room", "$ 116", "$ 287", "According to available data and information from stakeholder groups, many of the factors differentiating large and small hotels\u2019 ability to absorb a labor cost increase in Los Angeles do not apply in Santa Monica, or are true to a much lesser extent. Many of Santa Monica\u2019s smaller hotels have similar ADR to large hotels, share owners with other large hotels in Santa Monica or elsewhere, have sources of income beyond room rental, and benefit equally from tourist travel. And unlike Los Angeles, Santa Monica hotels share approximately the same benefits of location, transportation, and tourist attractions, where Los Angeles hotel ADR and occupancy varies more widely depending on location.", "Stakeholder input. The Chamber of Commerce, Santa Monica Travel & Tourism (SMTT), Unite Here Local 11, and the Los Angeles hotel association group addressed the Santa Monica hotel wage in formal communications to staff and Council, as shown in Attachment C. Workers, labor advocacy groups, and many community members expressed support for the hotel minimum wage. Hotel operators expressed support for minimum wage increases but voiced concern with the proposed hotel living wage increases as unfairly targeting the hospitality sector. Hotel groups recommended a phased or slower implementation to assist with associated operational adjustments. There was general agreement that any change in hotel wage should apply to all hotels regardless of number of rooms. Many SMTT members, the Chamber of Commerce, and some community members did not agree with or had questions about exempting hotels with unionized workers.", "Recommendation. Staff recommends a phased approach applying to all non-union hotels, matching the Los Angeles hotel wage by July 2017. The wage would increase to $13.25 per hour on July 1, 2016 and $15.37 on July 1, 2017, followed by annual consumer price index (CPI) increases. Like Los Angeles, the wage increase would take place over two years, and would reach the same rate. Unlike Los Angeles, the wage increase applies to all hotels regardless of size. Also like the Los Angeles ordinance, the recommendation includes a one-year waiver upon application for hotels that demonstrate that, to avoid bankruptcy, they would need to lay off an appreciable number of staff or significantly decrease hours to accommodate the increased wage cost. Again like Los Angeles, the hotel wage would apply to leased spaces connected to hotels, and to employees of contractors working on site.", "Phasing in the increase provides additional adjustment time for hotels, and reduces the likelihood and extent of possible negative consequences like layoffs, cuts to hours or cuts to services provided. It also reduces the disparity between minimum wage rates for workers at hotel restaurants and shops and non-hotel restaurants and shops. Applying the wage to all hotels makes sense in the Santa Monica context, where smaller hotels do not necessarily have lower room rates or profits, or less access to resources. Applying the wage rate to all hotel sizes promotes fair competition, makes enforcement and compliance simpler, and would mean that hotel workers doing the same job receive the same pay. The recommendation matches LA\u2019s ordinance within one and half years.", "Alternative. Council could choose to match LA\u2019s $15.37 wage starting July 1, 2016 for all hotels. This would increase hotel wages faster, matching the Los Angeles wage level more quickly. Santa Monica hotels\u2019 high occupancy rates and ADR, including exceptionally strong performance over the past three years, indicate a strong and profitable industry that already typically pays above the State minimum wage and primarily competes with the Los Angeles hotels subject to their minimum wage rates. However, while Los Angeles hotels had either eight or 20 months to adjust to a higher wage, Santa Monica hotels would have less than six months to make the change, and this could result in sudden changes to hotel employment or operations that could negatively affect hotel workers and reduce Santa Monica\u2019s competitiveness as a destination. Another variation on this alternative would be to push the hotel wage rate shift to January 1, 2017, which would entail a smaller initial rate increase matching the citywide minimum wage increase pegged for July 1, 2016.", "Service charges", "Council direction. In June, Council directed staff to draft an ordinance that goes beyond State law in directing how employers use service charge revenue. Following the September 29 meeting, Council directed staff to address concerns related to the use of service charges that were raised at that meeting, including providing transparency to the customer, clarifying who can receive service charge revenue, and how to enforce any violations of service charge regulations.", "Background. Service charges are similar to tips, but are treated differently in State law. Absent direction beyond State law, replacing tips with service charges can lead to lower income for regularly tipped workers, and can be opaque to consumers. Specific direction in the proposed ordinance can mitigate against these potential problems.", "Many service workers including restaurant workers earn a significant proportion or majority of their income from tips. According to Restaurant Opportunities Center (ROC) data, in Los Angeles 56% of tipped workers are outside of the restaurant industry in the hospitality, carwash, nail and beauty salon, and massage industries. In Los Angeles, over 60% of all tipped workers make less than $25,000 per year. The proposed ordinance language would also apply to these types of service-based businesses if the employers chose to introduce service charges.", "According to State law, tips are the property of the employee. This means that the employer must return all income received as a tip or gratuity to those employees providing the service. Applying tips toward minimum wage calculation is called a tip credit, and is illegal in California and six other states. State law also determines how tip income is distributed, and allows employees to share tip income through tip pools. However, tips shared through pools must go to workers in the chain of service. Many employers believe it is unclear in State law which staff is considered part of the chain of service and thus eligible to participate in tip pools. Consequently, in practice in the restaurant industry, \u201cfront of house\u201d (FOH) workers such as servers, bussers, hosts, bartenders, food runners, receive tip income, but \u201cback of house\u201d (BOH) workers such as cooks and dishwashers do not. This contributes to an often significant income gap between the front and back of the house staff. However, courts have ruled in favor of mandated tip sharing between front and back of house staff who participate in the chain of service. Accordingly, some restaurants, including some in Santa Monica, do share tips between front and back of the house staff. Nevertheless, many employers continue to believe that they cannot have a mandatory tip pool that includes back of house workers.", "In addition to or in lieu of a tip, businesses may impose a service charge. Using service charges is entirely voluntary. It is very common for hotels to use service charges, and more restaurants are considering introducing this business practice. The proposed ordinance provision would regulate how a business would describe service charges to customers and use service charge proceeds, if the business chooses to introduce a service charge.", "A service charge is defined as a charge added to a bill of sale that a consumer is required to pay; also known as a mandatory charge. Service charges are particularly important because they appear where consumers normally pay a tip, and the word \u201cservice\u201d indicates that the charge is for the service provided, the same as a tip. There are also other charges that establishments might include on a bill as a mandatory charge, including those for utilities or health care. These surcharges are different than a service charge. To avoid confusion, the service charge definition in the ordinance addresses this aspect of service charges versus other surcharges.", "Unlike tips, service charges (and other mandatory charges) are the property of the employer under state law, and the employer can allocate revenue received as a service charge at his or her discretion. Introducing service charges in place of tips can provide the employer control over income previously received as tips and going directly to employees. Hotels often use service charges as a means to offset some administrative or other operational or personnel costs. Using service charges in restaurants is a relatively new practice, so there is little evidence of the impact on either restaurants or workers. However, many states and cities do regulate service charges to some extent. The regulatory language typically focuses on (a) consumer transparency, by ensuring that restaurants or other establishments that use service charges clearly define for customers and employees how charges are used and (b) ensuring that service charge proceeds, like tips, go to the employees providing the service.", "Los Angeles\u2019 City Council plans to vote on service charge direction for non-hotel businesses before the minimum wage law takes effect in June 2016. The Los Angeles Hotel Service Charge Reform Ordinance regulates service charges in hotels, making their treatment similar to tips, so that they go to the employee providing the service. Emeryville and Oakland regulate service charges in restaurants and the hospitality industry using the same language and definitions as those that apply to Los Angeles hotels.", "In recent years, several local restaurants have instituted a practice of designating and applying a 3% surcharge to their customers\u2019 bills, with the bills often claiming that the surcharge is for employee \u201chealth care\u201d or \u201cbenefits.\u201d There is a pending lawsuit against several of these restaurants in Santa Monica and Los Angeles challenging the use of a health care surcharge. The complaint alleges that restaurants engaged in price fixing because a group of restaurants established the same surcharge for employee health care. The outcome of this case is pending. Meanwhile, the Consumer Protection Division of the City Attorney\u2019s Office has concerns about whether customers have proper notice of the surcharge prior to ordering and paying and want to better ensure that funds from such surcharges will actually be used for the stated purpose. Staff\u2019s recommendation includes language on surcharges to address these issues.", "Stakeholder input. The Chamber of Commerce (including the Santa Monica Neighborhood Restaurant Coalition (SMNRC)) and SMTT provided general recommendations for service charge language. Both groups support businesses\u2019 ability to use surcharges other than service charges, and to distribute service charge revenue to more employees and at employer discretion. This means in particular to back of house staff, and to all non-salaried employees (rather than excluding all managers and supervisors, as currently written in the LA hotel ordinance). Workers and employee advocacy groups support treating service charges like tips. This means stricter regulation, broader definition of service charges to include other types of surcharges (i.e. delivery charge or health care charge), and excluding managers and supervisors from receiving service charge income. Staff received proposed ordinance language reflecting these recommendations from the SMNRC (Attachment G) and worker advocacy groups (Unite Here, ROC LA, and CLEAN Car Wash) (Attachment H).", "Recommendation. Staff recommends a balanced approach to regulating service charges. Staff\u2019s recommendation affirms businesses\u2019 authority to institute surcharges apart from service charges, with a focus on ensuring that any additional charges are clearly described and used as stated, and provides a narrow definition of what constitutes a service charge.", "Following Council direction, the recommendation ensures that service charge proceeds go to workers who participate directly or indirectly in the chain of service; accordingly, in the restaurant industry for example, the distribution would include back of house workers. It allows employees with some (but not majority) supervisory duties to receive service charge proceeds, in consideration of line staff who may have some supervisory responsibilities, but primarily act in a service capacity. It maintains current distribution for certain types of existing surcharges (banquet, porterage, and room service). The recommendation also ensures that funds received from any benefits surcharges (including health care surcharges) go entirely towards benefits coverage for employees. It also includes a provision ensuring that businesses cannot automatically include optional charges on a receipt and force the customer to remove them, and provides that customers must affirmatively opt in to such payments; a separate definition for surcharges; and a recordkeeping requirement. In using a more specific service charge definition and affirming businesses\u2019 ability to use other surcharges, the recommended ordinance language takes into consideration that a reasonable customer would understand certain types of charges, such as delivery or health surcharges, as distinct from a service charge that might replace the traditional tip. Finally, the recommendation provides direction on noticing requirements to customers, and transparency to employees regarding how proceeds are allocated. The recommendation follows Council direction for employee protections, and provides employers with flexibility in assessing surcharges and provides additional assurance that back-of-house staff can receive service charge proceeds. While staff agrees that regulating service charges is an appropriate and arguably necessary part of addressing a key issue of minimum wage policies, it may be one of the most challenging areas for effective and consistent enforcement.", "Alternative 1. Council could approve the SMNRC recommended language (Attachment G). Major provisions are that any charge described as a \u201cservice charge\u201d goes to the general group of employees providing the service; managers will decide on service charge distribution; all non-salaried employees can receive service charge income; and other \u201csurcharges\u201d may be assessed on the bill provided that they are described clearly, in a way customers might easily and reasonably understand what the charge is for and to whom it will be given. This option addresses some transparency concerns, directs income towards employees generally providing the service or to their benefits, and provides flexibility to employers. However, it does not go far enough in addressing transparency to customers, does not provide transparency to employees in service charge distribution, and the salaried versus non-salaried distinction in who can receive service charge revenue is too broad and could lead to misclassification of employees as non-salaried, when their job duties are more consistent with a salaried worker, so that the employer could make the employee eligible to receive service charge income.", "Alternative 2. Council could adopt the language proposed by the Unite Here, ROC, and CLEAN Car Wash group in its entirety (Attachment H). This language, which is the basis for staff\u2019s recommendation, includes most of those provisions. This alternative provides strong worker protections, accounts for the way some businesses already treat service charges, and provides the ability to share service charge income with back of house staff. But, it does not address employer concerns about ability to use other types of surcharges, lack of clarity regarding who can receive service charge income and what surcharges the language applies to, and does not fully address transparency to consumers. It also contains a broad definition of service charges, including a health care surcharge. The language is also overly restrictive in who can receive service charge income, potentially not allowing staff who may have some supervisory or managerial responsibilities, but who primarily provide customer service, to receive service charge proceeds.", "Seasonal Workers", "Council direction. Council directed staff to do additional research on seasonal provisions in other cities or states, and to reach out to seasonal employer and employee stakeholders. Council asked staff to return with options for ordinance language that would address concerns regarding young workers\u2019 and first-time workers\u2019 employment opportunities, and with maintaining affordable pier activities once the minimum wage is increased.", "Background. Many Santa Monica employers are affected by seasonal changes in business, including retailers who add part-time or temporary workers during the holiday season or employ students who work summer jobs. This is particularly true on the Santa Monica pier and beach, where Pacific Park and Perry\u2019s require a larger number of staff during the summer or other peak demand seasons like the holidays, and where a large percentage of employees work for less than a full year and may only work for one summer. According to Pacific Park and Perry\u2019s estimates, these two businesses employ many first-time workers: 30-35% of Perry\u2019s and 50% of Pacific Park employees. Both business owners state that they would not be able to employ the same number of peak demand workers - approximately 420 employees for Pacific Park and approximately 100-125 for Perry\u2019s - with the implementation of the proposed minimum wage increase. An exemption for seasonal workers could help preserve these first-time jobs. The community also values affordable activities at the beach and pier. An exemption for a portion of workers could help mitigate the impact on pier and beach price increases.", "Currently, no California city has a wage exemption for seasonal employment. Instead, California State law includes a provision for \u201clearners\u201d, defined as someone working for the first time in an activity in which they have no previous or similar experience.[4] This provides for 85% of the minimum wage for the first 160 hours of work. Emeryville includes this same provision applied to its local minimum wage, and Los Angeles includes this provision modified to apply only to workers between ages 14-17. Short-term wage exemptions in other states are generally limited to specific kinds of programs with some community benefit (i.e., summer camps, internships, or government supported youth work programs).", "Seasonal and first time employment often applies to young workers to a greater extent than to other workers. Young and first-time workers are often discussed in minimum wage increases, since making labor more expensive may decrease the likelihood that an employer would hire someone without experience. A November 2015 UCLA Labor Center study of Los Angeles youth workers (aged 18-29) concluded that young workers have a wide range of financial and other responsibilities, struggle with getting predictable work with the hours they want, and very often have little to no control over scheduling. On average, young workers report wanting more hours, more full time and predictable work, higher wages, better treatment, benefits and worker protections.[5] Report survey data shows that fewer than 1% of young workers use wages for discretionary spending (clothes, nights out, etc.) only; over one-third contribute financially to their households; 16.5% are parents; one-third are in school, and one-fourth have education debt. Over 60% do not receive health benefits, paid vacation or sick days. Approximately 72% report wanting to work more hours, and 19% work more than one job. This information challenges the notion that young workers have less essential needs than other workers, and are seeking jobs with limited and frequently changing hours.", "Stakeholder input. Pacific Park and Perry\u2019s management strongly advocate for a seasonal exception, and the Chamber of Commerce endorses this provision. Pacific Park provided recommended ordinance language that Perry\u2019s also supports. Conversely, Unite Here, ROC Los Angeles, and the UCLA Labor Center recommend either no seasonal exception, or one targeted to a very specific group of employees for a short period of time, and linked to the local minimum wage. Community members expressed concern about decreasing opportunities for first-time workers.", "Recommendation. Staff recommends including a learner exemption that would require employers to pay 85% of the minimum wage for 480 hours or six months, whichever is sooner, for employees in a job or activity in which they have no previous or similar related experience. This is the same as the State provision for first time workers (learners), but with the time period extended to cover six months at half time (20 hours per week), or three months at full time (40 hours per week). This provision would maintain an incentive to hire first time workers, would not create a significant wage gap in future years if the State wage does not increase, would apply to all businesses, and is a reasonable amount of time for a seasonal worker.", "Alternative 1. Council could approve the Pacific Park proposal, which creates a complete exemption from the minimum wage ordinance for employees working six months or less during a 12 month period, under a temporary services agreement, provided that the employer also employs 50 employees at an average 35 hours per week that are paid at least Santa Monica\u2019s minimum wage. This could assist Pacific Park and Perry\u2019s in maintaining current staffing, including providing first time job experience and training to many workers. To the extent that this exemption would help Pacific Park maintain prices at current levels, this addresses the City goal of keeping the pier affordable. However, staff believes that the language as written is overly broad and vague, and it would include employers like large retailers, movie theaters, and others who do not have either the constraints of the pier amusement park, or the community benefit that more affordable pier and beach recreation provide; and that have not demonstrated benefits for first time workers to the same degree. The language could also provide a loophole that allows other employers to create seasonal jobs in order to reduce wages. And, while both businesses have expressed their aim of keeping prices low, there is nothing to prevent them from increasing prices either in response to wage or any other growing operational cost. Finally, absent any State minimum wage increase, an exemption from the local minimum wage would lead to a 50% wage gap between seasonal and full-time employees in 2020.", "Alternative 2. Council could choose to offer no exemption to the minimum wage, or to simply adopt the State learner provision which requires employers to pay 85% of the minimum wage for the first 160 hours in a job in which the employee had no previous or similar related experience.", "Paid time off", "Council direction. Council directed staff to include a \u201creasonable\u201d paid time off provision in the minimum wage ordinance.", "Background. Many low-wage workers do not have paid time off to address health issues for themselves or family members. This leads to decreased health outcomes for the workers and their families, and often loss of jobs if family or personal illness prevents them from attending work. It can also be costly for the community as a whole, as it incentivizes putting off health care until conditions become serious.", "Beginning July 1, 2015, California state law requires employers to provide at least 24 hours or three days of sick leave per year. Employees would begin accruing sick leave on the 90th day of employment, and could be limited to using 24 hours in a given year. Emeryville, Oakland, and San Francisco are among other California cities that have included paid sick leave beyond the state requirement as part of their minimum wage ordinances. Oakland and San Francisco provide 72 hours (9 days) for larger business, and 40 hours (5 days) for small businesses; Emeryville provides 72 hours (9 days) for larger business, and 48 hours (6 days) for small businesses. The Los Angeles Hotel Worker Minimum Wage includes 12 days paid leave (sick, vacation, or personal), and 10 days unpaid sick leave per year for hotel workers.", "Los Angeles has not yet addressed paid leave in its minimum wage ordinance, although some reports suggest that the city is considering five days of sick leave. The LA City Council will decide on a paid leave provision before the minimum wage law\u2019s implementation in June 2016. Santa Monica does not currently have any local requirements for paid leave.", "Stakeholder input. All stakeholder groups provided input into paid leave. The Chamber of Commerce recommends five days leave; the Restaurant Opportunities Center recommended following the Oakland and San Francisco model of five days of sick leave and nine days of sick leave for larger businesses. Unite Here members and workers recommended that the City be clear about how and when employees can use leave, and include retaliation protection for employees taking paid leave. Hotels report already providing paid time off in most cases, so were less concerned about the number of days, and more about logistics, and having to change existing policies to accommodate new requirements, like different accrual rates, carryover or cash out provisions, or conditions for use. Following the December 16, 2015 information item including staff\u2019s preliminary recommendations, Chamber of Commerce members provided additional feedback that the leave requirement should apply specifically to sick leave. This recommendation is also noted in a Santa Monica Neighborhood Restaurant (SMNRC) December 22, 2015 letter to Council and staff, included as Attachment I.", "Recommendation. Staff recommends a paid sick leave provision similar to that of Oakland and San Francisco. Employees would earn one hour of sick leave for every 30 hours worked (same accrual rate as the State law), and would be entitled to accrue at least 40 hours (five days) for businesses with 25 or fewer employees, and 72 hours (nine days) for businesses with 26 or more employees. Employees could carry balances over from year to year up to a maximum of 40 hours for small businesses and 72 hours for large businesses, but would not have the option to cash out. Employees could be limited to using the maximum accrual amount in a given calendar year. Employee use of sick leave is consistent with State sick leave provisions. This meets worker advocacy recommendations, and is existing policy in other cities. The accrual rate aligns with the State, making implementation simpler for employers.", "This recommendation has changed from the December 16, 2015 Information Item in response to additional input from Chamber of Commerce members. Staff had initially recommended that paid leave could be used for vacation, personal, or sick leave, with the intent of providing flexibility to employers and employees. Employers already have policies in place to accommodate sick leave, so they are better able to plan for staff\u2019s use of sick leave, and have established procedures with employees for taking sick leave. Further, vacation and personal days function more as a benefit, or perk, that employers offer to retain employees, as compared to sick leave, which is for employee and consumer protection. Staff consulted with employee advocacy groups a second time on this issue and received feedback that the sick leave provision meets employee needs. This modified recommendation also aligns more closely with San Francisco, Oakland, and Emeryville, all of which provide paid sick leave.", "Alternative 1. Council could approve five days / nine days of sick leave for all non-hotel businesses; and adopt leave requirements for hotels consistent with the Los Angeles hotel minimum wage. This would mean that hotel workers would be entitled to at least 96 hours (12 days) of compensated time off per year (includes vacation, personal, or sick leave), accrued at 96/52 for each week worked. In addition, employees would have access to at least 80 additional hours of unpaid sick leave, earned at 80/52 hours each week, to be used after compensated time is exhausted. This would be consistent with the LA hotel wage and would provide generous time off for employees. However, this would present a significant increase for hotels to absorb in addition to the hotel wage increase. It would also create inconsistency within Santa Monica for paid leave policies, which could be complicated and difficult to enforce.", "Alternative 2. Council could reduce the number of sick leave days recommended by staff either for small businesses, larger businesses, or all businesses (for example, match the State\u2019s three days for small businesses, and mandate five days for larger businesses). Another variable would be to delay the effective date for implementation of the provision to recognize the greater complexity of putting such a provision in place.", "Education and enforcement", "Council direction. Council directed staff to develop a comprehensive enforcement policy, using all tools available, and to consult with experts, including the UCLA Labor Center.", "Background. Wage theft is common, often difficult to prosecute, and wages often go unrecovered.[6] Meaningful enforcement measures and strong retaliation protections make it more likely that employees feel comfortable bringing claims forward, and that employers comply with regulations.", "Currently, employees with wage claims pursuant to state law can file their claims directly with the State Labor Commissioner\u2019s Office, also known as the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement (DLSE). In adopting a local minimum wage with different provisions than the State, Santa Monica would need to have the capacity to educate the community, businesses, and workers about the new requirements; respond to inquiries; and investigate and prosecute claims.", "Most cities adopting local ordinances have included a series of provisions to deter employers from committing wage violations and provide workers protection for reporting them, shown in the table below.", "CITY", "Enforcement Agency", "Revoke Licenses Permits Contracts", "Liens", "Posting & Payroll Access", "Fines & Penalties", "Criminal Penalties", "Private Right of Action", "Retaliation Protection", "Outreach & Education", "Albuquerque NM", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Berkeley", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Bernalillo", "Y", "Y", "Chicago", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Houston*", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Oakland", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Las Cruces NM", "Y", "Y", "Los Angeles", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Louisville", "Y", "Y", "Miami*", "Y", "Y", "Montgomery County, MD", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Mountain View", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Richmond", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "San Diego", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "San Francisco", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "San Jose", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Santa Clara County*", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Santa Fe", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Seattle", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Sunnyvale", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Washington DC", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "Y", "* No higher minimum wage, but implemented wage theft ordinances", "SOURCE: UCLA Labor Center / Economic Roundtable \u201cLA Rising: A City that Works for Everyone\u201d, modified to include Los Angeles", "One important tool that is used by other municipalities that has garnered significant success is outreach and education. This includes work with community-based organizations, and a strong education campaign, to prioritize education and informal complaint resolution, and incentivize voluntary compliance. San Francisco provides the best model for this aspect of wage enforcement. It has been significantly more successful in wage violation investigation and recovery than the State average: its Office of Labor Standards Enforcement (OLSE) has collected full back wages plus interest on final judgments in 90.5% of cases, compared to 17% statewide.[7] The OLSE, created in 2006, has been in place the longest of any local wage enforcement office in California, and it is the model for the Los Angeles and other Bay Area city local wage ordinances. Community-based organizations build on connections with the community to identify problem areas, and to put together strong cases for workers that may not be comfortable approaching the city. Community organizations are well placed to communicate wage law provisions effectively and where most appropriate.", "Most cities with dedicated wage enforcement offices are much larger than Santa Monica. Of the cities with local minimum wage ordinances or wage theft ordinances, Santa Monica is most similar in size to Sunnyvale and Mountain View. These cities do not have dedicated wage enforcement offices but have contracted with the City of San Jose for enforcement of their local ordinances, and the partnership has worked successfully since implementation in 2014. Each city pays San Jose\u2019s office based on services provided, and San Jose reports to the client cities on wage related activity. San Jose itself has had few wage claims. In approximately one year, in a city with approximately 70,000 businesses, San Jose city staff has received approximately 50-60 emails or phone calls, of which only 25 were complaints, and many of these were not enforceable.[8] Sunnyvale and Mountain View, through San Jose, have also experienced a fairly low number of claims. Contracting with another city means that the city has access to staff if more claims arise, but does not have excess staff capacity if there is little activity.", "The City and County of Los Angeles are establishing wage enforcement divisions. The City of Los Angeles has requested 39 positions phased in over three years, a $1 million annual community outreach budget, and an annual $200,000 budget for advertisement, public relations, and technology. The division will be called the Office of Wage Standards, and will be housed within the Bureau of Contract Administration, which currently enforces living and prevailing wage requirements. The City of Los Angeles staffing level and outreach budget is based on the San Francisco and Seattle models, but is proportionally slightly larger, taking into account that Los Angeles has a higher percentage of low-wage workers than do Seattle or San Francisco, and that it has one of the highest rates of wage theft in the country, estimated at 30% of low wage employees receiving less than the minimum wage in any given week.[9] The Office of Wage Standards will serve the city\u2019s approximately 5.5 million workers. At least initially, wage enforcement will likely present a significant challenge for the City of Los Angeles because of its very large workforce, high concentration of low wage workers, and the fact that it has not previously been required to enforce wage laws.", "Los Angeles County (County), which adopted a minimum wage that will reach $15 per hour by 2020, will also establish an enforcement system. The County\u2019s Wage Enforcement Program (WEP) will be located in the Department of Consumer and Business Affairs (DCBA). The enforcement program consists of 5 positions in the first year, with an opportunity, upon approval by the Board of Supervisors the following year, for additional positions to accommodate emerging workloads. The County will initially have authority over an estimated 15,000 businesses in unincorporated areas. Approximately 67% of these businesses are in the services (39%), retail (21%), and food service (7%) categories. The DCBA\u2019s WEP unit will focus on education, prevention, complaint investigation, and wage recovery. Its primary goal will be to educate and inform employees and employers of their rights and responsibilities in order to achieve voluntary compliance with minimum intervention. The DCBA has 40 years of experience with local, state, and Federal consumer protection laws, which it can apply to enforcing local minimum wage ordinances. The initial work plan includes comprehensive publicity and education programs, including establishing an information center, providing online resources, creating promotional materials, conducting educational trainings and workshops, and identifying and partnering with community based organizations. Like San Francisco and the City of Los Angeles, and consistent with wage enforcement expert recommendations, the County will implement proactive enforcement strategies, as well as complaint-driven and targeted enforcement of particularly vulnerable industries. The County has included in its work plan the capacity to provide contract service to incorporated cities.", "Stakeholder input. Staff discussed education and enforcement with the UCLA Labor Center, ROC LA, Unite Here, and Chamber of Commerce and SMTT groups. The worker advocacy groups recommended that Santa Monica adopt the provisions included in the San Francisco and Los Angeles ordinances, with some additions to strengthen these provisions. They strongly recommended the City partner with community based organizations for outreach and education, and work with the Los Angeles City or County enforcement agencies. Business groups supported strong enforcement of noncompliant businesses, and recommended that the City have a strong enforcement plan in place before adopting an ordinance. They supported the City conducting an extensive education campaign to make new requirements clear, and inform the community of the new requirements. Staff reached out to Los Angeles City and County enforcement divisions to discuss partnering in enforcement. The Los Angeles County group was very receptive, and staff has established that there are no legal or other barriers to pursuing a contract with them.", "Recommendation. Staff recommends a very rigorous enforcement program, including provisions building from the San Francisco and Los Angeles ordinances, to ensure compliance with the minimum wage regulatory scheme. The proposed ordinance authorizes criminal penalties for violations of the ordinance. Consistent with well-established legal precedent in the area of criminal penalties relating to a regulatory program, many of the violations will be subject to a strict liability standard. Furthermore, consistent with Penal Code sections 800 et seq. and case law interpreting those statutory provisions, the statute of limitations to bring a prosecution under this ordinance will be tolled until three years following discovery of the offense. The proposed ordinance also authorizes civil remedies, including a private right of action, fee-shifting provisions, and treble damages for willful violations.", "Staff recommends continuing discussions and negotiations with Los Angeles County for enforcement, as well as initiating an education and outreach campaign through local community organizations and marketing specialists. The City currently works with Los Angeles County on some areas of enforcement currently. The County has considerable experience investigating a diverse array of constituent complaints, and staff believes that, compared to the City of Los Angeles, the County has better capacity to oversee both workers its own workforce (the unincorporated areas of the County) and workers within the City of Santa Monica. While contracting with the City of Los Angeles provides a more seamless geographical match with the jurisdiction that surrounds Santa Monica on three sides, Santa Monica would represent a tiny fraction of LA\u2019s scope. Contracting with the County would be more likely to result in a collaborative partnership. The County plans to do complaint-based and targeted investigation, which is consistent with ROC LA and UCLA Labor Center recommendations for effective outreach. Upon Council approval, staff would propose a budget for the 2016-17 fiscal year and return with a request for authorization of a contract with Los Angeles County for enforcement. As part of any agreement, staff anticipates that the City would handle any complaints that are particularly complex or that require prosecution. This could mean additional work for the City\u2019s attorneys, hearing officers, and support staff.", "Staff recommends working with community organizations, and is requesting $80,000 initially for education and outreach, based on the amount that San Francisco allocates annually. With Council approval, staff would issue a request for proposals for outreach, education, and marketing services, with the goal of beginning the outreach and education campaign in early spring 2016. Staff envisions contributing to LA County outreach and education contracts, which would expand these efforts to cover Santa Monica in a regional approach. The City and County could also collaborate in supporting community-based organization\u2019s work to identify incidents of wage theft and other violations.", "Staff would monitor the outreach and enforcement approach for effectiveness, and could adjust the contract or change the plan if necessary. Partnering with LA County would satisfy the need for dedicated staff to focus on wage enforcement, and would provide flexibility to adjust funding and resources based on activity.", "With community partners, staff also recommends researching incentive programs and other ways to reward businesses that provide strong employee wages and benefits, similar to the City\u2019s Healthy Nail Salons program and the Office of Sustainability energy efficiency awards.", "Alternative. The City could establish an internal wage enforcement function. This would require additional code enforcement, public information, attorney, staff support, and hearing officer time. This approach could potentially provide more focused time on Santa Monica businesses, and the City would have more direct control over any investigations. Also, Code Enforcement staff already has an established system in place for tracking of enforcement actions and integration with the City Attorney\u2019s Office for both administrative and criminal proceedings. However, there is little data to understand the potential workload and cost associated with this task, the approach would not take advantage of existing capacity at the County level, and it could be challenging to establish in the short time span.", "Comparison to LA ordinance", "Since the initial report to Council on September 29, 2015, staff has noted the importance of adopting an ordinance similar to that of Los Angeles to avoid regional market distortion and facilitate compliance and enforcement. From conversations with LA County and based on careful consideration, staff believes that the differences between the proposed ordinance and those adopted by the City of Los Angeles and Los Angeles County will not be detrimental to regional coordination. In some cases, the ways in which Santa Monica\u2019s proposed ordinance differs from these laws will make enforcement and compliance simpler. For example, in adopting a hotel wage with no tiers, and in strengthening noticing requirements. In the case of seasonal exemption, the Santa Monica proposed ordinance provides a learner exemption that is similar to existing State. Moreover, the accrual rate proposed for paid time off matches the accrual rate under State law. In areas where the City of Los Angeles has yet to make a determination, it is possible that Santa Monica\u2019s ordinance can serve as a model.", "Wage Laws in Santa Monica", "If Council adopts the proposed minimum wage and hotel wage, Santa Monica will have three wage levels in effect: (1) the living wage, applying to city contracts of $54,200 or greater ($15.37 per hour); (2) the minimum wage, applying to most business and reaching $15 per hour for all non-hotel businesses by 2021; and (3) a hotel wage, reaching $15.37 per hour in 2017 for all hotel workers. Each of these wages includes an annual inflation increase, such that without a change to any law, the City will maintain three different wage levels indefinitely. Staff recommends reviewing wage laws periodically to assess opportunities for synchronizing them, potentially following 2021 when all will approach a similar level.", "The proposed ordinance includes data reporting requirements related to the ordinance. If the ordinance is adopted, staff would report to Council within the first 12 months of implementation of the local minimum wage law. Given this is a relatively new and untested realm of public policy and that there will also be greater national experience and research by the fall of 2017, a data-driven approach to effectively and equitably meet the law\u2019s objectives may suggest future modifications.", "Financial Impacts & Budget Actions", "Increasing the City\u2019s minimum wage could impact the City\u2019s expenditures and revenue in a variety of areas. In the near term, staff anticipates incurring expenses related to outreach and enforcement.", "Approving the recommendation to move forward with marketing and outreach requires a one-time appropriation in the amount of $80,000. The appropriation will be included in the FY 2015-16 Midyear Budget for Council approval. Staff expects to award grants in spring 2016, and will request additional funding if necessary.", "Approving the recommendation to contract with Los Angeles County will require an additional appropriation. The amount is not available at this time, and will depend on the Los Angeles County proposal and types of services requested. Staff will pursue marketing and outreach contracts, and will request additional funding if necessary.", "Implementing the recommendation could also affect sales, transient occupancy, and other tax revenue related to the economic activity of the City. Staff will monitor these areas, and report to Council on any revenue changes along with its biannual financial status updates. Staff will also generally monitor implementation of the ordinance and return to Council if there is evidence of significant economic impacts.", "In addition to the recommended report on the first year of implementation, staff is committed to ongoing review of this policy and its impact on employment, businesses, and general welfare. Where appropriate, and particularly where it can be combined with other data collection (like the annual resident survey), staff will assess impact of the minimum wage and report to Council on these impacts, including recommendations for changes if required."]}], [{"Title": "Potential New Local Funding Sources for Affordable Housing", "Department": "Housing Division, Housing and Economic Development", "Sponsors": "Director Gigi Decavalles-Hughes", "Category": "08. Administrative Item", "Recommendations": "Staff recommends that the City Council:1. Review, comment, and provide direction regarding a report prepared by the Housing Commission regarding potential sources of funding for affordable housing;2. Review, comment, and provide direction regarding a narrowed list of potential sources of financing for affordable housing, and3. Authorize the City Manager to negotiate and execute a first modification to professional services agreement No. 10141 in the amount of $40,000 with Goodwin Simon Strategic Research, a California-based company, to conduct a resident survey to gauge support for various potential affordable housing funding strategies, resulting in a four-year amended agreement with a total amount not to exceed $123,400.", "Body": ["Executive Summary", "In August 2015, Council identified \u201cmaintaining an inclusive and diverse community\u201d as one of its top Strategic Goals and later held a study session reaffirming its long-term commitment to a robust affordable housing program. Concurrently, the Housing Commission has concluded a year-long community discussion regarding funding for affordable housing with a report and recommendations to Council. The Commission\u2019s recommendations include potential new funding sources that would require voterapproval. In order to assess voter opinions regarding potential funding sources, staff recommends a contract modification in the amount of $40,000 for the City\u2019s contracted survey research firm, Goodwin Simon Strategic Research, to complete a telephone survey to assess resident support.", "Background", "Santa Monica has a long history of supporting social equity, housing affordability, and community inclusivity. Santa Monica voters have expressed their support for housing affordability through a series of voter-approved initiatives, starting in 1979 with the adoption of rent control and continuing through 2010 with the adoption of Citywide eviction protections. However, local measures to support affordability and inclusivity in Santa Monica have been undermined by state actions, including legislation allowing for vacancy decontrol of rent-controlled apartments and removal of rent-controlled apartments, as well as the 2012 elimination of the Santa Monica Redevelopment Agency, the City\u2019s primary funding source for the production and preservation of low\u2011income housing. Over the past five years, approximately 400 to 550 long-term, rent-controlled apartments have gone to market rents each year. Without a stable source of financing for affordable housing, there has been a significant diminution in the tools available to the City to combat the loss of housing that is affordable to low- and moderate-income households.", "In November 2014, Santa Monica voters considered a ballot measure to increase the local documentary transfer tax, as well as a companion measure to direct all funds toward affordable housing if the transfer tax increase was approved. In considering whether to place a measure on the November 2014 ballot, the City completed a telephone survey of likely Santa Monica voters (Attachment A.) The polling results showed strong support for affordable housing and majority support for an increase in the documentary transfer tax. At the ballot box, a majority of voters supported directing funds toward affordable housing, though the transfer tax increase failed to receive majority support. As a result, the City is left without a significant, stable source of funding for affordable housing, thereby impacting the City\u2019s ability to maintain inclusivity and diversity. At its August 23, 2015 retreat, the City Council reaffirmed its support for affordable housing by identifying \u201cmaintaining an inclusive and diverse community\u201d as one of its top strategic goals.", "At its August 25, 2015 meeting, Council held a study session (Attachment B) regarding the current state of housing affordability in Santa Monica, as well as various approaches to creating a local funding source for affordable housing. A summary of the potential funding sources presented at the study session is outlined in the table below.", "POTENTIAL SOURCES OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING FUNDING", "Funding Source", "Description", "Revenue Estimate (yr.)", "General Fund", "Reduction in other programs to support affordable housing", "Would depend on cuts", "Transit Occupancy Tax", "Tax on hotel stays; currently 14%", "~ $3M for each 1% increase", "Documentary Transfer Tax", "Taxes transfers of real estate; currently $3 per $1,000 of sale value", "~ $2.4 Million for each $1.50 increase in transfer tax", "Utility User Tax", "Tax on utility use such as gas, electric, phone, etc.; currently 10%", "~ $3 Million for each 1% increase", "General Obligation Bond", "Property tax surcharge", "$220/year per property for 30 years = $100 Million bond", "Parcel Tax", "Property tax surcharge", "$334/year per property = $8 Million annually", "Sales Tax", "Tax on retail goods; currently 9.5%", "~ $7.5 Million for each \u00bc% increase", "Parking Tax", "Tax on parking fees; currently 10%", "~ $1 Million for each 1% increase", "Council comments during the study session questioned the feasibility or value of certain of the proposals, including questioning whether a general obligation bond or parcel tax could meet the required two-thirds voter approval threshold and whether they should be preserved for capital improvements (in the case of GO bonds) and school funding (in the case of parcel taxes.) Council expressed interest in continuing to explore the other identified options.", "At its August 25, 2015 study session, Council also initiated a discussion of appropriate long-term goals with respect to the preservation and production of affordable housing. One goal that appealed to several Council and community members was to match the annual loss of affordability on 400 to 550 long-term, rent-controlled apartments with the preservation or production of deed-restricted affordable housing. The goal is tempered by the sobering reality that local gap financing for 400 to 550 affordable homes is estimated to range from $140 million per year (estimated gap financing for new construction of 400 deed-restricted homes) to $275 million per year (estimated gap financing for preservation of 550 existing apartments.) Given that the total General Fund budget is less than $350 million in FY 15/16, the laudable goal appears unachievable.", "During 2015, the Housing Commission focused its efforts on receiving broad input regarding the community\u2019s support for affordable housing and possible funding mechanisms to achieve affordable housing preservation and production. TheCommission hosted a series of meetings, including presentations from local experts, to understand the historical efforts and achievements of Santa Monica\u2019s affordable housing policy and programs, as well as the current dilemma regarding the need for affordable housing and lack of funding sources. The Commission also created several opportunities for the community-at-large to provide input regarding the type and scope of affordable housing in Santa Monica, including a special weekend meeting.  TheHousing Commission\u2019s efforts culminated in a report to Council (AttachmentC).", "Discussion", "The Housing Commission\u2019s report addresses measures to help low-income Santa Monica residents stay in their rent-controlled apartments, as well as strategies to protect and expand the supply of deed-restricted affordable housing, including policy and program recommendations that do not require City funding.", "Housing Commission Report", "Given Santa Monica\u2019s high housing costs, the Housing Commission recognizes that there is a mismatch between housing costs and the ability to pay for housing even among households whose incomes exceed the median for the region. However, the Commission recommends that the Council first focus its efforts on the lower-income members of the community, given the extremely limited supply of housing in Santa Monica that is affordable to such households and the disproportionate likelihood that such households are severely rent\u2011burdened. The Commission intends to spend the coming year evaluating options to address the housing needs of moderate-income households.", "With respect to helping residents stay in their rent-controlled housing, the Commission recommends that the City continue its efforts to protect tenants from harassment. TheCommission also recommends a pilot program to provide rental assistance to low-income residents of rent-controlled apartments whose housing costs may force them tovacate their homes.", "With respect to existing programs, the Commission recommends strengthening monitoring of deed-restricted housing, increased efforts to connect local residents and workers with affordable housing, careful monitoring of expiring affordability requirements on existing housing, pursuing affordable housing on City-owned land, and maximizing inclusionary affordable housing associated with market-rate housing. Regarding new programs and policies, the Commission recommends incentivizing affordable auxiliary dwelling units, as well as exploration of private-market approaches to preserving existing housing for affordability.", "Housing Commission Report: Affordable Housing Financing", "The Commission recognizes that maintaining Santa Monica\u2019s inclusive and diverse identity will require the City to continue to fund the preservation and production of affordable housing. The Commission also recognizes that trying to replace all long-term rent-controlled housing by preserving or producing deed-restricted housing is beyond the City\u2019s means. As a result, the Commission recommended that the City work to stem the tide by returning, at minimum, to funding approximately $15 million per year in housing, as was done prior to the dissolution of redevelopment. The Commission anticipates that local funds will continue to leverage outside funding sources, including low-income housing tax credits, California Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities grants, county funds, and other programs that are being considered at the state and countylevels. With respect to new funding sources, the Commission recommends that the City combine some repurposing of existing General Funds with the creation of a new General Fund revenue source. Regarding existing General Funds, the Commission recommends that the Council establish a policy to dedicate $7.5 million per year, or approximately two percent of the General Fund, toward affordable housing. Commission discussion and community input on the matter looked at the City budget cuts that were implemented as a result of the Great Recession, which resulted in minimal impacts on City services.", "Regarding new revenue sources requiring voter approval, the Commission report focuses on three primary measures:", "Potential Funding Sources", "Staff agrees with the Housing Commission regarding the funding sources that hold the greatest potential. The following are key considerations with respect to the potential funding sources.", "\u00b7 General Fund: The General Fund portion of the FY2015-16 budget is $348 million. Reallocating two percent of that amount would provide approximately $7 million. Theprojected five percent variation between revenues and expenditures in the FY 13/15 Budget was addressed by cutting approximately two percent in departmental operating budgets, cutting one percent from the capital improvement budget, and increasing revenues by two percent from new and increased fees. Over the long run, reallocating another two percent of the budget toward affordable housing could begin to impact existing programs or services. In the near term, however, staff believes that Council could allocate funds, in the amounts recommended by the Housing Commission, toward affordable housing without significant reductions in other programs. Doing so would require a Council policy decision to allocate all funds received by the City, from repayment of loans made to the former Redevelopment Agency, toward affordable housing. InNovember 2015, the California Department of Finance approved the repayment of a City/Agency loan with an outstanding balance of over $36 million. Theloan is expected to be repaid over the next four to five fiscal years. The annual repayment, combined with the $1.2 million that Council has directed to be allocated to affordable housing annually from redevelopment residual funds received by the City (i.e. redevelopment \u201cboomerang\u201d funds), would meet or exceed the $7.5 million annual amount recommended by the Housing Commission over the next four to five years. In the longer-term, once the City/Agency loan is repaid, reductions in other programs or designation of General Fund revenue growth toward affordable housing would be necessary to maintain the pace of funding.", "\u00b7 Sales Tax: A sales tax increase requires majority voter approval. Each quarter-percent increase results in approximately $7.5 million of additional revenue to theCity. The City\u2019s current sales tax rate, including the transaction and use tax adopted by voters in 2010, is 9.5 percent. The maximum allowed sales tax rate in California is 10 percent. If the County electorate adopts a sales tax increase to support transit on the same ballot that a sales tax increase is adopted in Santa Monica, both sales tax increases would be valid, though there could be voter antipathy toward two sales tax increases on the same ballot.  Currently, fewer than ten cities in California have sales tax rates of 10 percent. Culver City\u2019s rate of 9.5 percent matches Santa Monica\u2019s, while the cities of Los Angeles and Beverly Hills impose rates of 9.0 percent. Some community members have advocated for a one-half percent sales tax increase in Santa Monica, with a companion measure that asks Council to allocate 50 percent of the funding toward school maintenance. The advocacy reflects concern that while approved school bonds are financing new and renovated school facilities, funding for maintenance of existing school facilities continues to be a challenge. Sales tax ballot measures in a variety of California communities over the last several years have largely been successful.  However, there could be concern among local voters that the local sales tax was increased four years ago.", "\u00b7 Documentary Transfer Tax: An increase in the documentary transfer tax, a one-time tax paid upon sale of a property, requires majority voter approval. Every $1.50 increase in the documentary transfer tax is expected to raise approximately $2.4 million per year, though transfer tax receipts are extremely volatile in any year. For example, over the last six years, transfer tax receipts have ranged from a high of $7.9 million to a low of $2.7 million.  Santa Monica\u2019s current tax rate is $3 per $1,000 of sale value, in addition to the County rate of $1.10 per $1,000. While some Northern California cities have transfer tax rates of up to $15 per $1,000 of sale value (including a San Francisco rate that goes up to $25 per $1,000), the rates in Culver City and Los Angeles are $4.50 per $1,000, while Beverly Hills maintains the general County rate of $1.10 per $1,000. Polling of Santa Monica residents during April 2014 (Attachment A) indicated majority support for a transfer tax increase, as well as using the increased revenues for affordable housing. However, in November2014, Santa Monica voters rejected an increase in the documentary transfer tax, following a well-funded opposition campaign by the California Association of Realtors.", "\u00b7 Construction Tax: Imposing a construction tax would require majority voter approval. The idea entails applying a surcharge based on the valuation of property improvements associated with building permits. For example, if the total valuation of a new construction project was $1 million and the construction tax rate was onepercent, the surcharge would be $10,000. Building permit valuations fluctuate significantly from year to year. For example, over the past five years, annual permit valuation has ranged from approximately $250 million to nearly $390million, meaning that receipts from a construction tax could be volatile. TheHousing Commission report recommends a rate of five percent, with an exemption for single-family improvements. The City Attorney\u2019s Office is investigating possible legal obstacles to implementing a construction tax, including any limitations on applying the tax to multifamily development and any restrictions on double taxation, as most construction projects pay sales taxes on materials. If a five-percent construction tax had been applied to commercial construction (including tenant improvements) over the past five years, theexpected annual receipts would have ranged from a high of $12 million to a low of $3.6 million, with an average of $6.8 million per year.", "Other potential revenue measures are not recommended as prime candidates at this time for the following reasons:", "\u00b7 Transient Occupancy Tax: While increasing a tax that is charged only to visitors provides appeal at the ballot box, each one percentage point is estimated to raise approximately $3 million per year, well below the goals identified by the Housing Commission. The hotel industry could wage a fierce battle against a potential measure, particularly in the same year that Council is expected to adopt a hotel living wage.", "\u00b7 Utility User Tax: Tax receipts are gradually declining as use and telecommunication services eligible for the tax decline. In addition, aone percentage point increase is estimated to raise approximately $3 million per year, well below the goals identified by the Housing Commission.", "\u00b7 General Obligation Bond: While a General Obligation Bond creates the opportunity for an immediate infusion of money into the Housing Trust Fund, past polling has shown that the two-thirds voter threshold is likely too high to achieve success.", "\u00b7 Parcel Tax: Similar to a General Obligation Bond, the two-thirds voter threshold would be very difficult to surpass.", "\u00b7 Parking Tax: As a large portion of the parking tax is raised from City parking facilities, an increase in the parking tax would simply shift City revenues. In addition, a very large increase in the tax would be required to meet the Housing Commission\u2019s goals.", "Survey of Santa Monica Voters", "Community support for the various funding mechanisms can be gauged through polling. For example, a poll could test support for a sales tax increase compared with support for implementation of a construction tax. The recommended poll would survey 600 Santa Monica voters. A split survey is proposed in order to gauge reactions to the different potential ballot measures.", "The poll could also gauge voter preferences regarding the use of new City proceeds. For example, the three primary ways to support affordable housing are direct rental subsidies, new construction, and acquisition and rehabilitation of existing buildings. Although a broad and robust affordable housing program includes all three components, the proposed resident survey could gauge resident support for the different elements of the program.", "The survey could also gauge support for homeownership assistance programming as another potential use of any new affordable housing funding. The housing measure that was recently approved by San Francisco voters included homeownership assistance and it could be useful to understand whether such assistance resonates with Santa Monica residents.", "Finally, the City\u2019s survey research firm cautions against asking about too many funding sources or too many programs, as the survey would need to be of a manageable length in order to find participants and its reliability would be increased with fewer options. Ideally, the report would ask questions regarding two potential funding sources, rather than three. In that regard, staff recommends that the survey focus on the sales tax increase and the imposition of a construction tax, given that the 2014 election showed that the documentary transfer tax is difficult for many voters to understand and that there is a well-funded organization ready to fight the increase.", "Vendor/Consultant Selection", "In late 2014, the City issued a request for proposals seeking a public opinion and research consulting firm to conduct the citywide telephone survey. Following review of proposals by an interdepartmental evaluation committee, on July 28, 2015, Council authorized the City Manager to negotiate and execute an agreement with Goodwin Simon Strategic Research to complete two citywide surveys over the next four years. Given the firm\u2019s familiarity with Santa Monica, as well as the need to coordinate the regular citywide survey with the proposed revenue survey, staff recommends an amendment to the existing contract with Goodwin Simon.", "Next Steps", "With Council approval, the polling of residents regarding support for various funding sources and affordable housing approaches would be anticipated to occur during February or March of 2016. Staff would then return to Council with results of the polling and recommended strategies, including a potential revenue measure for the November2016 ballot. November 2016 may be an ideal juncture for voters to consider a potential measure, given that it is a presidential election that is expected to yield high voter turnout, which typically produces more progressive voting in Santa Monica.", "With Council support, staff would continue to review the other recommendations included in the Housing Commission staff report and return to Council with recommendations as part of the upcoming budget preparation process.", "Financial Impacts and Budget Actions", "The proposed contract modification with Goodwin Simon Strategic Research is for an amount not to exceed $40,000.  Funds are available in the FY 2015-16 budget at account SO015202.589000."]}], [{"Title": "Appointment to one annual vacancy on the Clean Beaches and Ocean Parcel Tax Citizens Oversight Committee for a term ending on 12/31/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Commission on the Status of Women for a term ending on 06/30/2016.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Commission on the Status of Women for a term ending on 6/30/2017.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Appointment to one unscheduled vacancy on the Social Services Commission for a term ending on 6/30/2016.", "Department": "City Clerk 13-Items", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}, {"Title": "Request of Mayor Pro Tem Winterer and Councilmember McKeown that Council direct staff to explore expanded Ellis and other involuntary relocation protections for households which include school-age children, similar to the augmented protections afforded seniors and persons with disabilities, to avoid the trauma to vulnerable young people of unanticipated forced dislocation and re-enrollment in the middle of a school year", "Department": "Records & Elections Services Department", "Sponsors": null, "Category": "13. Councilmember Discussion Items"}]]}